Massachusetts, session 194th, H5555.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. To provide for the operations of the several departments, boards,
commissions and institutions of the commonwealth and other services of the commonwealth and
for certain permanent improvements and to meet certain requirements of law, the sums set forth
in this act, for the several purposes and subject to the conditions specified, are hereby
appropriated from the General Fund unless specifically designated otherwise, subject to the laws
regulating the disbursement of public funds and the approval thereof for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2027. All sums appropriated under this act, including supplemental and deficiency
budgets, shall be expended in a manner reflecting and encouraging a policy of nondiscrimination
and equal opportunity for members of minority groups, women and persons with a disability. All

officials and employees of an agency, board, department, commission or division receiving funds
under this act shall take affirmative steps to ensure equality of opportunity in the internal affairs
of state government and in their relations with the public, including those persons and
organizations doing business with the commonwealth. Each agency, board, department,
commission and division of the commonwealth, in spending appropriated sums and discharging
its statutory responsibilities, shall adopt measures to ensure equal opportunity in the areas of
hiring, promotion, demotion or transfer, recruitment, layoff or termination, rates of
compensation, in-service or apprenticeship training programs and all other terms and conditions
of employment.
SECTION 1A. In accordance with Articles LXIII and CVII of the Articles of
Amendment to the Constitution of the Commonwealth and section 6D of chapter 29 of the
General Laws, it is hereby declared that the amounts of revenue set forth in this section, by
source, for the respective funds of the commonwealth for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027
are necessary and sufficient to provide the means to defray the appropriations and expenditures
from such funds for fiscal year 2027 as set forth and authorized in this act. The comptroller shall
keep a distinct account of actual receipts from each such source by each such fund to furnish the
executive office for administration and finance and the house and senate committees on ways
and means with quarterly statements comparing those receipts with the projected receipts set
forth in this section and shall include a full statement comparing the actual and projected receipts
in the annual report for fiscal year 2027 pursuant to section 12 of chapter 7A of the General
Laws. The quarterly and annual reports shall also include detailed statements of any other
sources of revenue for the budgeted funds in addition to those specified in this section.

All Commonwealth Other
General Other
Revenue Source Budgeted Transportation Major
Fund Funds
Funds Fund Funds
Alcoholic Beverages $96.5 $96.5 $0.0 $0.0 $0.0
Banks $19.0 $19.0 $0.0 $0.0 $0.0
Cigarettes $225.2 $225.2 $0.0 $0.0 $0.0
Corporations $3,383.1 $3,383.1 $0.0 $0.0 $0.0
Deeds $411.6 $411.6 $0.0 $0.0 $0.0
Fair Share Income Surtax $2,700.0 $2,150.0 $550.0 $0.0 $0.0
Income $25,621.0 $25,621.0 $0.0 $0.0 $0.0
Inheritance and Estate $718.9 $718.9 $0.0 $0.0 $0.0
Insurance $783.9 $756.9 $0.0 $0.0 $27.0
Marijuana Excise $193.9 $0.0 $0.0 $193.9 $0.0
Motor Fuel $697.8 $0.0 $696.9 $0.0 $0.9
Public Utilities $0.0 $0.0 $0.0 $0.0 $0.0
Room Occupancy $259.3 $259.3 $0.0 $0.0 $0.0
Sales - Regular $6,827.9 $4,506.9 $0.0 $0.0 $2,321.0
Sales - Meals $1,750.9 $1,750.9 $0.0 $0.0 $0.0
Sales - Motor Vehicles $1,198.7 $0.0 $791.2 $0.0 $407.5
Miscellaneous $12.9 $12.9 $0.0 $0.0 $0.0
Fiscal Year 2027 Base Tax Revenue Estimate $44,900.5 $39,912.1 $2,038.2 $193.9 $2,756.4
Statutory Tax Transfers
Annual Contribution to the State Pension System -$5,130.5 -$5,130.5 $0.0 $0.0 $0.0
Sales Tax Transfer to the MBTA -$1,444.3 $0.0 $0.0 $0.0 -$1,444.3
Sales Tax Transfer to the MSBA -$1,284.3 $0.0 $0.0 $0.0 -$1,284.3
UI Surcharge to the Workforce Training Trust Fund -$27.0 $0.0 $0.0 $0.0 -$27.0
Fair Share Surtax to Education and Transportation Fund -$2,150.0 -$2,150.0 $0.0 $0.0 $0.0
Excess Capital Gains to the Disaster Relief Fund -$20.0 -$20.0 $0.0 $0.0 $0.0
Excess Capital Gains to the Stabilization Fund -$51.2 -$51.2 $0.0 $0.0 $0.0
Excess Capital Gains to State Pension System -$34.8 -$34.8 $0.0 $0.0 $0.0
Excess Capital Gains to the State Retiree Benefits Trust
-$150.0 -$150.0 $0.0 $0.0 $0.0
Fund
-
Total Statutory Tax Transfers -$7,536.5 $0.0 $0.0 -$2,755.5
$10,292.0
Total Fiscal Year 2027 Consensus Tax Revenue
$34,608.5 $32,375.5 $2,038.2 $193.9 $0.9
Available for Budget
Tax Initiatives and Other Tax Revenue
Tax-Related Settlements & Judgments $50.0 $50.0 $0.0 $0.0 $0.0
Federal Conformity Phase In $108.0 $108.0 $0.0 $0.0 $0.0
Pass-through Entity Excise Tax Expansion $296.0 $296.0 $0.0 $0.0 $0.0
Food Donation Tax Credit -$5.5 -$5.5 $0.0 $0.0 $0.0
Sustainable Aviation Fuel Tax Credit -$10.0 -$10.0 $0.0 $0.0 $0.0
Housing Production Sales Tax Credit -$17.5 -$17.5 $0.0 $0.0 $0.0

Total Tax Initiatives and Other Tax Revenue $421.0 $421.0 $0.0 $0.0 $0.0
Total Taxes for Budget $35,029.5 $32,796.5 $2,038.2 $193.9 $0.9
Non-Tax Revenue
Federal Reimbursements $15,846.6 $15,838.2 $0.0 $0.0 $8.4
Departmental Revenues $6,550.8 $5,766.0 $719.0 $53.6 $12.2
Consolidated Transfers $5,190.6 $2,502.6 $90.7 $292.5 $2,304.9
Total Non-Tax Revenue $27,588.0 $24,106.7 $809.7 $346.1 $2,325.5
Fiscal Year 2027 Grand Total $62,617.5 $56,903.3 $2,847.9 $539.9 $2,326.4
SECTION 1B. The comptroller shall keep a distinct account of actual receipts of non-tax revenues by each
department, board, commission or institution to furnish the executive office for administration and finance and
the house and senate committees on ways and means with quarterly statements comparing those receipts with
projected receipts set forth in this section and to include a full statement comparing those receipts with projected
receipts in the annual report for the fiscal year pursuant to section 12 of chapter 7A of the General Laws. The
quarterly and annual reports shall also include detailed statements of any other sources of revenue for the
budgeted funds in addition to those sources specified in this section.
Non-Tax Revenue: Department Federal Departmental Budgeted Total Total
Summary Revenues Revenues Transfers Unrestricted Restricted
Judiciary
Supreme Judicial Court $0 $2,237,901 $0 $2,237,901 $0
Committee for Public Counsel $0 $3,038,139 $0 $3,038,139 $0
Appeals Court $0 $284,765 $0 $284,765 $0
Trial Court $0 $65,745,420 $0 $65,745,420 $0
Total $0 $71,306,225 $0 $71,306,225 $0
District Attorneys
Middlesex District Attorney's Office $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
Worcester District Attorney's Office $0 $5,000 $0 $5,000 $0
Plymouth District Attorney's Office $0 $100,000 $0 $100,000 $0
Total $0 $105,000 $0 $105,000 $0
Secretary of the Commonwealth
Secretary of the Commonwealth $0 $311,026,204 $0 $310,511,204 $515,000
Total $0 $311,026,204 $0 $310,511,204 $515,000
Treasurer and Receiver General
Office of the Treasurer $0 $495,521,218 $473,116,352 $938,287,570 $30,350,000
Massachusetts Cultural Council $0 $21,597 $0 $21,597 $0
State Lottery Commission $0 $30,887 $1,321,596,996 $1,321,627,883 $0
Total $0 $495,573,702 $1,794,713,348 $2,259,937,050 $30,350,000

Attorney General
Office of the Attorney General $5,979,752 $59,857,051 $0 $58,347,250 $7,489,553
Total $5,979,752 $59,857,051 $0 $58,347,250 $7,489,553
State Ethics Commission
State Ethics Commission $0 $150,000 $0 $150,000 $0
Total $0 $150,000 $0 $150,000 $0
Inspector General
Office of the Inspector General $0 $1,680,000 $0 $0 $1,680,000
Total $0 $1,680,000 $0 $0 $1,680,000
Office of Campaign and Political
Finance
Office of Campaign and Political
Finance $0 $79,500 $0 $79,500 $0
Total $0 $79,500 $0 $79,500 $0
Massachusetts Commission
Against Discrimination
Massachusetts Commission Against
Discrimination $0 $360,327 $0 $35,007 $325,320
Total $0 $360,327 $0 $35,007 $325,320
Office of the State Comptroller
Office of the State Comptroller $0 $98,592,914 $2,294,995,802 $2,393,588,716 $0
Total $0 $98,592,914 $2,294,995,802 $2,393,588,716 $0
Massachusetts Gaming
Commission
Massachusetts Gaming Commission $0 $0 $372,395,024 $372,395,024 $0
Total $0 $0 $372,395,024 $372,395,024 $0
Cannabis Control Commission
Cannabis Control Commission $0 $23,569,523 $0 $23,569,523 $0
Total $0 $23,569,523 $0 $23,569,523 $0
Executive Office for
Administration and Finance
Secretary of Administration and
Finance $0 $151,108,130 $183,000,000 $334,108,130 $0
Division of Capital Asset
Management & Maintenance $0 $4,644,339 $9,695,826 $4,638,339 $9,701,826
Civil Service Commission $0 $12,500 $0 $12,500 $0
Group Insurance Commission $0 $1,328,690,159 $409,862,157 $1,736,205,695 $2,346,621
Division of Administrative Law
Appeals $0 $70,000 $0 $0 $70,000
Department of Revenue $56,017,558 $217,431,963 $0 $266,682,270 $6,767,251
Appellate Tax Board $0 $2,985,306 $0 $2,585,306 $400,000
Human Resources Division $0 $1,235,830 $0 $1,235,830 $0
Operational Services Division $0 $30,161,252 $0 $12,919,301 $17,241,951
Total $56,017,558 $1,736,339,479 $602,557,983 $2,358,387,371 $36,527,649
Executive Office of Technology
Services and Security
Executive Office of Technology
Services and Security $0 $2,733,931 $0 $0 $2,733,931

Total $0 $2,733,931 $0 $0 $2,733,931
Executive Office of Energy and
Environmental Affairs
Executive Office of Energy &
Environmental Affairs $25,000 $5,051,342 $0 $4,386,342 $690,000
Department of Public Utilities $0 $47,575,779 $0 $47,575,779 $0
Department of Environmental
Protection $0 $36,332,145 $0 $30,440,593 $5,891,552
Department of Fish and Game $8,420,000 $14,033,313 $1,945,000 $23,930,324 $467,989
Department of Agricultural
Resources $0 $6,828,571 $0 $6,828,571 $0
Department of Conservation and
Recreation $0 $32,099,974 $0 $32,099,974 $0
Department of Energy Resources $0 $9,939,456 $0 $9,939,456 $0
Total $8,445,000 $151,860,580 $1,945,000 $155,201,039 $7,049,541
Executive Office of Health and
Human Services
Department of Veterans' Services $0 $765,484 $0 $5,484 $760,000
Secretary of Health and Human
Services $12,659,697,415 $2,099,364,010 $16,000,000 $14,460,061,425 $315,000,000
Mass Commission for the Blind $5,289,456 $191,736 $0 $5,481,192 $0
Massachusetts Rehabilitation
Commission $8,289,128 $77,310 $0 $8,366,438 $0
Mass Commission for the Deaf $261,584 $3,500 $0 $265,084 $0
Chelsea Soldiers' Home $16,480,848 $2,654,195 $0 $18,635,043 $500,000
Holyoke Soldiers' Home $8,687,722 $2,321,163 $0 $8,008,885 $3,000,000
Department of Youth Services $4,301,146 $288,293 $0 $4,589,439 $0
Department of Transitional
Assistance $461,336,421 $1,121,427 $19,075,578 $481,533,426 $0
Department of Public Health $234,718,961 $118,651,416 $1,000,000 $150,622,109 $203,748,268
Department of Children and Families $381,226,989 $3,143,392 $700,000 $377,927,850 $7,142,531
Department of Mental Health $169,871,904 $22,522,218 $0 $192,269,122 $125,000
Department of Developmental
Services $1,245,579,965 $4,394,397 $0 $1,249,974,362 $0
Department of Elder Affairs $235,246,726 $1,434,850 $0 $236,681,576 $0
Total $15,430,988,265 $2,256,933,391 $36,775,578 $17,194,421,435 $530,275,799
Health Policy Commission
Health Policy Commission $0 $11,148,300 $0 $11,148,300 $0
Total $0 $11,148,300 $0 $11,148,300 $0
Center for Health Information and
Analysis
Center for Health Information and
Analysis $0 $37,277,886 $0 $37,277,886 $0
Total $0 $37,277,886 $0 $37,277,886 $0
Board of Library Commissioners
Board of Library Commissioners $0 $15,039 $0 $15,039 $0
Total $0 $15,039 $0 $15,039 $0
Executive Office of Economic
Development

Office of Consumer Affairs and
Business Regulation $0 $1,957,300 $0 $859,553 $1,097,747
Division of Banks $0 $49,135,127 $0 $47,635,127 $1,500,000
Division of Insurance $0 $160,432,868 $0 $160,432,868 $0
Division of Professional Licensure $0 $38,798,307 $0 $18,598,766 $20,199,541
Division of Standards $0 $5,622,089 $0 $4,718,528 $903,561
Department of Telecommunications
and Cable $0 $5,308,611 $0 $5,308,611 $0
Massachusetts Office of Business
Development $0 $1,194,528 $0 $1,194,528 $0
Massachusetts Office of Travel and
Tourism $0 $0 $5,343,355 $5,343,355 $0
Total $0 $262,448,830 $5,343,355 $244,091,336 $23,700,849
Executive Office of Housing and
Livable Communities
Housing and Livable Communities $0 $7,063,538 $0 $3,412,477 $3,651,061
Total $0 $7,063,538 $0 $3,412,477 $3,651,061
Executive Office of Labor and
Workforce Development
Labor and Workforce Development $0 $3,083,693 $23,786,462 $26,415,727 $454,428
Total $0 $3,083,693 $23,786,462 $26,415,727 $454,428
Executive Office of Education
Department of Early Education and
Care $301,527,830 $4,517,760 $0 $305,525,590 $520,000
Department of Elementary and
Secondary Education $0 $7,508,998 $0 $4,888,116 $2,620,882
Department of Higher Education $0 $10,500,000 $0 $10,500,000 $0
University of Massachusetts $0 $110,000,000 $0 $110,000,000 $0
Bridgewater State College $0 $250,000 $0 $250,000 $0
Fitchburg State College $0 $425,000 $0 $425,000 $0
Framingham State College $0 $115,000 $0 $115,000 $0
Massachusetts College of Art and
Design $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
Massachusetts College of Liberal
Arts $0 $150,000 $0 $150,000 $0
Salem State College $0 $803,000 $0 $803,000 $0
Westfield State College $0 $625,000 $0 $625,000 $0
Worcester State College $0 $425,000 $0 $425,000 $0
Berkshire Community College $0 $291,150 $0 $291,150 $0
Bristol Community College $0 $298,275 $0 $298,275 $0
Cape Cod Community College $0 $288,750 $0 $288,750 $0
Greenfield Community College $0 $118,750 $0 $118,750 $0
Holyoke Community College $0 $451,608 $0 $451,608 $0
Mass Bay Community College $0 $520,000 $0 $520,000 $0
Massasoit Community College $0 $393,165 $0 $393,165 $0
Middlesex Community College $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
Mount Wachusett Community
College $0 $259,320 $0 $259,320 $0

Northern Essex Community College $0 $379,648 $0 $379,648 $0
North Shore Community College $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
Quinsigamond Community College $0 $101,423 $0 $101,423 $0
Springfield Technical Community
College $0 $780,000 $0 $780,000 $0
Roxbury Community College $0 $2,500,000 $0 $0 $2,500,000
Bunker Hill Community College $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
Total $301,527,830 $141,701,847 $0 $437,588,795 $5,640,882
Executive Office of Public Safety
and Security
Executive Office of Public Safety
and Security $0 $2,100,000 $0 $2,100,000 $0
Office of the Chief Medical
Examiner $0 $10,149,000 $0 $1,297,881 $8,851,119
Criminal History Systems Board $0 $30,746,070 $0 $24,929,150 $5,816,920
Department of State Police $1,935,922 $111,533,000 $0 $2,763,000 $110,705,922
Municipal Police Training Council $0 $2,800,000 $0 $0 $2,800,000
Department of Fire Services $0 $61,571,317 $0 $59,152,448 $2,418,869
Military Division $0 $1,900,000 $0 $0 $1,900,000
Emergency Management Agency $2,000,000 $0 $0 $2,000,000 $0
Department of Corrections $3,500,000 $6,013,000 $4,687,000 $0 $14,200,000
Total $7,435,922 $226,812,387 $4,687,000 $92,242,479 $146,692,830
Sheriffs
Hampden Sheriff's Office $1,035,000 $3,713,855 $0 $1,117,604 $3,631,251
Worcester Sheriff's Office $34,000 $20,000 $0 $54,000 $0
Middlesex Sheriff's Office $14,600 $210,338 $0 $49,938 $175,000
Hampshire Sheriff's Office $7,600 $8,223 $0 $15,823 $0
Berkshire Sheriff's Office $8,500 $1,800,214 $0 $208,714 $1,600,000
Franklin Sheriff's Office $206,863 $7,152 $0 $214,015 $0
Essex Sheriff's Office $29,200 $1,858,697 $0 $37,897 $1,850,000
Barnstable Sheriff's Office $0 $1,506,036 $0 $6,036 $1,500,000
Bristol Sheriff's Office $148,764 $257,215 $0 $405,979 $0
Dukes Sheriff's Office $0 $448,764 $0 $148,764 $300,000
Norfolk Sheriff's Office $357,229 $215,430 $0 $357,229 $215,430
Plymouth Sheriff's Office $34,341,845 $300,000 $0 $34,341,845 $300,000
Suffolk Sheriff's Office $0 $2,250,000 $0 $450,000 $1,800,000
Total $36,183,601 $12,595,924 $0 $37,407,844 $11,371,681
Massachusetts Department of
Transportation
Massachusetts Department of
Transportation $0 $638,502,672 $53,433,545 $691,936,217 $0
Total $0 $638,502,672 $53,433,545 $691,936,217 $0
Total Non-Tax Revenue $15,846,577,928 $6,550,817,943 $5,190,633,098 $26,779,570,445 $808,458,524

Conference Committee Report
SECTION 2.
JUDICIARY.
Supreme Judicial Court.
0320-0003 For the operation of the supreme judicial court, including the salaries of
the chief justice and the 6 associate justices .................................................... $12,684,430
0320-0010 For the operation of the clerk’s office of the supreme judicial court for
Suffolk county ...................................................................................................... $2,500,938
0321-0001 For the operation of the commission on judicial conduct .................................... $1,223,014
0321-0100 For the services of the board of bar examiners .................................................. $2,711,846
Committee for Public Counsel Services.
0321-1500 For the operation of the committee for public counsel services under
chapter 211D of the General Laws, including, but not limited to, payroll
costs of the committee’s public defenders, attorneys in charge and
appeals attorneys, including fringe benefit costs; provided, that the
committee shall maintain a system in which not less than 20 per cent of
indigent clients shall be represented by public defenders; provided further,
that to the extent feasible, the committee shall assign public defenders to
district and superior courts; provided further, that the committee shall
approve by majority vote any increase in the base salary or rate of
compensation for employees holding management positions, including,
but not limited to, chiefs, deputy chiefs, directors, assistant directors and
managers; provided further, that not later than December 2, 2026, the
committee shall submit a report to the executive office for administration
and finance and the house and senate committees on ways and means
that shall include, but not be limited to, the expected surplus or deficiency
of items 0321-1500, 0321-1510 and 0321-1520 for fiscal year 2027;
provided further, that not later than March 3, 2027, the committee shall
submit an annual report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means, which shall be compared with data from the current period to the
previous 2 fiscal years; and provided further, that the report shall include,
but not be limited to: (i) the number of cases handled by the committee in
each reporting period, delineated by public defender and private bar
advocate; (ii) the average number of hours spent per case by public
defenders; (iii) the number of public defenders currently employed by the
committee and the total number employed by the committee at the end of
each fiscal year, delineated by division; (iv) the number of public defender
vacancies to be filled; (v) the average cost for public defender services
rendered per case in the prior fiscal year; (vi) the number of cases
assigned to private bar advocates; (vii) the average number of hours billed
by private bar advocates; (viii) the average cost for private bar advocate
services rendered per case in the prior fiscal year; (ix) the billable hours of
private counsel, delineated by travel time and time spent in court, including
wait time and trial preparation time, including interview time, investigating
time and research time; (x) any changes to the private bar billing system
and any billing improvements that have been made; (xi) the total number

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
of support staff, investigators, attorneys in charge and management
personnel currently employed by the committee and the total number
employed by the committee at the end of each fiscal year for the previous
2 fiscal years; and (xii) a summary of all spending for psychologists,
psychiatrists and investigators, including the total number of hours billed,
the number of unique vendors and the average number of hours billed ........ $109,000,000
0321-1510 For compensation paid to private counsel assigned to criminal and civil
cases under subsection (b) of section 6 of chapter 211D of the General
Laws and under section 11 of said chapter 211D; provided, that not more
than $3,000,000 from this item shall be expended for services rendered
prior to fiscal year 2027 ................................................................................... $245,827,979
0321-1520 For fees and costs as defined in section 27A of chapter 261 of the General
Laws, as ordered by a justice of the appeals court or a justice of a
department of the trial court on behalf of persons who are indigent as
defined in said section 27A of said chapter 261; provided, that not more
than $2,000,000 from this item shall be expended for services rendered
prior to fiscal year 2027 ..................................................................................... $25,172,236
Massachusetts Legal Assistance Corporation.
0321-1600 For the Massachusetts Legal Assistance Corporation to provide legal
representation for indigent or otherwise disadvantaged residents of the
commonwealth; provided, that not later than February 2, 2027, the
corporation shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means using the most recent United States Census Bureau
population data available that shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the
number of persons assisted by the programs funded by the corporation in
the prior fiscal year; (ii) any proposed expansion of legal services,
delineated by type of service, target population and cost; and (iii) the total
number of indigent or otherwise disadvantaged residents who received
services from the corporation, delineated by type of case and geographic
location; provided further, that the corporation may contract with any
organization to provide representation; and provided further, that
notwithstanding the first paragraph of section 9 of chapter 221A of the
General Laws, funds shall be expended for the Disability Benefits Project,
the Medicare Advocacy Project and the Domestic Violence Legal
Assistance Project............................................................................................. $51,000,000
0321-1800 For the access to counsel program; provided, that funds may be expended
for costs associated with implementing the program; and provided further,
that, subject to appropriation, funds shall be distributed by the
Massachusetts Legal Assistance Corporation to designated non-profit
organizations to increase access to legal representation for low-income
tenants and low-income owner occupants in eviction proceedings ....................... $3,000,000
Mental Health Legal Advisors Committee.
0321-2000 For the operation of the mental health legal advisors committee and for
certain programs for the indigent mentally ill established in section 34E of
chapter 221 of the General Laws; provided, that funds shall be expended
for the operations of a satellite office in the western region of the
commonwealth .................................................................................................... $3,415,072

Conference Committee Report
Prisoners’ Legal Services.
0321-2100 For the expenses of Prisoners’ Legal Services .................................................. $3,370,268
New England Innocence Project.
0321-2200 For the expenses of the New England Innocence Project, Inc. to support
exonerees .............................................................................................................. $250,000
Social Law Library.
0321-2205 For the expenses of the social law library located in Suffolk county .................. $3,049,096
Appeals Court.
0322-0100 For the appeals court, including the salaries, traveling allowances and
expenses of the chief justice, recall justices and associate justices ................. $16,268,212
Trial Court.
0330-0101 For the salaries of the justices of the 7 departments of the trial court .............. $90,824,360
0330-0300 For the central administration of the trial court, including costs associated
with trial court non-employee services, dental and vision health plan
agreements for employees who are subject to a collective bargaining
agreement, jury expenses, law libraries, statewide telecommunications,
private and municipal court rentals and leases, operation of courthouse
facilities, rental of county court facilities, witness fees, printing expenses,
equipment maintenance and repairs, the court interpreter program,
insurance and chargeback costs, the Massachusetts sentencing
commission, court security and judicial training; provided, that 50 per cent
of all fees payable under rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8) of the Massachusetts
Rules of Criminal Procedure shall be paid from this item; provided further,
that funds may be expended for training on domestic violence issues, the
maintenance of a domestic violence registry, evaluations of batterers’
intervention programs and the risk assessment tool for domestic violence
offenders under chapter 260 of the acts of 2014; provided further, that not
less than $15,000 shall be expended for Cambridge Somerville Legal
Services within Greater Boston Legal Services, Inc.; provided further, that
not less than $75,000 shall be expended to the University of
Massachusetts School of Law for the South Coast Bridge Program for
Legal Professionals to provide mentorship and professional development;
provided further, that not less than $378,000 shall be expended for the
race and bias initiative to expand the trial court office of diversity, equity
and inclusion and to provide additional diversity training for all court
employees; provided further, that in planning and implementing the
policies of the race and bias initiative, the trial court’s office of diversity,
equity and inclusion shall solicit feedback from community stakeholders in
order to identify any structural, organizational or cultural barriers to ensure
equity in the justice system for people of racial, linguistic, cultural or sexual
minorities and shall recommend methods to remove such barriers to
guarantee the provision of competent representation and inclusive
practices in every courtroom in the commonwealth; provided further, that
funds shall be expended for juvenile court investigators rates at an amount
that at least maintains the rates from fiscal year 2026; provided further,

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
that not less than $300,000 shall be expended to ensure the maintenance
of an interactive text response system to remind litigants, including all
criminal defendants in the district courts, Boston municipal court and
superior courts, of their court dates; provided further, that not less than
$1,130,000 shall be expended to hire mental health clinicians; provided
further, that mental health clinicians shall be distributed to court facilities
in a geographically equitable manner; provided further, that funds may be
expended to provide information and assistance to self-represented
litigants; provided further, that the trial court shall submit quarterly reports
to the house and senate committees on ways and means on revenues
collected by the trial court; provided further, that each report shall provide
for the previous quarter for each court division and courthouse: (i) the total
amount ordered in fees and fines; (ii) the total amount dismissed in fees
and fines; (iii) the total amount paid in fees and fines; and (iv) the total
amount outstanding in fees and fines; provided further, that not later than
February 3, 2027, the court administrator shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means detailing the number of court
officers, per diem court officers and security personnel located in each trial
court of the commonwealth; provided further, that notwithstanding section
9A of chapter 30 of the General Laws or any other general or special law
to the contrary, the rights afforded to a veteran under said section 9A of
said chapter 30, shall also be afforded to any such veteran who holds a
trial court office or position in the service of the commonwealth not
classified under chapter 31 of the General Laws, other than an elective
office, an appointive office for a fixed term or an office or position under
section 7 of said chapter 30 and who has: (a) held the office or position for
not less than 1 year; and (b) completed 30 years of total creditable service
to the commonwealth; and provided further, that not less than 15 days
before the transfer of funds between items within the trial court, the court
administrator shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to: (1) the amount of
funds transferred from any item of appropriation; (2) the item number of
the appropriation making the transfer; (3) the item number of the
appropriation receiving the transfer; and (4) the reason for the transfer ........ $387,189,302
0330-0344 For the administration and transportation costs associated with a veterans
court program ......................................................................................................... $274,745
0330-0410 For the implementation of alternative dispute resolution programming;
provided, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended for online dispute
resolution ............................................................................................................. $1,372,241
0330-0441 For permanency mediation services in the probate and juvenile courts;
provided, that permanency mediation services shall be made available in
Bristol county .......................................................................................................... $600,000
0330-0500 For the use of video teleconferencing for court appearances by persons in
the custody of the houses of correction ................................................................. $254,925
0330-0599 For a probation program that administers high-intensity supervision to
promote successful probation outcomes and reduce recidivism; provided,
that the office of the commissioner of probation may partner with the same
external research organization in fiscal year 2027 as selected in fiscal year
2026 to: (i) monitor program fidelity and design; (ii) implement the model;
and (iii) collect and analyze the outcome evaluation; provided further, that

Conference Committee Report
said program shall be conducted at both a district and a superior court;
provided further, that the trial court shall maintain the program in at least the
10 court locations currently in operation; and provided further, that not later
than March 16, 2027, the office of the commissioner of probation shall
submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and means
that shall include, but not be limited to, any relevant data on participants
and outcomes ...................................................................................................... $1,383,811
0330-0601 For the operation of the specialty courts; provided, that no funds shall be
transferred from this item to any other item in the trial court; and provided
further, that not later than April 1, 2027, the trial court shall, in coordination
with partner departments and agencies, submit reports on
interdepartmental service agreements made with the partner departments
and agencies to the court administrator and the house and senate
committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to: (i)
the amount of funds transferred to each specific agency or department for
use in the specialty courts; (ii) the specific intent of the transfer in relation
to specialty court operations; (iii) any additional services implemented by
way of the transfer; and (iv) the amount of unspent funds from the transfer
at the time of reporting ........................................................................................ $8,947,480
0330-0612 For the administration of the Massachusetts Community Justice Project to
serve individuals with mental health and substance use disorders who are
involved in the criminal justice system; provided, that the trial court shall
continue to fund a project coordinator to oversee coordination and
administration and to provide financial oversight of the sequential intercept
model; and provided further, that not later than March 2, 2027, the project
coordinator shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to, the: (i) design of
the sequential intercept model mappings; (ii) locations of workshops held
to advocate for the model; (iii) number of cases in which the model has
been utilized; (iv) impact of the model on rehabilitation and recidivism; and
(v) cost savings associated with the model ........................................................... $283,605
0330-0613 For the implementation of the recommendations set forth by the Council
of State Governments Justice Center - Massachusetts Criminal Justice
Review including, but not limited to, the establishment of new programs
and expansion of existing programs targeted at recidivism reduction;
provided, that the trial court shall transfer funds to other commonwealth
agencies as outlined in this item; provided further, that not less than 15
days before any such transfer, the trial court administrator shall notify the
house and senate committees on ways and means; provided further, that
if no state agency or department is specifically designated to receive funds
from this item, the trial court administrator shall distribute funding based
on the recommendations of the Council of State Governments Justice
Center - Massachusetts Criminal Justice Review; provided further, that not
later than March 2, 2027, each state agency or department receiving funds
from this item shall submit a report to the executive office for administration
and finance and the house and senate committees on ways and means
detailing, as applicable, participation, completion and recidivism rates,
delineated by gender; provided further, that the department of correction
shall expend not less than $637,500 to expand recidivism reduction
programming; provided further, that not later than March 2, 2027, the
department of correction shall submit a report to the executive office of
public safety and security, the executive office for administration and

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
finance, the house and senate committees on ways and means and the
joint committee on the judiciary on the types of recidivism reduction
programs provided, participation, completion and recidivism rates for said
recidivism reduction programming; provided further, that the report shall
be delineated by gender and include descriptions of new programs offered
to women as a result of these funds; provided further, that not less than
$345,000 shall be expended on grants administered by the executive
office of public safety and security to support the expansion of evidence-
based cognitive behavioral programs in county houses of correction and
jails; provided further, that the secretary of public safety and security shall
award grants on a competitive basis and applicants shall provide a plan
for ensuring that proposed programs shall be implemented with fidelity to
a research-based, evidence-based or evidence-informed program design;
provided further, that if there is no existing research or evidence
supporting the proposed program, applicants shall describe in detail how
the program will be evaluated with sufficient rigor to add to existing
research; provided further, that the sheriffs’ offices that receive grant funds
shall report participation, completion and recidivism rates annually to the
executive office of public safety and security; provided further, that the
report shall be delineated by gender and include descriptions of new
programs offered to women as a result of these funds; provided further,
that not later than March 2, 2027, copies of the report shall be provided to
the executive office for administration and finance, the house and senate
committees on ways and means and the joint committee on the judiciary;
provided further, that funds shall be expended to improve collaboration
between the department of correction and the parole board to reduce
delays in the release of incarcerated persons approved for parole;
provided further, that not later than March 2, 2027, the department of
correction and the parole board shall submit a joint report to the executive
office for administration and finance, the house and senate committees on
ways and means and the joint committee on the judiciary detailing the: (i)
implementation process; (ii) number of incarcerated persons who
experienced delayed release in fiscal year 2026 compared to prior fiscal
years; and (iii) average length of delays in fiscal year 2026 compared to
prior fiscal years; provided further, that not less than $130,000 shall be
expended to: (a) evaluate the caseload of parole and probation officers;
(b) hire new officers accordingly; and (c) expand programs and services
at community corrections centers; provided further, that not less than
$2,300,000 shall be expended for a transitional youth early intervention
probation pilot program to be administered by the office of the
commissioner of probation; provided further, that not less than $45,000
shall be expended to improve case management and data-tracking
capacity in the office of the commissioner of probation; and provided
further, that not less than $5,075,000 shall be expended in conjunction
with the executive office of health and human services to develop and
implement a behavioral health strategy, including statewide capacity to
track the utilization of behavioral health care services and behavioral
health outcomes for persons in the criminal justice system within the
Medicaid management information system ........................................................ $8,662,500
Superior Court Department.
0331-0100 For the operation of the superior court department; provided, that funds
shall be expended for medical malpractice tribunals under section 60B of
chapter 231 of the General Laws; and provided further, that the clerk of

Conference Committee Report
the court shall be responsible for the internal administration of the clerk’s
office, including personnel, staff services and record keeping ......................... $39,925,793
District Court Department.
0332-0100 For the operation of the district court department, including a civil
conciliation program; provided, that, notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, the district court of Chelsea shall be the
permanent location for the northern trial session to handle 6-person jury
cases; and provided further, that all personnel within said district court
whose duties related to said northern trial session shall report to the clerk-
magistrate of said district court ......................................................................... $92,986,131
Probate and Family Court Department.
0333-0002 For the operation of the probate and family court department; provided,
that not less than $848,014 shall be expended to continue the case
management triage plan ................................................................................... $48,720,381
Land Court Department.
0334-0001 For the operation of the land court department .................................................. $6,534,669
Boston Municipal Court Department.
0335-0001 For the operation of the Boston municipal court department; provided, that
not less than $100,000 shall be expended for the new courthouse for the
South Boston division of the Boston municipal court ........................................ $16,914,450
Housing Court Department.
0336-0002 For the operation of the housing court department; provided, that funds
shall be expended on court interpreter services; provided further, that the
trial court shall conduct a study on eviction sealings, which shall include,
but not be limited to: (i) the number of eviction cases dismissed, the
number of petitions for sealing filed in those cases on or after January 1,
2025, and the length of time for such petitions to be resolved; (ii) the
number of eviction cases decided in favor of the defendant, the number of
petitions for sealing filed in those cases on or after January 1, 2025, and
the length of time for such petitions to be resolved; and (iii) any logistical,
technological and financial resources necessary to automatically seal
cases, both prospectively and retroactively since January 1, 2020, that
have been dismissed or decided in favor of the defendant, including the
implementation of standardized sealing deadlines for all sealing
applications, and to implement any recommended technological
improvements to the eviction record sealing process; and provided further,
that not later than December 31, 2026, the trial court shall submit a report
to the clerks of the senate and house of representatives, the joint
committee on housing, the joint committee on the judiciary and the senate
and house committees on ways and means detailing the results of the
study. ................................................................................................................. $15,780,738
Juvenile Court Department.

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
0337-0002 For the operation of the juvenile court department; provided, that not less
than $407,602 shall be expended to CASA Project Inc. for its court
appointed special advocate program in Worcester county; provided
further, that not less than $137,877 shall be expended to Friends of
Children, Inc. for its court appointed special advocate program in Franklin
and Hampshire counties; provided further, that not less than $178,244
shall be expended to Center for Human Development, Incorporated for its
court appointed special advocate program in Hampden county; provided
further, that not less than $166,317 shall be expended to Family Services
of the Merrimack Valley, Inc. for its court appointed special advocate
program in Essex county; provided further, that not less than $277,326
shall be expended to Boston CASA, Inc. for its court appointed special
advocate program in Suffolk and Middlesex counties; provided further, that
not less than $104,849 shall be expended to 18 Degrees, Inc. for its court
appointed special advocate program in Berkshire county; provided further,
that not less than $127,785 shall be expended to The Advocacy Bridge Inc
for its CARE advocate program in Bristol county; and provided further, that
not less than $50,000 shall be expended to One Can Help, Inc. for the
purpose of providing assistance and resources for families in juvenile
courts statewide ..................................................................................................... $25,569,194
Office of the Commissioner of Probation.
0339-1001 For the office of the commissioner of probation; provided, that the office
shall enter into an interagency service agreement with the department of
revenue to verify income data and to utilize the department’s wage
reporting and bank match system for weekly tape-matching to determine
an individual’s eligibility for appointment of indigent counsel under chapter
211D of the General Laws; provided further, that not less than $479,167
shall be expended for DNA testing; provided further, that not less than
$450,000 shall be expended for expanded drug testing capacity; provided
further, that not less than $222,000 shall be expended for increased
sealing and expungement capacity; provided further, that not less than
$250,000 shall be expended for a caseload management software system
for the juvenile and probate and family courts; provided further, that not
less than $641,000 shall be expended for a pre-trial services unit; provided
further, that not less than $350,000 shall be expended for increased
electronic monitoring capacity; provided further, that not less than
$374,667 shall be expended for a probate and family court workload
reduction project; provided further, that not less than $160,000 shall be
expended for the purchase of bulletproof vests for probation officers;
provided further, that funds may be expended for increased lab-based
testing, oral toxicology tests and new urine tests to detect additional
substances; provided further, that funds shall be used for the ongoing
development and implementation of the validated risk assessment tool to
inform pre-adjudication decision making with regard to detention, release
on personal recognizance or release under conditions of criminal
defendants before the adult trial court; provided further, that not later than
November 3, 2026, the office shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to: (i)
the status of the validated risk assessment tool; (ii) efforts to implement
the risk assessment tool; (iii) further goals to expand the use of the risk
assessment tool; and (iv) the outcomes associated with utilization of the
risk assessment tool; and provided further, that funds from this item shall
be expended for costs associated with the full implementation of chapter

Conference Committee Report
303 of the acts of 2006 and chapter 418 of the acts of 2006 to ensure
effective supervision of probationers who are monitored through global
positioning system bracelets ............................................................................ $206,356,677
0339-1003 For the office of community corrections and performance-based contracts
for the operation of community corrections centers; provided, that not later
than March 2, 2027, the office shall submit a report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be
limited to: (i) the performance standards used to evaluate community
corrections centers; (ii) a description of how each community corrections
center compares based on performance and utilization data; (iii) the
amount of each contract awarded to community corrections centers on a
per-client-day basis; (iv) the standards for terminating contracts with
underperforming community corrections centers; and (v) plans for
increasing the use of community corrections centers by the courts, the
department of correction and the sheriffs’ offices; provided further, that the
executive director of the office of community corrections may make funds
available from this item for rehabilitative pilot programs that incorporate
evidence-based corrections practices; provided further, that the office may
provide re-entry services programs, which shall not operate as
intermediate sanctions programs as defined in section 1 of chapter 211F
of the General Laws, to any person released from incarceration including,
but not limited to, any probationer or parolee; and provided further, that
not less than $2,000,000 shall be expended for the Ralph Gants Reentry
Services Program for the purpose of supporting reentry, including
providing reentry services programs ................................................................. $33,678,828
0339-1005 For a competitive grant program to be administered by the office of the
commissioner of probation for cities and towns, acting either individually
or in concert, to pilot or expand multidisciplinary approaches to divert
juveniles and young adults from the juvenile and criminal justice systems
prior to arrest or arraignment through coordinated programs for prevention
and intervention that serve youths and their families including, but not
limited to: (i) connecting youths to mental health services; (ii) providing
youth development activities and mentoring; (iii) promoting school safety,
family home visits, juvenile diversion programs and restorative justice and
mediation programs; and (iv) providing assistance for families and schools
to navigate the legal system; provided, that eligible applicants may partner
with nonprofit organizations to provide programs and services; provided
further, that the office shall give preference to applications that: (a) clearly
outline a comprehensive plan for municipalities to collaborate with law
enforcement agencies, schools, community-based organizations and
government agencies to address juvenile delinquency and young adult
crime; (b) include written commitments of municipalities, law enforcement
agencies, schools, community-based organizations and government
agencies to collaborate; (c) make a written commitment to match grant
funds with not less than a 25 per cent matching grant provided by either
municipal or private contributions; and (d) identify a local governmental
unit to serve as the fiscal agent for the proposed programs and services;
provided further, that administrative costs for approved grant applications
shall not exceed 5 per cent of the value of the grant; and provided further,
that not later than March 16, 2027, the office shall submit a report to the
house and senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but
not be limited to: (1) the number of grant applications received; (2) the
number of grants approved; (3) the amount of funds issued to each
grantee; and (4) details regarding each grantee, including geographic

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
location, services offered, organizations with which the grantee
collaborated, matching funds provided and the number of juveniles and
young adults served ............................................................................................... $515,000
0339-1011 For a grant program to be administered by the office of the commissioner
of probation for community-based residential re-entry programs to reduce
recidivism by providing transitional housing, workforce development and
case management to individuals returning to the community from county
correctional facilities and state prisons, including incarcerated persons
under the supervision of state prisons and county correctional facilities
approved under sections 49 and 86F of chapter 127 of the General Laws
and individuals on parole or on probation; provided, that no funds shall be
transferred from this item to any other item in the trial court; provided
further, that said programs shall provide supervision and accountability as
needed; provided further, that the funds shall be awarded through a
competitive process to qualified nonprofit organizations with a
documented history of providing comprehensive, evidence-based or
evidence-informed community residential re-entry services; provided
further, that applicants shall provide a plan for ensuring that proposed
programs shall be implemented with fidelity to a research-based,
evidence-based or evidence-informed program design; provided further,
that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to PAACA, Inc. in the city of
New Bedford for costs related to their PAACA housing support fund;
provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be spent on women
and elderly persons returning from incarceration; provided further, that not
less than $1,500,000 shall be awarded to the parole board for sober and
transitional housing for parolees; and provided further, that not later than
March 2, 2027, the office shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means on the outcomes and recidivism rates of
the participants .................................................................................................. $16,135,703
Office of Jury Commissioner.
0339-2100 For the office of jury commissioner under chapter 234A of the General
Laws .................................................................................................................... $3,886,393
DISTRICT ATTORNEYS.
Suffolk District Attorney.
0340-0100 For the Suffolk district attorney’s office, including the victim and witness
assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault prosecution
program, the domestic violence unit and the children’s advocacy center;
provided, that 50 per cent of fees payable under rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8)
of the Massachusetts Rules of Criminal Procedure for appeals taken by
the office shall be paid from this item; provided further, that not less than
$500,000 shall be expended for the design and operation of a pre-
arraignment diversion program and a diversion session; and provided
further, that no assistant district attorney shall be paid an annual salary of
less than $76,000 .............................................................................................. $30,451,325
0340-0198 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the Suffolk
district attorney’s office .......................................................................................... $532,839

Conference Committee Report
Middlesex District Attorney.
0340-0200 For the Middlesex district attorney’s office, including the victim and witness
assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault prosecution
program and the domestic violence unit; provided, that 50 per cent of fees
payable under rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8) of the Massachusetts Rules of
Criminal Procedure for appeals taken by the office shall be paid from this
item; and provided further, that no assistant district attorney shall be paid
an annual salary of less than $76,000 .............................................................. $25,490,650
0340-0298 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the Middlesex
district attorney’s office .......................................................................................... $789,542
Eastern District Attorney.
0340-0300 For the Eastern district attorney’s office, including the victim and witness
assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault prosecution
program and the domestic violence unit; provided, that 50 per cent of fees
payable under rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8) of the Massachusetts Rules of
Criminal Procedure for appeals taken by the office shall be paid from this
item; and provided further, that no assistant district attorney shall be paid
an annual salary of less than $76,000 .............................................................. $15,452,606
0340-0398 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the Eastern
district attorney’s office .......................................................................................... $758,496
Worcester District Attorney.
0340-0400 For the Worcester district attorney’s office, including the victim and witness
assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault prosecution
program and the domestic violence unit; provided, that 50 per cent of fees
payable under rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8) of the Massachusetts Rules of
Criminal Procedure for appeals taken by the office shall be paid from this
item; and provided further, that no assistant district attorney shall be paid
an annual salary of less than $76,000 .............................................................. $16,733,669
0340-0498 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the Worcester
district attorney’s office .......................................................................................... $641,139
Hampden District Attorney.
0340-0500 For the Hampden district attorney’s office, including the victim and witness
assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault prosecution
program and the domestic violence unit; provided, that 50 per cent of fees
payable under rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8) of the Massachusetts Rules of
Criminal Procedure for appeals taken by the office shall be paid from this
item; and provided further, that no assistant district attorney shall be paid
an annual salary of less than $76,000 .............................................................. $17,398,941
0340-0598 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the Hampden
district attorney’s office .......................................................................................... $649,406
Northwestern District Attorney.

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
0340-0600 For the Northwestern district attorney’s office, including the victim and
witness assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault
prosecution program, the domestic violence unit and the anti-crime task
force; provided, that not less than $150,000 shall be expended for the
Opioid Task Force of Franklin County and the North Quabbin Region;
provided further, that 50 per cent of fees payable under rules 15(d) and
30(c)(8) of the Massachusetts Rules of Criminal Procedure for appeals
taken by the office shall be paid from this item; and provided further, that
no assistant district attorney shall be paid an annual salary of less than
$76,000 ............................................................................................................. $10,615,496
0340-0698 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the Northwestern
district attorney’s office .......................................................................................... $456,230
Norfolk District Attorney.
0340-0700 For the Norfolk district attorney’s office, including the victim and witness
assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault prosecution
program and the domestic violence unit; provided, that 50 per cent of fees
payable under rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8) of the Massachusetts Rules of
Criminal Procedure for appeals taken by the office shall be paid from this
item; and provided further, that no assistant district attorney shall be paid
an annual salary of less than $76,000 .............................................................. $15,083,161
0340-0798 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the Norfolk
district attorney’s office .......................................................................................... $628,869
Plymouth District Attorney.
0340-0800 For the Plymouth district attorney’s office, including the victim and witness
assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault prosecution
program and the domestic violence unit; provided, that 50 per cent of fees
payable under rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8) of the Massachusetts Rules of
Criminal Procedure for appeals taken by the office shall be paid from this
item; and provided further, that no assistant district attorney shall be paid
an annual salary of less than $76,000 .............................................................. $13,322,877
0340-0898 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the Plymouth
district attorney’s office .......................................................................................... $656,788
Bristol District Attorney.
0340-0900 For the Bristol district attorney’s office, including the victim and witness
assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault prosecution
program and the domestic violence unit; provided, that 50 per cent of fees
payable under rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8) of the Massachusetts Rules of
Criminal Procedure for appeals taken by the office shall be paid from this
item; and provided further, that no assistant district attorney shall be paid
an annual salary of less than $76,000 .............................................................. $15,457,795
0340-0998 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the Bristol district
attorney’s office ...................................................................................................... $785,005
Cape and Islands District Attorney.

Conference Committee Report
0340-1000 For the Cape and Islands district attorney’s office, including the victim and
witness assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault
prosecution program and the domestic violence unit; provided, that 50 per
cent of fees payable under rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8) of the Massachusetts
Rules of Criminal Procedure for appeals taken by the office shall be paid
from this item; and provided further, that no assistant district attorney shall
be paid an annual salary of less than $76,000 ................................................... $6,850,371
0340-1098 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the Cape and
Islands district attorney’s office .............................................................................. $434,367
Berkshire District Attorney.
0340-1100 For the Berkshire district attorney’s office, including the victim and witness
assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault prosecution
program, the drug task force, the domestic violence unit and the Berkshire
county law enforcement task force; provided, that 50 per cent of fees
payable under rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8) of the Massachusetts Rules of
Criminal Procedure for appeals taken by the office shall be paid from this
item; and provided further, that no assistant district attorney shall be paid
an annual salary of less than $76,000 ................................................................ $6,321,513
0340-1198 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the Berkshire
district attorney’s office .......................................................................................... $354,094
MASSACHUSETTS DISTRICT ATTORNEYS ASSOCIATION.
0340-0203 For the implementation and administration of drug diversion programs for
nonviolent young adult drug offenders; provided, that individuals using
heroin or other opiate derivatives who are arrested for nonviolent crimes
shall be eligible for such programs; provided further, that individuals
charged with violent crimes shall not be eligible for participation in a drug
diversion program; provided further, that a district attorney’s office may
contract with any organization to administer a drug diversion program or
an education program; provided further, that such programs shall be
designed in consultation with the department of public health; provided
further, that eligible drug diversion programs shall offer pre-arraignment or
post-arraignment programs for non-violent drug offenders to provide
candidates the opportunity to receive comprehensive substance use
treatment services in lieu of prosecution through the traditional court
process; provided further, that treatment plans may include, but shall not be
limited to, inpatient, outpatient and step-down recovery services; provided
further, that diversion program candidates without insurance coverage for
the services under the programs shall not be denied access to the program
based on the inability to pay; provided further, that not less than 60 days
before the distribution of funds, the Massachusetts District Attorneys
Association shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means detailing: (i) the amount to be given to each district
attorney’s office; (ii) the methodology for the distribution; and (iii) the
administration and cost of the program; and provided further, that no funds
from this item shall be expended on the administrative costs of the
Massachusetts District Attorneys Association ....................................................... $514,949
0340-2100 For the operation of the Massachusetts District Attorneys Association,
including the implementation and related expenses of the district

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
attorneys’ offices automation, case management and tracking system;
provided, that expenses associated with the system may be charged
directly to this item; provided further, that the association shall work in
conjunction with the disabled persons protection commission and the 11
district attorneys' offices to prepare a report that shall include, but not be
limited to: (i) the number of abuse cases that are referred to each district
attorney’s office for further investigation; (ii) the number of said referrals
resulting in the filing of criminal charges, delineated by type of charge; (iii)
the number of cases referred to each district attorney's office that remain
open as of the date for submission of the report; and (iv) the number of
cases that resulted in a criminal prosecution and the disposition of each
such prosecution; provided further, that not later than March 16, 2027, said
report shall be submitted to the house and senate committees on ways
and means and the clerks of the house of representatives and senate;
provided further, that not later than January 29, 2027, the association shall
work in conjunction with the 11 district attorneys’ offices to prepare and
submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and means
and the clerks of the house of representatives and senate; provided
further, that the association shall provide said offices with an agreed-upon
template for the report to be filled out; provided further, that said offices
shall submit said report in a standard electronic format; provided further,
that said template shall include, delineated by charge type: (a) the number
of criminal cases initiated by arraignment in each department of the trial
court; (b) the number of criminal cases disposed of in each department of
the trial court; (c) the number of cases appealed to the appeals courts, the
supreme judicial court, a single justice of the appeals court or of the
supreme judicial court or any other appeals; (d) the number of cases
reviewed but not charged; and (e) the number of cases under active
management where the case includes charges for drug offenses under
chapter 94C of the General Laws, motor vehicle offenses under chapter
90 of the General Laws or firearm offenses under chapter 140 of the
General Laws; provided further, that not less than $330,000 shall be
expended for a one-year PILOT program for an automated crime victim and
witness notification and survey platform for each of the 11 district attorneys,
including assistant district attorneys and crime advocates; and provided
further, that each district attorney shall notify the house and senate
committees on ways and means not less than 30 days before transferring
any funds from the AA object class of each district attorney’s administrative
line item and means of its intention to make that transfer .................................... $3,202,595
0340-2117 For the retention of assistant district attorneys and non-attorney staff with
not less than 3 years of experience; provided, that the Massachusetts
District Attorneys Association shall transfer funds to the AA object class in
each of the 11 district attorneys’ offices; provided further, that the
association shall develop a formula for the distribution of said funds;
provided further, that funds distributed from this item to the district
attorneys’ offices shall be used for retention purposes and shall not be
transferred out of the AA object class; provided further, that not more than
$125,000 shall be distributed to any 1 district attorney’s office for such
purpose; provided further, that not less than 60 days prior to the distribution
of funds, the Massachusetts District Attorneys Association shall submit a
report to the house and senate committees on ways and means detailing:
(i) the methodology used to determine the amount to be disbursed; (ii) the
amount to be given to each district attorney’s office; (iii) the methodology
for the distribution; and (iv) the number of assistant district attorneys and
non-attorney staff from each office who would receive funds from this item;

Conference Committee Report
and provided further, that no funds from this item shall be expended for
the administrative costs of the Massachusetts District Attorneys
Association .......................................................................................................... $1,030,000
0340-8908 For the costs associated with maintaining the Massachusetts District
Attorneys Association’s wide area network ........................................................ $3,465,645
EXECUTIVE.
0411-1000 For the offices of the governor, the lieutenant governor and the governor’s
council; provided, that the amount appropriated in this item may be used
at the discretion of the governor for the payment of extraordinary expenses
not otherwise provided for and for transfers to appropriation items where
the amounts otherwise available may be insufficient; provided further, that
funds may be expended for the governor’s commission on intellectual
disability; provided further, that funds may be expended for the governor’s
development coordinating council; and provided further, that the advisory
council on Alzheimer’s disease and related disorders, established in
section 379 of chapter 194 of the acts of 1998, shall continue during fiscal
year 2027 ............................................................................................................ $6,173,602
0411-1020 For the operation of the office of climate innovation and resilience ....................... $500,000
SECRETARY OF THE COMMONWEALTH.
0511-0000 For the operation of the office of the secretary of the commonwealth;
provided, that the secretary may transfer funds between items 0540-0900,
0540-1000, 0540-1100, 0540-1200, 0540-1300, 0540-1400, 0540-1500,
0540-1600, 0540-1700, 0540-1800, 0540-1900, 0540-2000 and 0540-
2100 under an allocation schedule which shall be filed with submitted to
the executive office for administration and finance and the house and
senate committees on ways and means not less than 30 days before the
transfer; and provided further, that each register of deeds using electronic
record books shall ensure that all methods of electronically recording
instruments conform to the regulations or standards established by the
secretary and the records conservation board ................................................... $8,945,369
0511-0001 For the secretary of the commonwealth, who may expend not more than
$15,000 in revenues collected from the sale of merchandise at the state
house gift shop to restock gift shop inventory .......................................................... $15,000
0511-0002 For the operation of the corporations division; provided, that the division
shall implement a corporate dissolution program; and provided further, that
not later than April 1, 2027, the secretary of the commonwealth shall
submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and means
detailing the total number of reports filed as a result of this program and
the amount of revenue generated for the commonwealth ..................................... $606,206
0511-0200 For the operation of the archives division; provided, that the secretary of
the commonwealth shall expend not less than the amounts expended in
fiscal year 2026 for preservation matching grants for municipalities and
nonprofit organizations to preserve veterans’ monuments, memorials and
other significant sites and historic documents; provided further, that not
less than $25,000 shall be expended to capital improvements to Camp

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
DiCarlo, home of the National Lancers, to bring the facility up to code;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the city
of Gardner for the purpose of the city archives buildout; and provided
further, that the program shall be administered by the state historic records
advisory board ........................................................................................................ $989,130
0511-0230 For the operation of the records center.................................................................... $36,259
0511-0250 For the operation of the archives facility ................................................................ $847,715
0511-0260 For the operation of the commonwealth museum ................................................. $368,538
0511-0270 For the secretary of the commonwealth, who shall contract with the
University of Massachusetts Donahue Institute to provide the
commonwealth with technical assistance on United States census data
and to prepare annual population estimates, prior appropriation continued ........ $1,280,663
0511-0273 For a grant program to be administered by the secretary of the
commonwealth for municipalities or regional planning agencies to prepare
for the 2030 decennial census; provided, that grants shall be used to cover
costs related to the preparation of the list of addresses used to enumerate
local populations; provided further, that the secretary may prioritize grants
to low income communities or gateway municipalities as defined in section
3A of chapter 23A of the General Laws; and provided further, that the
secretary may use not more than 5 per cent of the total appropriation for
necessary administrative costs reasonably related to grant administration .......... $500,000
0511-0280 For the secretary of the commonwealth, who may expend not more than
$500,000 in revenues collected from fees assessed upon communication
technology service providers for administration and monitoring of the
remote online notarization program under subsection (i) of section 28 of
chapter 222 of the General Laws; provided, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating
timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the secretary may incur expenses and the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization
or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting
system .................................................................................................................... $500,000
0511-0420 For the operation of the address confidentiality program ...................................... $349,337
0517-0000 For the printing of public documents ...................................................................... $577,145
0521-0000 For the operation of the elections division, including preparation, printing
and distribution of ballots and for other miscellaneous expenses for
primary and other elections; provided, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, the secretary of the commonwealth may incur
costs and make expenditures in excess of funds available by up to
$15,000,000 to provide for necessary election costs related to items 0521-
0000, 0521-0001, 0521-0002 and 0524-0000; provided further, that the
secretary shall submit supporting documents on incurred costs necessary
to administer elections to the executive office for administration and
finance and the house and senate committees on ways and means not
later than 60 days after the completion of elections; provided further, that
the secretary of the commonwealth may award grants for voter registration
and education; and provided further, that the registration and education

Conference Committee Report
activities may be conducted by community-based voter registration and
education organizations; and provided further, that not later than
December 31, 2026, the secretary of the commonwealth shall submit a
report to the house and senate committees on ways and means, the joint
committee on election laws, the joint committee on state administration
and regulatory oversight and the clerks of the house and senate detailing
the total costs incurred during calendar years 2022, 2024 and 2026 to
issue mail voting postcards, send mail ballots to local election officials for
distribution and use a second envelope for mail ballots, prior appropriation
continued ........................................................................................................... $30,595,925
0521-0001 For the operation of the central voter registration computer system;
provided, that not later than January 29, 2027, the secretary of the
commonwealth shall submit a report to the house and senate committees
on ways and means detailing voter registration activity ................................... $11,448,118
0521-0002 For the implementation of early voting in the commonwealth as required by
section 25B of chapter 54 of the General Laws; provided, that not later
than December 31, 2026, the secretary of the commonwealth shall submit
a report to the house and senate committees on ways and means, the joint
committee on election laws, the joint committee on state administration
and regulatory oversight and the clerks of the senate and house of
representatives detailing the early voting rates for calendar years 2022,
2024 and 2026, prior appropriation continued .................................................... $6,884,180
0524-0000 For providing information to voters ..................................................................... $2,155,894
0526-0100 For the operation of the Massachusetts historical commission .......................... $1,228,623
0527-0100 For the operation of the ballot law commission ....................................................... $10,384
0528-0100 For the operation of the records conservation board ............................................... $36,396
0540-0900 For the registry of deeds located in the city of Lawrence ................................... $1,474,004
0540-1000 For the registry of deeds located in the city of Salem ......................................... $3,343,591
0540-1100 For the registry of deeds located in the county of Franklin .................................... $732,774
0540-1200 For the registry of deeds located in the county of Hampden .............................. $2,297,688
0540-1300 For the registry of deeds located in the county of Hampshire ............................... $917,227
0540-1400 For the registry of deeds located in the city of Lowell ......................................... $1,398,798
0540-1500 For the registry of deeds located in the city of Cambridge ................................. $4,724,745
0540-1600 For the registry of deeds located in the town of Adams ......................................... $489,356
0540-1700 For the registry of deeds located in the city of Pittsfield ........................................ $661,809
0540-1800 For the registry of deeds located in the town of Great Barrington ......................... $392,706
0540-1900 For the registry of deeds located in the county of Suffolk ................................... $2,766,382
0540-2000 For the registry of deeds located in the city of Fitchburg ....................................... $851,435

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
0540-2100 For the registry of deeds located in the city of Worcester ................................... $2,738,149
TREASURER AND RECEIVER GENERAL.
Office of the Treasurer and Receiver General.
0610-0000 For the office of the treasurer and receiver general; provided, that the
treasurer shall provide computer services required by the teachers’
retirement board; provided further, that funds may be expended for the
payment of bank fees; and provided further, that financial assistance shall
be made available to injured firefighters ........................................................... $13,707,567
0610-0010 For the office of economic empowerment to promote and improve financial
literacy; provided, that funds from this item may be transferred to the
Economic Empowerment Trust Fund established in section 35QQ of
chapter 10 of the General Laws; and provided further, that not less than
$250,000 shall be expended to The MIDAS Collaborative, Inc. as a fiscal
intermediary for matched-savings programs, and the development of the
Midas economic mobility incubator to help close critical racial and other
wealth gaps of low-to-moderate-income households, in partnership with
financial institutions, community development corporations, community
foundations and other community-based organizations ..................................... $1,726,699
0610-0050 For the administration of the alcoholic beverages control commission in its
efforts to regulate and control the conduct and condition of trafficking in
alcoholic beverages; provided, that the commission shall maintain at least
1 chief investigator and other investigators as may be necessary for the
regulation and control of trafficking of alcoholic beverages; provided
further, that the commission shall work and cooperate with the Bureau of
Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives in the United States
Department of Justice and other relevant federal agencies to assist in its
efforts to regulate and control trafficking of alcoholic beverages; and
provided further, that the commission shall seek out matching federal
funds and apply for federal grants that may be available to assist in the
enforcement of laws pertaining to the trafficking of alcoholic beverages ........... $6,255,309
0610-0051 For the operation of the alcoholic beverages control commission relative
to the prevention of underage drinking and related programs including, but
not limited to, applying for and obtaining Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco,
Firearms and Explosives in the United States Department of Justice funds,
grants and other federal appropriations; provided, that the commission
may expend not more than $350,000 in revenues collected from fees
generated by the commission; and provided further, that notwithstanding
any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the commission may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the
lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported
in the state accounting system ............................................................................... $350,000
0610-0060 For the costs associated with the investigation and enforcement division
of the alcoholic beverages control commission’s implementation of the
enhanced liquor enforcement programs known as the safe campus, safe

Conference Committee Report
holidays, safe prom and safe summer programs; provided, that funds from
this item shall not support other operating costs of item 0610-0050 ..................... $348,780
0610-2000 For payments made to veterans under section 1 of chapter 646 of the acts
of 1968, section 16 of chapter 130 of the acts of 2005 and section 11 of
chapter 132 of the acts of 2009; provided, that the office of the state
treasurer may expend not more than $500,000 for costs incurred in the
administration of these payments; and provided further, that not later than
September 25, 2026, the state treasurer shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means detailing: (i) the number of
veterans applying for the payments, delineated by in-person and online
applications; and (ii) how many payments were approved in the prior fiscal
year ..................................................................................................................... $2,203,626
0611-1000 For bonus payments to war veterans....................................................................... $44,500
0612-0105 For payment of the public safety employee killed in the line of duty benefit
established in section 100A of chapter 32 of the General Laws; provided,
that the office of the state treasurer shall provide immediate written
notification to the secretary of administration and finance and the house
and senate committees on ways and means upon the expenditure of the
funds appropriated in this item; and provided further, that at the written
request of the office of the state treasurer, the comptroller shall transfer
uncommitted and unobligated funds from item 1599-3384 to this item ................. $600,000
Lottery Commission.
0640-0000 For the operation of the state lottery commission and arts lottery; provided,
that no funds shall be expended from this item for costs associated with
the promotion or advertising of lottery games; provided further, that
positions funded from this item shall not be subject to chapters 30 and 31
of the General Laws; provided further, that 25 per cent of the amount
appropriated in this item shall be transferred quarterly from the State
Lottery and Gaming Fund, established in section 35 of chapter 10 of the
General Laws, to the General Fund; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, funds may be
expended for the establishment and operation of the online lottery
established in section 24 of chapter 10 of the General Laws ......................... $122,614,695
0640-0005 For the costs associated with monitor games; provided, that 25 per cent
of the amount appropriated in this item shall be transferred quarterly from
the State Lottery and Gaming Fund, established in section 35 of chapter
10 of the General Laws, to the General Fund ..................................................... $4,321,359
0640-0010 For the promotional activities associated with the state lottery program;
provided, that not later than June 30, 2027, the state lottery commission
shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means detailing additional revenues generated as a result of promotional
activities funded from this item; and provided further, that 25 per cent of
the amount appropriated in this item shall be transferred quarterly from the
State Lottery and Gaming Fund, established in section 35 of chapter 10 of
the General Laws, to the General Fund .............................................................. $6,000,000
0640-0096 For the commonwealth’s fiscal year 2027 contributions to the health and
welfare fund established under the collective bargaining agreement

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
between the state lottery commission and the Service Employees
International Union, Local 888, AFL-CIO; provided, that the contributions
shall be paid to the fund on such basis as the collective bargaining
agreement provides; and provided further, that 25 per cent of the amount
appropriated in this item shall be transferred quarterly from the State
Lottery and Gaming Fund, established in section 35 of chapter 10 of the
General Laws, to the General Fund ....................................................................... $618,509
Massachusetts Cultural Council.
0640-0300 For the services and operations of the Massachusetts cultural council,
including grants to or contracts with public and nonpublic entities;
provided, that the council may expend the amounts appropriated in this
item for the council as provided in sections 52 to 58A, inclusive, of chapter
10 of the General Laws; provided further, that 25 per cent of the amount
appropriated in this item shall be transferred quarterly from the State
Lottery and Gaming Fund, established in section 35 of said chapter 10, to
the General Fund; provided further, that a person employed under this
item shall be considered an employee within the meaning of section 1 of
chapter 150E of the General Laws and shall be placed in the appropriate
bargaining unit; provided further, that the council shall expend from any
source an amount not less than 75 per cent of this item on grants and
subsidies to further the achievement of the goals of the council’s 3-year
strategic plan, including: (i) stewarding programmatic practices that
advance equity, diversity and inclusion; (ii) advancing the creative and
cultural sector through building partnerships, identifying recommendations
and storytelling; and (iii) ensuring internal systems, structures and ways of
working reflect the council’s values of creativity, public service and
inclusion and advance the sector’s needs; provided further, that not less
than $20,000 shall be expended to Acton Community Access Television,
Inc. for equipment upgrades; provided further, that not less than $5,000
shall be expended to the Attleboro Arts Museum for damages to a flooded
basement; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
to Allston Village Main Streets, Inc. for artists community assistance;
provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to Fitchburg
Public Market to sustain customer-facing commercial retail operations on
Main street in the city of Fitchburg through fiscal year 2028; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to Longmeadow
Pride Alliance, Inc. to continue the Longmeadow Pride Festival to support
community services and celebrate Italian heritage; provided further, that
not less than $100,000 shall be expended to Boston Ballet, Incorporated;
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to Franklin
Performing Arts Company, Inc.; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the Children’s Museum of Franklin, Inc;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the
Franklin Creative Center for the Arts Inc.; and provided further, that not
later than November 3, 2026, the council shall submit its board-approved
fiscal year 2027 spending plan to the office of the state treasurer, the
executive office for administration and finance, the house and senate
committees on ways and means and the joint committee on tourism, arts
and cultural development including, but not limited to, the amounts to be
expended on: (a) grants and subsidies; (b) personnel; (c) leases and
utilities; and (d) travel, delineated by in-state and board-approved out-of-
state travel; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
as an honorarium to the official Poet Laureate of Massachusetts pursuant

Conference Committee Report
to Executive Order no. 640; provided further, that not less than $100,000
shall be expended to the Hopkinton Center for the Arts for the design of
an accessible theatre; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended for the Common Wealth Mural Collaborative, Inc. to support the
Fresh Paint Springfield public art festival in the city of Springfield; provided
further, that not less than $28,000 shall be expended for the historic First
Church of Christ in the town of Longmeadow for the replacement of a
control system for the historical clock tower for the continued use of a bell
forged by Paul Revere and to preserve access to the historical premises
for students and the community; provided further, that not less than
$15,000 shall be expended for Woods Hole Film Festival, Inc. to support
its showcase of independent films for the public; provided further, that not
less than $20,000 shall be expended for Plimoth Patuxet Museums, Inc.
for history programming for schools, teachers and historians; provided
further, that not less than $60,000 shall be expended for the Pilgrim Hall
Museum in the town of Plymouth to support the public museum and
promote local tourism; provided further, that not less than $30,000 shall
be expended for Heritage Museums and Gardens, Inc. in the town of
Sandwich to support the public museum and promote local tourism;
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the
Cape Cod Center For the Arts, Inc. for programming and initiatives to
commemorate the centennial season of the Cape Playhouse; and
provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to Marilyn
Rodman Performing Arts Center, Inc. in the town of Foxborough for facility
upgrades and programming .............................................................................. $28,106,072
Debt Service.
0699-0005 For the state treasurer, who may retain and expend not more than
$30,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 from premiums paid on the sales of
revenue anticipation notes and expend those premium payments to pay
the principal and interest on account of the revenue anticipation notes ........... $30,000,000
0699-0014 For the payment of interest, discount and principal on certain indebtedness
incurred under chapter 233 of the acts of 2008 for financing the
accelerated bridge program ............................................................................ $289,765,086
Commonwealth Transportation Fund....................... 100%
0699-0015 For the payment of interest, discount and principal on certain bonded debt
and the sale of bonds of the commonwealth; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the state
treasurer may make payments under section 38C of chapter 29 of the
General Laws from this item and items 0699-9100, 0699-2005 and 0699-
0014; provided further, that the payments shall pertain to the bonds, notes
or other obligations authorized to be paid from each item; provided further,
that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
comptroller may transfer the amounts that would otherwise be
unexpended on June 30, 2027 from this item to items 0699-9100, 0699-
2005 and 0699-0014 or from said items 0699-9100, 0699-2005 and 0699-
0014 to this item that would otherwise have insufficient amounts to meet
debt service obligations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027; provided
further, that each amount transferred shall be charged to the funds as
specified in the item to which the amount is transferred; provided further,
that payments on bonds issued under section 2O of said chapter 29 shall

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
be paid from this item and shall be charged to the infrastructure subfund
of the Commonwealth Transportation Fund; provided further, that
notwithstanding this item or any general or special law to the contrary, the
comptroller may charge the payments authorized in the item to the
appropriate budgetary or other fund subject to a plan that the comptroller
shall submit to the executive office for administration and finance and the
house and senate committees on ways and means not less than 10 days
in advance of charging such payments; and provided further, that the state
treasurer may expend from the Technology Education Fund under items
7070-6606 and 7070-6607 in the state accounting system, payments to
the University of Massachusetts and the Massachusetts Institute of
Technology for interest accrued in fiscal year 2027 and prior fiscal years
on bonds held pursuant to section 4 of the Morrill Act, 7 U.S.C. 304 .......... $2,240,456,319
General Fund ........................................................ 45.00%
Commonwealth Transportation Fund.................... 55.00%
0699-2005 For the payment of interest, discount and principal on certain indebtedness
that may be incurred for financing the central artery/third harbor tunnel
funding shortfall.. ............................................................................................... $81,421,109
Commonwealth Transportation Fund....................... 100%
0699-9100 For the payment of costs associated with any bonds, notes or other
obligations of the commonwealth, including issuance costs, interest on
bonds, bond and revenue anticipation notes, commercial paper and other
notes under sections 47 and 49B of chapter 29 of the General Laws and
for the payment to the United States under Internal Revenue Code, 26
U.S.C. 148, of any rebate amount or yield reduction payment owed with
respect to any bonds or notes or other obligations of the commonwealth;
provided, that the state treasurer shall certify to the comptroller a schedule
of the distribution of costs among the various funds of the commonwealth;
provided further, that not more than $400,000 shall be expended from this
item for the costs of personnel at the debt management department of the
office of the state treasurer; provided further, that the comptroller shall
charge costs to the funds in accordance with the schedule; and provided
further, that any deficit in this item at the close of the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2027 shall be charged to the various funds or to the General
Fund or the Commonwealth Transportation Fund debt service reserves ......... $28,681,484
OFFICE OF THE STATE AUDITOR.
0710-0000 For the office of the state auditor, including the review and monitoring of
privatization contracts under sections 52 to 55, inclusive, of chapter 7 of
the General Laws .............................................................................................. $20,724,096
0710-0100 For the operation of the division of local mandates ............................................... $515,371
0710-0200 For the operation of the bureau of special investigations; provided, that the
office of the state auditor shall submit quarterly reports to the house and
senate committees on ways and means detailing the total amount of
fraudulently obtained benefits identified by the bureau, the total value of
settlement restitution payments, actual monthly collections and any
circumstances that produce shortfalls in collections ........................................... $2,657,193

Conference Committee Report
0710-0225 For the operation of the Medicaid audit unit within the division of audit
operations to prevent and identify fraud and abuse in the MassHealth
system; provided, that the federal reimbursement for any expenditure from
this item shall not be less than 50 per cent; provided further, that not later
than March 2, 2027, the division shall submit a report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means detailing all findings on activities
and payments made through the MassHealth system; provided further,
that the report shall include, to the extent available, a review of all post-
audit efforts undertaken by MassHealth to recoup payments owed to the
commonwealth due to identified fraud and abuse; provided further, that
the report shall include the responses of MassHealth to the most recent
post-audit review survey, including the status of recoupment efforts; and
provided further, that the report shall include the unit’s recommendations
to enhance recoupment efforts .......................................................................... .$1,525,387
0710-0300 For costs related to the use of data analytic techniques to identify fraud by
the bureau of special investigations ....................................................................... $569,734
0710-0400 For the operation of an information technology audit unit within the office
of the state auditor to conduct audits of high risk information technology
related activities including, cybersecurity, data access, systems
operations, data integrity and regulatory compliance ............................................ $905,621
POLICE REFORM COMMISSION.
0800-0000 For the operation of the Massachusetts Peace Officer Standards and
Training Commission; provided, that not later than March 16, 2027, the
commission shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the
commission’s current caseload for fiscal year 2027; (ii) the number of
complaints concerning police officer conduct received by the commission;
(iii) patterns of unprofessional police conduct identified by the commission;
and (iv) the number of police officers suspended by the commission and
the reason for said suspension ........................................................................... $8,829,669
0800-0001 For the operation of the commission on the status of African Americans ............. $150,000
0800-0002 For the operation of the commission on the status of Latinos and Latinas ........... $150,000
0800-0003 For the operation of the commission on the status of persons with
disabilities ............................................................................................................... $150,000
0800-0004 For the operation of the commission on the social status of Black men and
boys ........................................................................................................................ $150,000
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
0810-0000 For the office of the attorney general, including the administration of the
local consumer aid fund established in section 11G of chapter 12 of the
General Laws, the operation of the anti-trust division, all regional offices,
a high-tech crime unit and the victim and witness assistance program;
provided, that funds shall be expended to support the services of the

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
student loan ombudsman within the office who shall serve as an
independent mediator for student loan borrowers in the commonwealth ......... $52,088,563
0810-0013 For the office of the attorney general, which may expend for a false claims
program not more than $4,578,648 in revenues collected from
enforcement of sections 5A to 5O, inclusive, of chapter 12 of the General
Laws; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between
the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the office may
incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not
to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system .......................................... $4,578,648
0810-0014 For the operation of the office of ratepayer advocacy within the office of
the attorney general under section 11E of chapter 12 of the General Laws;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary,
the amount assessed under said section 11E of said chapter 12 shall
equal the amount expended from this item and the associated fringe
benefit costs for personnel paid from this item; and provided further, that
funds shall be expended for the expenses of legal and technical personnel
and associated administrative and travel expenses relative to participation
in regulatory proceedings at the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission
on behalf of ratepayers in the commonwealth .................................................... $3,330,206
0810-0016 For the office of the attorney general, which may expend not more than
$618,200 from revenues collected from costs of litigation, including
reasonable attorney and expert witness fees as awarded to the attorney
general by the court or as agreed upon by the parties in settlement of any
claims brought pursuant to the acts enforced in this item, for the
development and prosecution of claims for enforcement by the
commonwealth of the Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. 1251 et seq., the Clean
Air Act, 42 U.S.C. 7401 et seq., the Safe Drinking Water Act, 42 U.S.C.
300f et seq., the Comprehensive Environmental Response,
Compensation, and Liability Act, 42 U.S.C. 9601 et seq., the Emergency
Planning and Community Right-to-Know Act, 42 U.S.C 11001 et seq., the
Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, 42 U.S.C. 6901 et seq. and the
Endangered Species Act, 16 U.S.C. 1531 et seq. including, but not limited
to, the investigation of such claims, personnel and litigation costs, the
engagement of experts, the administration of studies or related activities
and the enforcement of settlements; provided, that penalties payable to
the commonwealth under the General Laws that are recovered by the
commonwealth in the course of prosecuting claims for enforcement of
federal law shall be deposited into the General Fund; and provided further,
that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the
purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of
retained revenues and related expenditures, the office may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system ........................................................... $618,200
0810-0021 For the operation of the Medicaid fraud control unit; provided, that the
federal reimbursement for any expenditure from this item shall not be less
than 75 per cent of the expenditure; provided further, that funds shall
continue to be used specifically for the investigation and prosecution of
abuse, neglect, mistreatment and misappropriation based on referrals
from the department of public health under section 72H of chapter 111 of

Conference Committee Report
the General Laws; provided further, that the unit shall provide training for all
investigators of the department of public health’s division of health care
quality responsible for the investigations on a periodic basis pursuant to a
comprehensive training program to be developed by the division and the
unit; and provided further, that training shall include instruction on
techniques for improving the efficiency and quality of investigations of
abuse, neglect, mistreatment and misappropriation referred under said
section 72H of said chapter 111 .......................................................................... $5,897,957
0810-0045 For the wage enforcement program; provided, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, a nonmanagement position funded
by this item shall be considered a job title in a collective bargaining unit as
prescribed by the labor relations commission and shall be subject to
chapter 150E of the General Laws; provided further, that not less than
$500,000 shall be expended for the operation and administration of a
specialized prevailing wage and construction investigatory and
enforcement unit within the wage enforcement program; provided further,
that the unit shall consist of not less than 2 investigators assigned to
eastern Massachusetts, 2 investigators assigned to central
Massachusetts and 2 investigators assigned to western Massachusetts;
provided further, that the specialized unit shall be supervised by at least 1
supervising investigator and 1 assistant attorney general in the wage
enforcement program’s Boston office with significant experience
investigating violations of the commonwealth’s prevailing wage and
construction laws; and provided further, that not later than February 26,
2027, the specialized unit shall submit a report on its annual enforcement
actions and violation trends within the construction industry to the clerks
of the senate and the house of representatives .................................................. $7,514,554
0810-0061 For the funding of existing and future litigation committed to obtaining
significant recoveries for the commonwealth ...................................................... $3,995,599
0810-0098 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the office of the
attorney general; provided, that other costs associated with said officers
shall not be funded from this item; and provided further, that no
expenditures shall be made on or after the effective date of this item that
would cause the commonwealth’s obligation under this item to exceed the
amount appropriated in this item ............................................................................ $867,874
0810-0201 For the costs incurred in administrative or judicial proceedings on
insurance under section 11F of chapter 12 of the General Laws; provided,
that funds made available in this item may be used to supplement the
automobile insurance fraud unit and the workers’ compensation fraud unit
in the office of the attorney general; provided further, that notwithstanding
any general or special law to the contrary, the amount assessed for these
costs shall be equal to the amount expended from this item and the
associated fringe benefit costs for personnel paid from this item; and
provided further, that funds may be expended for costs associated with
health insurance rate hearings ............................................................................ $2,093,995
0810-0338 For the investigation and prosecution of automobile insurance fraud;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary,
the amount assessed for these costs shall be equal to the amount
appropriated in this item and the associated fringe benefit costs for
personnel paid from this item ................................................................................. $598,970

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
0810-0399 For the investigation and prosecution of workers’ compensation fraud;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary,
the amount assessed for these costs shall be equal to the amount
appropriated in this item and the associated fringe benefit costs for
personnel paid from this item; provided further, that the office of the
attorney general shall investigate and prosecute, when appropriate,
employers who fail to provide workers’ compensation insurance as
required by law and any other employers or employees who may seek to
defraud the system; and provided further, that the unit shall investigate
and report on all companies not in compliance with chapter 152 of the
General Laws ......................................................................................................... $420,582
0810-1204 For the costs of the division of gaming enforcement under section 11M of
chapter 12 of the General Laws; provided, that the gaming commission
shall reimburse the General Fund for the total amount of this appropriation
and associated fringe benefit costs under said section 11M of said chapter
12 ........................................................................................................................... $596,773
0810-1205 For programs established to combat opioid addiction including, but not
limited to, the investigation and enforcement of opioid dispensing practices
and fraudulent prescribing practices; provided, that not later than January
29, 2027, the office of the attorney general shall submit a report to the
house and senate committees on ways and means on the results of said
programs including, but not limited to, the effectiveness of investigations,
opioid and trafficking settlements pursued and long-term plans for the
program; and provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be
expended to SAFE Coalition Incorporated for those affected by substance
use disorder in the city known as the town of Franklin ......................................... $2,961,598
0810-1206 For the office of the attorney general, which may expend for a civil
penalties revolving fund an amount not to exceed $2,292,704 from
revenues collected from enforcement of civil laws; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose
of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of revenues
and related expenditures, the office may incur expenses and the
comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of
this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system ..................................................................................... $2,292,704
Victim and Witness Assistance Board.
0840-0004 For compensation to victims of violent crimes; provided, that
notwithstanding chapter 258C of the General Laws, if a claimant is 60
years of age or older at the time of the crime and is not employed or
receiving unemployment compensation, such claimant shall be eligible for
compensation under said chapter 258C even if the claimant has suffered
no out-of-pocket loss; provided further, that compensation to such
claimant shall be limited to a maximum of $50; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, victims of the
crime of rape shall be notified of all available services designed to assist
rape victims including, but not limited to, the services provided under
section 5 of chapter 258B of the General Laws .................................................. $3,426,323
0840-0100 For the operation of the victim and witness assistance board; provided,
that not less than $100,000 shall be expended for the operation and

Conference Committee Report
administration of trainings and educational programming that advances
the goals of the Massachusetts office for victim assistance; provided further,
that the victim and witness assistance board shall submit to the general
court and the secretary of administration and finance a report detailing the
claims submitted to the state treasurer for payment under item 0840-0004,
indicating both the number and costs for each category of claim; and
provided further, that the report shall be submitted not later than January 12,
2027 .......................................................................................................................... $2,545,578
0840-0101 For the salaries and administration of the SAFEPLAN advocacy program
to be administered by the Massachusetts office for victim assistance;
provided, that not later than January 29, 2027, the office shall submit a
report to the house and senate committees on ways and means detailing
the effectiveness of contracting for the program including, but not limited
to, the: (i) expansion of the program’s services to new courthouses
throughout the commonwealth; (ii) number and types of incidents to which
the advocates responded; (iii) types of services and service referrals
provided by domestic violence advocates; (iv) cost of providing such
services; and (v) extent of coordination with other service providers and
state agencies; and provided further, that SAFEPLAN services shall be
maintained at not less than the levels provided in fiscal year 2026 .................... $2,453,510
STATE ETHICS COMMISSION.
0900-0100 For the operation of the state ethics commission ............................................... $3,917,515
OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL.
0910-0200 For the operation of the office of the inspector general ...................................... $6,476,307
0910-0210 For the office of the inspector general, which may expend not more than
$1,680,000 from revenues collected from the fees charged to participants
in the OIG Academy, including the Massachusetts public purchasing
official certification program for the operation of OIG Academy programs;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary,
for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the
receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the office may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system; provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, funds may be
collected in the prior fiscal year for service programs or activities delivered
during the next fiscal year; and provided further, that any unspent balance
at the close of the current fiscal year up to the ceiling shall remain in the
account and may be expended for this item in the next fiscal year .................... $1,680,000
0910-0220 For the operation of the bureau of program integrity established in section
16V of chapter 6A of the General Laws ................................................................. $844,780
0910-0230 For the operation of the data analytics unit within the office of the inspector
general .................................................................................................................. $649,094
0910-0300 For the operation of the internal special audit unit established in section 9
of chapter 6C of the General Laws ..................................................................... $1,312,345

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
0910-0330 For the operation of the division of state police oversight established in
section 72 of chapter 22C of the General Laws ..................................................... $486,890
OFFICE OF CAMPAIGN AND POLITICAL FINANCE.
0920-0300 For the operation of the office of campaign and political finance ....................... $2,177,077
OFFICE OF THE CHILD ADVOCATE.
0930-0100 For the operation of the office of the child advocate; provided, that not less
than $3,750,000 shall be expended for the operation of the state center on
child wellbeing and trauma; provided further, that not less than $250,000
shall be expended for a hospital-based, comprehensive child protection
program at University of Massachusetts Memorial Medical Center;
provided further, that not less than $300,000 shall be expended on efforts
to ensure that transition-age youth who are aging out of the care or custody
of the department of children and families or the department of youth
services are well-prepared for and supported in their transition into
adulthood; provided further, that such services shall include, but not be
limited to, staff support through case management and the provision of
direct housing services; and provided further, that not less than
$1,250,000 shall be expended for Roca, Inc.'s young mothers
experiencing acute trauma program in the commonwealth ................................ $9,466,712
MASSACHUSETTS COMMISSION AGAINST DISCRIMINATION.
0940-0100 For the Massachusetts commission against discrimination; provided, that
the commission shall pursue the highest allowable rate of federal
reimbursement; provided further, that not later than March 5, 2027, the
commission shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means on the: (i) number of currently pending cases and the
number of cases under investigation and in post-probable cause, with the
number of post-probable cause cases delineated by the number of cases
in the conciliation, pre-public hearing and post-public hearing stages; (ii)
number of cases pending before the commission in which a state agency
or authority is named as a respondent, delineating those cases by agency
or authority; (iii) number of new cases filed in fiscal year 2026; (iv) number
of cases closed by the commission in fiscal year 2026; and (v) average
duration of cases closed by the commission in fiscal year 2026, delineated
by cases that reached the conciliation, pre-public hearing and post-public
hearing stages; and provided further, that all non-clerical positions shall be
exempt from chapter 31 of the General Laws ................................................... $10,422,737
0940-0102 For the Massachusetts commission against discrimination, which may
expend not more than $325,319 in revenues collected from fees charged
for training and monitoring programs; provided, that the commission shall
work with the office of access and opportunity and the office of diversity
and equal opportunity to design and deliver training to executive branch
staff; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to
the contrary, the commission may also expend revenues generated
through the collection of fees and costs so authorized; and provided

Conference Committee Report
further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt
of retained revenues and related expenditures, the commission may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system ........................................................... $325,319
COMMISSION ON THE STATUS OF WOMEN.
0950-0000 For the commission on the status of women established in section 66 of
chapter 3 of the General Laws ............................................................................... $991,743
COMMISSION ON THE STATUS OF GRANDPARENTS RAISING
GRANDCHILDREN.
0950-0030 For the commission on the status of grandparents raising grandchildren
established in section 69 of chapter 3 of the General Laws .................................. $290,485
MASSACHUSETTS COMMISSION ON LESBIAN, GAY, BISEXUAL,
TRANSGENDER, QUEER AND QUESTIONING YOUTH.
0950-0050 For the commission on lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer and
questioning youth established in section 67 of chapter 3 of the General
Laws; provided, that funds shall be used to address issues related to the
implementation of the commonwealth’s anti-bullying law under section
37O of chapter 71 of the General Laws .............................................................. $1,600,000
COMMISSION ON THE STATUS OF ASIAN AMERICANS AND PACIFIC
ISLANDERS.
0950-0080 For the commission on the status of Asian American and Pacific Islander
descent established in section 68 of chapter 3 of the General Laws .................... $586,188
OFFICE OF THE VETERAN ADVOCATE.
0960-1000 For the operation of the office of the veteran advocate ....................................... $1,000,000
OFFICE OF THE COMPTROLLER.
1000-0001 For the office of the comptroller for the management of the accounting,
payroll, related financial systems and annual financial reports, including
prescribing the books and manner of accounting and internal control
guidance for all agencies of the commonwealth to promote accountability,
integrity and clarity in the commonwealth’s business, fiscal and
administrative enterprises and to mitigate the risk of fraud, waste and
abuse of the commonwealth’s resources; provided, that the comptroller
shall submit quarterly reports to the executive office for administration and
finance and the house and senate committees on ways and means which
shall include, for each state agency for which the commonwealth is billing,
the eligible state services and the full-year estimate of revenues and

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
collected revenues; provided further, that the comptroller shall make
expenditures for an enhanced intercept collections of delinquent debt
program; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special
law to the contrary, the comptroller may take any necessary actions to
secure financial and payroll data including, but not limited to, restricting
certain data released under section 20 of chapter 66 of the General Laws ..... $11,632,765
CANNABIS CONTROL COMMISSION.
1070-0840 For the operation of the cannabis control commission ..................................... $16,585,330
Marijuana Regulation Fund ...................................... 100%
1070-0842 For the cannabis control commission’s oversight of the medical marijuana
industry ................................................................................................................ $3,526,466
Marijuana Regulation Fund ...................................... 100%
1070-0843 For the operation of a statewide laboratory for the independent review of
cannabis products .................................................................................................. $750,000
Marijuana Regulation Fund ...................................... 100%
EXECUTIVE OFFICE FOR ADMINISTRATION AND FINANCE.
Office of the Secretary.
1100-1100 For the office of the secretary of administration and finance; provided, that
the secretary shall provide biannual reports, the first of which shall be
submitted not later than January 29, 2027 and the second of which shall
be submitted not later than May 28, 2027, to the house and senate
committees on ways and means summarizing existing and proposed
collective bargaining agreements in an electronic format; provided further,
that, for each agreement, the reports shall include, but not be limited to: (i)
the session law for the previously agreed upon collective bargaining
agreement; (ii) the current agreement status; (iii) the collective bargaining
unit and unit number; (iv) the number of full-time equivalent employees
subject to the agreement, by item; (v) a description of the membership of
the unit; (vi) the total salary base of the most recent previous agreement;
(vii) the start date and expiration date of the most recent agreement; (viii)
the estimated total fiscal impact of the agreement compared to the
previous agreement; (ix) the base salary increases required by the
agreement, by effective time; and (x) the funding status of the agreement;
provided further, that the reports shall detail, by bargaining unit, the costs
to the commonwealth resulting from the collective bargaining agreements
with various public employees’ unions, delineated by item; provided
further, that the reports shall include, but not be limited to, the: (a) effective
date of any new negotiations or renegotiations; (b) end date of the
contract; (c) number of employees in the bargaining unit, by department;
and (d) costs associated with any new negotiations or renegotiations,
including salary adjustments, step increases, statutory benefits and other
nonsalary costs for the current and subsequent fiscal years for the life of
the contract; provided further, that the executive office for administration

Conference Committee Report
and finance shall submit quarterly reports to the house and senate
committees on ways and means detailing federal grant applications
submitted and federal grants received by executive branch agencies
during the applicable reporting period; and provided further, that not later
than December 2, 2026, the executive office for administration and finance
shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means evaluating the stress impacts of varying economic scenarios for
the next 2 fiscal years including, but not limited to, the: (1) potential effects
of economic changes on tax revenue collections; and (2) sufficiency of the
Commonwealth Stabilization Fund established in section 2H of chapter 29
of the General Laws and other reserve balances in offsetting potential
revenue declines ................................................................................................. $4,837,840
1100-1201 For supporting activities relating to accountability and transparency
including, but not limited to, economic forecasting, adoption of uniform
procedures across state agencies and departments and maximizing
federal revenue opportunities ................................................................................ $582,639
1100-1700 For the provision of information technology services within the executive
office for administration and finance ................................................................. $39,262,566
1106-0064 For the caseload and economic forecasting office; provided, that the office
shall forecast: (i) MassHealth enrollment by group and coverage type; (ii)
participation in state-subsidized child care provided through items 3000-
3060 and 3000-4060; (iii) participation in emergency assistance and
housing programs provided through items 7004-0101, 7004-0102, 7004-
0108 and 7004-9316; (iv) enrollment of both active members and
dependents in the group insurance commission; (v) recipients of direct
benefits provided by the department of transitional assistance through
items 4400-1004, 4403-2000, 4405-2000 and 4408-1000; (vi) participation
in programs provided by the department of children and families through
items 4800-0038 and 4800-0041; and (vii) other related economic
forecasts; provided further, that not later than October 30, 2026, the office
shall report its fiscal year 2026 actuals, fiscal year 2027 year-to-date
actuals and forecasts and fiscal year 2028 forecasts to the executive office
for administration and finance and the house and senate committees on
ways and means; and provided further, that not later than March 16, 2027,
the office shall submit updated forecasts to the executive office for
administration and finance and to the house and senate committees on
ways and means .................................................................................................... $245,616
Division of Capital Asset Management and Maintenance.
1102-3199 For the operation of the office of facilities management and maintenance,
including the cost of utilities and associated contracts for properties
managed by the division of capital asset management and maintenance ....... $31,606,483
1102-3205 For the division of capital asset management and maintenance, which may
expend for the maintenance and operation of the Massachusetts
information technology center and other state buildings not more than
$9,701,826 in revenues collected from rentals, commissions, fees and any
other sources pertaining to the operations of said facilities; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose
of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the division may incur expenses and

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower
of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in
the state accounting system ............................................................................... $9,701,826
1102-3233 For the division of capital asset management and maintenance for the
certification of contractors and subcontractors ...................................................... $986,564
Bureau of the State House.
1102-1128 For state house accessibility coordination, including communications
access to public hearings and meetings; provided, that access shall
include interpreter services for the deaf and hard of hearing ................................ $162,257
1102-3331 For the operation of the bureau of the state house; provided, that the
superintendent, director of operations and other employees of the bureau
shall work in conjunction with the business manager of the house of
representatives and the chief financial officer of the senate on the
maintenance, repair, purchases and payments for materials and services;
provided further, that funds shall be expended for full-time maintenance
coverage of elevators at the state house; and provided further, that funds
shall be expended for personnel necessary to provide management of
physical security technology at the state house ................................................. $4,575,171
1102-3400 For security operations at the bureau of the state house, including security
personnel necessary to adequately staff the security operations center and
manage communications for the bureau of the state house security and
emergency preparedness team with public safety agencies, prior
appropriation continued ......................................................................................... $742,500
Massachusetts Office on Disability.
1107-2400 For the Massachusetts office on disability .......................................................... $1,465,805
DISABLED PERSONS PROTECTION COMMISSION.
1107-2501 For the operation of the disabled persons protection commission including,
but not limited to, the costs of maintaining a computerized registry system
of persons who have been substantiated for registrable abuse of a person
with an intellectual or developmental disability; provided, that the
commission shall facilitate compliance by the department of mental health
and the department of developmental services with uniform investigative
standards; provided further, that the commission shall submit quarterly
reports to the house and senate committees on ways and means on the
number of claims of abuse by caretakers made by employees or
contracted service employees of the department of developmental
services, the department of mental health and MassAbility; provided
further, that the report shall include the number of: (i) substantiated claims;
(ii) unsubstantiated claims; and (iii) false claims reported as a result of
intentional and malicious action; and provided further, that all persons who
call the commission’s 24-hour hotline shall be provided with the
opportunity to elect that the call not be recorded .............................................. $13,000,000
Civil Service Commission.

Conference Committee Report
1108-1011 For the civil service commission; provided, that the General Fund shall be
reimbursed for the appropriation in this item through a fee charged on a
per-claim basis; provided further, that the commission shall develop and
implement regulations to provide for reimbursement to the General Fund;
and provided further, that the commission may assess a fee upon the
appointing authority when inappropriate action has occurred ............................ $1,305,302
Group Insurance Commission.
1108-5100 For the operation of the group insurance commission; provided, that on a
monthly basis, the commission shall provide the caseload forecasting
office with enrollment data and any other information pertinent to caseload
forecasting; provided further, that the information shall be provided in
a manner that meets all applicable federal and state privacy requirements;
provided further, that the commission shall submit quarterly reports to the
house and senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but
not be limited to: (i) any proposed plan changes accompanied by a
detailed rationale for such changes; (ii) a detailed delineation of any
estimated deficiencies or reversions in the current fiscal year, detailed by
item; and (iii) a projection of any funding changes for the following fiscal
year, detailed by item; provided further, that not later than September 25,
2026 the first such report shall be submitted; provided further, that the
commission shall provide all materials presented at any public meetings
hosted by the commission to the house and senate committees on ways
and means not later than 15 days after the public meeting; provided further,
that not less than $300,000 shall be expended to the Harvard T.H. Chan
School of Public Health to conduct a study and issue a report on the impact
on health status and health care utilization as a result of discontinuing
commercial and public health insurance coverage for glucagon-like
peptide-1 medications for patients with obesity; provided further, that such
funds shall be made available until June 30, 2029; provided further, that
the report shall be submitted to the executive office for administration and
finance, the joint committee on health care financing and the house and
senate committees on ways and means and shall include, but not be
limited to, an analysis of: (a) the impacts of discontinued coverage for
glucagon-like peptide-1 medications on the utilization of health care
services, total medical spending and enrollee out-of-pocket spending; (b)
how individuals and providers respond to discontinued coverage of
glucagon-like peptide-1 medications including, but not limited to, whether
individuals are paying for the medication out of pocket or the prescriber is
recoding patient diagnoses; (c) how the impacts vary across groups of
individuals; and (d) the comparison of health outcomes and total medical
spending between enrollees that have lost coverage of glucagon-like
peptide-1 medications and enrollees who have maintained coverage for
glucagon-like peptide-1 medications for obesity management; and
provided further, that not later than February 7, 2027, the commission shall
submit a report to the executive office for administration and finance, the
joint committee on health care financing and the house and senate
committees on ways and means detailing the preliminary findings of the
study .................................................................................................................... $5,909,591
1108-5200 For the commonwealth’s share of the group insurance premium and plan
costs incurred in fiscal year 2027; provided, that funds may be expended
from this item for the commonwealth’s share of group insurance premium
and plan costs provided to employees and retirees in prior fiscal years;

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
provided further, that funds may be expended from this item for elderly
retired governmental employees and retired municipal teachers; provided
further, that the commission may pay premium and plan costs for
municipal employees and retirees who are enrolled in the commission’s
health plans under the commission’s regulations; provided further, that the
rules for determining the commonwealth’s share of the group insurance
premiums for active and retired state employees shall be the same as the
standards in effect on July 1, 2012; provided further, that notwithstanding
section 26 of chapter 29 of the General Laws, the commission may
negotiate, purchase and execute contracts before July 1 of each year for
policies of group insurance under chapter 32A of the General Laws;
provided further, that the group insurance commission shall obtain
reimbursement for premium and administrative expenses from other
agencies and authorities not funded by state appropriations; provided
further, that the secretary of administration and finance shall charge the
department of unemployment assistance and other departments,
authorities, agencies and divisions which have federal or other funds
allocated to them for this purpose for that portion of insurance premium
and plan costs as the secretary determines shall be borne by such funds
and shall notify the comptroller of the amounts to be transferred, after
similar determination, from the several state or other funds and amounts
received in payment of all such charges or transfers shall be credited to
the General Fund; provided further, that the secretary of administration
and finance may charge all agencies for the commonwealth’s share of the
health insurance costs incurred on behalf of any employees of those
agencies who are on leave of absence for a period of more than 1 year;
provided further, that the amounts received in payment for the charges
shall be credited to the General Fund; provided further, that not less than
90 days before any changes in coverage, benefits or the schedule of
copayments and deductibles for plans offered by the group insurance
commission, the commission shall notify the house and senate
committees on ways and means; provided further, that notwithstanding
any general or special law to the contrary, funds in this item shall not be
available during the accounts payable period of fiscal year 2027 and any
unexpended balance in this item shall revert to the General Fund on June
30, 2027; and provided further, that not later than March 5, 2027, the
commission shall report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means on: (i) the average full cost premium equivalent per enrollee; (ii) the
average actual cost per enrollee for enrollees from participating
municipalities; (iii) the contribution ratios for each participating municipality
for fiscal year 2027; (iv) the number of members in high deductible health
plans; (v) the premium reimbursement paid by each municipality per active
enrollee by plan; (vi) the average employee premium contribution by plan
for each municipality; (vii) estimates for the total premium per active
enrollee by plan for each municipality; (viii) the average employee out-of-
pocket expenditure and premium contribution by salary level of
employees; (ix) a comparison of the total premium estimate with the sum
total of municipality reimbursement and average employee premium
contribution; (x) the total amount spent on pharmaceutical drugs; and (xi)
the cost of the commonwealth’s projected share of premiums for the next
fiscal year .................................................................................................... .$2,765,209,719
1108-5201 For the costs incurred by the group insurance commission associated with
providing municipal health insurance coverage under section 19 of chapter
32B of the General Laws; provided, that the commission may expend not
more than $2,346,621 from revenue received from administrative fees

Conference Committee Report
associated with providing municipal health insurance coverage under said
section 19 of said chapter 32B; and provided further, that notwithstanding
any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the commission may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the
lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported
in the state accounting system ............................................................................ $2,346,621
1108-5500 For the costs, notwithstanding chapter 32A of the General Laws, of dental
and vision benefits for active state employees, not including employees of
authorities or any other political subdivision, who are not otherwise
provided those benefits under a separate item or by the terms of a contract
or collective bargaining agreement; provided, that such employees shall
pay 15 per cent of the monthly premiums established by the group
insurance commission for the benefits.............................................................. $12,634,259
Division of Administrative Law Appeals.
1110-1000 For the operation of the division of administrative law appeals; provided,
that the division shall maintain, to the fullest extent practicable, a complete
physical and technological separation from any agency, department,
board, commission or program the decisions, determinations or actions of
which may be appealed to it; and provided further, that a decision issued
by a commissioner or other head of an agency or by such person’s
designee following the issuance of a recommended decision by an
administrative law judge shall be an agency decision subject to judicial
review under chapter 30A of the General Laws .................................................. $2,201,006
1110-1002 For the division of administrative law appeals, which may expend not more
than $70,000 in revenues from fees charged to appellants upon the filing
of claims, for the operation of such services provided ............................................. $70,000
George Fingold Library.
1120-4005 For the administration of the George Fingold Library ......................................... $1,663,212
Department of Revenue.
1201-0100 For the operation of the department of revenue, including tax collection
administration, audits of certain foreign corporations and the division of
local services; provided, that the department may allocate funds to the
office of the attorney general for the tax prosecution unit; provided further,
that the department may charge the expenses for computer services,
including the costs of personnel and other support costs provided to the
child support services unit, from this item to item 1201-0160 consistent
with the costs attributable to that unit; provided further, that the department
shall provide the general court with access to the municipal data bank;
provided further, that notwithstanding section 1 of chapter 31 of the
General Laws, seasonal positions funded by this item shall be positions
requiring the services of an incumbent, on either a full-time or less than
full-time basis, beginning not earlier than December 1 and ending not later
than November 30; provided further, that seasonal positions funded by this
item shall not be filled by an incumbent for more than 10 months within a
12-month period; provided further, that funds shall be expended for the

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
department’s tax expenditure commission established in section 14 of
chapter 14 of the General Laws; and provided further, that not less than
$500,000 shall be expended to organizations providing tax assistance
services to individuals and families qualifying for the volunteer income tax
assistance program, in partnership with the Internal Revenue Service, for
the provision of such services ......................................................................... $105,466,605
1201-0122 For grants to qualified low-income taxpayer clinics established in section
13 of chapter 14 of the General Laws; provided, that not later than March
5, 2027, the department of revenue shall report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means on the: (i) number of grant applications;
(ii) number of rejected applications; (iii) reasons for those rejections; (iv)
estimated number of taxpayers served by each approved grant; (v)
geographic location of the approved grant recipient clinic; and (vi) average
size of approved grants .......................................................................................... $500,000
1201-0130 For the department of revenue, which may expend for the operation of the
department not more than $27,938,953 from revenues collected by the
additional auditors for an enhanced audit program; provided, that the
auditors shall: (i) locate and identify persons who are delinquent either in
the filing of a tax return or the payment of a tax due and payable to the
commonwealth; (ii) obtain the delinquent returns; and (iii) collect the
delinquent taxes; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general
or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the department may incur expenses and the comptroller
may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state
accounting system ............................................................................................ $27,938,953
1201-0160 For the child support services division; provided, that the department of
revenue may allocate funds appropriated in this item to other state
agencies for the performance of certain child support services activities
and those agencies may expend funds for the purposes of this item;
provided further, that not later than March 3, 2027, all such allocations
shall be reported to the house and senate committees on ways and means
upon the allocation of the funds; provided further, that federal receipts
associated with the child support computer network shall be drawn down
at the highest possible rate of reimbursement and deposited into a
revolving account to be expended for the network; provided further, that
federal receipts associated with child support services grants shall be
deposited into a revolving account to be drawn down at the highest
possible rate of reimbursement and shall be expended for the grant
authority; provided further, that not later than March 3, 2027, the
department shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means detailing the balance, year-to-date and projected receipts
and year-to-date and projected expenditures, by subsidiary, of the child
support trust fund established under section 9 of chapter 119A of the
General Laws; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the department may incur expenses and the comptroller
may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state
accounting system for federal incentives and the network in items 1201-
0165, 1201-0410 and 1201-0412 ...................................................................... $47,063,828

Conference Committee Report
1201-0164 For the child support services division; provided, that the division may
expend not more than $6,767,251 from the federal reimbursements
awarded for personnel and lower subsidiary-related expenditures; and
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between
the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the division may
incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not
to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system .......................................... $6,767,251
1201-0400 For the operation of the multi-agency illegal tobacco task force established
in section 40 of chapter 64C of the General Laws .............................................. $1,072,879
1201-0911 For the costs associated with expert witnesses retained by the department
of revenue to resolve tax disputes; provided, that expenditures from this
item shall be the lesser of $173,250 or the amount certified by the
secretary of administration and finance under section 156 of chapter 139
of the acts of 2012.................................................................................................. $173,250
1231-1000 For the Commonwealth Sewer Rate Relief Fund established in section 2Z
of chapter 29 of the General Laws ...................................................................... $1,500,000
1232-0100 For underground storage tank reimbursements to parties that have
remediated spills of petroleum products under chapter 21J of the General
Laws; provided, that priority for payment of approved claims shall be given
to claimants who own or formerly owned not more than 4 dispensing
facilities ............................................................................................................... $5,842,714
Underground Storage Tank Petroleum
Product Cleanup Fund ............................................. 100%
1232-0200 For the Underground Storage Tank Petroleum Cleanup Fund
Administrative Review Board established in section 8 of chapter 21J of the
General Laws and for the administration of the underground storage tank
program associated with the implementation of said chapter 21J; provided,
that notwithstanding section 4 of said chapter 21J or any other general or
special law to the contrary, appropriations made from this item shall be
sufficient to cover the administrative expenses of the underground storage
tank program; and provided further, that not later than March 3, 2027, the
board shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways
and means on the status of the underground storage tank program
including, but not limited to, the: (i) number of municipal grants made for
the removal and replacement of underground storage tanks; (ii)
reimbursements for remediated petroleum spills; (iii) number of backlog
claims; (iv) average waiting period for claims granted in the past year; and
(v) number of tanks not in compliance with said chapter 21J ............................. $1,892,435
Underground Storage Tank Petroleum
Product Cleanup Fund ............................................. 100%
1233-2000 For the tax abatement program for certain veterans, widows, blind persons
and the elderly; provided, that cities and towns shall be reimbursed for the
abatements granted under clauses Seventeenth, Twenty-second, Twenty-
second A, Twenty-second B, Twenty-second C, Twenty-second D,
Twenty-second E, Twenty-second F, Thirty-seventh, Thirty-seventh A,

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
Forty-first, Forty-first B, Forty-first C, Forty-first C 1/2 and Fifty-second of
section 5 of chapter 59 of the General Laws; provided further, that the
commonwealth shall reimburse each city or town that accepts said clause
Forty-first B or Forty-first C of said section 5 of said chapter 59 for
additional costs incurred in determining eligibility of applicants under said
clause Forty-first B or Forty-first C of said section 5 of said chapter 59 not
more than $2 per exemption granted; and provided further, that funds in
this item shall be available for reimbursements to cities and towns for
additional exemptions granted from the motor vehicle excise under the
seventh paragraph of section 1 of chapter 60A of the General Laws ............... $43,119,996
1233-2350 For the distribution to cities and towns of the balance of the State Lottery
and Gaming Fund under clause (c) of the second paragraph of section 35
of chapter 10 of the General Laws and additional aid to municipalities as
provided for in section 3; provided, that not less than $30,000,000 shall be
distributed based on each municipality’s proportional share of the
statewide population; provided further, that the portion of such distribution
to any individual municipality shall not exceed 4 per cent of the total
distribution; and provided further, that notwithstanding the prior provisos,
the total apportionments from this item shall be prescribed in section 3… . $1,363,109,516
General Fund ........................................................ 85.01%
Gaming Local Aid Fund ........................................ 14.99%
1233-2400 For reimbursements to cities and towns in lieu of taxes on state-owned
land under sections 13 to 17, inclusive, of chapter 58 of the General Laws;
provided, that not less than $1,520,000 shall be expended for one-time,
additional reimbursements to cities and towns so that no city or town shall
receive an amount from this line item in fiscal year 2027 that is less than
the amount said city or town received in fiscal year 2026 ................................ $55,371,000
1233-2401 For reimbursements to qualifying cities and towns for additional
educational costs under chapter 40S of the General Laws ................................ $2,300,000
Appellate Tax Board.
1310-1000 For the operation of the appellate tax board; provided, that the board shall
schedule hearings in each county; and provided further, that not later than
January 8, 2027, the board shall report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means on the number of hearings held at each
location ............................................................................................................... $2,671,770
1310-1001 For the appellate tax board, which may expend not more than $400,000 in
revenues collected from fees; provided, that notwithstanding any general
or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the board may incur expenses and the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization
or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting
system .................................................................................................................... $400,000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF VETERANS’ SERVICES.
Office of the Secretary.

Conference Committee Report
1410-0010 For the operation of the executive office of veterans’ services; provided,
that the secretary of veterans' services may transfer funds between 1410-
0010, 1410-0012, 1410-0015, 1410-0018, 1410-0024, 1410-0075, 1410-
0251, 1410-0400, 1410-0630, 1410-1616 and 1410-1700; provided further,
that funds may be transferred from said items to items 4180-0100 and 4190-
0100; provided further, that not less than 30 days in advance of any such
transfer, the secretary shall notify the house and senate committees on
ways and means; and provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended for the town of Ludlow for the department of veterans’ services
for services including, but not limited to, monthly veterans’ lunches, food
pantry supports and outreach programming ..................................................... $12,519,749
1410-0012 For services to veterans, including the maintenance and operation of
outreach centers; provided, that said outreach centers shall provide
counseling to incarcerated veterans and to Vietnam war era veterans who
may have been exposed to agent orange and the families of such
veterans; provided further, that said outreach centers shall provide
services to veterans who were discharged after September 11, 2001 and
the families of those veterans; provided further, that the executive office of
veterans’ services shall make a payment of not less than the amount
appropriated for each outreach center funded by this item in fiscal year
2026; provided further, that not less than $2,500,000 shall be expended
for clinical care, education and training in veterans’ mental and behavioral
health issues, including post-traumatic stress, traumatic brain injury,
substance use disorder and suicide prevention administered by the
Massachusetts General Hospital Home Base Program; provided further,
that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to Veterans Inc. to expand
its behavioral health programming and create low-barrier access to
treatment for persons at the Worcester housing programs, and that these
funds shall be in addition to funds available for its outreach center;
provided further, that not less than $5,000 shall be expended to The
Veteran's Kitchen of Fall River, Inc.; provided further, that not less than
$5,000 shall be expended to the South Attleboro Lions Club, Inc. for costs
associated with their wheelchair ramp project; provided further, that not
less than $25,000 shall be expended to The Cape and Islands Veterans
Outreach Center, Inc. for the purpose of communications and systems
upgrades; provided further, that not less than $350,000 shall be expended
to the New England Brain Sciences Institute, Inc. to deliver cutting-edge
brain treatment to veterans and first responders; provided further, that not
less than $30,000 shall be expended to the Veterans Oral History Project
in the town of Natick; provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be
expended to VFW Post 1645 and American Legion Post 89 combined in
the town of Stoughton; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall
be expended to Springfield Veterans First (NABVET) Outreach Center;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended for Project
New Hope Incorporated for initiatives related to veteran outreach,
community engagement in the town of Leicester, and wellness programs;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the
Bilingual Veterans Outreach Centers of Massachusetts, Inc. in the city of
Springfield for a city of Pittsfield caseworker; provided further, that not less
than $125,000 shall be expended to the Montachusett Veterans Outreach
Center, Inc. for supportive housing programs and operational functions;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the
Abraham Lincoln Post 11 in the Charlestown section of the city of Boston
for facility upgrades and maintenance; provided further, that not less than

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
$200,000 shall be expended to Brave for Veterans, Inc. to support
research programs benefiting veterans in the commonwealth; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to New England
Wounded Veterans, Inc. for the development of the East Boston Veterans
Museum; provided further, that not later than March 26, 2027, the executive
office shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways
and means detailing for each outreach center receiving funds under this
item: (i) the number of veterans served annually; (ii) the cost and types of
programs, including evidence-based or evidence-informed programs,
offered to veterans; and (iii) a 5-year spending plan or outline that shall
include a summary of the implementation or further development of
evidence-based programs and program evaluation; provided further, that
not less than $150,000 shall be expended as a grant to the Veterans'
Association of Bristol County, Inc.; provided further, that not less than
$45,000 shall be expended to the town of Carver for a wheelchair-
accessible shuttle bus for veterans; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be expended for Bilingual Veterans Outreach Center of
Massachusetts, Inc. in the city of Springfield for the administration of
veteran services; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be
expended for the Massachusetts chapter of Vietnam Veterans of America
to aid veterans filing claims for medical and financial benefits; provided
further, that not less than $500,000 shall be expended for the operations
of Veterans Inc. for services to veterans, including, but not limited to,
employment training and substance use treatment; provided further, that
not less than $50,000 shall be expended to Operation Troop Support, Inc.
in the town of Danvers to support the production and distribution of care
packages to deployed United States military personnel; provided further,
that not less than $25,000 shall be expended for Fishing for the Mission
’22, Inc. to assist veterans in crisis through healing, community, resources,
advocacy and support; and provided further, that not less than $25,000
shall be expended for the Frank M. Noyes V.F.W. Post 8892, Inc. in the
town of Avon for necessary infrastructure repairs to comply with the
Americans with Disabilities Act accessibility requirements for veterans and
the general public .............................................................................................. $11,327,339
1410-0013 For veterans' education, employment and training services and programs
to expand employment, education and training support for veterans
returning to the commonwealth including, but not limited to, the Veterans
Coordinated Approach to Recovery and Employment program that
supports unemployed or underemployed veterans with post-traumatic
stress disorder to attain competitive employment ............................................... $1,650,000
1410-0015 For the women veterans’ outreach program .......................................................... $721,444
1410-0018 For the executive office of veterans’ services, which may expend not more
than $760,000 for the maintenance and operation of veterans’ cemeteries
in the town of Winchendon and in the city known as the town of Agawam
from revenue collected from fees, grants, gifts and other contributions to
the cemeteries; provided, that the funds appropriated in this item shall not
revert to the General Fund but shall be made available for these purposes
through June 30, 2028 ........................................................................................... $760,000
1410-0024 For the training and certification of veterans' benefits and services officers;
provided, that the secretary of veterans' services shall continue a training
program for veterans' agents and directors of veterans' services in cities
and towns; provided further, that the executive office of veterans' services

Conference Committee Report
shall provide such training in several locations across the commonwealth;
and provided further, that training shall be provided annually and on an as
needed basis to veterans' service organizations recognized by the
executive office of veterans affairs to provide information and education
regarding the benefits available under chapter 115 of the General Laws
and all other benefits to which a veteran or a veteran's dependents may
be entitled ............................................................................................................... $385,068
1410-0075 For the train vets to treat vets program; provided, that the executive office
of veterans’ services shall work in conjunction with the William James
College, Inc. to administer a behavioral health career development
program for veterans .............................................................................................. $275,000
1410-0250 For veterans’ homelessness services; provided, that the executive office
of veterans’ services shall expend not less than the amount appropriated
for each veterans’ homelessness service funded by this item in fiscal year
2026; provided further, that not later than April 2, 2027, the executive office
shall submit a comprehensive report to the joint committee on veterans
and federal affairs and the house and senate committees on ways and
means, which shall include, but not be limited to, the: (i) list of veterans’
homelessness services receiving funds through this account in the current
fiscal year; (ii) amount of funding received by each veterans’
homelessness service; (iii) number of veterans served annually by each
veterans’ homelessness service; and (iv) estimated percentage of
homeless veterans receiving veterans’ homelessness services per county
in the current year; provided further, that not less than $175,000 shall be
expended to Volunteers of America of Massachusetts, Inc. for the
development of an innovative transitional employment program for
individuals in recovery from mental health and substance use disorder;
and provided further, that not less than $914,000 shall be expended to the
Disabled American Veterans Department of Massachusetts Service Fund,
Inc. to combat veteran homelessness by maintaining and operating 3
veterans homes and to provide counseling and benefits, including wrap-
around assistance, to disabled veterans and their families ................................ $4,117,952
1410-0251 For the maintenance and operation of homeless shelters and transitional
housing for veterans at the New England Center and Home for Veterans
located in the city of Boston ................................................................................ $4,043,750
1410-0400 For reimbursements to cities and towns for money expended for veterans’
benefits and for payments to certain veterans under section 6 of chapter
115 of the General Laws and for the payment of annuities to certain
disabled veterans; provided, that annuity payments made under this item
shall be made under sections 6A, 6B and 6C of said chapter 115; provided
further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, 100
per cent of the amounts of veterans’ benefits paid by cities and towns to
residents of a soldiers’ home, homeless shelter or transitional housing
facility shall be paid by the commonwealth to said cities and towns;
provided further, that under section 9 of said chapter 115, the executive
office of veterans’ services shall reimburse cities and towns for the cost of
United States flags placed on the graves of veterans on Memorial Day;
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, the executive office shall continue a training program for
veterans’ agents and directors of veterans’ services in cities and towns;
provided further, that the executive office shall provide such training in

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
several locations across the commonwealth; provided further, that such
training shall be provided annually and on an as-needed basis to veterans’
service organizations to provide information and education regarding the
benefits available under said chapter 115 and all other benefits to which a
veteran or a veteran’s dependents may be entitled; provided further, that
any person applying for veterans’ benefits to pay for services available
under chapter 118E of the General Laws shall also apply for medical
assistance under said chapter 118E to minimize costs to the
commonwealth and its municipalities; provided further, that veterans’
agents shall complete applications authorized by the executive office for
the spouse or dependent applying for medical assistance under said
chapter 115; provided further, that the veterans’ agent shall file the
application for the veteran, surviving spouse or dependent for assistance
under said chapter 118E; provided further, that the executive office of
health and human services shall act on all chapter 118E applications and
advise the applicant and the veterans’ agent of the applicant’s eligibility for
said chapter 118E healthcare; provided further, that the veterans’ agent
shall advise the applicant of the right to assistance for medical benefits
under said chapter 115 pending approval of the application for assistance
under said chapter 118E by the executive office of health and human
services; provided further, that the secretary of veterans’ services may
supplement health care under said chapter 118E with health care
coverage under said chapter 115 if the secretary determines that
supplemental coverage is necessary to provide the veteran, surviving
spouse or dependent with sufficient relief and support; provided further,
that payments to, or on behalf of, a veteran, surviving spouse or
dependent under said chapter 115 shall not be considered income for
determining eligibility under said chapter 118E; and provided further, that
benefits awarded under said section 6B of said chapter 115 shall be
considered countable income ........................................................................... $85,049,082
1410-0630 For the administration of the veterans’ cemeteries in the town of
Winchendon and in the city known as the town of Agawam ............................... $1,567,538
1410-1616 For war memorials; provided, that not less than $100,000 shall be
expended to the city of Worcester for the maintenance and care of the
Vietnam Veterans Memorial in the city of Worcester; provided further, that
not less than $10,000 shall be expended for the North Adams Veterans
Memorial Wall; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be
expended to the U.S.S. Massachusetts Memorial Committee,
Incorporated for the maintenance and care of historic naval vessels;
provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the town
of Rockland for purposes including, but not limited to, lighting replacement
and updates to ground level lighting at Rockland Veterans Memorial;
provided further, that not less than $30,000 shall be expended to the Cape
and Islands Veterans Outreach Center, Inc. for veterans’ housing and
homelessness prevention, food security and transportation services,
including a contract for services with the Cape Cod and Islands regional
group of the Blinded Veterans Association; and provided further, that not
less than $25,000 shall be expended for the William E. Carter American
Legion Post 16 in the Mattapan section of the city of Boston to preserve
its historical building and support local veteran and community events ................ $435,000
1410-1700 For the provision of information technology services within the executive
office of veterans' services .................................................................................. $4,749,739

Conference Committee Report
Massachusetts Veterans Home in the City of Chelsea.
4180-0100 For the maintenance and operation of the Massachusetts Veterans Home
in the city of Chelsea, including a specialized unit for the treatment of
patients with Alzheimer’s disease; provided, that no fee, assessment or
other charge shall be imposed upon or required of any person for any
admission or hospitalization that exceeds the amount of fees charged in
fiscal year 2026 .................................................................................................. $45,464,230
4180-1100 For the maintenance and operation of the Massachusetts Veterans Home
in the city of Chelsea in an amount not to exceed $500,000; provided, that
50 per cent of all revenues generated under section 2 of chapter 90 of the
General Laws through the purchase of license plates with the designation
VETERAN by eligible veterans of the commonwealth, after compensating
the registry of motor vehicles for the costs associated with the license
plates, shall be deposited into and for the purposes of this account; and
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between
the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the department
may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts
not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate, as reported in the state accounting system, prior appropriation
continued ................................................................................................................ $500,000
Massachusetts Veterans Home in Holyoke.
4190-0100 For the maintenance and operation of the Massachusetts Veterans Home
in Holyoke; provided, that no fee, assessment or other charge shall be
imposed upon or required of any person for any outpatient treatment,
admission or hospitalization that exceeds the amount of fees charged in
fiscal year 2026; and provided further, that funds shall be expended for the
operation of an ombudsman’s office at the Massachusetts Veterans Home
in Holyoke to act as an independent, impartial and confidential resource
for the community .............................................................................................. $36,885,297
4190-0103 For the Massachusetts Veterans Home in Holyoke, which may expend not
more than $50,000 for its operation from the sale of goods to residents
and visitors of the home ........................................................................................... $50,000
4190-0300 For the Massachusetts Veterans Home in Holyoke, which may expend not
more than $2,400,000 for the operation of 12 long-term care beds from
revenue generated through the occupancy of those beds; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose
of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the Massachusetts Veterans Home in
Holyoke may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment
amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent
revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system, prior
appropriation continued ...................................................................................... $2,400,000
4190-1100 For the maintenance and operation of the Massachusetts Veterans Home
in Holyoke in an amount not to exceed $500,000; provided, that 50 per
cent of all revenues generated under section 2 of chapter 90 of the General
Laws through the purchase of license plates with the designation
VETERAN by eligible veterans of the commonwealth, after compensating

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
the registry of motor vehicles for the costs associated with the license
plates, shall be deposited into and for the purposes of this account; and
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between
the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the department
may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts
not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate, as reported in the state accounting system, prior appropriation
continued ................................................................................................................ $500,000
Health Policy Commission.
1450-1200 For the operation of the health policy commission; provided, that the
commission shall provide all materials presented at any public meetings
hosted by the commission to the house and senate committees on ways
and means not later than 15 days after the public meeting .............................. $13,935,376
Reserves.
1599-0008 For a reserve to offset reductions in state aid distributed to cities and towns
under chapter 70 of the General Laws due to unexpected reductions in
English language learners .................................................................................. $4,000,000
1599-0026 For a reserve to support municipal improvements; provided, that not less
than $3,000,000 shall be expended for the District Local Technical
Assistance Fund established under section 2XXX of chapter 29 of the
General Laws, for initiatives, including projects that encourage
regionalization, to be administered by the division of local services and
distributed through the District Local Technical Assistance Fund; provided
further, that not less than $30,000 shall be expended to the town of
Shrewsbury to upgrade athletic lights at Dean Park and Coolidge
Pickleball Court; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to the Longmeadow police department, to repurpose an existing
first floor room as an interview room to meet ADA requirements; provided
further, that not less than $40,000 shall be expended to the town of Paxton
for disaster relief, recovery costs and reimbursements for damage as a
result of the September 2025 tornado that touched down in said town;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the town
of Holden for essential renovations and the relocation of municipal
buildings; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended
to Old Sturbridge Village Living History Museum for capital improvements;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town
of Chicopee to create an emergency access and recreational ramp for the
Chicopee River; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be
expended to the town of Norwood for the repair and construction of
infrastructure at the historic Shattuck Memorial Park; provided further, that
not less than $150,000 shall be expended to the town of Marlborough for
GIS Flyover data capture drone and analysis; provided further, that not
less than $100,000 shall be expended to the town of Marlborough for
continued upgrades for the Marlborough downtown veterans park
containing the Women’s Veterans, MIA/POW, Spanish American and Civil
War monuments; provided further, that not less than $40,000 shall be
expended to the city of Framingham for the design, fabrication, engraving,
installation and public dedication of a Middle East Conflicts Veterans
Memorial in Framingham; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall

Conference Committee Report
be expended to the city of Chelsea to support a new fire station; provided
further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the town of
Wakefield for restroom construction at Veterans field in Wakefield;
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended for
Brighton Main Streets, Inc.; provided further, that not less than $100,000
shall be expended to the city of Melrose for stage lights replacements and
other capital improvements at Memorial Hall; provided further, that not less
than $35,000 shall be expended to the town of Swampscott for
maintenance and repairs of deteriorating structures at the Swampscott
cemetery; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended
to the town of Dalton for the purchase and installation of an emergency
generator at the Dalton senior center; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the town of Essex for a study of Chebacco
lake and its watershed; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall
be expended to the city of Gloucester for the planning and design of the
courtyard at O’Maley Innovation middle school; provided further, that not
less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town of Rowley for a PFAS
remediation system to bring Town Well #2 online; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town of Ipswich for water
treatment plant updates and wastewater treatment to alleviate issues that
have contributed to the closure of local clam flats; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town of Georgetown for
critical water treatment infrastructure; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shelled be expended to the town of Newbury to address
watershed supply and drought management; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended to the city of Malden for upgrades and
capital improvements to the city’s streetscape; provided further, that not
less than $100,000 shall be expended to the city of Malden for flood
mitigation and stormwater infrastructure improvements including, but not
limited to, the cleaning and maintenance of the Town Line brook and
Linden brook culverts; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be
expended town of North Reading for roof maintenance at the historic
Putnam House; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to Wayland public schools for wellness and recreational
enhancements at Wayland high school and Happy Hollow elementary
school; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended to
support Volunteer Medical Group of Eastern Massachusetts to cover start-
up costs and to provide primary care services to uninsured patients in the
Allston, Brighton, Watertown and Waltham communities; provided further,
that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the city known as the town
of North Attleborough for a feasibility study regarding the World War II
Memorial Pool; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the town of Petersham to replace its current ADA-compliant
ramp for the Town Office building; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the town of Petersham for unanticipated
costs associated with continuing ambulance services; provided further,
that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the town of Scituate for
the renovation and conversion of the WPA building into a veterans’ space,
in coordination with the executive office of veterans’ services; provided
further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the town of
Medfield for technological and facility upgrades to its town hall; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the city of
Westfield for capital improvements to Bullens field in Westfield; and
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the town
of Wellesley for digital content updates and modifications; provided further,
that not less than $7,000,000 shall be transferred to the executive office

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
of public safety and security for a competitive grant program for public
safety and emergency staffing to be administered by the executive office;
provided further, that the grants shall be awarded to communities using
the same methodology and criteria used in fiscal year 2026; provided
further, that grants under this item shall only be provided to communities
that submitted qualifying applications that were approved by the executive
office in fiscal year 2026; provided further, that not more than 4 per cent
of funds appropriated for the grant program shall be expended for the
administrative costs of the program; provided further, that not later than
February 16, 2027, each state entity administering grant funds through this
item shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways
and means detailing grants awarded through this item and the criteria used
for distribution; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended for facade improvements to the Old Town Hall in the town of
Andover; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
for the acquisition of a digital community sign in the town of Amesbury;
provided further, that not less than $15,000 shall be expended to the town
of Rehoboth for the preservation and binding of historical municipal
records, including the use of outside archival services; provided further,
that not less than $7,000 shall be expended to the town of Brimfield for the
purchase of solar-powered pedestrian crossing signs and related
equipment; provided further, that not less than $30,000 shall be expended
to the town of Hopedale for fire department costs associated with fire
safety projects, including for the removal of out-of-date fire alarm wiring
and equipment from utility poles; provided further, that not less than
$20,000 shall be expended to the town of West Newbury for roadway
safety improvements; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to the town of Groveland for water treatment facility
improvements; provided further, that not less than $40,000 shall be
expended to the metropolitan area planning council for the costs
associated with the planning and coordination of a regional approach to
municipal emergency services in Essex county; and provided further, that
not less than $70,000 shall be expended to the town of Raynham for the
development of a townwide stormwater and drainage master plan to
identify deficiencies and prioritize infrastructure improvements ....................... $13,307,000
1599-0093 For contract assistance to the Massachusetts Clean Water Trust including,
but not limited to, the debt service obligations of the trust, principal
forgiveness, interest rate reduction and other subsidies or financial
assistance under sections 6 and 18 of chapter 29C of the General Laws ....... $63,383,680
1599-0340 For a reserve for costs associated with increasing starting salaries for
assistant district attorneys ................................................................................... $5,000,000
1599-1970 For a reserve for the Massachusetts Department of Transportation to
defray the costs of the Massachusetts Turnpike Authority, or its successor,
incurred in fiscal year 2027 under section 138 of chapter 27 of the acts of
2009 ................................................................................................................ $125,000,000
Commonwealth Transportation Fund....................... 100%
1599-1977 For contract assistance and other payments to the Massachusetts
Development Finance Agency for payment of debt service and related
obligations in connection with bonds issued by the agency under chapter
293 of the acts of 2006, as amended by chapter 129 of the acts of 2008,
chapter 238 of the acts of 2012, chapter 287 of the acts of 2014 and

Conference Committee Report
chapter 219 of the acts of 2016; provided, that not later than January 29,
2027, the secretary of administration and finance shall submit a report to
the house and senate committees on ways and means on the estimated
contract assistance and other payments to be required under said chapter
293 of the acts of 2006, said chapter 219 of the acts of 2016, said chapter
238 of the acts of 2012 and said chapter 287 of the acts of 2014 for
obligations existing not later than July 1, 2026, in fiscal years 2028 and
2029 and an estimate of anticipated contract assistance and other
payments arising out of potential agreements reasonably expected to be
entered into after July 1, 2026, in fiscal years 2028 and 2029 ......................... $13,000,000
1599-2003 For the Uniform Law Commission; provided, that prior fiscal year
payments may be payable from this item ................................................................ $75,000
1599-3234 For the South Essex Sewerage District debt service assessment .......................... $33,914
1599-3384 For a reserve for the payment on behalf of a state agency as defined in
section 1 of chapter 29 of the General Laws under regulations
promulgated by the comptroller, of certain court judgments, settlements
and legal fees that were ordered to be paid in the current fiscal year or a
prior fiscal year; provided, that the office of the comptroller shall not pay
attorneys’ fees to outside counsel representing a state agency, including
a state official or employee who is sued for actions undertaken within that
individual’s scope of employment for the commonwealth, in litigation
before a court until the office of the attorney general has reviewed and
provided written approval for the outside counsel's bills, which may be
reviewed in redacted form if warranted because of a conflict of interest;
provided further, that the office of the comptroller shall not pay attorneys’
fees for outside counsel representing a state agency in such litigation that
exceeds a cumulative amount of $250,000 until the secretary of
administration and finance or a designee has reviewed and provided
written approval for such attorneys’ fees for outside counsel; provided
further, that before a state official or employee who is sued for actions
undertaken within that individual’s scope of employment for the
commonwealth may seek reimbursement from this item, that individual
shall obtain written approval from the office of the attorney general in a
form to be approved by the office of the comptroller; provided further, that
the office of the comptroller shall not pay a settlement of litigation before a
court on behalf of a state agency that is not within an executive office
identified in section 2 of chapter 6A of the General Laws, including a state
official or employee who is sued for actions undertaken within that
individual’s scope of employment for the commonwealth, until the office of
the attorney general has reviewed and provided written approval for such
a settlement; provided further, that the office of the comptroller shall not
pay a settlement of litigation before a court that exceeds $250,000 on
behalf of a state agency that is not within an executive office identified
under said section 2 of said chapter 6A, including a state official or
employee who is sued for actions undertaken within that individual’s scope
of employment for the commonwealth, until the secretary of administration
and finance or a designee has reviewed and provided written approval for
such a settlement; provided further, that the office of the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the 5-year historical
expenditure average as certified by the secretary of administration and
finance or the current appropriation, whichever is greater; provided further,
that the comptroller shall submit quarterly reports to the house and senate
committees on ways and means on the amounts expended from this item,

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
delineated by item; and provided further, that upon written notification to
the executive office for administration and finance and the house and
senate committees on ways and means, uncommitted and unobligated
funds from this item may be transferred to item 0612-0105 upon the
request of the state treasurer .............................................................................. $1,000,000
1599-4417 For the Edward J. Collins Jr. Center for Public Management in the John
W. McCormack Graduate School of Policy and Global Studies at the
University of Massachusetts at Boston .................................................................. $275,000
1599-6903 For the fiscal year 2027 costs of rate implementations under chapter 257
of the acts of 2008; provided, that rate implementations under said chapter
257 may include, but shall not be limited to, costs associated with any
court order or settlement between providers of services and the
commonwealth related to the rate implementation process; provided
further, that preference in distributing funds from this item shall be given
to personnel earning wages less than $20 per hour; provided further, that
home care workers shall be eligible for funding from this item; provided
further, that workers from shelters and programs that serve homeless
individuals and families that were previously contracted through the
department of transitional assistance and the department of public health
who are currently contracted with the executive office of housing and
livable communities and direct care workers that serve homeless veterans
through the executive office of veterans' services shall be eligible for
funding from this item; provided further, that no funds from this item shall
be allocated to special education programs under chapter 71B of the
General Laws, contracts for early education and care services or programs
for which payment rates are negotiated and paid as class rates as
established by the executive office of health and human services; provided
further, that no funds shall be allocated from this item to contracts funded
exclusively by federal grants as delineated in section 2D of this act;
provided further, that the secretary of administration and finance may
transfer from the sum appropriated in this item to other items of
appropriation and allocations thereof for fiscal year 2027, amounts that are
necessary to meet these costs where the amounts otherwise available are
insufficient for the purpose of rate implementations; provided further, that
the executive office for administration and finance shall submit quarterly
reports to the house and senate committees on ways and means on
transfers made from this item; provided further, that the report shall
identify, by item and service class, all transfers made from this item as of
the date of the report and all transfers expected to be made before the end
of the fiscal year; provided further, that not later than February 3, 2027,
the executive office of health and human services shall submit a report to
the executive office for administration and finance and the house and
senate committees on ways and means on the implementation of rates
under said chapter 257 of the acts of 2008, including, the: (i) state costs
for rates promulgated as of July 1, 2026 by regulation, department and
program; (ii) state costs for rates promulgated as of January 1, 2027,
delineated by regulation, department and program; (iii) per cent of
increase in state funding for rates to be reviewed between July 1, 2026
and June 30, 2027, delineated by regulation, department and program;
and (iv) fiscal impact for increases in state funding versus prior fiscal year
actual costs for rates to be reviewed between July 1, 2026 and June 30,
2027, delineated by regulation, department and program; provided further,
that contracts between providers and the departments within the executive
office of health and human services and the executive office of aging and

Conference Committee Report
independence shall require providers to report on the impact of the rate
implementations on employee salaries, employee-related costs and
operations; provided further, that not later than April 1, 2027, the executive
office of health and human services shall submit a report to the executive
office for administration and finance and the house and senate committees
on ways and means on the implementation of ongoing and proposed
initiatives to promote equitable salaries for human services workers, direct
care workers, nurses, clinicians or other comparable employees employed
by state-operated human services providers and equitable rates paid to
human service provider employees in community-based human services
organizations funded by the executive office of health and human services,
the executive office of aging and independence or the executive office of
housing and livable communities; provided further, that the report shall
include, but not be limited to: (a) average uniform financial report provider
data on employee tax and fringe benefit information of the preceding 2
state fiscal years, as validated with information from the uniform financial
report or a method determined by the executive office; (b) the median
salary and compensation information of the preceding 2 state fiscal years
classified by direct care and frontline staff, medical and clinical staff and
management staff, as validated with information from the uniform financial
report or a method determined by the executive office; (c) a comparison
of the median salary for each classification of staff position with the
seventy-fifth percentile wage estimate for that position as determined by
the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics for the commonwealth using
the available data for that rate review; and (d) the average employee
vacancy rates of direct care and frontline staff for the preceding 2 state
fiscal years and the current fiscal year from the date of new rate
implementations; provided further, that not later than March 4, 2027 the
executive office health and human services shall report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means a comparison of the median salary
for each classification of staff position with the seventy-fifth percentile
wage estimate for that position as determined by the United States Bureau
of Labor Statistics for Massachusetts in the most recent available data;
provided further, that not later than December 30, 2026 the executive
office of health and human services shall report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means the methodology used to develop service
rates for home health aides, personal care aides and homemakers; and
provided further, that any human service provider receiving revenue under
said chapter 257 shall use not less than 75 per cent of the funds received
for compensation for their direct care, frontline and medical and clinical
staff, which may include, but shall not be limited to, hourly rate increases,
wraparound benefits, shift differentials, overtime, hiring and retention
bonuses or recruitment, as defined by the executive office ............................ $175,000,000
Human Resources Division.
1750-0100 For the operation of the human resources division and the costs of
administration, training and customer support related to the
commonwealth’s human resources and compensation management
system and the human resource modernization initiative; provided, that
any employee of the commonwealth who chooses to participate in a bone
marrow donor program shall be granted a leave of absence without loss
or reduction in pay to undergo the medical procedure and for associated
physical recovery time, but such leave shall not exceed 5 days; provided
further, that notwithstanding clause (n) of section 5 of chapter 31 of the

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
General Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, the
secretary of administration and finance shall charge a fee of not less than
$50 to be collected from each applicant for a civil service examination;
provided further, that the division shall administer a program of state
employee unemployment management including, but not limited to,
agency training and assistance; provided further, that funds may be
expended to revalidate civil service exams, including police and fire
medical standards; provided further, that the division shall be responsible
for the administration of examinations for state and municipal civil service
titles, establishment of eligible lists, certification of eligible candidates to
state and municipal appointing authorities and technical assistance in
selection and appointment to state and municipal appointing authorities;
and provided further, that the division shall administer the statewide
classification system including, but not limited to, maintaining a
classification pay plan for civil service titles in accordance with generally
accepted compensation standards and reviewing appeals for
reclassification ................................................................................................... $17,546,607
1750-0103 For the operation of the Training and Career Ladder Program ............................. $829,164
1750-0104 For the human resources division, which may expend for the
administration of the civil service examination program, examinations for
non-civil service positions and implementation of the medical and physical
fitness standards programs ................................................................................. $5,846,319
1750-0119 For payment of workers’ compensation benefits to certain former
employees of Middlesex and Worcester counties and the Hampshire
council of government; provided, that the human resources division shall
routinely recertify the former employees under current workers’
compensation procedures ........................................................................................ $53,548
1750-0300 For the commonwealth’s contributions in fiscal year 2027 to health and
welfare funds established under certain collective bargaining agreements;
provided, that the contributions shall be calculated as provided under the
applicable collective bargaining agreements and shall be paid to the health
and welfare trust funds on a monthly basis or on such other basis as the
applicable collective bargaining agreement shall provide................................. $37,979,800
1750-0928 For the cost to lease or rent space to administer the civil service physical
abilities tests and to revalidate civil service exams, including police and
fire medical standards ............................................................................................ $752,345
Operational Services Division.
1775-0115 For the operational services division, which may expend not more than
$15,691,630 from revenues collected from the statewide contract
administrative fee to procure, manage and administer statewide contracts;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary,
for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the
receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the division may
incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not
to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system ........................................ $15,691,630

Conference Committee Report
1775-0124 For the operational services division, which may expend not more than
$131,101 from revenues collected in the recovery of cost reimbursement
and non-reimbursable overbilling and recoupment for health and human
service agencies and as a result of administrative reviews as determined
during the division’s audits and reviews of providers under section 22N of
chapter 7 of the General Laws; provided, that the division may only retain
revenues collected in excess of $100,000; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose
of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the division may incur expenses and
the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower
of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in
the state accounting system .................................................................................. $131,101
1775-0600 For the operational services division, which may expend not more than
$397,220 from revenues collected from the sale of state surplus personal
property and the disposal of surplus motor vehicles including, but not
limited to, state police vehicles from vehicle accident and damage claims
and from manufacturer warranties, rebates and settlements for the
payment, expenses and liabilities for the acquisition, warehousing,
allocation and distribution of surplus property and the purchase of motor
vehicles; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between
the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the division may
incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not
to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system, including the costs of
personnel ............................................................................................................... $397,220
1775-0700 For the operational services division, which may expend not more than
$1,000,000 from revenues collected in addition to the amount authorized
in item 1775-1000 of section 2B for printing, photocopying, mailing, related
graphic art or design work and other reprographic goods and services
provided to the general public, including all necessary or incidental
expenses; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between
the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the division may
incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not
to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system .......................................... $1,000,000
1775-0900 For the operational services division, which may expend not more than
$22,000 from revenues collected under chapter 449 of the acts of 1984
and section 4L of chapter 7 of the General Laws, including the costs of
personnel, from the sale of federal surplus property, including the
payment, expenses and liabilities for the acquisition, warehousing,
allocation and distribution of federal surplus property; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose
of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the division may incur expenses and
the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower
of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in
the state accounting system .................................................................................... $22,000
Supplier Diversity Office.

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
1780-0100 For the operation and administration of the supplier diversity office;
provided, that the office shall provide training and other services to diverse
businesses as defined in section 58 of chapter 7 of the General Laws and
certified by the office that allow those businesses to better compete for
state contracts and ensure that equitable practices and policies in the
public marketplace are maintained; provided further, that the office shall
administer an electronic business certification application which shall be
accessible to business applicants through the internet; provided further,
that the office shall ensure the integrity and security of personal and
financial information transmitted by electronic application; and provided
further, that the office shall use all existing available resources to provide
certification services to all supplier diversity office qualified applicants,
within or outside of the commonwealth, as applicable ........................................ $4,649,617
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF TECHNOLOGY SERVICES AND SECURITY.
1790-0100 For the operation of the executive office of technology services and
security; provided, that the executive office shall continue a chargeback
system for its information technology services; provided further, that the
state comptroller shall establish accounts and procedures as the
comptroller deems appropriate and necessary to assist in accomplishing
the purposes of this item; provided further, that the executive office may
establish rules and procedures necessary to implement this item; provided
further, that the chief information officer shall review and approve any
planned information technology development project or purchase by any
agency under the authority of the governor for which the total projected
cost exceeds $200,000, including the cost of any related hardware,
software or consulting fees and regardless of fiscal year or source of
funds, before the agency may obligate funds for the project or purchase;
provided further, that not later than June 30, 2027, the secretary of
technology services and security shall submit to the office of the state
auditor, the house and senate committees on ways and means and the
joint committee on state administration and regulatory oversight a
complete accounting of and justification for all project-related expenditures
totaling $250,000 or more over the previous 12-month period regardless
of source of funds or authorization for such expenditure; provided further,
that not less than $250,000 shall be expended to expand the AI For Impact
program to design, test and deploy artificial intelligence solutions that
improve delivery of state services and build an AI-ready state workforce;
and provided further, that not later than February 17, 2027, the executive
office shall submit a report to the executive office for administration and
finance, the office of the state auditor and the house and senate
committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to: (i)
financial statements detailing savings and, where applicable, additional
expenses realized from the consolidation of information technology
services within each executive office and other initiatives; (ii) efforts being
taken to ensure the compatibility and interoperability of agency systems and
to consolidate relevant data between agencies; (iii) the number of personnel
assigned to information technology services within each executive office;
(iv) efficiencies that have been achieved from the sharing of resources; (v)
the status of the centralization of the commonwealth's information
technology staffing, infrastructure and network and cloud hosting; (vi) the
status of the commonwealth's cybersecurity; and (vii) strategies and
initiatives to further improve the: (a) efficiency and security of the

Conference Committee Report
commonwealth's information technology; and (b) transparency of the
executive office of technology services and security with the general court,
other executive branch agencies and the general public.................................... $3,897,090
1790-0300 For the executive office of technology services and security, which may
expend not more than $2,733,931 in revenues collected from the provision
of computer resources and services to the general public for the costs of
the bureau of computer services, including the purchase, lease or rental
of telecommunications lines, services and equipment; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose
of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the executive office may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system ........................................................ $2,733,931
1790-1700 For core technology services and security, including those previously
funded through item 1790-0200 in prior fiscal years ......................................... $53,892,963
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENTAL AFFAIRS.
Office of the Secretary.
2000-0100 For the operation of the office of the secretary of energy and environmental
affairs, including the water resources commission, the hazardous waste
facility site safety council, the coastal zone management program and
environmental impact reviews conducted under chapter 30 of the General
Laws; provided, that efforts shall be made to prioritize environmental
justice across all departments; provided further, that not less than
$500,000 shall be expended to the Cape Cod Commercial Fishermen’s
Alliance, Inc. for the modernization and maintenance of sustainable
fishing; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to
Quiet Communities, Inc. in Concord; provided further, that not less than
$30,000 shall be expended to enter into an agreement with OARS, Inc. to
operate a water quality monitoring program in the Sudbury, Assabet and
Concord rivers; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the town of Foxborough for necessary repairs and
improvements to aging dam structure;and provided further, that not less
than $150,000 shall be expended for a coastal water quality and natural
resource monitoring program in Buzzards bay and Vineyard sound
administered by Buzzards Bay Coalition, Inc. .................................................. $20,504,035
2000-0101 For the executive office of energy and environmental affairs to coordinate
and implement strategies for climate change adaptation and preparedness
including, but not limited to: (i) the resiliency of the commonwealth's
transportation, energy and public health infrastructures; (ii) built
environments; (iii) municipal assistance; (iv) improved data collection and
analysis; (v) enhanced planning; and (vi) improved resiliency through the
strengthening and revitalization of natural resources, including marshes
and other wetlands; provided, that the executive office may enter into
interagency service agreements to facilitate and accomplish these efforts;
provided further, that not later than February 5, 2027 the executive office
of energy and environmental affairs shall submit a report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be
limited to: (a) the commonwealth’s multi-year plan for developing a climate

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
change resiliency plan and response strategy; (b) plans to support local
partners in climate change adaptation and resiliency; (c) an analysis of the
differing effects of climate change in different geographic, ecological, and
coastal regions of the state, including urban, suburban and rural homes;
(d) a review of the environmental justice impacts of climate change on
communities of color; and (e) a detailed breakdown of all expenditures
made under this item; provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall
be expended to Boston Harbor Now, Inc. for planning, programming and
activation and for climate resiliency and community science education;
provided further, that not less than $300,000 shall be expended to the
University of Massachusetts Boston to compile and use new technologies
to conduct a climate resiliency report and study on preparing for low
probability high impact event; and provided further, that not later than
December 30, 2026 the executive office shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means, the house committee on
climate action and sustainability, the senate committee on climate change
and global warming, the joint committee on transportation and the joint
committee on telecommunications, utilities and energy that shall include
the status of its efforts to enhance port infrastructure for the development
of offshore wind ................................................................................................... $4,750,000
2000-0102 For the executive office of energy and environmental affairs to implement
an environmental justice strategy and promote and secure environmental
justice; provided, that funds shall be expended on language translation
services to ensure adequate access during public comment periods;
provided further, that not later than March 3, 2027, the executive office
shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means, which shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the number of full-time
equivalent positions assigned to the executive office’s environmental
justice staff; (ii) the responsibilities held by the executive office’s
environmental justice staff; (iii) the status of environmental justice policies,
strategies and initiatives being pursued for both the current and coming
fiscal years; (iv) the efforts to expand language access through verbal and
written materials, including the languages in which environmental justice
policy and materials have been translated; and (v) the impact of language
access initiatives on participation in public hearings and public comment
periods; and provided further, that funds shall be expended on mapping
technology to overlay environmental and public health data .............................. $4,000,000
2000-0120 For obligations of the commonwealth to neighboring states incurred
pursuant to interstate compacts for flood control ................................................... $506,140
2000-1011 For the office of environmental law enforcement, which may expend not
more than $40,000 from the administrative handling charge revenues
received from electronic transactions processed through its online
licensing and registration systems; provided, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating
timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the office may incur expenses and the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization
or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting
system ...................................................................................................................... $40,000
2000-1700 For the operation of information technology services within the executive
office of energy and environmental affairs ........................................................ $21,855,267

Conference Committee Report
2030-1000 For the operation of the office of environmental law enforcement; provided,
that environmental police officers shall provide monitoring under the
National Shellfish Sanitation Program .............................................................. $17,446,355
2030-1004 For environmental police private details; provided, that the office of
environmental law enforcement may expend not more than $650,000 from
revenues collected from the fees charged for private details; and provided
further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt
of retained revenues and related expenditures, the office may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system ........................................................... $650,000
Department of Public Utilities.
2100-0012 For the operation of the department of public utilities; provided, that
notwithstanding the second sentence of the first paragraph of section 18
of chapter 25 of the General Laws, the assessments levied for fiscal year
2027 under said first paragraph of said section 18 of said chapter 25 shall
be made at a rate sufficient to produce the amount expended from this
item and the associated fringe benefit costs for personnel paid from this
item.................................................................................................................... $18,973,830
2100-0013 For the operation of the transportation oversight division ...................................... $970,861
2100-0016 For the department of public utilities to regulate steam distribution
companies; provided, that notwithstanding section 18A of chapter 25 of
the General Laws, the assessments levied for fiscal year 2027 shall be
made at a rate sufficient to produce the amount expended from this item
and the associated fringe benefit costs for personnel paid from this item ............. $462,420
2100-0017 For the operation of the division of transportation network services
established in section 23 of chapter 25 of the General Laws; provided, that
the amount assessed under said section 23 of said chapter 25 shall be
made at a rate sufficient to produce the amount expended from this item
and the associated fringe benefit costs for personnel paid from this item .......... $4,343,775
2100-5694 For the operation of the energy facilities siting division; provided, that the
division may expend funds from this item for the implementation of section
12N of chapter 25 of the General Laws, including the maintenance of a
real-time, online, clean energy infrastructure dashboard and the creation
thereof ................................................................................................................ $3,604,000
Department of Environmental Protection.
2200-0100 For the operation of the department of environmental protection, including
the environmental strike force, the bureau of planning and evaluation, the
bureau of resource protection, the bureau of waste prevention, the Senator
William X. Wall Experiment Station and a contract with the University of
Massachusetts for environmental research; provided, that section 3B of
chapter 7 of the General Laws shall not apply to fees established in section
18 of chapter 21A of the General Laws; and provided further, that not later
than February 5, 2027 the department shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means detailing: (i) the status of

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
hiring of additional staff; (ii) the staffing levels of the department for the last
10 fiscal years; (iii) the number of enforcement actions for serious
violations and fine collections compared to the previous 10 fiscal years;
and (iv) recommendations for the additional resources needed to fulfill the
department’s enforcement responsibilities; provided, that not less than
$200,000 shall be expended to the Merrimack River Watershed Council,
Inc. for a regional approach to reducing combined sewer overflows and
non-point source pollution in the Merrimack river; provided further, that not
less than $100,000 shall be expended to the metropolitan area planning
council for initiatives to support the North Shore Water Resilience Task
Force in its regional plans and actions to help sustain the rivers and waters
of the north shore region; and provided further, that not less than $30,000
shall be expended for Cape Ann Climate Coalition Inc for preemptive
strategic planning for post-disaster recovery .................................................... $51,438,149
2200-0102 For the department of environmental protection, which may expend not
more than $650,148 in revenues collected from fees for wetland permits;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary,
for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the
receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the department
may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts
not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system ............................................. $650,148
2200-0107 For technical assistance, grants and support of efforts consistent with the
Massachusetts Recycling and Solid Waste Master Plan and the
Massachusetts Climate Protection Plan; provided, that funds may be
expended for a recycling industries reimbursement grant program under
section 241 of chapter 43 of the acts of 1997; provided, that not less than
$500,000 shall be expended for the department of environmental
protection to develop an employment social enterprise impact pilot
program to provide funding for at least 1 nonprofit entity to provide
recycling services with the overall goal of fostering job security for
individuals facing barriers to employment through the provision of mattress
recycling work opportunities; provided further, that eligible applicants shall
have a demonstrated history of providing mattress recycling services in
the commonwealth as an approved vendor to the department for not less
than 5 years; provided further, that contracts through the program may be
awarded for periods not to exceed 5 years with options for renewal;
provided further, that not less than $150,000 shall be expended to the
department of environmental protection to administer a grant program for
small businesses to implement composting; provided further, that grants
may be used by grantees to obtain compost collection containers, procure
educational or technical assistance, establish regular collection of food
waste and other compostable matter or other similar composting efforts or
activities; provided further, that agricultural businesses and food service
establishments shall be prioritized in the grant application review process;
and provided further, that not later than April 1, 2027, the department of
environmental protection, in coordination with the department of
agricultural resources, shall submit a report to the senate and house
committees on ways and means and the joint committee on environment
and natural resources on the implementation of the grant program which
shall include, but not limited to, the names and locations of the grantees,
the number of pounds of food waste and other compostable matter
collected and information about where the waste was diverted ......................... $1,138,747

Conference Committee Report
2200-0109 For the department of environmental protection to ensure sufficient staff
for timely permit decisions and compliance assurance ...................................... $2,471,257
2200-0112 For the department of environmental protection, which may expend not
more than $2,500,000 in revenues collected from permit and compliance
fees to ensure sufficient staff for timely permit decisions and compliance
assurance; provided, that if this item is eliminated or the amount herein is
reduced in fiscal year 2027 or operational funding for the department falls
below the level authorized in the general appropriations act for fiscal year
2015, excluding appropriations for earmarks and nonrecurring operating
costs, the fee increase supporting this item shall terminate; and provided
further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt
of retained revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system ........................................................ $2,500,000
2210-0106 For the department of environmental protection, which may expend for the
administration and implementation of chapter 21I of the General Laws, not
more than $2,741,404 in revenues collected from fees, penalties, grants
and tuition under said chapter 21I; provided, that not later than February
3, 2027, the department shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means detailing the status of the department’s
progress in meeting the statutory and regulatory deadlines associated with
said chapter 21I and detailing the number of full-time equivalent positions
assigned to various implementation requirements of said chapter 21I;
provided further, that not less than $1,629,860 from this item shall be
made available for the operation of the Toxics Use Reduction Institute
program at the University of Massachusetts at Lowell; provided further,
that the department shall enter into an interagency service agreement with
the University of Massachusetts to make such funding available for this
purpose; provided further, that not less than $644,096 from this item shall
be made available for toxics use reduction technical assistance and
technology under said chapter 21I; provided further, that the department
shall enter into an interagency service agreement with the executive office
of energy and environmental affairs to make such funding available for this
purpose; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special
law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the department may incur expenses and the comptroller
may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state
accounting system .............................................................................................. $2,741,404
2220-2220 For the administration and implementation of the Clean Air Act under 42
U.S.C. section 7401 et seq., including the operating permit program, the
emissions banking program, the auto-related state implementation
program, the low emission vehicle program, the non-auto-related state
implementation program and the commonwealth’s commitments under the
New England Governors and Eastern Canadian Premiers Regional
Climate Change Action Plan for reducing acid rain deposition and mercury
emissions ............................................................................................................... $766,721

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
2220-2221 For the administration and implementation of the operating permit and
compliance program required under the Clean Air Act under 42 U.S.C.
section 7401 et seq. ........................................................................................... .$1,384,924
2250-2000 For the administration and implementation of the Safe Drinking Water Act
under section 18A of chapter 21A of the General Laws; provided, that the
department of environmental protection may expend funds for the study
and remediation of lead in public school drinking water; provided further,
that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Silent Spring Institute,
Inc. for continued study of the long term effects of per-and polyfluoroalkyl
substances on residents in the town of Ayer, including supporting
epidemiological analyses, reconstructing past exposures to per-and
polyfluoroalkyl substances drinking water and disseminating study
findings to community members and presenting health-related resources
to clinicians; and provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall be
expended to the town of Maynard for the mitigation of drinking water
quality issues ....................................................................................................... $2,716,225
2260-8870 For the expenses of the hazardous waste cleanup and underground
storage tank programs, including, but not limited to, monitoring unlined
landfills, notwithstanding section 4 of chapter 21J of the General Laws;
provided, that the department of environmental protection shall provide the
department of revenue with information necessary for the completion of
the report required in item 1232-0200 including, but not limited to, the
number of tanks out of compliance with said chapter 21J ................................ $15,081,628
2260-8872 For the brownfields site audit program................................................................ $1,022,328
2260-8881 For the operation of the board of registration of hazardous waste site
cleanup professionals, notwithstanding section 19A of chapter 21A of the
General Laws ......................................................................................................... $386,896
Department of Fish and Game.
2300-0100 For the office of the commissioner of fish and game; provided, that the
commissioner’s office shall assess and receive payments from the division
of marine fisheries, the division of fisheries and wildlife, the office of fishing
and boating access, the division of ecological restoration, the riverways
program and all other programs under the control of the department of fish
and game; provided further, that those assessments shall be used to cover
appropriate administrative costs of the department including, but not
limited to, payroll, personnel, legal and budgetary costs; provided further,
that not less than $30,000 shall be expended to the town of Chelmsford
for an aquatic management study at Heart Pond, including water quality
analysis and invasive species mitigation; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended to the North Walpole Fish and Game
Club, Inc. in the town of Walpole to support the continuation of programs
for combat veterans and students with special needs; provided further, that
not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the New England Wildlife
Center, Inc. in the city known as the town of Weymouth for costs
associated with the care, treatment and maintenance of wildlife; provided
further, that the amount and contribution from each division, office or
program shall be determined by the commissioner; and provided further,
that the George L. Darey Inland Fisheries and Game Fund shall be

Conference Committee Report
reimbursed annually from the General Fund for all lost revenue attributed
to the issuance of discounted and free hunting and fishing licenses .................. $2,356,087
2300-0101 For the division of ecological restoration and the riverways program and
for the promotion of public access to rivers and wetland restoration,
including grants to public and nonpublic entities; provided, that not less
than $200,000 shall be expended as a grant to the Southeastern Regional
Planning and Economic Development District to support the management
of the Assawompset pond complex and contributing and interconnected
watersheds within the region including, but not limited to, sedimentation,
mitigation, design, permitting, water supply preservation and flood
management efforts; and provided further, that not less than $60,000 shall
be expended as a grant to Long Pond Association, Inc. in the town of
Lakeville for the management and eradication of invasive weeds in Long
Pond .................................................................................................................... $5,086,042
2310-0200 For the administration of the division of fisheries and wildlife, including
expenses of the fisheries and wildlife board, the administration of game
farms and wildlife restoration projects, wildlife research and management,
the administration of fish hatcheries, the improvement and management
of lakes, ponds and rivers, fish and wildlife restoration projects, the
commonwealth’s share of certain cooperative fisheries and wildlife
programs and for certain programs reimbursable under the federal Aid to
Fish and Wildlife Restoration Act; provided, that the division may expend
the amount necessary to restore anadromous fish in the Connecticut and
Merrimack river systems; and provided further, that no funds shall be spent
on the restoration of catadromous fish in the Connecticut and Merrimack
river systems unless considered necessary by the division ............................. $18,490,988
George L. Darey Inland Fisheries and Game Fund . 100%
2310-0300 For the operation of the natural heritage and endangered species
program; provided, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to the
Fishing Academy of Boston for programming ..................................................... $1,231,735
2310-0306 For the hunter safety training program................................................................... $581,485
George L. Darey Inland Fisheries and Game Fund . 100%
2310-0316 For the purchase of land containing wildlife habitats and for the costs of
the division of fisheries and wildlife directly related to the administration of
the wildlands stamp program under sections 2A and 2C of chapter 131 of
the General Laws ................................................................................................ $1,500,000
George L. Darey Inland Fisheries and Game Fund . 100%
2310-0317 For the waterfowl management program established in section 11 of
chapter 131 of the General Laws ............................................................................. $65,000
George L. Darey Inland Fisheries and Game Fund . 100%
2320-0100 For the administration of the office of fishing and boating access, including
the maintenance, operation and improvement of public access land and
water areas; provided, that positions funded by this item shall not be
subject to chapter 31 of the General Laws ........................................................ $1,004,529

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
2330-0100 For the operation of the division of marine fisheries; provided, that the
division may expend funds for the Annisquam river marine research
laboratory, marine research programs, a commercial fisheries program, a
shellfish management program, including coastal area classification,
mapping and technical assistance, and a shellfish classification program;
provided further, that funds shall be expended on a recreational fisheries
program to be reimbursed by federal funds; provided further, that the
division shall continue to develop strategies to improve federal regulations
governing the commercial fishing industry and to promote sustainable
fisheries; provided further, that not less than $150,000 shall be expended
for shellfish propagation in Barnstable, Dukes and Nantucket counties to
be administered jointly by the director of Marine Fisheries and the
aforementioned counties; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall
be expended for a green crab trapping program in the towns of
Provincetown, Truro, Wellfleet, Eastham, Orleans, Chatham and Harwich
to be distributed by the department of marine fisheries; and provided
further, that not less than $575,000 shall be expended for a program of
collaborative research by the division of marine fisheries through the
Marine Fisheries Institute, in collaboration with the School for Marine
Science and Technology at the University of Massachusetts at Dartmouth,
that applies innovative technology to assess the biomass of fish in the
region managed by the New England Fishery Management Council and
hydrodynamic modeling of coastal waters to accurately assess delineation
of shellfish growing area classifications and other applications to improve
management of marine fisheries resources, and whelk fishery research to
evaluate alternative management strategies; provided further, that not less
than $175,000 shall be expended to the University of Massachusetts at
Amherst for its Gloucester Marine Station in the city of Gloucester to
support marsh restoration and revitalization activities including, but not
limited to: (i) a green crab trapping program for applied research and
product development; (ii) high‑resolution drone mapping to assess
deterioration of the Great Marsh; (iii) microplastic and macroplastic
sampling; and (iv) an academic study and processing of samples from the
water column, beach environment, marsh peat and eelgrass; provided
further, that not less than $150,000 shall be expended to Center for
Coastal Studies, Inc. for field operations and staffing to respond to
entanglements of marine mammals and sea turtles in the coastal waters;
and provided further, that not less than $195,000 shall be expended for
water testing capacity improvements at the division including, but not
limited to, personnel and supplies, in support of the shellfish and
aquaculture industries in the south coast region of the commonwealth ........... $10,234,242
2330-0120 For the division of marine fisheries for a program to enhance and develop
marine recreational fishing and related programs and activities, including
the cost of equipment, maintenance and staff and the maintenance and
updating of data ..................................................................................................... $987,684
2330-0121 For the division of marine fisheries to utilize reimbursable federal sportfish
restoration funds to further develop marine recreational fishing and related
programs, including the costs of activities that increase public access for
marine recreational fishing, support research on artificial reefs and provide
for the development of marine recreational fishing; provided, that the
division may expend not more than $217,989 in revenues collected from
the United States Fish and Wildlife Service’s Sport Fish Restoration
program funds and from the sale of materials that promote marine
recreational fishing; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general

Conference Committee Report
or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the division may incur expenses and the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization
or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting
system .................................................................................................................... $217,989
2330-0199 For conducting surveys to monitor and forecast the number of
commercially-important invertebrate species in the commonwealth’s
waters, including a ventless lobster trap employing the services of
contracted commercial lobster fishing vessels in the commonwealth;
provided, that the division of marine fisheries may expend not more than
$250,000 in revenues collected from fees generated by the sale of lobster
permits; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special
law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the division may incur expenses and the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization
or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting
system .................................................................................................................... $250,000
2330-0300 For the administration and operation of the recreational saltwater fishing
permit program under section 17C of chapter 130 of the General Laws ............ $2,306,416
Marine Recreational Fisheries Development Fund .. 100%
Department of Agricultural Resources.
2511-0100 For the operation of the department of agricultural resources, including the
division of administration, the integrated pest management program, the
board of agriculture, the division of agricultural markets, the division of
animal health, the division of agricultural conservation and technical
assistance, the division of crop and pest services, including a program of
laboratory services at the University of Massachusetts at Amherst, the
expenses of the pesticide board and agency costs associated with the
administration of other boards, commissions and committees chaired by
the department; provided, that not less than $120,000 shall be expended
for the Massachusetts Farm to School Project; provided further, that not
less than $300,000 shall be expended for the Massachusetts Food Trust
Program established in section 65 of chapter 23A of the General Laws;
provided further, that not less than $175,000 shall be expended for the
apiary inspection program; provided further, that not less than $100,000
shall be expended for the invasive insects program; provided further, that
not less than $250,000 shall be expended for a grant program to be
administered by the department in consultation with the Massachusetts
food policy council to support local food policy councils; provided further,
that not less than $750,000 shall be expended to enhance the Buy Local
effort in western, central, northeastern and southeastern Massachusetts;
provided further, that any buy local effort included in this item shall include
locally-harvested seafood including, but not limited to, fish and shellfish;
and provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be transferred to
the Homeless Animal Prevention and Care Fund established in section
35WW of chapter 10 of the General Laws ........................................................ $10,970,309

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
2511-0103 For the costs associated with agricultural oversight of hemp and cannabis
............................................................................................................................ $1,007,137
Marijuana Regulation Fund ...................................... 100%
2511-0105 For the purchase of supplemental foods for the emergency food
assistance program within the Feeding America nationally-certified food
bank system; provided, that funds appropriated in this item shall reflect the
Feeding America allocation formula in order to benefit the
commonwealth’s 4 regional food banks; provided further, that the
department of agricultural resources may assess an administrative charge
not to exceed 2 per cent of the total appropriation in this item; provided
further, that not less than $1,250,000 shall be expended to the
commonwealth’s 4 regional food banks for operating funds to distribute
food for the Massachusetts emergency food assistance program; provided
further, that not less than $500,000 shall be expended to the Women's
Lunch Place, Inc. to provide nutritious food and individualized services for
women who are experiencing homelessness or poverty; provided further,
that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Merrimack Valley Food
Bank for the operation of the nourish children’s feeding program; provided
further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to Project Just
Because, Inc.; and provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to the MetroWest Food Collaborative to support food security
initiatives ........................................................................................................... $56,175,000
2511-0107 For the advancement of community food security and the protection of
public access to sufficient, safe and nutritious food; provided, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended for Maverick Landing Community
Services, Inc. for recovered food distribution across the city of Boston, the
city known as the town of Winthrop and the city of Revere; provided further,
that not less than $190,000 shall be expended for Acton Community
Supper and Food Pantry, Inc. to purchase a mobile food pantry vehicle;
provided further, that not less than $60,000 shall be expended to New Life
Furniture Bank of MA, Inc. to purchase a vehicle to support its operations
and its mission to provide free furniture to families in need; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended for Heart & Soil
Collective Inc. in the town of Lanesborough for the purpose of providing
free, fresh produce and soup to seniors and families in need; provided
further, that not less than $65,000 shall be expended to Ginny’s Helping
Hand, Inc. in the city of Leominster for the purposes of supporting their
food pantry; provided further, that not less than $51,500 shall be expended
to Metrowest Worker Center Inc. / Casa do Trabalhador/ Casa Del
Trabajador to support culturally appropriate food distribution efforts
serving immigrant families facing food insecurity, including expanded
support in the city of Marlborough; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be expended to Growing Places Garden Project, Inc. in the
city of Leominster to connect fresh food from local farms to local residents
in need; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended for
Open Door/Cape Ann Food Pantry, Inc. serving the cities of Gloucester
and Lynn and the towns of Rockport, Essex, Manchester-by-the-Sea,
Ipswich, Rowley, Topsfield, Boxford, Hamilton and Wenham to develop
and deploy a transportation system for decentralized food distribution to
the north shore communities it serves; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to Our Neighbors' Table, Inc. for expenses
related to opening and operating the seacoast regional food hub, located
in the town of Salisbury, serving the lower merrimack valley food coalition;

Conference Committee Report
provided further, that not less than $45,000 shall be expended for the food
pantry run by the Society of Saint Vincent de Paul located behind Saint
Joseph church in the town of Lincoln; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to Healthy Waltham, Inc. to support its food
pantry operations; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to the city of Somerville for its mobile market revolving fund to
help maintain its low-cost farmers market on wheels; provided further, that
not less than $150,000 shall be expended for the Charles River Regional
Chamber, Inc. to provide grants to independent restaurants located in the
city of Newton and the towns of Brookline and Wellesley to supply
prepared meals and other food products to food banks serving those
communities, senior programs and other programs addressing food
insecurity among individuals in those communities; provided however, that
of said $150,000 not less than $65,000 of such funds shall be allocated
for grants to independent restaurants in the city of Newton; provided
however, that of said $150,000 not less than $50,000 of such funds shall
be allocated for grants to independent restaurants in the town of Brookline;
provided however, that of said $150,000 not less than $35,000 of those
funds shall be allocated for grants to independent restaurants in the town
of Wellesley; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to Newton Food Pantry, Inc. to support its operations; provided,
that not less than $70,000 shall be expended for Food Link, Inc. to address
food insecurity in the city of Woburn and the towns of Arlington, Billerica,
Burlington and Lexington; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall
be expended for Harvest on Vine Food Pantry in the Charlestown
neighborhood of the city of Boston to provide food resources and services;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to
Somebody Cares New England, Inc. in the city of Haverhill for the
operation of its food pantry and to combat food insecurity in the
community; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
to the Allston-Brighton Food Pantry in the city of Boston; provided further,
that not less than $10,000 shall be expended for the veterans food bank
in the city known as the town of Winthrop for public food pantry services;
provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended for Grace
Church Federated in the East Boston section of the city of Boston for public
food pantry services; provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be
expended for Friday Night Supper Program, Inc. in the Back Bay section
of the city of Boston for public food pantry services; provided further, that
not less than $10,000 shall be expended for the First Congregational
Church of Revere in the city of Revere for its public food pantry; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to Lorraine's Soup
Kitchen & Pantry, Inc. in the city of Chicopee to support food aid and
additional services; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to Third Sector New England, Inc. for Gardening the
Community, Inc. to address food insecurity in the city of Springfield;
provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended for the
Joshua Kaye Foundation Inc to combat food insecurity in the
commonwealth; provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be
expended for Meghan’s Light, Inc. in the town of Hadley for food
assistance to individuals struggling with cystic fibrosis; provided further,
that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to Family Table
Collaborative, Inc. for infrastructure improvements, equipment upgrades,
technology enhancements, expanded delivery capacity and facility and
operational efficiencies to support regional food security on Cape Cod;
provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended for Stone
Soup Cafe in the city of Greenfield to support its community programming;

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
provided further, that not less than $70,000 shall be expended to Franklin
County Community Meals Program, Inc. for its programming and meal
services; provided, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to
People's Pantry in the town of North Andover for a vehicle to transport food
donations; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
to Catholic Charities of Lynn for the purposes of supporting their food
pantry and additional community services; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended to the Regional Environmental Council,
Inc. for programs and operations; provided further, that not less than
$90,000 shall be expended to Greater Lynn Senior Services, Inc. for
programming related to the Phoenix Food Hub in the city of Lynn; provided
further, that not less than $40,000 shall be expended to Coastal Foodshed
Incorporated to address food insecurity through access to healthy food
and to provide support to local farmers and our agricultural economy in the
greater New Bedford region; provided further, that not less than $100,000
shall be expended to expanding the Edward L. Cooper Community
Gardening and Education Center, Inc.; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to expanding the Hawthorne Youth and
Community Center, Incorporated; provided further, that not less than
$75,000 shall be expended to Manna Community Kitchen to combat food
insecurity and expand their support service for vulnerable populations;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the
Martha's Vineyard Fishermen's Preservation Trust, Inc. for operating and
expanding the Seafood Donation Program, and for otherwise supporting
the fishing industry on Martha’s Vineyard; provided further, that not less
than $40,000 shall be expended to Farming Falmouth, Inc. for the
purchase and installation of a year-round greenhouse and for otherwise
supporting agriculture in the town of Falmouth; provided further, that not
less than $20,000 shall be expended to The People's Pantry in the town
of Great Barrington for the purchase of a new off-site food storage unit;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the city
of Somerville for the operation of school-based food access programs;
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to Fenway
Civic Association, Inc. for the purpose of funding the Fenway Cares Mutual
Aid Initiative, including administrative costs, to distribute fresh food and
supplies to food-insecure Fenway residents; provided further, that not less
than $25,000 shall be expended to the Marion Institute, Inc. for the 2026
Food System Assessment for Southeastern Massachusetts; provided
further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended to the Lexington
Interfaith Outreach Food Pantry, Inc. for operations, rent support,
feasibility studies and planning for potential new locations and efficiency
improvements for the Lexington food pantry; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended to Just Roots, Inc., Greenfield Community
Farm; provided further, that not less than $30,000 shall be expended to
Survival Centers,Inc. to support its food pantry programs; provided further,
that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to Granby To-Go, Inc. to
support the in-school food pantry and clothing distribution program in the
town of Granby; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the food pantry at A Place to Turn Inc. in the town of Natick;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the heart
healthy food pantry at the Natick Service Council, Inc.; provided further,
that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to Arlington EATS, Inc.;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to
Neighbors Eating All Together (NEAT), Inc. in the town of Arlington;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the
Cambridge Economic Opportunity Committee, Inc. in the city of

Conference Committee Report
Cambridge for the reopening of the North Cambridge food pantry; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Franklin Food
Pantry, Incorporated for the prevention of food insecurity; provided further,
that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Medway Community
Farm, Inc. Agriculture Development Project; provided further, that not less
than $25,000 shall be expended to the Medway food pantry for local food
security and anti-hunger initiatives; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the Walpole Community Food Pantry, Inc.
for operations, rent support, feasibility studies and planning for a potential
new location; provided further, that not less than $375,000 shall be
expended to the Boston Public Market Association, Inc. for the operation
and programming at the Boston Public Market; provided further, that not
less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Charity Guild Food Pantry for
local food security and anti-hunger initiatives in the city of Brockton;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Al
Nelson Friendship Center Food Pantry; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to Rose's Bounty Food Pantry, Inc. to help
fulfill food insecurity needs for residents of the southwest neighborhood of
the city of Boston; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to Land’s Sake,Inc. in the town of Weston to support
infrastructure and capital improvements to support the sale and donation
of fresh produce; provided further, that not less than $40,000 shall be
expended to the East Boston Community Soup Kitchen, Inc. to provide
food aid and additional services; provided further, that not less than
$10,000 shall be expended to Meadowbrook Farm LLC in Westford for
regional food sustainability services; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be expended to Codman Square Health Center, Inc. for
planning and operational costs related to the expansion of food security
services provided by the Dorchester Food Court; provided further, that not
less than $25,000 shall be expended to the West Bridgewater Food
Pantry, Inc.; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be
expended to Food for Free Committee, Incorporated to operate school
programming; and provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the Belmont Food Collaborative, Inc. in the town of Belmont ........ $3,546,500
2511-3002 For the integrated pest management program ........................................................ $87,129
Department of Conservation and Recreation.
2800-0100 For the operation of the department of conservation and recreation;
provided, that notwithstanding section 3B of chapter 7 of the General
Laws, the department shall establish or renegotiate fees, licenses,
permits, rents and leases and adjust or develop other revenue sources to
fund the maintenance, operation and administration of the department ............ $7,235,707
2800-0101 For the watershed management program to operate and maintain
reservoirs, watershed lands and related infrastructure of the department
of conservation and recreation and its office of water resources; provided,
that the amount of the payment shall be charged to the General Fund and
shall not be included in the amount of the annual determination of fiscal
year charges to the Massachusetts Water Resources Authority assessed
to the authority under the General Laws; provided further, that the
department shall continue to make payments under chapter 616 of the
acts of 1957, as amended by section 89 of chapter 801 of the acts of 1963;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
Blackstone Watershed Collaborative, Inc. for programming and
operations; and provided further, that the department shall continue to
make payments under chapter 307 of the acts of 1987 for the use of certain
land ..................................................................................................................... $1,732,905
2800-0401 For a program to provide stormwater management for all properties and
roadways under the care, custody and control of the department of
conservation and recreation; provided, that the department shall
implement a stormwater management program in compliance with federal
and state stormwater management requirements; provided further, that
the department shall inventory all stormwater infrastructure, assess its
stormwater practices, analyze long-term capital and operational needs
and develop a stormwater management plan to comply with federal and
state regulatory requirements; provided further, that not less than $25,000
shall be expended to the town of Chelmsford for efforts to address per-
and polyfluoroalkyl substances contamination through the installation of a
granular activated carbon filtration system; and provided further, that in
order to protect public safety and to protect water resources for water
supply, recreational and ecosystem uses, the department shall
immediately implement interim stormwater management practices
including, but not limited to, street sweeping, inspection and cleaning of
catch basins and emergency repairs to roadway drainage ................................ $1,644,905
2800-0500 For the existing maintenance, operational and infrastructure needs of the
metropolitan beaches under section 70 of chapter 3 of the General Laws;
provided, that not less than $900,000 shall be expended for the
metropolitan beaches in the cities of Lynn, Revere and Quincy, the towns
of Nahant and Hull, the city known as the town of Winthrop and the East
Boston, South Boston and Dorchester sections of the city of Boston to be
fully maintained and seasonally staffed as recommended by the
metropolitan beaches commission in coordination with the department of
conservation and recreation; provided further, that not less than $100,000
shall be expended for Save the Harbor, Save the Bay, Inc.’s staff time,
consultants and direct expenses to support the ongoing work of the
commission on the future of metropolitan beaches; provided further, that
not less than $50,000 shall be expended for the cleanup of Pilayella algae;
provided further, that not less than $290,000 shall be expended for
matching grants to public and nonpublic entities to support free public
events and programs on the metropolitan beaches as part of Save the
Harbor, Save the Bay, Inc.’s Better Beaches Grants Program as
recommended by the metropolitan beaches commission; and provided
further, that not less than $55,000 shall be expended for the maintenance
of Red Rock park on Lynn Shore drive in the city of Lynn .................................. $1,460,231
2800-0501 For the operation of the beaches, pools and spray pools under the control
of the department of conservation and recreation; provided, that the
seasonal hires of the department’s parks, beaches, pools and spray pools
shall be paid from this item; provided further, that said beaches, pools and
spray pools shall remain open and staffed from Memorial Day to Labor
Day, inclusive; provided further, that said beaches, pools and spray pools
shall be fully maintained; provided further, that seasonal employees who
are hired before the second Sunday preceding Memorial Day, whose
employment continues beyond the Saturday following Labor Day and who
received health insurance benefits in fiscal year 2026, shall continue to
receive such benefits in fiscal year 2027 during the period of said
employees’ seasonal employment; provided further, that notwithstanding

Conference Committee Report
section 1 of chapter 31 of the General Laws, seasonal positions funded by
this item shall be positions requiring the services of an incumbent, on
either a full-time or less than full-time basis, beginning not earlier than April
1 and ending not later than November 30 or beginning not earlier than
September 1 and ending not later than April 30; and provided further, that
notwithstanding said section 1 of said chapter 31, seasonal positions
funded by this item shall not be filled by an incumbent for more than 8
months within a 12-month period ...................................................................... $28,463,716
2800-0700 For the office of dam safety; provided, that the office shall, in collaboration
with the department of environmental protection and the department of fish
and game, establish and maintain a comprehensive inventory of all dams
and develop a coordinated permitting and regulatory approach to dam
removal for stream restoration and public safety; provided further, that not
less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town of Groveland for repairs
to the Salem Street dam; and provided further, that not less than $50,000
shall be expended to the city of Newburyport to advance the Lower
Artichoke dam project ............................................................................................ $855,817
2810-0100 For the operation of the division of state parks and recreation; provided,
that funds appropriated in this item shall be used to: (i) operate all of the
division’s parks, parkways, boulevards, roadways, bridges and related
appurtenances under the care, custody and control of the division, flood
control activities of the division, reservations, campgrounds, beaches and
pools; (ii) oversee skating rinks; and (iii) protect and manage the division’s
lands and natural resources, including the forest and parks conservation
services and the bureau of forestry development; provided further, that all
properties that were open in fiscal year 2026 shall be open in fiscal year
2027; provided further, that the crossing guards located at department of
conservation and recreation intersections shall continue to perform the
duties where state police previously performed such duties; provided
further, that the division may issue grants to public and nonpublic entities
from this item; provided further, that the rinks under the control of the
department shall remain open and staffed for the full rink season and that
ice skating shall be available from September 1 through April 15 of the
following year; provided further, that local youth programs and nonprofits
get first preference in scheduling on all playfields and hockey rinks
operated by the department; provided further, that additional funds shall
be expended to address the needs of state parks in all regions of the
commonwealth; provided further, that not later than February 3, 2027 the
department shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means on: (A) the status of hiring for additional staffing; (B) the
staffing levels for the previous 10 fiscal years; and (C) the average staffing
level at each park; provided further, that not more than $3,300,000 may
be used to support the costs of snow and ice removal; provided further,
that the department shall take steps to address personnel needs in a
manner that is geographically equitable; provided further, that not later
than January 29, 2027, the department shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means detailing the hires made for
division personnel in fiscal year 2027; provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law, rule, regulation or
administrative directive to the contrary, the commissioner of conservation
and recreation may fill not more than 1,300 full-time positions; and
provided further, that not less than $350,000 shall be expended for a
study, in consultation with the city of Boston and the town of Brookline, to

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
evaluate and develop solutions to mitigate low water levels in the Muddy
river ................................................................................................................ $105,730,957
2810-0122 For special projects relating to the commonwealth’s state parks and
recreational areas; provided, than not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to the city of Salem, in consultation with Friends of the Salem
Common, Inc., for the purchase and planting of trees to infill areas where
trees have died and a signage program to publicly name and recognize
donors of trees; provided further, that not less than $53,500 shall be
expended to Nashua River Watershed Association, Inc. to support
environmental education and volunteer river stewardship programs
serving communities across the Nashua river watershed including, but not
limited to, the purchase a truck and canoe trailer; provided further, that not
less than $100,000 shall be expended to the city of Boston for the planting
of trees and the removal of invasive species at Jamaica pond; provided
further that not less than $40,000 shall be expended to the town of
Salisbury for the planning design and construction of beach and
infrastructure resilience projects; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be expended for the Blue Hill Weather Observatory &
Science Center, Inc.; provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall
be expended to the town of Plymouth for coastal infrastructure
improvements to support the promotion of business development and
tourism; provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be extended to
the town of Rockland for purposes including, but not limited to, an
engineering study for widening the entrance at Hartsuff park; provided
further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the town of
Danvers for improvements to John George park, including, but not limited
to, the purchase and installation of new outdoor fitness equipment and
benches; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
to the city of Peabody for capital improvements to the park at the Leather
City Common; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to the town of Danvers for field and park improvements to
Phinney field at Tapley park; provided further, that not less than $100,000
shall be expended to the department of conservation and recreation for
the design, planning and construction of Havey beach in the West Roxbury
section of the city of Boston; provided further, that not less than $25,000
shall be expended for Community Boating, Inc. to provide affordable and
accessible sailing; provided further, that not less than $700,000 shall be
expended to the department of conservation and recreation for
improvements to Christian A. Herter Park in the city of Boston; provided
further, that not less than $60,000 shall be expended to the city of Malden
for public park improvements; provided further, that not less than $100,000
shall be expended to the city of Malden for the Malden river works park
project; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to
the Friends of Belle Isle Marsh, Inc. for the implementation of
environmental preservation programs; provided further, that not less than
$300,000 shall be expended for the Blue Hills Trailside Museum in the
town of Milton; provided further, that not less than $90,000 shall be
expended for the testing and treatment of cyanobacteria and related
contaminants in Monponsett pond in the town of Halifax; provided further,
that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for the Central Plymouth
County Water District commission annual budget for the improvement and
management of lakes and ponds in the Central Plymouth County Water
District; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to
Fishermen’s Memorial Foundation Corp. for the planning, design and
construction of the fishermen’s memorial in the town of Provincetown

Conference Committee Report
honoring the region’s fishing heritage and those lost at sea; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended for Community
Connections, Inc. for its explorers program to support an inclusive bicycle
safety and learn-to-ride program, including for the purchase of equipment
and development of training programming; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended for the city known as the town of West
Springfield for capital improvements at local parks; and provided further,
that not less than $390,000 shall be expended to the department of
conservation and recreation for improvements to Charlesgate park in the
city of Boston; provided, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to
Fore River Trail in the city known as the town of Weymouth; and provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to Friends of Faxon
Park in the city of Quincy; provided, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the city of Leominster for the purposes of upgrading the
Alzheimer’s Awareness park in the city of Leominster; provided further,
that not less than $40,000 shall be expended to the city of Lynn for the
treatment of invasive species in ponds; provided further, that not less than
$35,000 shall be expended to the Rutland and Washington Community
Garden in the city of Boston for improvements including wrought iron fence
restoration, replacing and adding aged beds and the stabilization of the
gazebo; provided further, that not less than $80,000 shall be expended to
the city known as the town of Barnstable for public beach and waterfront
improvements supporting accessibility and community use at Veterans
beach; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended to
the town of Sudbury for the acquisition of adaptive bicycles for persons
with disabilities for use on the Bruce Freeman and Mass Central rail trails
and for the construction of a storage shed for said adaptive bicycles;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the city
of Fitchburg for improvements to the Gus Johnson and Herman Bourque
Jr. baseball and softball fields; provided further, that not less than $40,000
shall be expended to Finnish Center at Saima Park, Inc. for replacement
of the boiler; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the North Shore Maritime Center, Inc. for their youth rowing
program; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
to the town of Arlington for improvements to Parallel park; provided further,
that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town of Shirley for the
operation, administration and improvement of the Summer in Shirley camp
program including, but not limited to providing for low-income children’s
camp attendance costs and other related expenses; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town of Acton for the
design, construction and installation of pedestrian and recreational
infrastructure at the Acton Community dog park including, but not limited
to providing shade pavilion to protect against heat and other related
expenses; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
to the town of Dedham for the parks and recreation summer program;
provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended to Boston
4 Celebrations Foundation, Inc. for the Boston Pops Fireworks
Spectacular for the fourth of July, Independence Day celebrations on the
Charles river; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to the Edward “Gus” Whelan memorial at Thompson Square
park in the Charlestown section of the city of Boston for rehabilitation and
maintenance; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to the city of Quincy for improvements, preparedness and
operations for ferry service at Squantum Point park; provided further, that
not less than $40,000 shall be expended to the town of Sandwich for
recreational improvements and maintenance of recreational areas;

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the
Pawtucket Farm Wildlife Sanctuary in the city of Lowell for preservation,
infrastructure improvements and community programming in the
Pawtucketville section of the city of Lowell; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended to the city known as the town of Randolph
for the purposes of the construction of a new tri-town water treatment plant
in collaboration with the city known as the town of Braintree and the town
of Holbrook; provided further, that not less than $40,000 shall be expended
to Tree Eastie, Inc. for expanding the tree canopy in the East Boston
section of the city of Boston through the planting and maintenance of trees;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the city
of Brockton public schools for the renovation of dilapidated tennis courts
into basketball courts at the Davis elementary school park area; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town of
Chelmsford for the maintenance of the Bruce Freeman rail trail; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the city of Brockton
for baseball field improvements; provided further, that not less than
$75,000 shall be expended to the city of Brockton for landscaping and
hardscaping outside the new D.W. Field Park Welcoming Center; provided
further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the city of
Worcester for improvements to Elm park; and provided further, that not
less than $75,000 shall be expended to the town of Belmont to maintain
the tree canopy ................................................................................................... $4,993,500
2820-0101 For the costs associated with the department of conservation and
recreation’s park rangers specific to the security of the state house;
provided, that funds appropriated in this item shall only be expended for
the costs of security and park rangers at the state house .................................. $3,132,611
2820-2000 For the operation of street lighting and the expenses of maintaining the
parkways of the department of conservation and recreation .............................. $4,578,423
Department of Energy Resources.
7006-1001 For the Massachusetts residential conservation service program under
chapter 465 of the acts of 1980 and the Massachusetts commercial and
apartment conservation service program under section 11A of chapter 25A
of the General Laws; provided, that the assessments levied for fiscal year
2027 under said chapter 465 shall be made at a rate sufficient to produce
the amount expended from this item and the associated fringe benefit
costs for personnel paid from this item .................................................................. $272,563
7006-1003 For the operation of the department of energy resources; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the amount
assessed under section 11H of chapter 25A of the General Laws shall be
made at a rate sufficient to produce the amount expended from this item
and the associated fringe benefit costs for personnel paid from this item .......... $7,066,535
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF EDUCATION.
Department of Early Education and Care.
3000-1000 For the administration of the department of early education and care;
provided, that the department shall report on the first business day of each

Conference Committee Report
month to the joint committee on education, the joint committee on children,
families and persons with disabilities, the house and senate committees
on ways and means and the executive office for administration and finance
on the unduplicated number of children on waiting lists for state-subsidized
early education and care programs and services, including supportive
child care services; provided further, that notwithstanding chapter 66A of
the General Laws, the department of early education and care, the child
care resource and referral agencies, the department of elementary and
secondary education, the department of transitional assistance, the
department of children and families, the executive office of housing and
livable communities, the Children’s Trust Fund established in section 50
of chapter 10 of the General Laws, the disabled persons protection
commission, the district attorneys’ offices and the early intervention
program within the department of public health may share with each other
personal data regarding the parents and children who receive services
provided under early education and care programs administered by the
commonwealth for investigations, waitlist management, program
implementation and evaluation, reporting and policy development
purposes; provided further, that not less than $7,500,000 shall be
expended for an early education and care educator scholarship program
established in section 19F of chapter 15A of the General Laws; provided
further, that the department shall issue monthly reports detailing the
number and average cost of voucher and contracted slots funded by the
department for items 3000-3060 and 3000-4060 delineated by age
category; provided further, that such reports shall reflect current caseload
and detailed assumptions on caseload cost in future months; provided
further, that the reports shall include the number of recipients subject to
subsection (f) of section 110 of chapter 5 of the acts of 1995; provided
further, that the department of early education and care shall provide the
caseload forecasting office and the house and senate committees on ways
and means with enrollment data and any other information pertinent to
caseload forecasting that is requested by the office on a monthly basis;
provided further, that the information shall be provided in a manner that
meets all applicable federal and state privacy and security requirements;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Old
Colony YMCA-Taunton Branch for the replacement of the basketball court;
provided further, that the commissioner of early education and care may
transfer funds between said items 3000-3060 and 3000-4060, as
necessary, for this purpose, under an allocation plan that shall detail, by
object class, the distribution of the funds to be transferred and which shall
be submitted to the house and senate committees on ways and means not
less than 30 days before any such transfer; provided further, that not less
than $200,000 shall be expended for People, Incorporated to support
student transportation at its early education center in the city of Fall River;
and provided further, that not less than $300,000 shall be expended to
Jumpstart for Young Children, Inc. to provide evidence-based early
childhood education programs to enhance language, literacy and early
relational health for preschool children from communities with untapped
potential ............................................................................................................. $17,195,519
3000-1020 For early education and care quality supports to improve and sustain
educational quality among providers of early education and care and to
assist early educators and providers in attaining higher levels of
proficiency, skill and quality; provided, that funding may be used to
incentivize public-private partnerships to implement reforms that lead to
student success; provided further, that such partnerships’ funding shall be

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
administered in coordination with the department of elementary and
secondary education, and preference shall be given to partnerships serving
high percentages of high-needs students; provided further, that supports
funded through this item shall include, but not be limited to, program
quality improvements related to meeting the Massachusetts Quality Rating
and Improvement System standards; provided further, that costs related
to department of early education and care personnel who support quality
improvement may be funded from this item, including the department's
licensing staff and other personnel who ensure compliance with state and
federal requirements for inspections, monitoring and training; provided
further, that funds from this item may support the Massachusetts universal
pre-kindergarten program, inclusive learning environment grants and early
childhood mental health consultation services; provided further, that any
payment made under any such grant to a school district shall be deposited
with the treasurer of the city, town or regional school district and held as a
separate account and, notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, shall be expended by the school committee of such city, town or
regional school district without municipal appropriation; and provided
further that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to the Nauset Youth
Alliance in support of the Alliance’s childcare programming .............................. $48,175,758
3000-1045 For operational grants to child care providers; provided, that for fiscal year
2027, funds shall be distributed in accordance with the formula established
in section 20 of chapter 15D of the General Laws; provided, that the
department shall collect data from participating programs, including, but
not limited to: (i) the number of enrolled children; (ii) the number of
educators employed; (iii) efforts to recruit and retain employees; (iv) any
available demographic data of the families served by participating
providers; (v) to the extent feasible, the income level of the families served
by participating providers; (vi) the amount awarded to each provider; and
(vii) the amount of operational grants spent by provider, delineated by
category of spending including, but not limited to: (a) salaries; (b) other
compensation; (c) workforce training; and (d) facilities improvements;
provided further, that programs shall respond to all data collection
requests and surveys from the department to be eligible for said grants;
provided further, that funds may be expended for departmental technical
assistance related to the administration and distribution of the grants; and
provided further, that funds may be expended to support data collection
technology, personnel and supports related to this item ................................ $475,000,000
Education and Transportation Fund ..................... 78.95%
Early Education and Care
Operational Grant Fund ........................................ 21.05%
3000-2000 For the regional administration and coordination of services provided by
child care resource and referral agencies ......................................................... $20,000,000
3000-2050 For the administration of the Children’s Trust Fund established in section
50 of chapter 10 of the General Laws; provided, that the department of
early education and care shall not exercise any supervision or control with
respect to the board of the trust fund; and provided further, that not later
than December 30, 2026, the Children’s Trust Fund shall submit a report to
the house and senate committees on ways and means and the joint
committee on children, families and persons with disabilities on the progress
of the pilot program and the mobilization of services at the family centers ........... $1,993,205

Conference Committee Report
3000-2060 For evidence-based, adult-focused child sexual abuse prevention
initiatives that provide technical assistance to communities, youth-serving
organizations and schools to: (i) organize local coalitions dedicated to
preventing child sexual abuse; (ii) recruit, train and certify local volunteers
to provide free prevention education for parents, students and
professionals; and (iii) strengthen the core standards around the screening
of prospective employees, the development of codes of conduct, the
assessment and modification of physical spaces to reduce opportunities
for sexual abuse, the responding to and reporting of boundary-violating
behaviors and suspected acts of sexual abuse and the training of staff and
volunteers on ways to prevent adult perpetration and child-on-child sexual
abuse; provided further, that initiatives supported through this item shall
be administered by the Children’s Trust Fund established in section 50 of
chapter 10 of the General Laws and the office of the child advocate; and
provided further, that not less than $150,000 shall be expended for
Enough Abuse, Inc. to provide technical assistance to and training for
schools and communities .................................................................................... $2,315,019
3000-3060 For early education and care services for children with active cases at the
department of children and families, for families currently involved with, or
transitioning from, transitional aid to families with dependent children and
for families participating in education and training services funded by the
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program; provided, that providers shall
be reimbursed for subsidized child care services funded under this item
based on enrollment; provided further, that the department of early
education and care, in collaboration with the department of children and
families, shall maintain a centralized list detailing the number of children
eligible for services under this item, the number of supportive slots filled
and the number of supportive slots available; provided further, that for
children with active cases at the department of children and families, funds
may be used to provide services during a transition period of not less than
12 months upon the closure of the family’s case with the department of
children and families; provided further, that in the case of families involved
with transitional aid to families with dependent children, early education
and care shall be available to: (i) recipients of transitional aid to families
with dependent children benefits; (ii) former recipients who are working or
are engaged in an approved service need activity for up to 1 year after
termination of their benefits; (iii) participants who are working or are
engaged in an approved service need activity for up to 1 year after the
transitional period; and (iv) parents who are under 18 years of age who
are currently enrolled in a job training program and who would qualify for
benefits under chapter 118 of the General Laws but for the consideration
of the grandparents’ income; provided further, that all teens eligible for
year-round, full-time early education and care services shall be
participating in school, education, work and training-related activities or a
combination thereof for not less than the minimum number of hours
required by applicable regulations; provided further, that recipients of
transitional aid to families with dependent children shall not be charged
fees for care provided under this item; provided further, that early
education and care services for families involved with transitional aid to
families with dependent children funded from this item shall be distributed
geographically in a manner that provides fair and adequate access to early
education and care for all eligible individuals; provided further, that
informal early education and care benefits for families involved with
transitional aid to families with dependent children may be funded from
this item; provided further, that the commissioner of early education and

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
care may transfer funds to this item from items 3000-1000 and 3000-4060,
as necessary, under an allocation plan, which shall detail, by object class,
the distribution of the funds to be transferred; provided further, that the
commissioner shall submit to the house and senate committees on ways
and means not less than 30 days prior to the transfer; provided further,
that not later than April 16, 2027, the commissioner shall submit a
preliminary report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means and the executive office for administration and finance on the
projected expenses for the program that shall include, but not be limited
to, the expected surplus or deficiency for the program; provided further,
that not later than June 30, 2027, if the department determines that the
available appropriation for this program will be insufficient to meet
projected expenses, the commissioner shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means and the executive office for
administration and finance detailing the amount of appropriation needed
to address the deficiency; provided further, that reimbursements for
services rendered in prior fiscal years may be expended from this item;
provided further, that the department of early education and care shall
recoup funds owed by providers related to payments made by the
department in prior fiscal years by reducing payments to such providers for
services related to this item rendered in fiscal year 2027; and provided
further, that all children eligible for services under this item shall receive
such services .................................................................................................. $597,233,977
General Fund ........................................................ 64.62%
Education & Transportation Fund ......................... 20.00%
High-Quality Early Education & Care
Affordability Fund .................................................. 15.38%
3000-4060 For income-eligible early education and care programs; provided, that
providers shall be reimbursed for subsidized child care services funded
under this item based on enrollment; provided further, that teen parents
and homeless families identified as likely to become eligible for transitional
aid to families with dependent children may be paid from this item;
provided further, that informal early education and care benefits for
families meeting income-eligibility criteria may be funded from this item;
provided further, that early education and care services funded under this
item shall be distributed geographically in a manner that provides fair and
adequate access to early education and care for all eligible individuals;
provided further, that the commissioner of early education and care may
transfer funds to this item from items 3000-1000 and 3000-3060, as
necessary, pursuant to an allocation plan, which shall detail, by object
class, the distribution of the funds to be transferred; provided further, that
the commissioner shall submit to the house and senate committees on
ways and means and the executive office for administration and finance
not less than 30 days prior to the transfer; provided further, that not more
than 3 per cent of the funds appropriated in this item may be transferred
in fiscal year 2027 as set forth in a plan submitted by the department of
early education and care; provided further, that said plan shall be
submitted to the joint committee on education, the house and senate
committees on ways and means and the executive office for administration
and finance; provided further, that not later than April 16, 2027, the
commissioner shall submit a preliminary report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means and the executive office for administration
and finance on the projected expenses for the program that shall include,
but not be limited to, the expected surplus or deficiency for the program;

Conference Committee Report
provided further, that not later than June 30, 2027, if the department
determines that the available appropriation for this program will be
insufficient to meet projected expenses, the commissioner shall submit a
report to the house and senate committees on ways and means and the
executive office for administration and finance detailing the amount of
appropriation needed to address such deficiency; provided further, that
reimbursements for services rendered in prior fiscal years may be
expended from this item; provided further, that the department shall
recoup funds owed related to payments made by the department in prior
fiscal years by reducing payments for services related to this item
rendered in fiscal year 2027; and provided further, that notwithstanding
any general or special law to the contrary, any payment made under any
such grant with a school district shall be deposited with the treasurer of
the city, town or regional school district and held as a separate account
and shall be expended by the school committee of such city, town or
regional school district without municipal appropriation.................................. $623,593,845
General Fund ........................................................ 65.27%
Education & Transportation Fund ......................... 20.00%
High-Quality Early Education & Care
Affordability Fund .................................................. 14.73%
3000-5000 For grants to head start programs; provided, that funds from this item may
be expended on early head start programs ...................................................... $20,000,000
3000-6025 For grants in fiscal year 2027 to support planning and implementation
activities in cities, towns, regional school districts or educational
collaboratives to expand pre-kindergarten or preschool opportunities on a
voluntary basis to children who will be eligible for kindergarten by
September 2028; provided, that planning and implementation grants may
be awarded through a competitive process established by the department
of early education and care utilizing the Massachusetts Preschool
Expansion Grant public-private partnership model; provided further, that
preference in awarding grants shall be given to districts serving high
percentages of high-needs students; provided further, that additional
preference in awarding planning grants may be given to districts to update
strategic expansion plans completed in prior fiscal years; provided further,
that additional preference in awarding implementation grants shall be
given to districts that have completed strategic planning efforts that
support expanding access to high-quality preschool through the
Commonwealth Preschool Partnership Initiative; provided further, that not
later than March 16, 2027, the department shall submit a report to the joint
committee on education and the house and senate committees on ways
and means on the status of planning and implementation activities
supported through this item, which shall include, but not be limited to, the:
(i) districts that submitted applications for grant funding; (ii) recipients of
grant funding; (iii) anticipated number of children served by recipients; (iv)
size of awarded grants by recipient; and (v) recipients’ workforce
development efforts; provided further, that funds from this item may be
used to provide administrative support to grantees, including technical
assistance and program evaluation; provided further, that notwithstanding
any general or special law to the contrary, funds distributed from this item
shall be deposited with the treasurer of the city, town, regional school
district or educational collaborative and held in a separate account and
shall be expended by the school committee of such city, town, regional
school district or educational collaborative without further appropriation;

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
provided further, that funds may be expended for programs or activities
during the summer months; and provided further, that funds may be
expended for the Summer Step Up program to support children entering
kindergarten and elementary school with academic and enrichment
activities during the summer ............................................................................. $15,500,000
Education and Transportation Fund ....................... 100%
3000-6075 For early childhood mental health consultation services in early education
and care programs in the commonwealth; provided, that preference shall
be given to those services designed to limit the number of expulsions and
suspensions from the programs and to early education and care programs
serving high percentages of high-needs students; provided further, that
funding may be used to support programming and services to address
mental health concerns including, but not limited to, outreach, training for
educators to respond to mental health challenges, support for educators,
including peer group support, and an expansion of current services;
provided further, that eligible recipients for such grants shall include
municipal school districts, regional school districts, educational
collaboratives, head start programs, licensed child care providers, child
care resource and referral centers and other qualified entities; and
provided further, that funds shall be spent on trauma-informed professional
development for early education providers ............................................................. $4,950,000
3000-7000 For statewide neonatal and postnatal home parenting education and home
visiting programs for at-risk newborns to be administered by the Children’s
Trust Fund, established in section 50 of chapter 10 of the General Laws;
provided, that funds may be granted for performance-based workforce
incentives and retention of home visiting personnel and for direct family
support services; provided further, that the department of early education
and care shall collaborate with the Children's Trust Fund, when
appropriate, to coordinate services provided through this item with
services provided through item 3000-7050 to ensure that parents receiving
services through this item are aware of all opportunities available to them
and their children through the department; provided further, that the
Children’s Trust Fund shall oversee the maintenance of a participant data
system; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special
law to the contrary, priority for such services shall be given to low-income
parents .............................................................................................................. $18,116,603
3000-7040 For the department of early education and care, which may expend not
more than $520,000 for contingency contracts related to pursuing federal
reimbursement or avoiding costs in its capacity as the single state agency
under Title IV, Part E, of the Social Security Act 42 U.S.C. chapter 7,
subchapter IV, part E; provided, that notwithstanding any general or
special law or regulation to the contrary, these contingency contracts shall
not exceed 3 years except with prior review and approval by the executive
office for administration and finance; and provided further, that for the
purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of
retained revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system ........................................................... $520,000
3000-7050 For the coordinated family and community engagement grant program,
which shall establish a statewide network of supports for early education;

Conference Committee Report
provided, that the department of early education and care shall distribute
grants not later than August 31, 2026 in order to allow a full year of service
for families involved in these programs; provided further, that the
department shall, to the maximum extent feasible, coordinate services
provided through this item with services provided through item 3000-7000
in order to ensure that parents receiving services through this item are
aware of all opportunities available to them and their children through the
department; provided further, that eligible recipients for such grants shall
include, but not be limited to: (i) the Massachusetts Family Networks
program; (ii) municipal school districts; (iii) regional school districts; (iv)
educational collaboratives; (v) the parent-child plus program; (vi) head
start programs; (vii) other school readiness and family support programs;
(viii) licensed child care providers; and (ix) child care resource and referral
centers; provided further, that supports funded through this item shall be
in alignment with the quality requirements of the Massachusetts universal
pre-kindergarten program and the Massachusetts Quality Rating and
Improvement System; provided further, that the department shall take steps
to streamline activities and programs funded through this item; provided
further, that the department may expend funds from this item on grants for
supplemental services for children with individualized education plans;
provided further, that not more than $160,000 shall be expended for
technical assistance; and provided further, that funds may be expended for
programs or activities during the summer months ............................................. $11,740,598
3000-7052 For the parent-child plus program, also known as the parent-child home
program ............................................................................................................... $4,250,000
3000-7055 For the Neighborhood Villages Inc. pilot program to provide high-quality,
economically-integrated infant and toddler classrooms that demonstrate
best practices for supporting children, families and the early childhood
workforce and establish infrastructure to facilitate wraparound health and
wellness programming for children and families; provided, that funds shall
be used to support high-quality early education and care classroom
instruction and workforce development training; provided further, that
funds shall be used to allow for the enhancement, coordination and
alignment of early learning programs with community-based health
providers and those resources that impact outcomes across health and
early learning; and provided further, that the pilot program shall serve to
identify resources and promising practices that inform efforts to support
school-readiness and ensure the healthy development and well-being of
children and families ........................................................................................... $1,000,000
3000-7066 For professional development and higher education opportunities and
supports for early educators to be coordinated by the department of early
education and care in conjunction with Massachusetts-based 2-year
public institutions of higher education; provided, that programming shall
focus on the statewide recruitment and training needs of the early
education and care workforce, encourage opportunities for career
advancement and retention and incorporate early education and care
stakeholder, employer and industry collaboration; and provided further,
that professional development opportunities shall be consistent with the
core competencies and career pathways established by the department
and, to the greatest extent possible, shall provide a standard number of
college credits transferable to all other public institutions of higher
education in the commonwealth ......................................................................... $2,970,000

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
3000-7070 For Reach Out and Read, Inc.; provided, that the funds distributed through
Reach Out and Read, Inc. shall be contingent upon a match of not less
than $1 in private or corporate contributions for every $1 in state grant
funding ................................................................................................................ $1,750,000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES.
Office of the Secretary.
4000-0000 For the cost of transportation services for health and human services
clients; provided, that the executive office of health and human services
may transfer from the sum appropriated in this item to departments under
the purview of the executive office for the sole purpose of providing
transportation services to clients; provided further, that the executive office
shall when practicable encourage the use of reduced fare programs
provided by the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority and fare-free
services provided by regional transit authorities organized under chapter
161B of the General Laws; provided further, that the executive office shall
conduct a study of the quality of nonemergency transportation services
coordinated by the human service transportation office; provided further,
that not later than February 5, 2027, the executive office shall submit a
report to the joint committee on transportation, the joint committee on
children, families and persons with disabilities and the house and senate
committees on ways and means detailing: (i) the results of the study which
shall include an evaluation of the safety, reliability and accessibility of the
human service transportation system; (ii) recommendations for the
improvement of the human service transportation system; (iii) a cost
analysis of the recommendations; and (iv) strategies for enhancing
feedback from consumers of services coordinated by the office; and
provided further, that the executive office shall develop the report in
consultation with a representative of: (a) The Arc of Massachusetts; (b)
Massachusetts Statewide Independent Living Council; (c) Dignity Alliance
Massachusetts; (d) Disability Policy Consortium Inc.; (e) Massachusetts
Association for Mental Health, Inc.; and (f) the Children’s Hospital
Corporation ..................................................................................................... $449,596,838
General Fund ........................................................ 77.76%
Commonwealth Transportation Fund.................... 22.24%
4000-0005 For youth violence prevention program grants administered by the
executive office of health and human services; provided, that the grants
shall be targeted at reducing youth violence among young persons at the
highest annual risk of being perpetrators or victims of gun and community
violence; provided further, that these funds shall be available to those
municipalities with the highest number of annual youth homicides and
serious assaults as determined by the executive office; provided further,
that any new grants awarded from this item in fiscal year 2027 shall comply
with the grant application requirements set forth in item 4000-0005 of
section 2 of chapter 38 of the acts of 2013; provided further, that the
executive office of health and human services may select the same
evaluator in fiscal year 2027 as selected in fiscal year 2026; provided
further, that funds may be set aside for the administration of these
programs; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
to the SISU Center in Lawrence to provide programming for at-risk youth

Conference Committee Report
in the Merrimack Valley; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall
be expended to Friendship Home, Inc. to provide programming for those
with developmental disabilities and their families; provided further, that not
later than February 5, 2027, the executive office shall submit a report to
the house and senate committees on ways and means detailing: (i)
successful grant applications; (ii) the criteria used in selecting grant
recipients; (iii) a set of clearly-defined goals and benchmarks on which
grant recipients shall be evaluated; and (iv) outcomes and findings that
demonstrate program success from the grant awards for fiscal year 2026;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for the
Massachusetts Coalition to Prevent Gun Violence, Inc. for the operation of
comprehensive educational programming on gun violence and gun
violence prevention; and provided further, that not less than $500,000 shall
be expended for BAGLY, Inc. to provide innovative job training and
wraparound support to LGBTQ+ homeless youth ............................................ $13,099,000
4000-0007 For housing and supportive services for unaccompanied youth under
section 16X of chapter 6A of the General Laws; provided, that not later
than February 5, 2027, the executive office of health and human services
shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means on: (i) the number of youths served through this item receiving
either prevention or rehousing services, including total statewide numbers
and numbers by region; (ii) the types of services received by participating
youths; (iii) the number of youths who transition into stabilized housing
after receiving prevention support; (iv) the number of youths who do not
enter homelessness after receiving prevention support; (v) the number of
youths who do not return to homelessness after being housed; (vi) other
quantifiable data related to client outcomes as determined by the
executive office; and (vii) the amount of funding awarded to vendors for
the delivery of services and the names of each vendor; and provided
further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to BAY-CASH to
provide direct cash assistance to unaccompanied homeless youth ................. $10,539,590
4000-0009 For the office of health equity established in section 16AA of chapter 6A
of the General Laws; provided, that the office may enter into service
agreements with the department of public health to fulfill the obligations of
the office; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended
to the Massachusetts Sickle Cell Association, Inc for advocacy, family
support services, awareness campaigns and staff expansion; and
provided further, that not later than December 17, 2026, the office shall
submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and means
on the development of the office of health equity within the executive office
of health and human services and the implementation of programming as
set forth in said section 16AA of said chapter 6A, including personnel costs
and an organizational structure plan ...................................................................... $250,000
4000-0014 For the Edward M. Kennedy Community Health Center, Inc. to train
community health workers to serve as the patient link to medical and social
services for the disenfranchised population throughout the Worcester and
MetroWest regions ................................................................................................. $250,000
4000-0020 For the nursing and allied health workforce development initiative, to
develop and support strategies that increase the number of public higher
education faculty members and students who participate in programs that
support careers in fields related to the nursing and allied health workforce;
provided, that the amount appropriated in this item shall be transferred to

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
the Massachusetts Nursing and Allied Health Workforce Development
Trust Fund established in section 33 of chapter 305 of the acts of 2008;
provided further, that funds shall be transferred to the fund according to
an allotment schedule adopted by the executive office for administration
and finance; provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall be
expended to Northeastern University Bouve College of Health Sciences
School of Nursing for scholarships, simulation programs and clinical
partnerships at its city of Fall River campus; provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, not less than
$500,000 shall be expended to establish a partnership incentive grant
program between public higher educational institutions and health care
providers to expand the nursing and allied health workforce; provided
further, that the grant program shall support financial incentives to health
care providers that partner with public higher educational institutions by
offering clinical partnerships, the use of health care staff to teach courses
and other innovative supports to increase the nursing and allied health
workforce pipeline; provided further, that not less than $100,000 of said
funds shall be expended to the College of Nursing and Health Sciences at
the University of Massachusetts at Dartmouth to partner with Southcoast
Hospitals Group, Inc. to develop and implement innovative strategies to
increase the nursing and allied health workforce pipeline; provided further,
that not later than March 5, 2027, the executive office of health and human
services shall submit a report to the joint committee on public health, the
joint committee on health care financing, the joint committee on higher
education and the house and senate committees on ways and means
detailing the expenditures from the Massachusetts Nursing and Allied
Health Workforce Development Trust Fund and short-term and long-term
strategies to increase the number of public and private higher education
faculty and students who participate in programs that support careers in
fields related to nursing and allied health; provided further, that the report
shall include details on the grant program including, but not limited to: (i)
established grant criteria; (ii) a list of grant recipients, including grant
amounts; and (iii) summaries of the successful grant proposals; and
provided further, that not less than $125,000 shall be expended to Curry
College School of Nursing and Health Sciences to promote increased
access to quality, equitable healthcare services in the commonwealth
through its nursing education programs ............................................................. $1,450,000
4000-0050 For the operation of the PCA quality home care workforce council
established in section 71 of chapter 118E of the General Laws ......................... $3,875,766
4000-0051 For the operation and support of the network of child and family service
programs throughout the commonwealth, including family resource
centers supported through this item and item 4800-0200; provided, that
centers within this item shall: (i) be consistent with the requirements under
section 16U of chapter 6A of the General Laws; (ii) demonstrate
adherence to an evidence-based model of service; and (iii) use
measurable outcomes to assess quality; provided further, that the
executive office of health and human services shall maintain the fiscal year
2026 contract with a third-party administration service organization to
oversee the execution of, and the agency’s compliance with, subsection
(b) of said section 16U of said chapter 6A; provided further, that not later
than April 2, 2027, the executive office of health and human services shall
submit a report to the executive office for administration and finance, the
joint committee on children, families and persons with disabilities and the
house and senate committees on ways and means, which shall include

Conference Committee Report
but not be limited to: (a) the number of children and families served at each
center; (b) the types of programs; (c) program outcomes; (d) client
feedback; and (e) progress on data sharing between centers; and provided
further, that the network of child and family service programs shall
coordinate with the executive office, the department of early education and
care and municipal police departments to provide emergency assistance
to missing or absent children at times when the juvenile court is not open,
consistent with the requirements of section 39H of chapter 119 of the
General Laws ......................................................................................................... $500,000
4000-0250 For the executive office of health and human services, which may expend
not more than $15,000,000 from monies received from the commonwealth
health insurance connector authority for the costs of the operation and
maintenance of the health insurance exchange; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose
of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenue and related expenditures, the executive office may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system ...................................................... $15,000,000
4000-0300 For the operation of the office of the executive office of health and human
services, including the operation of the managed care oversight board;
provided, that funds appropriated in this item shall be expended for
administrative and contracted services related to the implementation and
operation of programs under chapter 118E of the General Laws; provided
further, that no expenditures, whether made by the executive office or
another commonwealth entity, shall be made that are not federally
reimbursable, including those related to Titles XIX or XXI of the Social
Security Act, 42 U.S.C. chapter 7, subchapters XIX or XXI, the
MassHealth demonstration waiver approved under subsection (a) of
section 1115 of Title XI of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 1315(a), or
the community first section 1115 demonstration waiver under said section
1115 of said Title XI of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C 1315, except as
required for: (i) the administration of the executive office; (ii) the equivalent
of MassHealth Standard benefits for children under 21 years of age who
are in the care or custody of the department of youth services or the
department of children and families; (iii) the dental benefits provided to
clients of the department of developmental services who are 21 years of
age or older; (iv) the payments related to services delivered in institutions
for mental disease for which federal financial participation is not otherwise
available; (v) cost-containment efforts, the purposes and amounts of which
shall be submitted to the executive office for administration and finance
and the house and senate committees on ways and means not less than
30 days before making these expenditures; or (vi) otherwise as explicitly
authorized with the prior written approval of the secretary of administration
and finance; provided further, that the executive office shall provide
technical and administrative assistance to agencies under the purview of the
secretariat receiving federal funds; provided further, that the executive office
shall ensure that any collaborative assessments for children receiving
services from multiple agencies within the secretariat shall be performed
within existing resources; provided further, that funds may be expended for
the operation of the office of health equity under the department of public
health and the executive office; provided further, that the office of Medicaid
shall coordinate with the health policy commission in the development of
care delivery and payment models in the MassHealth program, including

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
patient-centered medical homes and accountable care organizations, to
ensure alignment of such models with the commission’s certification
programs under sections 14 and 15 of chapter 6D of the General Laws;
provided further, that in consultation with the center for health information
and analysis, no rate increase shall be provided to existing Medicaid
provider rates without taking all measures possible under Title XIX of the
Social Security Act, codified at 42 U.S.C. chapter 7, subchapter XIX, to
ensure that rates of payment to providers shall not exceed the rates that
are necessary to meet the cost of efficiently and economically operated
providers to provide services of adequate quality; provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
commissioner of mental health shall approve any prior authorization or
other restriction on medication used to treat mental illness under written
policies, procedures and regulations of the department of mental health;
provided further, that the executive office may continue to recover provider
overpayments made in the current and prior fiscal years through the
Medicaid Management Information System and any such recoveries shall
be considered current fiscal year expenditure refunds; provided further,
that the executive office may collect directly from a liable third party any
amounts paid to contracted providers under said chapter 118E for which
the executive office later discovers another third party is liable if no other
course of recoupment is possible; provided further, that the executive
office and its agencies, when contracting for services on the islands of
Martha’s Vineyard and Nantucket and the town of Provincetown, shall take
into consideration the increased costs associated with the provision of
goods, services and housing in said jurisdictions; provided further, that
funds shall be expended for interpretive services directly or indirectly related
to a settlement or resolution agreement with the office of civil rights or any
other office, group or entity; provided further, that the executive office shall
submit monthly MassHealth caseload reports in a searchable electronic
format to the executive office for administration and finance and the house
and senate committees on ways and means; provided further, that the
executive office of health and human services shall report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means not later August 3, 2026 and every
30 days thereafter on the status of the implementation of the behavioral
health roadmap; provided further, that the executive office shall submit
quarterly reports to the house and senate committees on ways and means
and the joint committee on health care financing summarizing the
projected total costs for the next fiscal year of pharmaceutical pipeline
drugs identified by the executive office and expected to be made available
for utilization within a 12-month period from the submission date of the
report; provided further, that the report shall not identify the specific drugs,
manufacturer identities or wholesale acquisition costs of individual drugs
identified by the department; provided further, that not later than
December 18, 2026, the executive office shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means and the joint committee on
health care financing detailing utilization in fiscal year 2026 of the Health
Safety Net Trust Fund, established in section 66 of said chapter 118E,
including the: (a) number of persons whose medical expenses were billed
to the Health Safety Net Trust Fund; (b) total dollar amount billed to the
Health Safety Net Trust Fund; (c) age, income level and insurance status
of recipients using the Health Safety Net Trust Fund; (d) types of services
paid for out of the Health Safety Net Trust Fund; and (e) amount disbursed
from the Health Safety Net Trust Fund to each hospital and community
health center; provided further, that not later than January 13, 2027, the
executive office shall submit a report to the house and senate committees

Conference Committee Report
on ways and means detailing the methodology used to project caseload and
utilization in fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027; provided further, that the
executive office of health and human services shall report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means not later than January 13, 2027 on
the: (1) number of members served in the dual eligible initiative; (2) average
expenditure per member; (3) average expenditure per member before the
demonstration project; and (4) number of clients that receive care at skilled
nursing facilities; provided further, that not later than March 5, 2027, the
executive office shall submit a report to the house and senate committees
on ways and means and the joint committee on health care financing on:
(A) total spending related to pharmaceutical utilization for fiscal year 2026;
(B) estimated spending related to pharmaceutical utilization for fiscal year
2027; (C) the actual and estimated revenue amounts, both in the form of
supplemental rebates and federal financial participation, received in fiscal
year 2026 and in fiscal year 2027 as a result of total pharmaceutical
spending; (D) total or projected savings amounts delivered from
supplemental rebate negotiations in fiscal year 2027; and (E) the relative
impact of price and utilization of pharmaceutical drugs added to the
MassHealth drug list within fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027; provided
further, that not later than March 5, 2027, the executive office, in
consultation with office of Medicaid, shall submit a report to the executive
office for administration and finance, the joint committee on health care
financing and the house and senate committees on ways and means on
the review of wage payment rates for the provision of continuous skilled
nursing care established in 101 CMR 350.04, 101 CMR 361 and 101 CMR
453, including: (I) an aggregated overview of the wage payment rates paid
by home health agencies to staff or contracted nurses providing
continuous skilled nursing care, including any increases in said wage rates
resulting from increases in Medicaid rates paid to home health agencies
for continuous skilled nursing care; (II) an aggregated overview of the
proportion of the Medicaid reimbursement rate paid directly as wages and
benefits to nurses providing continuous skilled nursing care through a
home health agency that contracts with MassHealth; (III) an aggregated
breakdown of said wage rates as applied to the acuity level of patients
receiving continuous skilled nursing care; (IV) an aggregated breakdown
of said wage rates as applied to the licensure level of the providers of
continuous skilled nursing care; (V) state costs for wage rates promulgated
in state fiscal years 2022 to 2026, inclusive, by regulation, department and
program; (VI) the fiscal impact of increases in state funding versus prior
fiscal year actual costs for wage rates promulgated for state fiscal years
2022 to 2026, inclusive, delineated by regulation, department and
program; and (VII) recommendations on information to be included in any
future reporting by home health agencies receiving an increase of
continuous skilled nursing care rates provided by the office of Medicaid;
provided further, that home health agencies providing continuous skilled
nursing care shall provide all information and documentation requested by
the executive office of health and human services to compile the required
report; provided further, that the executive office shall make a supplemental
payment not less than $3,000,000 to Franciscan Hospital for Children, Inc.
above base rates, to compensate for high-complexity pediatric care;
provided further, that not less than $500,000 shall be expended for Health
Care For All, Inc. for the costs associated with operating its free statewide
non-profit consumer assistance helpline in order to provide health coverage
eligibility, enrollment and navigation assistance and to operate an online
support platform for enrollment assistance across the state; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to Emerson Hospital

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
in the town of Concord to expand its emergency behavioral health service
capacity; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended
to the Watertown Community Foundation, Inc. for support and stabilization
services for vulnerable populations in the city known as the town of
Watertown; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended
to Transhealth Inc. for infrastructure and programming; provided further,
that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to Sturdy Memorial Hospital,
Inc. for services and equipment related to maternal care; provided further,
that not less than $2,000,000 shall be expended to Planned Parenthood
League of Massachusetts, Inc. to support continued access to sexual and
reproductive health care and community needs; provided further, that not
less than $150,000 shall be expended to New England Life Flight, Inc.,
doing business as, Boston MedFlight; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be expended to St. Anthony Shrine Order of Friars Minor
Province of the Most Holy Name to expand the Father Mychal Judge
Center for counseling and recovery; provided further, that not less than
$150,000 shall be expended to Harbor Health Services, Inc. for the
operation of its Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE) day
centers; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended
to The Joint Committee for Children’s Health Care in Everett, Inc. for
increased staffing needs; provided further, that not less than $125,000
shall be expended to the Massachusetts Association of Mental Health for
an awareness campaign focused on the screening, early diagnosis, and
evidence-based treatment and medication for sleep and wakefulness
disorders, and their behavioral health and medical comorbidities; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for Community
Action Pioneer Valley; provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall
be expended for the turning 22 commission established in section 81;
provided further, that not less than $1,500,000 shall be transferred to the
Criminal Justice and Community Support Trust Fund established in
section 2QQQQQ of chapter 29 of the General Laws for the continuation
of a pilot program to establish a county restoration center and program
overseen by the restoration center commission in the former Middlesex
county established in section 225 of chapter 69 of the acts of 2018 to divert
persons suffering from mental illness or substance use disorder who
interact with law enforcement or the court system during a pre-arrest
investigation or the pre-adjudication process from lock-up facilities and
hospital emergency departments to appropriate treatment; provided
further, that not less than $650,000 shall be expended for the
Massachusetts Consultation Service for Treatment of Addiction and Pain
which shall be administered by the Massachusetts Behavioral Health
Partnership to provide case management and care navigation support to
assist health care facilities, individual practitioners and other health care
providers including, but not limited to, nurse case managers, social
workers and recovery coaches, in providing care and identifying
community-based providers for referral for pain management and
treatment of substance use disorder; provided further, that a total of
$40,000,000 may be expended from items 4000-0700 and 4000-1426
during the fiscal year 2027 accounts payable period to pay for services
delivered during fiscal year 2027; provided further, that the secretary of
health and human services, with the written approval of the secretary of
administration and finance, may authorize transfers of surplus among
items 4000-0320, 4000-0430, 4000-0500, 4000-0601, 4000-0641, 4000-
0700, 4000-0875, 4000-0880, 4000-0885, 4000-0940, 4000-0950, 4000-
0990, 4000-1400, 4000-1420 and 4000-1426 for the purpose of reducing
any deficiency in these items; provided further, that any such transfer shall

Conference Committee Report
be made not later than September 30, 2027; provided further, that any
projected aggregate deficiency among these items shall be reported to the
house and senate committees on ways and means not less than 90 days
before the projected exhaustion of funding; provided further, that any
unexpended balance in these accounts shall revert to the General Fund
on June 30, 2027; provided further, that funds shall be expended to the
Nantucket Cottage Hospital and Martha’s Vineyard Hospital, Inc. for off-
island medical transportation, including the transportation of patients with
behavioral health conditions; provided further, that not less than $100,000
shall be expended to The Arc of Massachusetts and Advocates for Autism
of Massachusetts, a division of The Arc, for a 6-month expansion of a
successful pilot series to provide additional workforce training funds for
department of developmental services and MassHealth day programs to
train staff serving adults with autism and complex behavioral needs;
provided further, that the training shall include, but not be limited to,
applied behavior analysis and augmentative and alternative
communication devices; provided further, that not later than May 1, 2027,
The Arc of Massachusetts shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means and the joint committee on children,
families and persons with disabilities detailing: (aa) the number of staff
who received training under the pilot program and the number of hours
trained; (bb) any certifications given; and (cc) the aggregated benefits to
individuals served by staff who participated in the pilot program; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for plumbing and
other infrastructure and facility upgrades at Heywood Healthcare, Inc.’s
Heywood Hospital in the city of Gardner to meet regulatory requirements
and support the expansion of the hospital’s bariatric program to help
improve the treatment of chronic conditions such as diabetes,
cardiovascular disease, and sleep-related disorders; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended to Beantown Baby Diaper Bank
Corp. to support the free diaper program for low-income families in the city
of Boston and surrounding communities; provided further, that not less
than $17,000 shall be expended for Baystate Wing Hospital Corporation
in the town of Palmer to create open access hours for emergency
department mental health patient follow-up services and to establish an
open walk-in clinic for patients with mental health issues; provided further,
that not less than $250,000 shall be expended for the Brookline
Community Mental Health Center, Inc. to expand the healthy lives
program; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended
for Community Servings, Inc. to support the creation of a fully
synchronized statewide logistics hub with precise route optimization to
further the efficient and equitable distribution of meals across the
commonwealth; and provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended for Sturdy Health Inc. in the city of Attleboro to provide additional
staff for major and regional events in the surrounding area ........................... $160,684,413
4000-0320 For the executive office of health and human services, which may expend
not more than $225,000,000 for medical care and assistance rendered in
the current year from the monies received from recoveries and collections
of any current or prior year expenditures; provided, that notwithstanding
any general or special law to the contrary, the balance of any personal
needs accounts collected from nursing and other medical institutions upon
the death of a medical assistance recipient and held by the executive office
for more than 3 years may be credited to this item ......................................... $225,000,000

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
4000-0321 For the executive office of health and human services, which may expend
not more than $65,000,000 for contingency fee contracts related to
pursuing federal reimbursement or avoiding costs in its capacity as the
single state agency under Titles XIX and XXI of the Social Security Act
and as the principal agency for all of the agencies within the executive
office and other federally-assisted programs administered by the
executive office; provided, that such contingency contracts shall not
exceed 3 years unless such contracts received prior review and approval
by the executive office for administration and finance; provided further, that
after providing payments due under the terms of the contingency
contracts, the executive office may use available funds to support special
MassHealth projects that will receive enhanced federal revenue
opportunities, including MassHealth eligibility operations and systems
enhancements that support reforms and improvements to MassHealth
programs; provided further, that any enhanced federal financial
participation received for such special projects, including the
Implementation Advanced Planning Documents or other eligibility
operations and systems enhancements that support reforms and
improvements to MassHealth shall be deposited into this item; provided
further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt
of revenues and payments required under contingency contracts, the
comptroller shall certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of
this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system; provided further, that the executive office may
negotiate contingency fees for activities and services related to pursuing
federal reimbursement or avoiding costs, and the comptroller shall certify
these fees and pay them upon the receipt of said revenue, reimbursement
or demonstration of costs avoided; provided further, that notwithstanding
any general or special law to the contrary, the executive office may enter
into interdepartmental service agreements with the University of
Massachusetts medical school to perform activities that the executive
office, in consultation with the comptroller, determines to be within the
scope of the proper administration of said Title XIX of the Social Security
Act and other federal funding provisions to support the programs and
activities of the executive office; provided further, that such activities may
include providing: (i) administrative services including, but not limited to,
utilization management activities and eligibility determinations based on
disability and supporting case management activities and similar
initiatives; (ii) consulting services related to quality assurance, program
evaluation and development, integrity and soundness and project
management; and (iii) activities and services to pursue federal
reimbursement, avoid costs or identify third-party liability and recoup
payments made to third parties; provided further, that federal
reimbursement for any expenditure made by the University of
Massachusetts medical school for federally-reimbursable services the
university provides under these interdepartmental service agreements or
other contracts with the executive office shall be distributed to the
university and recorded distinctly in the state accounting system; provided
further, that contingency fees paid to the University of Massachusetts
medical school shall not exceed $42,000,000 for state fiscal year 2027
except for contingency fees paid under interdepartmental service
agreements for recoveries related to special disability workload projects;
and provided further, that not later than December 18, 2026, the executive
office shall submit a report to the executive office for administration and
finance and the house and senate committees on ways and means

Conference Committee Report
detailing: (a) the amounts of the agreements; (b) a delineation of all
ongoing and new projects; and (c) the amount of federal reimbursement
and cost avoidance derived from the contracts for the previous fiscal year’s
activities ............................................................................................................ $65,000,000
4000-0322 For the executive office of health and human services, which may expend
not more than $10,000,000 for contingency fee contracts related to
revenue maximization projects pursuing additional federal reimbursement
or avoiding state costs; provided, that such contingency contracts shall not
exceed 3 years except with prior review and approval by the executive
office for administration and finance; provided further, that notwithstanding
any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures required under contingency contracts,
the executive office of health and human services shall incur expenses
and the comptroller shall certify for payment amounts not to exceed the
lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported
in the state accounting system; and provided further, that the secretary of
health and human services may negotiate contingency fees for activities
and services related to pursuing federal reimbursement or avoiding costs,
and the comptroller shall certify these fees and pay them upon the receipt
of this revenue, reimbursement or demonstration of costs avoided ................. $10,000,000
4000-0430 For the CommonHealth program to provide primary and supplemental
medical care and assistance to disabled adults and children under
sections 9A, 16 and 16A of chapter 118E of the General Laws; provided,
that funds may be expended from this item for health care services provided
to the recipients in prior fiscal years; provided further, that the executive
office of health and human services shall maximize federal reimbursement
for state expenditures made on behalf of those adults and children; provided
further, that children shall be determined eligible for medical care and
assistance if they meet the disability standards as defined by the executive
office; provided further, that such standards shall be no more restrictive
than those in effect on July 1, 1996; and provided further, that the
executive office shall process a CommonHealth application within 45 days
of receipt of a completed application or within 90 days if a determination
of disability is required ........................................................................................ $327,948,284
4000-0500 For health care services provided to medical assistance recipients through
the executive office of health and human services’ managed care delivery
systems, including a behavioral health contractor, the Primary Care
Clinician Plan, Primary Care Accountable Care Organizations, MassHealth
managed care organizations and Accountable Care Partnership Plans and
for MassHealth benefits provided to children, adolescents and adults
under section 9 of chapter 118E of the General Laws and clauses (a) to
(d), inclusive, and clause (h) of subsection (2) of section 9A of said chapter
118E and section 16C of said chapter 118E; provided, that no funds shall
be expended from this item for children and adolescents under clause (c)
of said subsection (2) of said section 9A of said chapter 118E whose
household incomes, as determined by the executive office, exceed 150
per cent of the federal poverty level; provided further, that funds may be
expended from this item for health care services provided to recipients in
prior fiscal years; provided further, that the executive office shall require
that any contract or other arrangement entered into by a managed care
provider under the managed care delivery system for the provision and
administration of pharmacy benefit management services on behalf of

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
individuals enrolled in programs of medical assistance under this item,
including a managed care provider participating in an accountable care
partnership plan, shall include, but not be limited to, the requirement that
pharmacy benefit managers: (i) identify all sources and amounts of
income, payments and financial benefits related to the provision and
administration of pharmacy benefit management services on behalf of the
managed care provider including, but not limited to, pricing discounts,
rebates, inflationary payments, credits, clawbacks, fees, grants,
chargebacks, reimbursements or other benefits; and (ii) disclose to
MassHealth the sources and amounts of all income, payments and
financial benefits received by the pharmacy benefit manager; provided
further, that not later than February 5, 2027, the executive office shall
submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and means
detailing: (a) the total number of members participating in the Accountable
Care Organization program; (b) disenrollment trends from the Partnership
Plan, Primary Care Accountable Care Organization and Managed Care
Organization-administered Accountable Care Organizations within the
designated plan selection; (c) the outcomes achieved by accountable care
organizations and community partners including, but not limited to,
financial performance, patient safety, patient satisfaction, quality and
aggregate and per-member reductions in spending compared to prior cost
trends; (d) the results of benchmarks on accountable care organizations’
and community partners’ progress toward an integrated care delivery
system; and (e) a summary of spending and activities related to
traditionally non-reimbursed services to address health-related social
needs including, but not limited to, home and community-based services,
housing stabilization and support, utility assistance, non-medical
transportation, physical activity, nutrition, sexual assault and domestic
violence supports; provided further, that said summary shall include, to the
maximum extent practicable, aggregated data on the results of
preventative health care services, including health-related social needs
screening, the number of referrals to human service providers to address
such screening, the result of such referrals and changes in health status;
provided further, that such data shall be stratified by demographic factors
to support an analysis of the impact on health disparities; provided further,
that where data is not available, a report on progress toward establishing
necessary data systems shall be provided; provided further, that said
summary shall include outcome measures for at-risk populations with
chronic health conditions; and provided further, that not later than March
5, 2027, the executive office shall conduct and submit a comparative
analysis to the house and senate committees on ways and means and the
joint committee on mental health, substance use and recovery of the rate
differential for inpatient psychiatric and substance use hospital per diem
payments between MassHealth and its contracted health insurers, health
plans, health maintenance organizations, behavioral health management
firms and third-party administrators under contract to a Medicaid managed
care organization or primary care clinician plan .......................................... $6,051,261,716
4000-0601 For health care services provided to MassHealth members who are
seniors, including those provided through the Medicare Savings Program,
and for the operation of the MassHealth senior care options program under
section 9D of chapter 118E of the General Laws; provided, that funds may
be expended from this item for health care services provided to recipients in
prior fiscal years; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, for the purposes of determining an individual’s
eligibility for the senior care options program, an individual shall be

Conference Committee Report
deemed to reach 65 years of age on the first day of the month in which
their sixty-fifth birthday occurs; provided further, that nursing facility rates
effective October 1, 2026 under section 13D of said chapter 118E shall be
developed using the costs of calendar year 2023; provided further, that
funds shall be expended from this item to maintain a personal needs
allowance of $72.80 per month for individuals residing in nursing and rest
homes who are eligible for MassHealth, emergency aid to the elderly, the
disabled and children program or supplemental security income; provided
further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
any nursing home facility or non-acute chronic disease hospital that
provides kosher food to its residents, the executive office of health and
human services, in consultation with the center for health information and
analysis, and in recognition of the special innovative program status
granted by the executive office, shall continue to make the standard
payment rates established in fiscal year 2006 to reflect the high dietary
costs incurred in providing kosher food; provided further, that MassHealth
shall reimburse nursing home facilities for up to 20 medical leave-of-
absence days and shall reimburse the facilities for up to 10 non-medical
leave-of-absence days; provided further, that medical leave-of-absence
days shall include an observation stay in a hospital in excess of 24 hours;
provided further, that no nursing home shall reassign a patient’s bed
during a leave of absence that is eligible for reimbursement under this
item; provided further, that not later than January 15, 2027, MassHealth
shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means detailing, for fiscal year 2026, the: (i) number of nursing facility
clients on a leave of absence, delineated by the nursing facility, medical
leave-of-absence days and medical leave-of-absence days that exceeded
10 days per hospital stay, nonmedical leave-of-absence days and the total
number of days on leave of absence unduplicated member count; (ii)
monthly licensed bed capacity level per nursing home and the monthly
total number of empty beds per nursing facility, total number of all nursing
home residents and total MassHealth nursing home residents; (iii) 6
separate MassHealth payment rates and the average payment amount
rate per nursing facility client resident; (iv) actual number of nursing home
residents for each of the 6 payment rates in clause (iii); and (v) aggregate
payment amount per nursing facility, by month; provided further, that the
information in the report shall be delineated by nursing facility, including
grand totals where appropriate; provided further, that the executive office
shall convene and consult with the personal care attendant program
working group established in item 4000-0601 of section 2 of chapter 140
of the acts of 2024 to identify savings in addition to those identified in the
November 28, 2025 report to effectuate a gross amount of spending for
the personal care attendant program consistent with the appropriation for
this item; provided further, that no further reductions to said personal care
attendant program may be implemented without the agreement of the
majority of said personal care attendant working group; provided further,
that no payment for special provider costs shall be made from this item
without the prior written approval of the secretary of administration and
finance; provided further, that not later than February 5, 2027, the
executive office shall submit a report to the house and senate committees
on ways and means on the implementation of the Medicare Savings
Program expanded program eligibility for seniors pursuant to section 25A
of said chapter 118E; provided further, that said report shall include, but
not be limited to: (a) the number of members who are seniors whose
household incomes, as determined by the executive office, exceed 135
per cent of the federal poverty level that are enrolled in Medicare Savings

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
Programs during each month of the fiscal year; (b) total enrollment in the
Qualified Medicare Beneficiary program, Specified Low-Income Medicare
Beneficiary Program and Qualifying Individual Program; (c) total annual
spending on Medicare premiums and cost-sharing for such members; and
(d) total annual transfers from the prescription advantage program in item
9110-1455 and the Health Safety Net Trust Fund to fund the Medicare
Savings Program expansion; provided further, that not less than
$2,973,456 shall be expended for the recognition of additional allowable
costs to the standard base rate for nursing facilities located within 17 miles
of 71 Hospital avenue in the city of North Adams; and provided further,
that not less than $3,800,000 shall be expended for the recognition of
additional allowable costs to the standard base rate over the base year
rate established on October 1, 2024, for a nursing facility located on
Martha’s Vineyard Island and within 8 miles of a hospital that has received
federal government designation as a Critical Access Hospital .................... $5,197,654,427
4000-0641 For nursing facility Medicaid rates; provided, that in fiscal year 2027, the
executive office of health and human services, in consultation with the
center for health information and analysis, shall establish rates that
cumulatively total not less than $342,100,000 more than the annual
payment rates established under the rates in effect as of June 30, 2002;
provided further, that not less than $25,000,000 shall be expended in base
rates for additional payments over the rate established in October 2025, as
supplemented January 2026 to reflect nursing facility resident care and
workforce costs including wages, hiring of staff and training for nursing
facility workers; provided further, that an amount for expenses related to
the collection and administration of assessments under section 63 of
chapter 118E of the General Laws shall be transferred to the executive
office; and provided further, that the payments made under this item shall
be allocated in an amount sufficient to implement section 622 of chapter
151 of the acts of 1996 ................................................................................... $650,073,456
4000-0700 For health care services provided to medical assistance recipients under
the executive office of health and human services’ health care indemnity
or third-party liability plan to medical assistance recipients not otherwise
covered under the executive office’s managed care or senior care plans
and for MassHealth benefits provided to children, adolescents and adults
under section 9 of chapter 118E of the General Laws and clauses (a) to
(d), inclusive, and clause (h) of subsection (2) of section 9A of said chapter
118E and section 16C of said chapter 118E; provided, that no funds shall
be expended from this item for children and adolescents under clause (c)
of said subsection (2) of said section 9A of said chapter 118E whose
household incomes, as determined by the executive office exceed 150 per
cent of the federal poverty level; provided further, that children who have
aged out of the custody of the department of children and families shall be
eligible for benefits through the age limit specified in MassHealth’s
approved state plan; provided further, that the executive office may reduce
MassHealth premiums or copayments or offer other incentives to
encourage enrollees to comply with wellness goals; provided further, that
funds shall be expended to eliminate pharmacy copayments for all
MassHealth members; provided further, that funds shall be expended from
this item for members who qualify for early intervention services; provided
further, that notwithstanding this item, funds may be expended from this
item for the purchase of third-party insurance including, but not limited to,
Medicare for any medical assistance recipient; provided further, that funds
may be expended from this item for activities relating to customer service;

Conference Committee Report
provided further, that funds may be expended from this item for activities
relating to disability determinations or utilization management and review,
including patient screenings and evaluations, regardless of whether such
activities are performed by a state agency, contractor, agent or provider;
provided further, that MassHealth shall expend funds for acute care
hospitals that have greater than 63 per cent of their gross patient service
revenue from governmental payers and free care as determined by the
executive office; provided further, that in fiscal year 2027, MassHealth shall
maintain the same level of federally-optional chiropractic services that
were in effect in fiscal year 2016 and that were included in its state plan or
demonstration program in effect on January 1, 2002 for members enrolled
in the primary care clinician program; provided further, that not later than
March 3, 2027, the executive office shall report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means on: (i) dental coverage available to
MassHealth recipients as of January 1, 2027 as it compares to dental
coverage available to MassHealth recipients on January 1, 2010; (ii)
utilization of dental services in fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027; (iii) the
actual and projected costs and revenue associated with dental coverage in
fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027; and (iv) the estimated cost
effectiveness of dental coverage as a contributor to MassHealth total cost of
care; provided further, that in fiscal year 2027, the executive office shall not
fund programs relating to case management with the intention of reducing
length of stay for neonatal intensive care unit cases; provided further, that
funds may be expended from this item for health care services provided
to recipients in prior fiscal years; provided further, that no payments for
special provider costs shall be made from this item without the prior written
approval of the secretary of administration and finance; provided further,
that not less than $250,000 shall be expended to Baystate Franklin
Medical Center in the city known as the town of Greenfield to support its
family medicine residency program; provided further, that not later than
December 4, 2026, $750,000 shall be equally distributed to the teaching
community health centers with family medicine residency programs in the
cities of Worcester and Lawrence and in the South Boston section of the
city of Boston; provided further, that the executive office shall designate
the Massachusetts League of Community Health Centers, Inc. to
administer the funds and shall retain 5 per cent of the total funds; and
provided further, that the executive office shall: (a) report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means on the use of the funds by
teaching community health centers; and (b) audit said centers in order to
confirm the use of the funds by each center for training purposes .............. $4,207,067,619
4000-0875 For the executive office of health and human services to expend for the
provision of benefits to eligible individuals who require medical treatment
for either breast or cervical cancer under section 2 of the Breast and
Cervical Cancer Prevention and Treatment Act of 2000, Public Law 106-
354, codified at 42 U.S.C. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(ii)(XVIII) and section 10D of
chapter 118E of the General Laws; provided, that the executive office shall
provide these benefits to individuals whose incomes, as determined by the
executive office, do not exceed 250 per cent of the federal poverty level,
subject to continued federal approval; and provided further, that funds may
be expended from this item for health care services provided to these
recipients in prior fiscal years ............................................................................ $18,500,000
4000-0880 For MassHealth benefits under clause (c) of subsection (2) of section 9A
of chapter 118E of the General Laws and section 16C of said chapter 118E
for children and adolescents whose household incomes, as determined by

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
the executive office of health and human services, exceed 150 per cent of
the federal poverty level; provided, that funds may be expended from this
item for health care subsidies provided to eligible individuals under the last
paragraph of section 9 of said chapter 118E and section 16D of said
chapter 118E; and provided further, that funds may be expended from this
item for health care services provided to those children and adolescents
in prior fiscal years .......................................................................................... $633,207,250
4000-0885 For the cost of health insurance subsidies paid to employees of small
businesses in the insurance reimbursement program under section 9C of
chapter 118E of the General Laws; provided, that funds may be expended
only for employees who are ineligible for subsidized insurance through the
commonwealth health insurance connector authority and ineligible for any
MassHealth program; provided further, that enrollment in this program
may be capped to ensure that MassHealth expenditures shall not exceed
the amount appropriated; provided further, that funds may be expended
from this item for health care services provided to individuals eligible under
clause (j) of subsection (2) of section 9A of said chapter 118E; and
provided further, that funds may be expended from this item for health care
services provided to those persons in prior fiscal years ................................... $34,042,020
4000-0940 For providing health care services related to the Patient Protection and
Affordable Care Act, Public Law 111-148; provided, that funds may be
expended from this item for health care services provided to individuals
ages 19 to 64, inclusive, whose household incomes, as determined by the
executive office of health and human services, do not exceed 133 per cent
of the federal poverty level and those who are eligible under clauses (b)
and (d) of subsection (2) of section 9A of chapter 118E of the General
Laws; and provided further, that in fiscal year 2027, MassHealth shall
maintain the same level of vision services that were in effect in fiscal year
2026 for members enrolled in the CarePlus program .................................. $3,363,484,382
4000-0950 For administrative and program expenses associated with the children’s
behavioral health initiative to provide comprehensive, community-based
behavioral health services to children suffering from severe emotional
disturbances; provided, that the executive office of health and human
services shall submit biannual reports to the house and senate committees
on ways and means on the implementation of the initiative; provided
further, that said reports shall include, but not be limited to: (i) up-to-date
results of the scheduled plan, including a schedule detailing
commencement of services and associated costs by service type; (ii) an
up-to-date analysis of compliance with the terms of the settlement
agreement to date; (iii) a detailed itemization of services and service
utilization by service type, geographical location and the age of the
member receiving the service; (iv) data detailing the time that elapsed
between a member’s request for services and commencement of an initial
assessment for services; (v) the time to complete the initial assessment
and the time that elapsed between initial assessment for services and
commencement of services; and (vi) a quarterly update of whether
projected expenditures are likely to exceed the amount appropriated in this
item; provided further, that the executive office shall notify the house and
senate committees on ways and means not less than 30 days before any
transfer of funds shall be made from this item; provided further, that funds
may be expended from this item for health care services provided to these
persons in prior fiscal years; and provided further, that any unexpended
balance in this item shall revert to the General Fund on June 30, 2027 ........ $337,639,537

Conference Committee Report
4000-0990 For the executive office of health and human services to expend for the
children’s medical security plan to provide health services for uninsured
children from birth through age 18, inclusive; provided, that the executive
office shall expend all necessary funds from this item to ensure the
provision of this program under section 10F of chapter 118E of the General
Laws; provided further, that the MassHealth benefit request shall be used
as a joint application to determine the eligibility for both MassHealth and
the children’s medical security plan; provided further, that the executive
office shall prescreen enrollees and applicants for Medicaid eligibility;
provided further, that the maximum benefit levels for this program shall be
made available only to those children who have been determined by the
executive office to be ineligible for MassHealth benefits; provided further,
that no applicant shall be enrolled in the program until the applicant has
been denied eligibility for the MassHealth program other than MassHealth
Limited; provided further, that the executive office shall maximize federal
reimbursements for state expenditures made on behalf of the children; and
provided further, that funds may be expended from this item for health care
services provided to those persons in prior fiscal years ................................... $42,600,000
4000-1400 For the provision of MassHealth benefits to persons diagnosed with
human immunodeficiency virus who have incomes that do not exceed 200
per cent of the federal poverty level; provided, that funds may be expended
from this item for health care services provided to said persons in prior
fiscal years ........................................................................................................ $16,555,080
4000-1420 For payment to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services in
compliance with Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. chapter 7,
subchapter XIX ................................................................................................ $721,675,586
4000-1426 For health care services provided to MassHealth members through the
following MassHealth waivers approved under section 1915(c) of the
Social Security Act: (i) the Acquired Brain Injury Residential Habilitation
waiver; (ii) the Acquired Brain Injury Non-Residential Habilitation waiver;
(iii) the Moving Forward Plan Residential Supports waiver; and (iv) the
Moving Forward Plan Community Living waiver; provided, that funds may
be expended from this item for administrative and program expenses
associated with the operation of said waivers; and provided further, that
funds may be expended from this item for health care services provided
to members participating in said waivers in prior fiscal years ......................... $560,464,089
4000-1700 For the provision of information technology services within the executive
office of health and human services ............................................................... $183,495,208
Office for Refugees and Immigrants.
4003-0111 For the operation of the office for refugees and immigrants; provided, that
the office shall submit quarterly reports to the house and senate
committees on ways and means detailing: (i) a list of recipients of such
funds; (ii) the amounts distributed to each recipient; and (iii) the number of
newly arrived immigrants and refugees served by each recipient ......................... $993,777
4003-0122 For a citizenship for new Americans program to assist legal permanent
residents of the commonwealth in becoming citizens of the United States;
provided, that the office for refugees and immigrants shall administer the

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
program; provided further, that the program funded under this item shall
provide assistance to persons who are within 3 years of eligibility to
become citizens of the United States; provided further, that services shall
include: (i) English for Speakers of Other Languages/civics classes; (ii)
citizenship application assistance; (iii) interview preparation; and (iv)
support services including, but not limited to, interpretation and referral
services; provided further, that persons who would qualify for benefits
under chapter 118A of the General Laws but for their status as legal
noncitizens shall be given the highest priority for services; provided further,
that persons who currently receive state-funded benefits that could be
replaced in whole or in part by federally-funded benefits if those persons
become citizens shall be given priority for services; provided further, that
funds may be expended for the programmatic and administrative support
of the office’s refugee and immigrant services; provided further, that not
less than $50,000 shall be expended to Casa Dominicana Inc. to assist in
ESL classes and additional programming for low-income adults; provided
further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended to Immigrants
Assistance Center, Inc. in the city of New Bedford to provide citizenship
and workforce readiness programming; provided further, that not less than
$40,000 shall be expended to Project Citizenship, Inc. for services for
immigrants in the cities of Boston, Cambridge and Watertown and the town
of Belmont; and provided further, that not less than $140,000 shall be
expended to Friendly House, Inc. for the operation of the Office of New
Americans in the city of Worcester ..................................................................... $1,616,246
4003-0124 For the implementation of an immigration legal services program;
provided, that funds may be expended for costs associated with
implementing the program; provided further, that not less than $2,000,000
shall be expended to the Immigrant Family Services Institute, Inc. (IFSI-
USA.INC.) for facilities, operations, programming, legal and mental health
services at their offices including but not limited to Mattapan, Brockton,
Everett, Worcester, Methuen and Lowell to support immigrants in
Massachusetts; and provided further, that, subject to appropriation, funds
shall be distributed by the office for refugees and immigrants to designated
non-profit organizations to increase access to legal representation for
immigrants and refugees in the commonwealth including, but not limited
to, legal assistance in a single consultation or ongoing legal representation
and all legal advice, advocacy and related assistance ....................................... $8,000,000
Center for Health Information and Analysis.
4100-0060 For the operation of the center for health information and analysis
established in section 2 of chapter 12C of the General Laws; provided, that
the estimated costs of the center shall be assessed in the manner
prescribed by section 7 of said chapter 12C; and provided further, that the
center for health information and analysis shall report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means not later than January 8, 2027 on: (i)
the MassHealth rates of payment for telehealth services; (ii) the MassHealth
rates of payment for comparable in-person services; and (iii) the utilization
rates of telehealth services where in person services are available .................... $32,231,359
4100-0063 For the operation of the Betsy Lehman center for patient safety and
medical error reduction established in section 15 of chapter 12C of the
General Laws; provided, that the estimated costs of the center shall be
assessed in the manner prescribed by section 7 of said chapter 12C; and

Conference Committee Report
provided further, that not less than $2,468,268 shall be expended for a pilot
program of automated adverse event monitoring in hospitals in the
commonwealth .................................................................................................... $5,642,287
OFFICE OF DISABILITIES AND COMMUNITY SERVICES.
Massachusetts Commission for the Blind.
4110-0001 For the operation of the Massachusetts commission for the blind, including
the cost of sheltered workforce employee retirement benefits ........................... $2,143,271
4110-1000 For the community services program; provided, that the Massachusetts
commission for the blind shall work in collaboration with the
Massachusetts commission for the deaf and hard of hearing to provide
assistance and services to the deaf-blind community through the deaf-
blind community access network; provided further, that not less than
$250,000 shall be expended for social workers, rehabilitation teachers and
orientation and mobility instructors at the Massachusetts commission for
the blind; provided further, that not less than $1,100,000 shall be
expended by the Massachusetts commission for the blind to maximize the
independent living skills of legally blind residents of the commonwealth
through rehabilitation programs, housing assistance services, adjustment
counseling services and the provision of accessible devices, assistive
software and equipment and supportive technology training provided by
qualified nonprofit providers in community, residential, virtual and facility-
based settings; and provided further, that not less than $500,000 of said
$1,100,000 shall be made available for the Carroll Center for the Blind,
Inc. and not less than $300,000 of said $1,100,000 shall be made available
for the MAB Community Services, Inc. ............................................................... $8,572,782
4110-1010 For radio reading services for the blind and print disabled; provided, that
not less than $150,000 shall be expended to each of the following service
providers: (i) Audible Local Ledger, Inc.; (ii) Audio Journal, Incorporated;
(iii) Berkshire Talking Chronicle; (iv) Lowell Association for the Blind, Inc.;
and (v) Valley Eye Radio, Inc.; and provided further, that not less than
$350,000 shall be expended for Talking Information Center, Incorporated
to provide human voiced broadcasts of local news, articles and items of
interest to visually-impaired and otherwise disabled listeners ............................ $1,100,000
4110-2000 For the turning 22 program of the Massachusetts commission for the blind,
including deaf-blind extended supports; provided, that the commission
shall work in conjunction with the department of developmental services
to secure the maximum amount of federal reimbursements available for
the care of turning 22 program clients .............................................................. $18,320,678
4110-3010 For vocational rehabilitation services for the blind operated in cooperation
with the federal government; provided, that no funds from federal
vocational rehabilitation grants or state appropriations shall be deducted
for pensions, group health or life insurance or any other such indirect costs
of federally-reimbursed state employees ............................................................ $2,522,010
MassAbility.

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
4120-0200 For independent living centers; provided, that not later than April 1, 2027,
MassAbility shall report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means on the services provided by independent living centers; and
provided further, that the report shall include, but not be limited to, the: (i)
total number of consumers that request and receive services; (ii) types of
services requested and received by consumers; (iii) total number of
consumers moved from nursing homes; and (iv) total number of
independent living plans and goals set and achieved by consumers ................. $8,500,000
4120-1000 For the operation of MassAbility; provided, that not less than 90 days prior
to any changes to the current eligibility criteria, the commission shall
provide written notification to the house and senate committees on ways
and means; provided further, that the commissioner shall report quarterly to
the house and senate committees on ways and means and the secretary of
administration and finance on the number of clients served and the amount
expended on each type of service; provided further, that upon the written
request of the commissioner of revenue, MassAbility shall provide lists of
individual clients to whom, or on behalf of whom, payments have been made
for the purpose of verifying eligibility and detecting and preventing fraud,
error and abuse in the programs administered by MassAbility; and provided
further, that said lists shall include client names and social security numbers
and payee names and other identification, if different from a client’s
identification ............................................................................................................ $481,163
4120-2000 For vocational rehabilitation services operated in cooperation with the
federal government; provided, that funds from federal vocational
rehabilitation grants or state appropriations shall not be deducted for
pensions, group health or life insurance or any other indirect costs of
federally-reimbursed state employees; and provided further, that the
commissioner of MassAbility, in making referrals to service providers, shall
take into account a client’s place of residence and the proximity of the
nearest provider to the client’s residence ......................................................... $29,194,031
4120-3000 For employment assistance services; provided, that vocational evaluation
and employment services shall be provided for severely disabled adults .......... $2,487,654
4120-4000 For community-based services, which shall include, but not be limited to,
protective services, adult support services, assistive technology services
and the annualization of funding for turning 22 program clients who began
receiving services in fiscal year 2026 under item 4120-4010 of section 2
of chapter 9 of the acts of 2025; provided, that not less than $1,920,000
shall be expended for assistive technology services; and provided further,
that not less than $500,000 shall be expended to REquipment Durable
Medical Equipment (DME) and Assistive Technology (AT) Reuse
Program, Inc. to improve the independence of individuals with disabilities
through the refurbishment and repair of home medical equipment and
assistive technology .......................................................................................... $14,730,909
4120-4001 For the accessible housing registry for people with disabilities ............................. $150,000
4120-4010 For the turning 22 program of MassAbility ............................................................. $311,166
4120-5000 For homemaking services ................................................................................... $4,862,718
4120-6000 For services for individuals with head injuries; provided, that MassAbility
shall work with the executive office of health and human services to

Conference Committee Report
maximize federal reimbursement for clients receiving head injury services
.......................................................................................................................... $33,106,310
Massachusetts Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing.
4125-0100 For the operation of and services provided by the Massachusetts
commission for the deaf and hard of hearing ................................................... $11,270,808
OFFICE OF CHILDREN, YOUTH AND FAMILY SERVICES.
Department of Youth Services.
4200-0010 For the administration of the department of youth services; provided, that
the department shall continue to collaborate with the department of
elementary and secondary education in order to align curriculum at the
department of youth services with the statewide curriculum frameworks
and to support the reintegration of youth from facilities at the department
of youth services into traditional public school settings; provided further,
that the commissioner of youth services may transfer funds between items
4200-0100, 4200-0200, 4200-0300 and 4200-0600, as necessary, under
an allocation plan which shall detail, by object class, the distribution of the
funds to be transferred and which the commissioner shall submit to the
house and senate committees on ways and means not less than 15 days
before any such transfer; and provided further, that not more than 7 per
cent of any such item shall be transferred in fiscal year 2027 ............................ $4,543,530
4200-0100 For supervision, counseling and other community-based services
provided to committed youths in nonresidential care programs of the
department of youth services ............................................................................ $23,362,621
4200-0200 For pre-trial detention programs, including purchase-of-service and state-
operated programs; provided, that not less than $600,000 shall be
expended for Robert F. Kennedy Children’s Action Corps, Inc. for the
detention diversion advocacy program to prevent high-risk juveniles
presenting before the court from becoming further involved in the juvenile
justice system .................................................................................................... $27,137,843
4200-0300 For secure facilities, including purchase-of-service and state-operated
programs incidental to the operations of the facilities; provided, that funds
shall be expended to address the needs of the female population; and
provided further, that funds shall be expended for suicide prevention
services ........................................................................................................... $117,780,790
4200-0500 For enhanced salaries for teachers at the department of youth services ........... $3,059,187
4200-0600 For the operation of secure facilities to detain arrested youth before
arraignment under the overnight arrest program ................................................ $2,606,922
4200-0700 For evidence-based delinquency prevention through diversion
programming that serves as an alternative to arresting or prosecuting
youth through the juvenile court .......................................................................... $1,660,615
Department of Transitional Assistance.

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
4400-1000 For the central administration of the department of transitional assistance;
provided, that all costs associated with verifying disability for all programs
of the department shall be paid from this item; provided further, that not
less than $75,000 shall be expended to Fresh Start Furniture Bank, Inc.
for the continuation of wrap around services; provided further, that not less
than $200,000 shall be expended for Cradles to Crayons’ Clothing
Insecurity relief and essentials distribution service; provided further, that
the department shall submit monthly status reports to the house and senate
committees on ways and means and the secretary of administration and
finance on program expenditures, savings and revenues, error rate
measurements and public assistance caseloads and benefits; provided
further, that the department shall collect all out-of-court settlement
restitution payments; provided further, that the restitution payments shall
include, but not be limited to, installment and lump sum payments;
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary and unless otherwise expressly provided, federal
reimbursements received for the department, including reimbursements
for administrative, fringe and overhead costs for the current fiscal year and
prior fiscal years, shall be credited to the General Fund; provided further,
that an application for assistance under chapter 118 of the General Laws
shall also be an application for assistance under chapter 118E of the
General Laws; provided further, that if the department denies assistance
under said chapter 118, the department shall transmit the application to
the executive office of health and human services for a determination of
eligibility under said chapter 118E; provided further, that the department
shall provide the caseload forecasting office with enrollment data and any
other information pertinent to caseload forecasting that is requested by the
office on a monthly basis; provided further, that the information shall be
provided in a manner that meets all applicable federal and state privacy
and security requirements; provided further, that after April 1, 2027, the
commissioner of transitional assistance may transfer funds for identified
deficiencies between items 4403-2000, 4405-2000 and 4408-1000;
provided further, that the distribution of the funds to be transferred shall be
included in an allocation plan, which the commissioner shall submit to the
executive office for administration and finance and the house and senate
committees on ways and means not less than 15 days before any such
transfer; provided further, that upon approval by the executive office for
administration and finance, the commissioner may transfer funds for
identified deficiencies between this item and item 4400-1100; and
provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended to
Springfield WORKS for its Bridge to Prosperity pilot program to mitigate
cliff effects for low-income families ................................................................. $109,285,521
4400-1001 For programs to increase the commonwealth’s participation rate in the
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program and other federal nutrition
programs; provided, that not less than $900,000 shall be expended for a
grant to Project Bread – The Walk for Hunger, Inc.; provided further, that
the work of employees of the department of transitional assistance paid
for from this item shall be restricted to processing supplemental nutrition
assistance program applications; provided further, that the department
shall not require supplemental nutrition assistance program applicants to
provide reverification of eligibility factors previously verified and not subject
to change; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special
law to the contrary, the department shall require only 1 signature from
supplemental nutrition assistance program applicants; provided further,
that the department shall fund a unit staffed by department employees to

Conference Committee Report
respond to supplemental nutrition assistance program inquiries and
arrange and conduct telephone interviews for initial supplemental nutrition
assistance program applications from this item; provided further, that the
department shall fund a system to image and catalog eligibility documents
electronically from this item; provided further, that funds may be expended
for supplemental nutrition assistance program outreach; and provided
further, that not later than February 3, 2027, the department shall report to
the house and senate committees on ways and means on the status of
these programs ................................................................................................... $5,762,115
4400-1004 For the project costs of the Massachusetts healthy incentives program;
provided, that when expanding the number of participating vendors, the
department shall prioritize improving access in areas with limited access
to fresh, local produce and that are historically underserved by the
program; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
to the Allston-Brighton Food Pantry for a community refrigerator support
program; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
to the Dracut Food Pantry; provided further, that the department shall
collaborate with local food coalitions and nonprofit groups to develop
community outreach strategies that ensure equitable access to, and
knowledge of, the program; and provided further, that not later than April
1, 2027, the department shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to: (i)
the number of households utilizing the program, including household size,
age and racial demographic information; (ii) the number of program
transactions; (iii) the number of vendors processing program transactions;
(iv) a breakdown of the total number of program clients and vendors, by
their municipality; and (v) the department’s efforts, plans and timeline for
identifying geographic areas that are underserved by the program and
increasing program activity in those areas, including metrics and factors to
be used to make determinations for the addition and siting of vendors, prior
appropriation continued ......................................................................................... $21,550,000
4400-1020 For the operation of the secure jobs connect program for employment
support, job training and job search services for homeless or previously
homeless families receiving assistance from the executive office of
housing and livable communities under items 7004-0101, 7004-0108,
7004-9024 or 7004-9316; provided, that participants receiving assistance
under said items 7004-0101 and 7004-0108 shall receive not less than 12
months of housing stabilization services under said items 7004-0101 and
7004-0108; provided further, that services shall be delivered by
community-based agencies that have demonstrated experience working
in partnership with regional administering agencies including, but not
limited to, Community Teamwork Inc., Father Bill's & MainSpring, Inc.,
Way Finders, Inc., Jewish Vocational Service, Inc., SER-Jobs for
Progress, Inc., South Middlesex Opportunity Council, Inc. and Worcester
Community Action Council, Inc.; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the Main South Community Development
Corporation for efforts to promote the safety and security of the University
Park and Beacon Brightly neighborhoods; provided further, that the
executive office of housing and livable communities shall make available
rental assistance under item 7004-9024 to ensure effective participation in
this program; provided further, that service delivery agencies shall seek
additional federal, state or private funds to ensure the effective
continuation of regional partnerships; and provided further, that not later
than April 1, 2027, the department of transitional assistance shall submit

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
a report to the house and senate committees on ways and means, by type
of service or program provided, on the: (i) housing situation, including
stability of housing, for program participants; (ii) employment status,
including the employment history, of program participants; (iii) total
number of program participants; and (iv) number of program participants
who are no longer receiving assistance under said items 7004-0101, 7004-
0108, 7004-9024 or 7004-9316 .......................................................................... $5,000,000
4400-1025 For domestic violence specialists at local area offices ....................................... $2,411,075
4400-1100 For the payroll of the department of transitional assistance’s caseworkers;
provided, that only employees of bargaining unit 8 shall be paid from this
item ....................................................................................................................... $121,991,351
4400-1979 For the department of transitional assistance to administer, in consultation
with the commonwealth corporation, the employment counseling and job
training program established in section 3B of chapter 118 of the General
Laws, the pathways to self-sufficiency program respectively established in
sections 3B and 3C of said chapter 118 and the full employment program
established in section 110 of chapter 5 of the acts of 1995, as amended by
section 29 of chapter 158 of the acts of 2014 ......................................................... $980,171
4401-1000 For employment and training services for recipients of benefits provided
under the transitional aid to families with dependent children program;
provided, that funds from this item may be expended on former recipients
of the program for up to 1 year after termination of their benefits; provided
further, that the department of transitional assistance may expend funds
on such services for the noncustodial parents of dependent children
receiving transitional aid to families with dependent children; provided
further, that the department shall expend not less than the amounts
expended in fiscal year 2026 for the young parents program and the
competitive integrated employment services program; provided further,
that not less than $170,000 shall be expended for learning disability
assessments through the University of Massachusetts; provided further,
that not less than $200,000 shall be expended for the DTA Works
internship program; provided further, that not less than $3,000,000 shall
be expended for the service providers with whom the office for refugees
and immigrants entered into service agreements in fiscal year 2026 under
this item; provided further, that certain parents who have not yet reached
18 years of age, including those who are ineligible for transitional aid to
families with dependent children and who would qualify for benefits under
chapter 118 of the General Laws but for the consideration of the
grandparents’ income, shall be eligible to receive services; provided
further, that not later than April 1, 2027, the department shall submit a
report to the house and senate committees on ways and means including,
but not limited to: (i) the number of clients served by these programs; (ii)
the number of clients who transition into employment, when applicable; (iii)
the number of clients who remain in employment after 90 days, when
applicable; (iv) the number of clients who remain in employment after 1
year, when applicable; and (v) other quantifiable data related to client
outcomes as designed by these programs; provided further, that the
department shall examine the outcomes of these programs to determine
which are effective in transitioning clients to employment and increasing
self-sufficiency; and provided further, that the department shall consider
other programs to meet the transitional employment needs of clients ............. $20,375,367

Conference Committee Report
4403-2000 For a program of transitional aid to families with dependent children;
provided, that the payment standard and need standard in fiscal year 2027
shall be not less than the standards in effect in fiscal year 2026; provided
further, that the need standard shall be equal to the payment standard
established under the provisions of this item; provided further, that the
payment standard and need standard for fiscal year 2028 shall be not less
than the standards set forth in this item; provided further, that the
department of transitional assistance shall notify parents under 20 years
of age who are receiving benefits from the program of the requirements of
clause (2) of subsection (i) of section 110 of chapter 5 of the acts of 1995
or any successor law; provided further, that a $40-per-month rental
allowance shall be paid to households incurring a rent or mortgage
expense and not residing in public or subsidized housing; provided further,
that a nonrecurring children’s clothing allowance of $500 shall be provided
to each child eligible under this program in September 2026; provided
further, that the children’s clothing allowance shall be included in the
standard of need for the month of September 2026; provided further, that
benefits under this program shall not be available to those families in which
a child has been removed from the household under a court order after a
care and protection hearing held under chapter 119 of the General Laws
or to adult recipients otherwise eligible for transitional aid to families with
dependent children but for the temporary removal of any dependent
children from the home by the department of children and families under
procedures; provided further, that not less than $779,058 shall be
expended for transportation benefits for recipients of transitional aid to
families with dependent children; provided further, that any person
experiencing homelessness, who: (i) has no established place of abode or
lives in a temporary emergency shelter; and (ii) is otherwise eligible under
this item and chapter 118 of the General Laws, shall receive the same
payment rate as recipients who incur shelter costs including, but not
limited to, rent or a mortgage; provided further, that the department of
transitional assistance shall promulgate or revise any such rules and
regulations necessary to implement the preceding provision; provided
further, that notwithstanding section 2 of said chapter 118 or any other
general or special law to the contrary, the department of transitional
assistance shall render aid to pregnant women with no other eligible
dependent children only if the pregnancy has been verified and who, if the
child had been born and was living with that parent in the month of
payment, would be categorically and financially eligible for transitional aid
to families with dependent children benefits; provided further, that certain
families that suffer a reduction in benefits due to a loss of earned income
and participation in retrospective budgeting may receive a supplemental
benefit to compensate them for the loss; provided further, that the
department of transitional assistance shall, to the extent feasible within the
existing appropriation and any funding from other sources, review its
disability standards to determine the extent to which such standards reflect
the current medical and vocational criteria; provided further, that not less
than 75 days before any changes to the disability standards are publicly
proposed, the department of transitional assistance shall report to the
house and senate committees on ways and means and the joint committee
on children, families and persons with disabilities; provided further, that at
the time of application and on a semi-annual basis, the department of
transitional assistance shall provide oral and written notification to all
recipients of their child care benefits; provided further, that the notification
shall include the full range of child care options available, including center-
based child care, family-based child care and in-home, relative child care;

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
provided further, that the notification shall detail available child care
benefits for current and former recipients, including employment and
training benefits and transitional benefits; provided further, that the notice
shall also advise recipients of the availability of supplemental nutrition
assistance program benefits; provided further, that in promulgating,
amending or rescinding its regulations relative to eligibility for, or levels of,
benefits under the program, the department of transitional assistance shall
take into account the amounts available to it for expenditure from this item
so as not to exceed this appropriation; provided further, that not less than
$1,000,000 shall be expended for cash and transportation benefits for
newly-employed transitional aid to families with dependent children clients
for a period not to exceed 12 months to assist such clients with short-term
self-sufficiency; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, the department of transitional assistance shall
calculate benefits provided under this item in the same manner as it
calculated said benefits in the previous fiscal year; provided further, that
the department of transitional assistance’s calculation of benefits shall not
preclude the department of transitional assistance from making eligibility
or benefit changes that lead to an increase in eligibility or benefits;
provided further, that not less than 75 days before adopting eligibility or
benefit changes, the department of transitional assistance shall submit a
report on said changes to the house and senate committees on ways and
means, the joint committee on children, families and persons with
disabilities and the clerks of the house of representatives; and senate;
provided further, that the report shall include the text of, basis for and
reasons for the proposed changes; and provided further, that not later than
January 1, 2027, the department of transitional assistance shall submit a
report to house and senate committees on ways and means that shall
include but not be limited to: (A) the number of participants in the program,
including available demographic information; (B) the average benefit
amount, including the methodology for determining an individual's benefit
amount; and (C) the number of participants in the program who also receive
benefits under items 7004-0101, 7004-0108, 7004-9024 or 7004-9316 .......... $437,259,755
4403-2007 For a nutritional benefit program for low-income workers; provided, that
benefits shall be provided only to those for whom receiving these benefits
will improve the work participation rate under the federal Temporary
Assistance for Needy Families program ............................................................ $11,000,000
4403-2008 For participant support payments to pay for or reimburse supplemental
nutrition assistance program applicants and recipients for expenses that
are reasonably necessary and directly related to participation in the SNAP
path to work program ............................................................................................. $352,972
4403-2119 For the provision of structured settings as provided under subsection (i) of
section 110 of chapter 5 of the acts of 1995 or any successor statute, for
parents under the age of 22 who are receiving benefits under the
transitional aid to families with dependent children program ............................ $15,080,238
4405-2000 For the state supplement to the Supplemental Security Income program
for the aged and disabled, including a program for emergency needs for
Supplemental Security Income recipients; provided, that the expenses of
special grant recipients residing in rest homes, as provided under section
7A of chapter 118A of the General Laws, may be paid from this item;
provided further, that rates for residential care facilities and rest homes
effective July 1, 2026, established in section 13D of chapter 118E of the

Conference Committee Report
General Laws, shall cumulatively total not less than rates effective January
1, 2026; provided further, that the department of transitional assistance, in
collaboration with the executive office of health and human services, may
fund an optional supplemental living arrangement category under the
Supplemental Security Income program that makes payments to persons
living in assisted living residences certified under chapter 19D of the
General Laws who meet the income and clinical eligibility criteria
established by the department and the executive office; provided further,
that the optional category of payments shall only be administered in
conjunction with the Medicaid group adult foster care benefit; and provided
further, that reimbursements to providers for services rendered in prior
fiscal years may be expended from this item .................................................. $186,937,185
4408-1000 For a program of cash assistance to certain residents of the
commonwealth, entitled emergency aid to the elderly, disabled and
children, who are found by the department of transitional assistance to be
eligible for the aid under chapter 117A of the General Laws and
regulations promulgated by the department and subject to the limitations
of appropriation for such purpose; provided, that recipients shall not be
subject to sponsor income-deeming or related restrictions; provided further,
that in implementing the program for fiscal year 2027, the department shall
include all eligibility categories permitted in this item and the need standard
and payment standard shall be not less than the standard that was in effect
in fiscal year 2026; provided further, that any person experiencing
homelessness, who: (i) has no established place of abode or lives in a
temporary emergency shelter; and (ii) is otherwise eligible under this item
and said chapter 117A, shall receive the same payment rate as recipients
who incur shelter costs including, but not limited to, rent or a mortgage;
provided further, that the department shall promulgate or revise any rules
and regulations necessary to implement this provision; provided further,
that rates for residential care facilities and rest homes effective July 1,
2026, established in section 13D of chapter 118E of the General Laws,
shall cumulatively total not less than rates effective January 1, 2026;
provided further, that the department may provide benefits to persons who
are the age of 65 or older who have applied for benefits under chapter
118A of the General Laws, to persons suffering from a medically-
determinable impairment or combination of impairments that is expected
to last for a period determined by department regulations, which
substantially reduces or eliminates such individuals’ capacity to support
themselves and which has been verified by a competent authority, to
certain persons caring for a disabled person, to otherwise eligible
participants in the vocational rehabilitation program of MassAbility, to
dependent children who are ineligible for benefits under both chapter 118
of the General Laws and the separate program under section 210 of
chapter 43 of the acts of 1997 and to parents or other caretakers of
dependent children who are ineligible under said chapter 118 and under
said separate program; provided further, that no person incarcerated in a
correctional institution shall be eligible for benefits under the program;
provided further, that no funds shall be expended from this item for the
payment of expenses associated with any medical review team, other
disability screening process or costs associated with verifying disability for
this program; provided further, that the department shall adopt emergency
regulations under chapter 30A of the General Laws to implement the
changes to the program required by this item promptly and within the
appropriation; provided further, that in promulgating, amending or
rescinding its regulations with respect to eligibility or benefits, including the

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
payment standard, medical benefits and any other benefits under this
program, the department shall take into account the amount available to it
for expenditure by this item so as not to exceed the amount appropriated
in this item; provided further, that the department may promulgate
emergency regulations under said chapter 30A to implement these
eligibility changes, benefit changes or both; provided further, that nothing
in this item shall be construed to create any right accruing to recipients of
the former general relief program; provided further, that reimbursements
collected from the Social Security Administration on behalf of former
clients of the emergency aid to the elderly, disabled and children program
or unprocessed payments from the program that are returned to the
department shall be credited to the General Fund; provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, not less than
75 days prior to adopting any eligibility or benefit changes, the
commissioner of transitional assistance shall submit to the house and
senate committees on ways and means, the joint committee on children,
families and persons with disabilities and the clerks of the senate and
house of representatives a detailed and comprehensive report setting forth
the text of and the basis and reasons for the proposed changes; provided
further, that the report shall state exactly which components of the current
benefit package will be altered and the department’s most accurate
assessment of the effects of benefit or eligibility changes upon recipient
families; provided further, that the payment standard and need standard
for fiscal year 2028 shall be not less than the standards set forth in this item;
and provided further, that not later than January 4, 2027, the department of
transitional assistance shall submit a report to house and senate
committees on ways and means that shall include but not be limited to: (A)
the number of participants in the program, including available demographic
information; (B) the average benefit amount, including the methodology for
determining an individual's benefit amount; and (C) the amount of those who
receive benefits under this program that also receive benefits from 7004-
0101, 7004-0108, 7004-9024 and 7004-9316 .................................................. $204,024,252
OFFICE OF HEALTH SERVICES.
Department of Public Health.
4510-0020 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$967,597 in retained revenues collected from fees charged by the food
protection program for costs of said program; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose
of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the
lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported
in the state accounting system ............................................................................... $967,597
4510-0040 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$73,734 from fees assessed under chapter 111N of the General Laws for
the regulation of all pharmaceutical and medical device companies that
market their products in the commonwealth; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose
of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the

Conference Committee Report
lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported
in the state accounting system ................................................................................. $73,734
4510-0100 For the administration and operation of the department of public health,
including the personnel support of programmatic staff within the
department, including the health statistics program, the operation of the
registry of vital records and statistics and the cancer registry established
under section 111B of chapter 111 of the General Laws; provided, that the
department shall give specific consideration to additional monies available
under the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act of 2010, Public Law,
111-148 and the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010,
Public Law 111-152;and provided further, that not less than $650,000 shall
be expended to the city of Boston for contracted clinical support staff
including, but not limited to, three nurse practitioners, one psychiatrist, and
two addiction/mental health specialists ................................................................. $36,026,194
4510-0110 For community health center services; provided, that not less than
$500,000 shall be expended on a statewide program of technical
assistance to community health centers to be provided by a state primary
care association qualified under section 330A(f)(2) of the Public Health
Service Act, as codified at 42 U.S.C. section 254b(l); provided further, that
funds shall be expended for the Massachusetts State Loan Repayment
Program in an amount not less than the amount expended in fiscal year
2026 contingent on the receipt of matching federal funds; provided further,
that not less than $600,000 shall be expended for the Ellie Fund, Inc. to
partner with community health centers to educate providers, patients and
families on the availability of breast cancer support services during the
screening and diagnosis processes in culturally competent manners;
provided further, that not less than $150,000 shall be expended to Harbor
Health Services Inc. to support expanded access at the Plymouth
Community Health Center; provided further, that not less than $100,000
shall be expended to the Public Health Institute of Western Massachusetts
to support the 413Cares centralized database of community services in
western Massachusetts; provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall
be expended to the Lynn Community Health Center for capital and
technology improvements to support enrollment and patient support
services; provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall be expended
to Fenway Health Center the purpose of supporting a Medical Education
and Health Research Fellowship Program; provided further, that not less
than $250,000 shall be expended to NEW Health - Charlestown for the
purpose of operating and maintaining treatment of substance use disorder;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for the
Baystate Brightwood Health Center in the city of Springfield to assist in
neighborhood outreach; provided further, that not less than $400,000 shall
be expended to the North End Waterfront neighborhood health center;
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to Lowell
Community Health Center, Inc. for its primary care residency program for
housing stipends for primary care residents; provided further, that not less
than $125,000 shall be expended to infrastructure and operational
upgrades related to expanding access to dental care and primary care
services at Geiger Gibson Community Health Center in the Dorchester
section of the city of Boston; provided further, that not less than $100,000
shall be expended for the continuation of a comprehensive substance
abuse and narcotic use reduction program at a federally qualified health
center located in South Boston; provided further, that not less than $50,000
shall be expended for Manet Community Health Center Incorporated for the

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
nurse care management program; and provided further, that not less than
$4,000,000 shall be transferred from this item to the Affirming Health Care
Trust Fund established in section 2K of chapter 111 of the General Laws ......... $12,443,222
4510-0112 For the department of public health to fund postpartum depression
programs at community health centers in the cities of Holyoke, Lynn,
Worcester, Fall River and Salem and in the Jamaica Plain section of the
city of Boston; provided, that should a community health center decline
funding, unexpended funds shall be made available to participating
centers or to expand the program to additional centers ........................................ $860,000
4510-0600 For an environmental and community health hazards program, including
control of radiation and nuclear hazards, consumer products protection,
food and drugs, lead poisoning prevention under chapter 482 of the acts
of 1993, lead-based paint inspections in day care facilities, inspection of
radiological facilities, licensing of x-ray technologists, evaluation of
exposure to environmental contaminants and possible links with diseases,
including cancer, potential health impacts of exposure to per- and
polyfluoralkyl substances, indoor air quality inspections in public buildings,
enforcement of the state sanitary code in multiple settings and the
administration of the bureau of climate and environmental health under
chapter 111F of the General Laws; provided, that the department may
expend funds from this item to monitor, survey and inspect nuclear power
reactors, including those now licensed by the Nuclear Regulatory
Commission; and provided further, that not less than $292,035 shall be
expended for the Argeo Paul Cellucci Amyotrophic Lateral Sclerosis
Registry established in section 25A of chapter 111 of the General Laws;
and provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to
Silent Spring Institute, Inc. for the Massachusetts PFAS and Your Health
study to study health effects of per- and polyfluoroalkyl substance
exposure from drinking water contamination in the village of Hyannis in the
town of Barnstable .............................................................................................. $9,458,009
4510-0601 For the department of public health to fund implementation and ongoing
administration of the Parkinson's Disease Registry as established in
section 243 of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as amended by section
225 of chapter 238 of the acts of 2024 .................................................................. $100,000
4510-0615 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$2,300,888 from fees collected from licensing and inspecting users of
radioactive material within the commonwealth under licenses presently
issued by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission; provided, that the retained
revenues may be used for the costs of both programs, including the
compensation of employees; provided further, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating
timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the department may incur expenses and the comptroller
may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state
accounting system; and provided further, that not less than $125,000 may
be expended for the C-10 Research and Education Foundation, Inc. to
provide radiological monitoring in the 6 communities of the commonwealth
that are within the plume exposure emergency planning zone of the
Seabrook nuclear power plant ............................................................................ $2,300,888

Conference Committee Report
4510-0616 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$1,525,556 for a drug registration and monitoring program from retained
revenues collected from fees charged to registered practitioners, including
physicians, dentists, veterinarians, podiatrists and optometrists, for
controlled substance registration; provided, that funds may be expended
from this item for the costs of personnel; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose
of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the
lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported
in the state accounting system ............................................................................ $1,525,556
4510-0710 For the operation of the bureau of health care safety and quality and the
office of patient protection; provided, that services funded through this item
shall include, but not be limited to, education, training, intervention,
support, surveillance and evaluation; provided further, that funds shall be
expended for the advancement of the prescription monitoring program and
the maintenance and enhancement of prescription drug monitoring
information exchange architecture to support interstate prescription drug
monitoring data sharing; provided further, that the bureau shall be
responsible for assuring quality of patient care provided by the
commonwealth’s health care facilities and services and for protecting the
health and safety of patients who receive care and services in nursing
homes, rest homes, clinical laboratories, clinics, institutions for individuals
with intellectual or developmental disabilities and the mentally ill, hospitals
and infirmaries, including the inspection of ambulance services; provided
further, that investigators shall conduct investigations of abuse, neglect,
mistreatment and misappropriation; provided further, that all investigators in
the division of health care quality responsible for the investigations shall
receive training by the Medicaid fraud control unit in the office of the attorney
general; provided further, that not less than $500,000 shall be expended for
South Shore Health to support its efforts to advance health equity and
improve access for underserved communities; provided further, that the
department shall expend not less than $500,000 for the development and
implementation of the mobile integrated health care program; and
provided further, that funds shall be expended for the full registration of
practitioners, physician assistants and registered nurses authorized by the
board of registration in nursing to practice in advanced practice nursing
roles under section 7A of chapter 94C of the General Laws ............................ $18,015,596
4510-0712 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$6,071,402 in retained revenues collected from the licensure of health
facilities and individuals applying for emergency medical technician
licensure and recertification for program costs of the bureau of health care
quality and improvement; provided, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the department may incur expenses and the comptroller
may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state
accounting system .............................................................................................. $6,071,402
4510-0721 For the operation and administration of the boards of registration for health
professions licensure; provided, that funds shall be expended for the
operation and administration of the boards of registration in nursing,

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
pharmacy, dentistry, nursing home administrators, physician assistants,
naturopathy, perfusionists, genetic counselors, community health workers
and respiratory care ............................................................................................ $4,140,620
4510-0723 For the operation and administration of the board of registration in
medicine and the committee on acupuncture ........................................................ $190,234
4510-0724 For the board of registration in medicine, including the physician profiles
program; provided, that the board may expend revenues not to exceed
$300,503 from new revenues associated with increased license and
renewal fees ........................................................................................................... $300,503
4510-0790 For regional emergency medical services; provided, that the regional
emergency medical services councils designated under 105 C.M.R.
170.101 and the central medical emergency direction centers that were in
existence on January 1, 1992 shall remain the designated councils and
central medical emergency direction centers ........................................................ $500,000
4510-0811 For grants to children’s advocacy centers, including those previously
funded through item 4800-0038 in prior fiscal years, and for services for
child victims of sexual abuse and assault; provided, that not less than the
amount allocated by the department of public health for each children’s
advocacy center in fiscal year 2026 shall be expended in fiscal year 2027;
provided further, that the department shall allocate available funding
above the amounts required to maintain not less than the prior fiscal year’s
funding levels for each center among the 12 accredited centers in a
manner to promote equity in the services available to child victims of
sexual abuse, assault and trafficking; provided further, that not less than
$1,050,000 shall be expended for the support of the statewide delivery
system of children’s advocacy centers with funding administered by the
Massachusetts Children’s Alliance, Inc.; and provided further, that not later
than January 29, 2027, the department shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be
limited to: (i) the grants awarded to each center; (ii) the number of
individuals served by each center receiving funding; and (iii)
recommendations on how to improve the availability and delivery of
services through these centers ........................................................................... $5,500,000
4510-3010 For a grant to the Down Syndrome program at the Children’s Medical
Center at the University of Massachusetts medical center based on the
patient-centered medical home concept ................................................................ $150,000
4512-0103 For human immunodeficiency virus and acquired immune deficiency
syndrome, or HIV/AIDS, services, programs and related services for
persons affected by the associated conditions of viral hepatitis, sexually
transmitted infections, tuberculosis and other infections of public health
importance; provided, that funding shall be provided proportionately to
serve each of the demographic groups afflicted by HIV/AIDS and
associated conditions; provided further, that in compliance with the Patient
Protection and Affordable Care Act, Public Law 111-148, the department
of public health shall ensure that vendors delivering HIV/AIDS community
testing and screening shall seek third-party reimbursement for said
services; provided further, that the department shall ensure that at least
the same level of services shall be made available as in the previous fiscal
year; and provided further, that no funds from this item shall be expended
for disease research in fiscal year 2027 ........................................................... $32,000,000

Conference Committee Report
4512-0106 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$65,194,869 for the HIV Drug Assistance Program, or HDAP, from
revenues received from pharmaceutical manufacturers participating in the
section 340B rebate program of the Public Health Service Act, as codified
in 42 U.S.C. section 256b, administered by the Health Resources and
Services Administration and the Office of Pharmacy Affairs; provided, that
such services shall include activities that would be eligible for coverage
through the Ryan White Comprehensive AIDS Resources Emergency Act,
Public Law 101-381, with priority given to the human immunodeficiency
virus and acquired immune deficiency syndrome drug assistance
program; provided further, that any excess rebate revenue collected
beyond the ceiling of this appropriation shall be deposited in the General
Fund; provided further, that services in an amount equivalent to the
amount deposited in the General Fund shall be funded through item 4512-
0103; and provided further, that the department may make expenditures
from the start of each fiscal year from this item in anticipation of receipt of
rebate revenues from pharmaceutical manufacturers ...................................... $65,194,869
4512-0200 For the bureau of substance addiction services, including a program to
reimburse driver alcohol education programs for services provided for
court-adjudicated, indigent clients; provided, that the department of public
health shall ensure that vendors providing methadone treatment shall seek
third-party reimbursement for such services; provided further, that in order
to support and strengthen public access to substance use disorder
services, funds shall be expended to maintain programming including, but
not limited to: (i) centralized intake capacity service under section 18 of
chapter 17 of the General Laws; (ii) the number and type of facilities that
provide treatment; and (iii) detoxification and clinical stabilization service
beds in the public system; provided further, that not less than $10,000,000
shall be expended for low-threshold housing, employing a “Housing First”
model, for homeless individuals with substance use and mental health
disorders at risk of HIV; provided further, that funds shall be expended to
preserve and expand the programs currently funded by the Massachusetts
Access to Recovery, or MA-ATR, program; provided further, that funds
shall be expended to support the operations of recovery centers funded
by the department, including centers that serve gateway municipalities as
defined under section 3A of chapter 23A of the General Laws; provided
further, that funds shall be expended for the extended release of naltrexone
program under section 158 of chapter 46 of the acts of 2015; provided
further, that funds shall be expended for a statewide program to improve
training for the care of newborns with neonatal abstinence syndrome at
hospital-based facilities that care for mothers and newborns, including the
10 level III neonatal intensive care units; provided further, that under
section 236 of chapter 111 of the General Laws, the department shall
enhance data-sharing capabilities and collaborate across agencies to
ensure coordination of services for newborns with neonatal abstinence
syndrome; provided further, that funds shall be expended to support
municipalities utilizing grant funds from the Massachusetts Opioid Abuse
Prevention Collaborative (MOAPC) grant program; provided further, that
funds shall be expended for a voluntary training and accreditation program
for owners and operators of alcohol and drug-free housing under section
18A of said chapter 17; provided further, that funds shall be expended on
MassAbility through an interagency service agreement with the bureau to
support workforce development; provided further, that funds shall be
expended for outpatient and mobile services for deaf/hard of hearing, and

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
deaf/hard of hearing/blind individuals with substance use disorders;
provided further, that funds shall be expended for the bureau to address the
addiction treatment workforce crisis through outreach and recruitment
efforts at local and regional educational institutions and vocational-technical
high schools; provided further, that not less than $460,000 shall be
expended to the Boston Public Health Commission for an additional 30
Transitional Support Services (TSS) and Clinical Stabilization Services
(CSS) beds for up to 60 days to cover shortages; provided further, that 20
of said beds shall be for women and 10 of said beds for men; provided
further, that funds shall be expended for substance use disorder step-down
recovery services, known as level-B beds and services, and other critical
recovery services with severely reduced capacity; provided further, that said
funds shall be expended in the AA object class; provided further, that funds
shall be expended for jail diversion programs primarily for nonviolent
offenders with opioid or opiate addiction to be procured by the department
of public health; provided further, that each jail diversion program shall have
not fewer than 60 beds and shall provide clinical assessment services to the
respective courts, inpatient treatment for not more than 90 days and ongoing
case management services for not more than 1 year; provided further, that
individuals may be diverted to this or other programs by a district attorney in
conjunction with the commissioner of probation if: (a) there is reason to
believe that the individual being diverted suffers from an addiction to opiates
or another substance use disorder; and (b) the diversion of the individual is
clinically appropriate and consistent with established clinical and public
safety criteria; provided further, that programs shall be established in
separate counties in locations deemed suitable by the department of public
health; provided further, that the department shall coordinate operations
with the sheriffs, the district attorneys, the commissioner of probation and
the department of correction; provided further, that funds shall be used to
support the ongoing treatment needs of clients after 90 days for which there
is no other payer; provided further that not less than $35,000 shall be
expended to the city of Lynn for the Lynn police department’s behavioral
health unit; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
to Community Servings for the purposes of providing medically tailored
meals to persons battling chronic illnesses and workforce training
programs to those recovering from addiction; provided further, that not less
than $25,000 shall be expended to the Merrimack Valley Prevention and
Substance Abuse Project, Inc., for resources, community outreach and
programs in the Merrimack Valley; provided further, that not less than
$200,000 shall be expended to the operation of The Dimock Center’s
Behavioral Health continuum of care to provide comprehensive treatment
for individuals suffering from substance use disorder and other behavioral
health challenges, address workforce challenges and reduce barriers to
care; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to
the operation of the Gavin Foundation’s behavioral health continuum of
substance use care to provide comprehensive treatment for individuals
suffering from substance use disorder and other behavioral health
challenges; provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall be
expended to the Joseph Nee Collaborative Center for substance use
disorder programming; provided further, that funds shall be expended for
family intervention and care management services programs, a young adult
treatment program and early intervention services for individuals who are
dependent on or addicted to alcohol, controlled substances or both alcohol
and controlled substances; provided further, that funds shall be expended
for supportive case management services; provided further, that funds
shall be expended to increase the number of residential rehabilitation

Conference Committee Report
services, with priority given to families, youth, transitional age youth and
young adults; provided further, that funds shall be expended for the bureau
to provide technical assistance and training to increase the number of
providers and to support existing providers delivering culturally, ethnically
and linguistically diverse services in communities of color; provided
further, that funds shall be expended for a program to support
multidisciplinary, team-based substance use services for adults with
severe and persistent substance use disorder; provided further, that the
program shall: (a) include a team-based approach to service delivery that
tailors services to the specific needs and acuity of each individual; (b)
provide substance use and social services through a person-centered
approach; and (c) not limit program services to a specific physical location;
provided further, that funds shall be expended to procure additional family
supportive housing programs across the commonwealth; provided further,
that funds shall be expended to address the addiction treatment workforce
crisis through outreach and recruitment efforts and support to complete
trainings and continuing education curriculum; provided further, that not
less than $1,500,000 shall be expended to expand and develop the state’s
licensed alcohol and drug counselor workforce; provided further, that not
less than $1,000,000 shall be expended for the purchase and distribution
of naloxone; provided further, that not less than $125,000 shall be
expended for a pilot program of public health-informed substance use
disorder treatment services for individuals under supervision of the parole
board, to be administered in consultation with the executive office of public
safety and security; provided further, that the bureau shall contract with a
community-based behavioral health provider to oversee and
operationalize the pilot program; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended for The Serenity House, Inc.; provided further,
that not less than $250,000 shall be expended to Boston Health Care for
the Homeless Program, Inc. in the South End and Roxbury sections of the
city of Boston for direct care workers providing health care treatment
services for individuals and families experiencing homelessness and
mental health and substance use disorders in and around the intersection
of Massachusetts avenue and Melnea Cass boulevard and the
surrounding impact areas; provided further, that not less than $250,000
shall be expended to the Boston Medical Center Corporation in the South
End section of the city of Boston for direct care workers providing health
care treatment services for those experiencing mental health and
substance use disorders in and around the intersection of Massachusetts
avenue and Melnea Cass boulevard and the surrounding impact areas;
and provided further, that funds may be expended to implement the
recommendations of the South End/Roxbury/Newmarket Working Group
on Addiction and Recovery to address the public health and safety crisis
at the intersection of Massachusetts avenue and Melnea Cass boulevard
and the surrounding impact areas in collaboration with the city of Boston ..... $187,880,689
Marijuana Regulation Fund ................................... 83.97%
General Fund ........................................................ 16.03%
4512-0204 For the purchase, administration and training of first-responder and
bystander naloxone distribution programs; provided, that funds shall be
expended to maintain funding for first responder naloxone grants and
bystander distribution in communities with high incidence of overdose;
provided further, that the commissioner of public health may transfer funds
between this item and item 4512-0200 as necessary under an allocation
plan which shall detail the distribution of the funds to be transferred;

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
provided further, that not less than 30 days prior to any such transfer, the
commissioner shall submit the allocation plan to the house and senate
committees on ways and means; and provided further, that not later than
October 1, 2026, the department of public health shall submit a report to
the house and senate committees on ways and means on the: (i)
communities included in the program expansion; (ii) number of participants
for each community; and (iii) amount of naloxone purchased and
distributed, delineated by community .................................................................. $1,298,718
4512-0205 For grants and contracts with substance use programs to provide
comprehensive prevention, intervention and recovery services; provided,
that not less than $25,000 shall be expended for UHAI for Health Inc. to
support its opioid overdose work in the community; provided further, that
not less than $300,000 shall be expended to for Office-Based
Addiction/Opioid Treatment, a program of the Greater New Bedford
Community Health Center; provided further, that not less than $125,000
shall be expended to the city of Lynn for mental health and substance use
disorder services; provided further, that not less than $175,000 shall be
expended to Self Esteem Boston for direct service and provider training
programs; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
to the Latin American Health Alliance of Central Massachusetts, Inc. for
capital expenses to support substance use recovery programming for
communities disproportionately affected by health disparities in central
Massachusetts; provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall be
expended to One Life at a Time, Inc., located in the city known as the town
of Braintree, for the facilitation of access to sober living programs and job
training services for people in recovery and associated operational costs;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the city
known as the town of Braintree for the Braintree Community Partnership
on Substance Use; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be
expended to Harbor Health Services, Inc. for a grant program to prevent
and treat addiction to opioid and related substances; provided further, that
not less than $250,000 shall be expended to Walker, Inc. for behavioral
health and wellness services for incarcerated and post-release individuals
with children in the counties of Suffolk and Norfolk to promote successful
child development, community reintegration and reduced recidivism and
for the expansion of similar services for at-risk and court-involved youth in
the counties of Suffolk and Norfolk to promote mental health, academic
success and reduced involvement in the criminal justice system; provided
further, that not less than $475,000 shall be expended for the
RecoveryWorks program at Massachusetts General Hospital to: (i)
provide participant mentorship, career coaching, recovery- and career-
oriented skills training groups and assistance with removing barriers to
enter the workforce throughout the 5-year duration of the program; and (ii)
partner with employers and organizations on education and anti-stigma
efforts; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to
Baystate Noble Hospital Corporation in the city of Westfield for a grant
program to prevent and treat addiction to opioids and related substances;
provided further, that not less than $2,000,000 shall be expended to RIZE
Massachusetts Foundation, Inc. to assist in their work to end the opioid
epidemic in the commonwealth; provided further, that not less than
$45,000 shall be expended in equal amounts to the following substance
abuse coalitions and community partnerships: (i) Canton Alliance Against
Substance Abuse; (ii) Sharon Substance Prevention and Resource
Coalition; and (iii) Norton Opioid Prevention and Education Collaborative
N.O.P.E.; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended

Conference Committee Report
to the purposes of the operation of Resources for Recovery Inc. located in
the Hyde Park section of the city of Boston; and provided further, that not
less than $100,000 shall be expended to continued capital improvements
to the Cambridge Community Center and for the expansion of their
community-based behavioral health program ..................................................... $4,120,000
4512-0206 For the department of public health to coordinate a comprehensive
statewide strategy, in partnership with municipalities, public health harm
reduction organizations and other stakeholders, to promote existing
commonwealth harm reduction efforts, to foster a culture of harm reduction
and to promote community-based harm reduction services as
recommended by the harm reduction commission established under
section 100 of chapter 208 of the acts of 2018 and to prioritize the health,
safety and dignity of individuals who use substances as recommended by
the commission on methamphetamine and other stimulant use in the
commonwealth established in section 131 of chapter 24 of the acts of
2021; provided, that not less $1,500,000 shall be made available to
increase the availability of sterile and safe consumption equipment and
syringe disposal services; provided further, that not less than $150,000
shall be expended for a program to provide access to fentanyl testing
strips or other drug checking equipment; provided further, that funds shall
be expended to promote programming to advance the creation of new
supportive places for treatment and related observation that offer medical
monitoring, nasal naloxone rescue kit distribution, counseling and
connection to primary care, behavioral health and addiction treatment
services; and provided further, that not later than March 2, 2027, the
department shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means detailing the status of implementing each program
funded in this item ............................................................................................... $6,478,000
4512-0225 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$500,000 for a compulsive gamblers’ treatment program from unclaimed
prize money held in the State Lottery and Gaming Fund established in
section 35 of chapter 10 of the General Laws for more than 1 year from
the date of the drawing when the unclaimed prize money was won and
from the proceeds of a multi-jurisdictional lottery game under subsection
(e) of section 24A of said chapter 10; provided, that the comptroller shall
transfer the amount to the General Fund; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose
of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the
lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported
in the state accounting system ............................................................................... $500,000
4512-2020 For a matching grant program to be administered by the department of
public health to support municipal public safety reform; provided that funds
shall be made available to municipalities pursuing public safety reforms
and alternative investments to promote equitable public safety and public
health outcomes; provided further, that eligible reforms and investments
shall include, but not be limited to: (i) utilizing jail diversion programs,
including restoration centers; (ii) hiring de-escalation specialists or
implementing de-escalation training; (iii) hiring behavioral health
specialists or utilizing other behavioral health supports; (iv) training in
evidence-based or evidence-informed mental health and substance use
crisis response or alternative emergency response; and (v) hiring or

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
contracting alternative emergency response professionals; provided
further, that preference in awarding matching grants shall be given to
municipalities posing alternative emergency responses conducted by
unarmed community-based human service or behavioral or mental health
providers who shall be unaccompanied by law enforcement but who may
call on law enforcement as needed; provided further, that municipalities
receiving matching grants shall demonstrate a measurable benefit to the
public health for the residents of the municipality, based on criteria
established by the department, and that the municipality is pursuing new
practices or reforms, or expansion of prior successful practices, that
support criteria established by the department; provided further, that prior
to receiving matching grants, municipalities shall provide a comprehensive
implementation plan to the department of proposed public safety reforms
and investments; provided further, that the department shall give priority
to applications that propose to invest a majority of grant funds with
community-based human service, substance use disorder treatment,
behavioral health or mental health providers; and provided further, that not
later than March 2, 2027, the department shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be
limited to: (a) a list of all municipalities that received matching funds; (b)
the amount of matching funds awarded to each municipality; and (c) a
description of the reforms and investments implemented in each
municipality awarded matching funds, prior appropriation continued ................. $1,000,000
4512-2022 For grants to local and regional boards of health; provided, that funds shall
be expended to support the state action for public health excellence
program established in section 27D of chapter 111 of the General Laws;
provided further, that the department of public health shall prioritize a
geographically equitable distribution; provided further, that funds shall be
expended for a statewide data collection and reporting system,
implementation of intermunicipal shared service agreements and capacity
building for local and regional boards of health; provided further, that not
less than $50,000 shall be expended to the town of Plymouth’s office of
health and human services for the planning and implementation of an
equity survey, and to develop and implement trainings; and provided
further, that not later than February 3, 2027, the department shall submit
a report to the house and senate committees on ways and means detailing
the: (i) grant recipients, their locations and amount per recipient; and (ii)
dates that funds were released to said recipients ........................................ ….$13,050,000
4513-0999 For a public information campaign to educate and promote awareness to
pharmacies and the public about an individual’s eligibility to receive a 12-
month prescription for contraceptives in the commonwealth; provided, that
information shall include availability of a 12-month supply of
contraceptives; and provided further, that the commissioner of public
health shall partner with insurers, pharmacies, relevant advocacy
organizations and employers to ensure the campaign reaches
pharmacists, clinicians and individuals eligible to receive a 12-month
prescription for contraceptives in the commonwealth ............................................. $500,000
4513-1001 For grants to support improvements in reproductive health access,
infrastructure and security, including grants to: (i) Tides for Reproductive
Freedom, Incorporated; (ii) Abortion Rights Fund of Western
Massachusetts, Incorporated; and (iii) Eastern Massachusetts Abortion
Fund, Incorporated; provided, that not later than March 2, 2027, the
department of public health shall submit a report to the house and senate

Conference Committee Report
committees on ways and means detailing: (a) the grant distribution
methodology; (b) a list of grant applicants; and (c) a list of successful grant
applicants, including the amounts awarded and the projects being
supported by the grants ..................................................................................... .$1,980,000
4513-1002 For women, infants and children, or WIC, nutrition services in addition to
funds received under the federal nutrition program administered by the
United States Department of Agriculture’s Food and Nutrition
Administration; provided, that funds from this item shall supplement
federal funds to enable federally-eligible women, infants and children to
be served through the WIC program ................................................................. $15,500,388
4513-1005 For the provision of family and adolescent health services, including, but
not limited to, comprehensive sexual and reproductive health services, the
birth defects monitoring program and adolescent sexuality education;
provided, that not less than $13,812,418 shall be expended for family
health services; provided further, that not less than $11,207,164 of said
funds shall be expended for comprehensive family planning services,
including HIV counseling and testing, community-based health education
and outreach services provided by comprehensive family planning
agencies; provided further, that not less than $6,700,000 shall be expended
for enhancing comprehensive family planning services currently funded or
previously funded by Title X Family Planning funding due to federal
restrictions; provided further, that funds may be expended for the
program’s critical congenital heart defects screening activities; provided
further, that funds may be expended for the birth defects monitoring
program; provided further, that not less than $1,700,000 shall be
expended to Action for Boston Community Development, Inc. to continue
services previously funded by Title X funding; provided further, that funds
shall be expended for teenage pregnancy prevention services; provided
further, that applications for pregnancy prevention funds shall be
administered through the department of public health upon receipt and
approval of coordinated community service plans to be evaluated under
the guidelines issued by the department; provided further, that portions of
the grants may be used for state agency purchases of designated services
identified by the community service plans; provided further, that funding
shall be expended on those communities with the highest teen birth rates
according to an annual statistical estimate conducted by the department;
provided further, that funds shall be expended on programming directed
at children under the care of the department of children and families who
are at high risk for teenage pregnancy; provided further, that the
department shall collaborate with the department of children and families
on said programming; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall
be expended for a reproductive health care training grant program to be
administered by the department of public health for hospitals in the
commonwealth to provide out-of-state medical residents with reproductive
health care training consistent with residency programs in the
commonwealth, including, but not limited to, abortion care training if they
cannot receive such training in the state where they are employed as a
medical resident due to abortion restriction laws in place in such state;
provided further, that grants shall be issued to hospitals in the
commonwealth that provide abortion care training to medical residents;
provided further, that each hospital grant recipient shall create and
implement an application process for medical residents from states with
abortion restriction laws, which prevent the out-of-state medical resident
from receiving reproductive health care training, including abortion care

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
training, in the state where they are employed as a medical resident;
provided further, that notwithstanding section 9A of chapter 112 of the
General Laws, a medical student who has creditably completed not less
than 2 years of study in a legally-chartered medical school may practice
medicine in a licensed health care facility in the commonwealth where
reproductive health care may be lawfully provided under the supervision
of a health care provider licensed in the commonwealth who, acting within
the scope of that license, may provide such reproductive health care; and
provided further, that not later than April 1, 2027, the department of public
health shall collect data and submit a report to the joint committee on
public health, the joint committee on health care financing, the house and
senate committees on ways and means and the clerks of the house and
senate that shall include, but not be limited to, (i) the number of applicants
to each grant recipient program; (ii) the number of applicants accepted into
each program; and (iii) at least 1 program description for a hospital
providing training funded by the grant; and provided further, that not less
than $150,000 shall be expended for the menstrual equity program in the
Massachusetts Chapter of the National Organization for Women to sustain
and expand its menstrual equity program ......................................................... $27,116,673
4513-1012 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$29,200,000 from retained revenues received from federal cost-
containment initiatives, including, but not limited to, infant formula rebates;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary,
for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the
receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the department
may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts
not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system ........................................ $29,200,000
4513-1020 For the early intervention program; provided, that not later than February
2, 2027, the department of public health shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means detailing: (i) the number of
families served by the program; (ii) the amount of funds appropriated in
this item granted to qualified families; and (iii) the total number of units of
service purchased and the total expenditures for the units of service paid
by the department, the executive office of health and human services and
third-party payers for early intervention services for the following service
categories: (a) home visit; (b) center-based individual; (c) child-focused
group; (d) parent-focused group; and (e) screening and assessment;
provided further, that the department shall make all reasonable efforts to
secure third-party and Medicaid reimbursements for the services funded
in this item; provided further, that funds from this item shall be expended
to provide respite services to families of children enrolled in early
intervention programs who have complex care requirements, multiple
disabilities and extensive medical and health needs; provided further, that
priority shall be given to low-income and moderate-income families;
provided further, that no claim for reimbursement made on behalf of an
uninsured person shall be paid from this item until the program receives
notice of a denial of eligibility for the MassHealth program from the
executive office of health and human services; provided further, that
MassHealth shall cover the costs incurred for the transportation of
MassHealth members who participate in the early intervention program;
provided further, that nothing in this item shall give rise to, or shall be
construed as giving rise to, enforceable legal rights to any such services
or an enforceable entitlement to the early intervention services funded in

Conference Committee Report
this item; provided further, that not less than 180 days prior to any change
to current eligibility criteria, the department shall provide written notification
to the house and senate committees on ways and means; provided further,
that no eligibility changes shall be made before April 1, 2027; provided
further, that funds in this item may be used to pay for current and prior
year claims; provided further, that the department shall provide services to
eligible children through 1 service delivery model and shall not determine
eligibility for services based on family insurance status; and provided
further, that funds from this item shall be expended for interpretation
services and translation supports to meet the linguistic and cultural needs
of children and families enrolled in early intervention programs ....................... $38,269,649
4513-1026 For the provision of statewide and community-based suicide prevention,
intervention, post-intervention and surveillance activities and the
implementation of a statewide suicide prevention plan; provided, that
funds shall be expended for a program to address elder suicide behavior
and attempts with the geriatric mental health services program within the
executive office of aging and independence; provided further, that not less
than $30,000 shall be expended to Sharing Kindness, Inc. to support
implementation of the Hope Squad peer-to-peer suicide prevention
program in schools; and provided further, that funds shall be expended for
a veterans-in-crisis hotline to be used by veterans or concerned family
members seeking counseling programs operated by the executive office
of veterans’ services so that they may be directed towards the programs
and services offered by their local or regional veterans’ services office to
be staffed by counselors or outreach program personnel contracted by the
department and trained in issues of mental health counseling and
veterans’ services ............................................................................................. $14,423,198
4513-1027 For The Samaritans, Inc.; provided, that funds shall be used for suicide
prevention services including, but not limited to, the operation and
expansion of Hey Sam, the text-based mental health support line tailored
specifically to youth and young adults, and for youth mental health
community education, outreach and communications ........................................ $1,800,000
4513-1098 For the provision of statewide support services for survivors of homicide
victims, including outreach services, burial assistance, grief counseling
and other support services; provided, that funds shall be expended as
grants in the aggregate amount of not less than $200,000 to the Louis D.
Brown Peace Institute Corporation, a community-based support
organization dedicated to serving families and communities impacted by
violence; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended
to Survivors Say, Inc. for direct support services to survivors and victims
of both high-profile tragedies and other traumas and crimes; provided
further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to the Darrell Lee
Jenkins Jr. Resource Center, Inc. in the city of Springfield; and provided
further, that the Louis D. Brown Peace Institute Corporation shall establish
and administer a process to distribute not less than $100,000 to the
Massachusetts Survivors of Homicide Victims Network organizations
throughout the commonwealth in the form of grants ................................................. $610,000
4513-1112 For the prevention and management of chronic diseases and their
associated risk factors, including, but not limited to, the Massachusetts
Tobacco Cessation and Prevention Program and oral health services and
programs; provided, that funds shall be provided for dental health services;
provided further, that funds shall be expended for the comprehensive

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
dental program for adults with developmental disabilities; provided further,
that funds shall be expended for the promotion of health and disease
prevention including, but not limited to: (i) breast cancer prevention; (ii)
diabetes screening and outreach; (iii) ovarian cancer screening; (iv)
hepatitis C prevention and management; (v) multiple sclerosis screening,
information, education and treatment programs and the Multiple Sclerosis
Home Living Independently Navigating Key Services program administered
by the Greater New England Chapter of the National Multiple Sclerosis
Society; (vi) colorectal cancer prevention; (vii) prostate cancer screening,
education and treatment with a particular focus on individuals with African-
American, Hispanic or Latino heritage, family history of the disease and
other individuals at high risk; (viii) osteoporosis education; and (ix)
maintenance of the statewide lupus database; provided further, that funds
shall be expended for Mass in Motion community grants in an amount not
less than the amount expended in fiscal year 2026, contingent upon
receipt of matching federal prevention block grant funds; provided further,
that not less than $250,000 shall be expended for a grant to a statewide
Alzheimer’s disease advocacy and education organization for a public
awareness and education campaign as recommended by the federal
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention; provided further, that not less
than $6,752,977 shall be expended for smoking prevention and cessation
programs, including youth tobacco use prevention and cessation
programs at the Massachusetts Tobacco Cessation and Prevention
Program; provided further, that not less than $475,000 shall be expended
to the Forsyth Institute’s Center for Children’s Oral Health to expand its
Forsyth Kids programming focused on children and adolescents and to
explore the emerging association between oral health status and
academic performance; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall
be expended for the operation of the Cranberry Health Research Center
at the University of Massachusetts at Dartmouth; provided further, that not
less than $250,000 shall be expended to Amyotrophic Lateral Sclerosis
Association, Massachusetts Chapter, Inc. to provide care services for
individuals suffering with amyotrophic lateral sclerosis; provided further,
that not less than $55,000 shall be expended to Blue Bridge Inc. to expand
access to clinical trials and advance health equity through community
engagement, patient navigation, outreach and education initiatives;
provided further, that not less than $5,000 shall be expended to Visiting
Dental Hygiene, Inc. in the town of Hingham to provide quality dental care
in patients’ homes; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be
expended for the Joe Andruzzi Foundation Inc. in the city known as the
town of North Attleborough to provide assistance to patients and their
families experiencing emotional and financial hardships due to cancer
diagnosis; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
to the purposes of the operation of VITfriends LLC located in the Hyde
Park section of the city of Boston; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the town of Winthrop for a resource
navigation and coordinator position in the Winthrop department of public
health and clinical services; and provided further, that not less than
$250,000 shall be expended to the Duchenne Program at the University
of Massachusetts medical school to advance clinical care, research and
innovation for patients with complex disorders affecting the human
nervous system ................................................................................................ .$14,002,134
4513-1121 For a statewide STOP stroke program; provided further, that funds from
this item shall be expended to provide educational programming as part
of the Act F.A.S.T. campaign to recognize the signs and symptoms of

Conference Committee Report
stroke and it’s warning signs with a focus on communities that have the
highest incidence of stroke; provided further, that no funds awarded to the
Act F.A.S.T. campaign shall be used for personnel costs; provided further,
that the department shall provide quality improvement measures that align
with the stroke consensus metrics by utilizing a nationally-recognized data
set platform and expand the statewide registry that compiles information
and statistics on stroke care using confidentiality standards that shall not
be less secure than a nationally-recognized data set platform, including
the stroke registry data platform; provided further, funds shall be expended
to require all stroke service hospitals and emergency medical services
agencies to report data consistent with nationally-recognized guidelines
on the treatment of individuals with confirmed stroke; provided further, that
funds shall be expended to oversee the operation and administration of
designated stroke service hospital programs pursuant to 105 CMR
130.1401 to 105 CMR 130.1408; provided further, that funds shall be used
to collect and analyze data from designated stroke service hospitals in the
commonwealth and for the salary of a full-time surveyor who shall be
primarily responsible for ensuring compliance with the stroke service
designation criteria; and provided further, that not later than December 31,
2026, the department shall submit a report to the senate committee on
post audit and oversight and the senate and house committees on ways
and means detailing: (i) expenditures from this item; (ii) the number of
persons reached by the campaign under this item; (iii) the methods and
strategies implemented to reach said persons; and (iv) activities carried
out by the department pursuant to this item .......................................................... $500,000
4513-1136 For sexual assault and domestic violence services; provided, that not less
than $8,937,298 shall be expended for a statewide sexual assault nurse
examiner program and pediatric sexual assault nurse examiner program
for the care of victims of sexual assault; provided further, that the program
shall operate under specific statewide protocols and by an on-call system
of nurse examiners; provided further, that funds shall be expended for
domestic violence and sexual assault prevention and survivor services
including, but not limited to: (i) intimate partner abuse education, formerly
known as the batterers intervention services; (ii) services for immigrants
and refugees; (iii) rape crisis center survivor services and prevention
information; and (iv) intervention services and crisis housing for sexual
violence and intimate partner violence in the lesbian, gay, bisexual,
transgender, queer and questioning communities; provided further, that
funds shall be expended for rape prevention and victim services, including
the statewide Spanish language hotline, community-based domestic
violence response, emergency and transitional residential services for
sexual assault and domestic violence victims and their children and
supervised visitation and trauma services for children who witness
violence and targeted services for department of children and families-
involved families; provided further, that the department of public health
shall ensure that there shall not be a disruption in survivor services and
violence prevention activities or a negative impact on program functioning
during fiscal year 2027; provided further, that not less than $1,000,000
shall be expended for a domestic violence and sexual assault prevention
program focused on teens in high-risk communities; provided further, that
said programming shall be aimed at promoting healthy relationships and
addressing teen dating violence for teens of all sexualities and genders;
provided further, that the department shall partner with domestic violence
and sexual assault service providers and other community-based or
school-based organizations to develop evidence-based and outcome-

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
focused prevention strategies; provided further, that the program shall
prioritize funding for schools and communities in which the majority of
students are eligible for free or reduced lunch; provided further, that at
least 1 program shall operate in a municipality with a population of not
more than 25,000; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be
expended to RIA, Inc. for the survivor-directed housing program and peer
mentorship; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
to the Center for Women and Community at the University of
Massachusetts at Amherst to support community services; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Cape Verdean
Association, Inc. for domestic violence outreach in the city of Brockton;
and provided further, that said funds may be expended for a competitive
grant program .................................................................................................... $84,057,342
4513-2020 For funding to increase behavioral health outreach, access and support;
provided, that the department of public health, in consultation with the
department of mental health and the department of elementary and
secondary education, shall expend not less than $3,782,000 for a program
to increase student access to behavioral telehealth services in schools;
provided further, that not later than June 30, 2027, the department of
public health shall submit a report to the joint committee on mental health,
substance use and recovery and the house and senate committees on
ways and means detailing the: (i) number of students participating in the
program; (ii) frequency with which students use the program; (iii) cost of
the services provided, including the use of support staff; and (iv) manner
in which costs have been supported by third-party reimbursement;
provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be expended by the
department for a public awareness campaign to promote the awareness
and availability of behavioral health services; provided further, that the
public awareness campaign shall partner with relevant advocacy
organizations, employers, institutions of higher education and community-
based organizations to ensure that the campaign reaches the populations
that are most at risk of encountering existing barriers to behavioral health
services; provided further, that not less than $500,000 shall be expended
for a pipeline program to establish a culturally, ethnically and linguistically
diverse mental health worker pipeline between acute care hospitals and
freestanding psychiatric facilities and local colleges; provided further, that
the department shall designate the Massachusetts Health and Hospital
Association, Inc. to administer the program; provided further, that the
department shall report to the clerks of the house of representatives and
the senate, the joint committee on higher education, the joint committee
on mental health, substance use and recovery and the house and senate
committees on ways and means detailing: (a) description of the partners
in the program; (b) a demographic and geographic profile of the students
served in the program; (c) a summary of post-program employment or
continuing education of participating students; and (d) any budgetary
recommendations on ways to further expand the program; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Greater Lowell
Community Foundation, Inc. to fund local non-profit organizations and
social services agencies in the 16th Middlesex district; provided further,
that not less than $5,000,000 shall be expended to community health
centers to support the allied health workforce; provided further, that for the
purpose of this item, a community health center shall be defined as any
entity receiving funding pursuant to 42 U.S.C. section 254(b); provided
further, that funds shall be used for workforce supports including, but not
limited to, loan repayment, workforce development programs, pipeline

Conference Committee Report
initiatives and retention payments; provided further, that workforce
supports shall prioritize the recruitment and retention of a culturally and
linguistically diverse workforce; and provided further, that payments shall
be allocated to community health centers based on financial need ................. $10,334,773
4516-0263 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$1,296,253 in retained revenues from blood lead testing fees collected
from insurers and individuals for the purpose of conducting such tests;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary,
for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the
receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the department
may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts
not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system .......................................... $1,296,253
4516-1000 For the operation of the bureau of infectious disease and laboratory
sciences, including infectious disease surveillance and the state public
health laboratory; provided, that funds shall be expended for an eastern
equine encephalitis testing program and for tuberculosis testing and
treatment services; provided further, that the department of public health
shall ensure that vendors delivering tuberculosis clinical services and
treatment shall seek third-party reimbursement for such services; provided
further, that no funds appropriated in this item shall be expended for
administrative, space or energy expenses of the department that are not
directly related to personnel or programs funded in this item; provided
further, that not less than $2,657,020 shall be expended for the operation
of the universal immunization program; provided further, that all costs
related to childhood vaccines shall be paid for through the Vaccine
Purchase Trust Fund established in section 24N of chapter 111 of the
General Laws; and provided further, that not later than September 16,
2026, the department shall submit a report to the joint committee on public
health and the house and senate committees on ways and means
detailing: (i) the current departmental recommendations for the
commonwealth's vaccine distribution plan, including the role of local
boards of health; (ii) the current state of implementing the plan; (iii) any
anticipated state investments necessary to carry out the plan; and (iv) the
department's plan to improve vaccine distribution coordination efforts with
local boards of health ........................................................................................ $28,903,456
4516-1005 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$1,097,107 generated by fees collected from providers or insurers for
sexually-transmitted infections testing performed at the state public health
laboratory; provided, that collected retained revenues may be used to
supplement the costs of the laboratory; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose
of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the
lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported
in the state accounting system ............................................................................ $1,097,107
4516-1010 For state matching funds required by the federal Pandemic and All-
Hazards Preparedness Act, Public Law 109-417 ............................................... $1,518,847
4516-1022 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$364,592 generated by fees collected from insurers and providers for

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
tuberculosis tests performed at the state public health laboratory;
provided, that collected retained revenues may be used to supplement the
costs of the laboratory; and provided further, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating
timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the department may incur expenses and the comptroller
may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state
accounting system ................................................................................................. $364,592
4516-1037 For the department of public health, which may expend for the
implementation of chapter 111O of the General Laws and rules and
regulations promulgated thereunder not more than $49,569 in retained
revenues collected from application fees for approval of mobile integrated
health care programs and renewals thereof and from fines and penalties
imposed by the department on mobile integrated health care programs;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary,
for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the
receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the department
may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts
not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system ............................................... $49,569
4516-1039 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$500,424 in retained revenues collected from application fees under
section 25C of chapter 111 of the General Laws to support the operations
of the determination of need program and health care facility plan review
within the department; provided, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the department may incur expenses and the comptroller
may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state
accounting system ................................................................................................. $500,424
4518-0200 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$2,411,409 generated by fees collected from services provided at the
registry of vital records and statistics, including: (i) amendments of vital
records and requests for vital records not issued in person at the registry;
(ii) requests for heirloom certificates; and (iii) research requests performed
by registry staff at the registry; provided, that collected retained revenues
may be used for all program costs, including the compensation of
employees; provided further, that the registrar of vital records and statistics
shall exempt any person requesting a verification of birth to establish
eligibility for Medicaid from the payment of a fee; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose
of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the
lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported
in the state accounting system ............................................................................ $2,411,409
4590-0250 For school health services and school-based health centers in public and
nonpublic schools; provided, that not less than $3,000,000 shall be
expended for mental health services in public and nonpublic schools;
provided further, that funds shall be distributed to public and nonpublic

Conference Committee Report
schools based on the percentage of students in the commonwealth
enrolled in each school; provided further, that services shall include, but not
be limited to: (i) strengthening the infrastructure of school health services in
the areas of personnel and policy development, programming and
interdisciplinary collaboration; (ii) developing linkages between school
health services programs and community health providers; (iii) incorporating
health education programs, including tobacco prevention and cessation
activities, in school curricula and in the provision of school-based health
services; and (iv) incorporating obesity prevention programs, including
nutrition and wellness programs, in school curricula, to address the nutrition
and lifestyle habits needed for healthy development; provided further, that
funds shall be expended for school nurses and school-based health center
programs; provided further, that funds may be expended to pay for nurse
salaries for more than 3 school years; provided further, that funds may be
expended to address the recommendations of the commission on lesbian,
gay, bisexual, transgender, queer and questioning youth established in
section 67 of chapter 3 of the General Laws for the reduction of health
disparities for gay, lesbian, bisexual, transgender, queer and questioning
youth; provided further, that not less than $500,000 shall be expended to
enhance the commonwealth's capacity to support the development of
school-based bridge programs for youth who have had prolonged school
absence due to hospitalization for physical or mental health care; provided
further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended to assist in
programming efforts for the Southcoast LGBTQ Network, Inc. in the city of
New Bedford; and provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the North Quabbin Community Coalition, Inc............................... $22,575,010
4590-0912 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$35,164,866 from reimbursements collected for Western Massachusetts
hospital services, subject to the approval of the commissioner of public
health; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, the Western Massachusetts hospital shall be eligible to receive
and retain full payment under the medical assistance program
administered by the executive office of health and human services under
chapter 118E of the General Laws for all goods and services provided by
the hospital under federal requirements; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose
of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the
lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported
in the state accounting system .......................................................................... $35,164,866
4590-0913 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$1,578,230 for payments received for those services provided by the
Lemuel Shattuck hospital to incarcerated persons from county correctional
facilities; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between
the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the department
may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts
not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system .......................................... $1,578,230
4590-0915 For the maintenance and operation of Tewksbury hospital, Pappas
Rehabilitation Hospital for Children, Lemuel Shattuck hospital and the
hospital bureau, including the state office of pharmacy services; provided,

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
that reimbursements received for medical services provided at the Lemuel
Shattuck hospital to incarcerated persons from houses of correction not
managed by private health care vendors shall be credited to item 4590-
0903 of section 2B; provided further, that Tewksbury hospital shall
maintain the same number of beds in fiscal year 2027 as it maintained in
fiscal year 2026; provided further, that the department of public health shall
expend not less than $600,000 to municipalities hosting a department of
public health facility that also acts as a department of mental health
continuing care facility and which does not also operate as a department
of correction facility; provided further, that said funds shall not be
expended to a municipality if the department of public health facility also
operates as a department of correction facility; and provided further, that
the department shall seek to obtain federal financial participation for care
provided to incarcerated persons of the department of correction and county
correctional facilities who are treated at the public health hospitals ................. $251,388,736
4590-0917 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$5,283,806 from payments received from the vendor managing health
services for state correctional facilities for incarcerated persons receiving
medical services provided by the Lemuel Shattuck hospital; provided, that
the payments may include capitation payments, fee-for-service payments,
advance payments and other compensation arrangements established by
contract between the vendor and the hospital; and provided further, that,
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose
of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the
lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported
in the state accounting system ............................................................................ $5,283,806
4590-0918 For the state office of pharmacy services, which may expend not more
than $43,065,614 from retained revenues collected from vendors
providing health care services to the department of correction; provided,
that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the
purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of
retained revenues and related expenditures, the department of public
health may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment
amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent
revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system ......................... $43,065,614
4590-0924 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$2,311,959 from reimbursements collected by Tewksbury hospital based
on a revenue enhancement project to obtain Medicaid coverage for
patients whose services are not currently being reimbursed; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose
of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the
lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported
in the state accounting system ............................................................................ $2,311,959
4590-0925 For the costs of a prostate cancer awareness, education and research
program focusing on men with African-American, Hispanic or Latino
heritage, family history of the disease and other men at high risk; provided,
that the department of public health shall oversee and manage said
program; and provided further, that the department shall grant not less

Conference Committee Report
than 85 per cent of funds from this item to the AdMeTech Foundation-led
Prostate Cancer Action Council, which shall leverage existing partnerships
with other state-funded nonprofit research organizations and current and
past federally-funded, state-funded and privately-funded prostate cancer
programs aimed at saving lives, improving quality of life and reducing
health care costs ................................................................................................. $1,275,000
4590-0930 For price reductions for municipalities purchasing naloxone through the
municipal naloxone bulk purchase program ....................................................... $1,501,157
4590-1503 For the provision of statewide support services for maternal, child and
family health activities for pregnant people, parents, caregivers, infants,
children and youth, including those with special health needs to maintain
the public health infrastructure necessary to promote racially equitable,
evidence-based, data-informed and family-engaged services and
programs; provided, that funds appropriated in this item shall be expended
for the notification of and follow through with affected families, primary care
providers and early intervention programs upon the department of public
health's receipt of data indicative of potential hearing disorders in newborns;
provided further, that not less than $10,840,965 shall be expended for the
pediatric palliative care program established in section 24K of chapter 111
of the General Laws; provided further, that notwithstanding said section
24K of said chapter 111, children less than 22 years of age shall be eligible
for this program; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be
expended to Seven Sisters Midwifery LLC; provided further, that not less
than $25,000 shall be expended to Worcester Community Midwifery to
provide midwifery care and birth center services to families across the
state; provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall be expended to
the development and implementation of a pilot program for MassHealth to
partner with a mobile pregnancy application to promote awareness of the
commonwealth’s maternal and infant health programs to prenatal,
pregnant and postpartum individuals who are enrolled in Medicaid or are
eligible for Medicaid; provided further, that such application shall have the
capability to deliver education, resources and support to prenatal,
pregnant and postpartum individuals and their families, including, but not
limited to, information specific to the commonwealth, links to programs
administered by the department and other state agencies and culturally
and linguistically appropriate content; provided further, that not later than
January 30, 2028, the department shall evaluate the effectiveness of the
pilot program and report on utilization, outcomes and recommendations
for expansion; provided further, that not less than $386,000 shall be
expended for universal newborn hearing screening; provided further, that
funds shall be expended for universal newborn hearing screening and
perinatal-neonatal quality improvement; provided further, that not less
than $1,000,000 shall be expended for a doula certification program;
provided further, that not less than $350,000 shall be expended for the
operations of and hiring additional personnel for the Massachusetts
maternal mortality and morbidity review committee to enhance the
committee’s ability to comprehensively review deaths and complications
that occur during or within 1 year of pregnancy and make related remedial
policy and practice recommendations; provided further, that the committee
shall convene regularly to encourage consistent case review and reporting
of findings and recommendations; provided further, that the department of
public health shall submit to the committee, in a timely manner,
aggregated and patient-level maternal morbidity and mortality data for
review and utilization in developing recommendations to improve perinatal

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
and maternal health outcomes; provided further, that not later than March
2, 2027, the committee shall submit a report on its findings and
recommendations to the joint committee on public health, the house and
senate committees on ways and means, the pregnancy and birth equity
task force of the Massachusetts caucus of women legislators and the
commission on the status of women; provided further, that not less than
$1,000,000 shall be expended to support the development and operation
of freestanding birth centers to cover costs including, but not limited to,
facility costs, start-up expenditures and the cost of providing full prenatal
care and extensive postpartum care; provided further, that funds shall be
issued through a competitive grant process; provided further, that
freestanding birth centers and maternal health-centered community-based
nonprofit organizations shall be eligible to apply for the funds, which shall
include a requirement that a birth center be licensed or be in active pursuit
of licensure; provided further, that priority for funding shall be given to birth
centers that serve communities historically impacted most by inequities in
maternal health including, but not limited to, high rates of maternal and
infant mortality; provided further, that not less than $220,000 shall be
expended for grants to community-based organizations to address mental
health conditions and substance use disorders for perinatal individuals
consistent with section 16GG of chapter 6A of the General Laws; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to Hilltown Village,
Inc. doing business as It Takes A Village in the town of Huntington for
postpartum and early parenting support for families in the western region
of the commonwealth; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall
be expended for the Neighborhood Birth Center in the city of Boston to
provide perinatal health care and prenatal and postpartum support; and
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to Pernet
Family Health Service of Worcester, Inc. in the city of Worcester for its
fourth trimester screening program ................................................................... $17,302,092
4590-1504 For a neighborhood-based gun and violent crime prevention program for
targeted work with out-of-school youth and young adults aged 17 to 24,
inclusive, intended to prevent gun violence and other violent crime in
neighborhoods and municipalities with the highest rates of violent crime in
the commonwealth; provided, that funds shall be awarded in consultation
with the executive office of public safety and security and the department
of elementary and secondary education; provided further, that funds shall
be awarded to nonprofit, community-based organizations located in and
serving high risk youth in eligible communities; provided further, that
preference shall be given to organizations that have: (i) demonstrated
street outreach capacity; (ii) effective partnerships with neighborhood
health and human services agencies, including mental health providers,
and with schools and other local educational institutions; and (iii) clearly
outlined a comprehensive plan in support of continued or expanded
collaboration efforts with such partners, including data related to
measurable outcomes of successful partner collaboration; provided
further, that eligible expenses for such grants shall include, but not be
limited to, case workers, mental health counselors, academic supports and
other research-based practices and related support services; provided
further, that the department shall ensure that every grant recipient
establishes measurable outcomes in its comprehensive plan and provides
data related to those outcomes that demonstrate program success;
provided further, that preference shall be given to proposals that
demonstrate coordination with programs and services funded through
items 4000-0005, 7061-0010 and 7061-9612; provided further, that the

Conference Committee Report
department shall allocate funding to support training and technical
assistance for all grantees; provided further, that not later than March 2,
2027, the department shall submit a report to the executive office for
administration and finance, the joint committee on public health, the joint
committee on public safety and homeland security, the joint committee on
education and the house and senate committees on ways and means
detailing the awarding of grants and details of anticipated contracts by
district; provided further, that the department shall further report on the
effectiveness of the program including, but not limited to: (a) any
measurable data-driven results; (b) which strategies and collaborations
have most effectively reduced gun and other violence in the grantee
neighborhoods; (c) how spending through this item has been aligned with
spending from items 4000-0005, 7061-0010 and 7061-9612 in ways that
enhance public safety while avoiding programmatic duplication; and (d)
what efforts have been taken by the nonprofit community and
municipalities to ensure the long-term viability of the reforms funded by the
program; provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall be expended
to the Nubian Square Safety Initiative; and provided further, that copies of
the report shall be provided to: (1) the joint committee on public safety
and homeland security; (2) the joint committee on public health; (3) the joint
committee on education; and (4) the house and senate committees on ways
and means not later than September 2, 2027 ....................................................... $11,307,331
4590-1506 For a competitive grant program to be administered by the department of
public health to support the establishment of a comprehensive youth
violence prevention program; provided, that eligibility shall be determined
by the criteria set forth in item 4590-1506 of section 2 of chapter 182 of
the acts of 2008; provided further, that no grants shall be awarded to law
enforcement agencies; provided further, that funds shall be considered
one-time; and provided further, that grants shall not annualize in fiscal year
2028 .................................................................................................................... $4,001,578
4590-1507 For competitively-procured grants to youth at-risk programs utilizing an
evidence-based positive youth development model, including programs
that serve lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer and questioning
youth; provided further, that the department of public health shall award
not less than $2,500,000 to the Alliance of Massachusetts YMCAS, Inc.,
which shall be distributed among the alliance’s member organizations;
provided further, that the department shall award not less than $3,000,000
to the Massachusetts Alliance of Boys & Girls Clubs, Inc., the first
$2,000,000 of which shall be distributed equally among its member
organizations; provided further, that the department shall provide not less
than $1,000,000 to the YWCA, which shall be distributed equally among
the Alliance of YWCAS’ organizations in the commonwealth; provided, that
not less than $75,000 shall be expended to the Mildred C. Hailey youth
center for staffing and operations, resources and events that support the
residents of the Mildred C. Hailey development; provided further, that not
less than $250,000 shall be expended to the Big Brother Big Sisters of
Eastern Massachusetts; provided further, that not less than $45,000 shall
be expended to Boys and Girls Clubs of Metrowest, Inc. to purchase
equipment to improve safety and security at its facilities; provided further,
that not less than $30,000 shall be expended for Old Colony YMCA
Wellness Services, Inc., for capital purposes, to support its health and
wellness, swimming, childcare, community and social services and other
programming for the public at the Plymouth branch; provided further, that
not less than $70,000 shall be expended for the Montachusett Community

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
Branch of The Young Men's Christian Association Of Central
Massachusetts in the city of Fitchburg for upgrades that support its youth
and community programming; provided further, that not less than $50,000
shall be expended for the Boys & Girls Club of Fitchburg and Leominster
- A Nonprofit Corporation for infrastructure improvements to support its
youth and community programming; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the Moving Mountains; provided further, that
not less than $65,000 shall be expended to the city known as the town of
Randolph to support its enhanced social services program; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to Awake Youth
Violence Prevention; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to the Boys & Girls Club of Metro North, Inc to establish an
innovation center and STEM lab; provided further, that not less than
$120,000 shall be expended to the Center for Teen Empowerment, Inc.
for support and community engagement programs for at-risk youth;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to The
Black Springfield Covid-19 Coalition; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be expended to College Bound Dorchester, Inc. for the
administration of Uncornered and other services for at-risk youth; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to Parent Villages,
Inc. for its youth outreach center; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to LTS Grow with Success Academy to
support professional development in the cosmetology field and to provide
job training for low-income residents in the Merrimack Valley; provided
further, that not less than $15,000 shall be expended for the Boys and
Girls Club of Cape Cod, Inc., for capital purposes, to support its after
school programs, summer camps, teen programs, youth programs and
enrichment programs for the public; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to Change the Play to support professional
development and mentorship efforts for at-risk youth in the Merrimack
Valley; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended for
the YMCA of Greater Westfield, Inc. in the city of Westfield for capital
improvements and operational costs at Camp Shepard to support outdoor
education and recreation; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall
be expended to Day Dreaming Organization Inc to support baseball
programming and youth mentoring in the city of Lawrence; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to Sueños
Basketball, Inc. to support the recreational, social and health benefits the
league provides to low-income youth in the city of Lawrence; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to Methuen Youth
Basketball Association, Inc. to enhance youth mentorship initiatives,
develop robust sports programming and strengthen violence prevention
efforts aimed at promoting teamwork, personal development and
community engagement among Methuen youth, and programming shall
prioritize underserved youth and promote life skills that support academic
success and leadership; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall
be expended to Hoop and Handles in the city of Methuen to provide
targeted youth mentorship, individualized basketball training and skill
development programming for underserved and at-risk youth; provided
further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the city known as
the town of Randolph for purposes of continued funding for the town’s
Enhanced Social Services Program; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to Friends and Mentors, Inc. for costs
associated with their at-risk youth mentoring programming in the city of
Brockton; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended
to Project R.I.G.H.T., Inc. for personnel, programming and administrative

Conference Committee Report
costs associated with violence prevention, trauma support outreach and
neighborhood-based intervention workers serving the Grove Hall
community; provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall be
expended to The Possible Zone for Career and Technical Education (CTE)
initiatives in the cities of Lawrence, Lowell and Brockton; and provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for the Hockomock
Area YMCA for its Integration Initiative to provide unique, innovative and
impactful opportunities for children, teens and young adults with special
needs and their families .................................................................................... $13,115,000
4590-2001 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$4,489,889 of payments received for services provided by Tewksbury
hospital to clients of the department of developmental services, including
for the provision of behavioral health services and the continuation of
short-term medical rehabilitation for clients of the department of
developmental services; provided, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the department of public health may incur expenses and the
comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of
this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system ..................................................................................... $4,489,889
OFFICE OF CHILDREN, YOUTH AND FAMILY SERVICES.
Department of Children and Families.
4800-0015 For central and area office administration and service coordination of the
department of children and families; provided, that the associated
expenses of employees whose AA and DD object class costs are paid
from item 4800-1100 shall be paid from this item; provided further, that the
commissioner of the department of children and families may transfer funds
between items 4800-0030, 4800-0038, 4800-0040 and 4800-0041 as
necessary, pursuant to an allocation plan, which shall detail by object class
the distribution of the funds to be transferred and which the commissioner
shall file with the house and senate committees on ways and means 30 days
prior to any such transfer; provided further, that not more than 5 per cent of
any item shall be transferred in fiscal year 2027; provided further, that the
commissioner may transfer funds from line item 4800-1100 into line item
4800-0015 for the purpose of maintaining appropriate staffing ratios;
provided further, that the commissioner shall notify the house and senate
committees on ways and means 30 days in advance of any such transfer;
provided further, that not more than 2 per cent of funds from line item 4800-
1100 shall be transferred in fiscal year 2027; provided further, that no funds
shall be expended from this item for the compensation of unit 8
employees; provided further, that the department of children and families
shall not place a child or adolescent referred by, or discharged from, the
care of the department of mental health until the department of mental
health forwards an assessment and recommendation as to whether the
child or adolescent may be appropriately placed in foster care or if, due to
severe emotional disturbance, such child or adolescent is more
appropriate for congregate care placement; provided further, that the
department of children and families shall assist the department of mental
health in making such assessments and recommendations; provided
further, that if placement of a child with someone other than a parent

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
becomes necessary, the department of children and families shall place
the highest priority on identifying a family resource within the child’s
kinship or family circle and shall provide services and support to partner
with the family resource in meeting the child’s needs; provided further, that
unless otherwise authorized, all funds including federal reimbursements
received by the department shall be credited to the General Fund, except
for federal reimbursement used to support revenue maximization projects;
provided further, that the department of children and families and the
department of early education and care shall provide standards for early
education and care placements made through the supportive child care
program; provided further, that the department of children and families, in
collaboration with the department of early education and care, shall
maintain a centralized list detailing the number of children eligible for
supportive child care services, the number of supportive slots filled and
the number of supportive slots available; provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the department
of children and families shall not reduce recoupment amounts
recommended by the state auditor; provided further, that there shall not
be a waiting list for the services; provided further, that all children eligible
for services under item 3000-3060 shall receive those services; provided
further, that the department shall maintain a timely, independent and fair
administrative hearing system; provided further, that not later than
December 2, 2026, and February 26, 2027, the department shall submit
reports to the joint committee on children, families and persons with
disabilities and the house and senate committees on ways and means
which shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the fair hearing requests filed
in fiscal year 2027, using non-identifying information, which shall state, for
each hearing request: (a) the subject matter of the appeal; (b) the number
of days between the hearing request and the first day of the hearing; (c)
the number of days between the first day of the hearing and the hearing
officer’s decision; (d) the number of days between the hearing officer’s
decision and the agency’s final decision; (e) the number of days of
continuance granted at the appellant’s request; (f) the number of days of
continuance granted at the request of the department or the hearing
officer’s request, specifying which party made the request; and (g) whether
the department’s decision that was the subject of the appeal was affirmed
or reversed; and (ii) the fair hearing requests filed before fiscal year 2027,
which have been pending for more than 180 days, stating the number of
those cases, how many of those cases have been heard but not decided
and how many have been decided by the hearing officer but not yet issued
as a final decision of the agency; provided further, that the department
shall maintain and make available to the public, during regular business
hours, a record of its fair hearings, with personal identifying information
removed, including for each hearing request: (1) the date of the request;
(2) the date of the hearing decision; (3) the decision rendered by the
hearing officer; and (4) the final decision rendered by the commissioner of
children and families after review; provided further, that the department
shall make redacted copies of fair hearing decisions available within 30
days of a written request; provided further, that the department shall not
make available any information in violation of federal privacy regulations;
provided further, that not later than February 26, 2027, the department
shall submit a report to the joint committee on children, families and
persons with disabilities and the house and senate committees on ways
and means that shall include, but not be limited to, the: (A) number of
medical and psychiatric personnel and their level of training currently
employed by or under contract with the department; (B) number of foster

Conference Committee Report
care reviews conducted by the department and the average length of time
in which each review was completed; (C) number of social workers and
supervisors who have earned a bachelor’s or master’s degree in social
work; (D) total number of social workers and the total number of social
workers holding licensure, by level; (E) number of the department’s
contracts reviewed by the state auditor and number of corrective action
plans issued; and (F) number of corrective action plans entered into by the
department; provided further, that the department shall submit quarterly
reports to the joint committee on children, families and persons with
disabilities and the house and senate committees on ways and means on
the caseload of the department; provided further, that the report shall
include, but not be limited to: (I) the caseloads of residential placements,
congregate care, foster care, therapeutic foster care, adoption,
guardianship, 51A reports, substantiated 51A reports, the number of
children who die in the care and custody of the department, the number of
children currently eligible for supportive child care, the number of children
presently receiving supportive child care and the number of medical and
psychiatric consultation requests made by the department’s social
workers; (II) the number of approved foster care placements; (III) the
number of children in psychiatric hospitals and community-based acute
treatment programs who remain hospitalized beyond their medically-
necessary stay while awaiting placement and the number of days each
child remains in placement beyond that which is medically necessary; (IV)
the number of children in the department’s care and custody who are
receiving medical or psychiatric care through other publicly-funded
sources; (V) the number of children served by supervised visitation centers
and the number of those children who are reunified with their families; (VI)
the total number of children served, their ages, the number of children
served in each service plan, the number of children in out-of-home
placements and the number of placements each child has had before
receiving an out-of-home placement; (VII) for each area office, the number
of kinship guardianship subsidies provided in the quarters covered by the
report and the number of kinship guardianship subsidies provided in that
quarter for which federal reimbursement was received; (VIII) for each area
office, the total spending amount on services other than case management
services provided to families to keep a child with the child’s parents or
reunifying the child with the child’s parents, detailing spending by the type
of service provided including, but not limited to, the number of children and
a breakdown of spending for respite care, intensive in-home services,
client financial assistance and flexible funding, community-based after-
school social and recreation program services, family navigation services
and parent aide services and the unduplicated number of families that
receive the services; (IX) for each area office, the total number of families
residing in shelters paid for by the department, a list of where the families
are sheltered, the total cost and average cost per family at those shelters
and a description of how the department determines who qualifies or does
not qualify for a shelter; (X) for each area office, the number of requests
for voluntary services, delineated by type of service requested, whether
the request was approved or denied, the number of families that were
denied voluntary services and received a 51A report, the reasons for
denying such services and what, if any, referrals were made for services
by other agencies or entities; (XI) the number of families receiving multiple
51A reports within a 10-month period, the number of cases reopened
within 6 months of being closed and the number of children who return
home and then reenter an out-of-home placement within 6 months; (XII)
the number of children and families served by the family resource centers,

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
delineated by area; and (XIII) the number of children in the care and
custody of the department whose whereabouts are unknown; provided
further, that not later than January 29, 2027, the department shall submit
a report to the joint committee on children, families and persons with
disabilities and the house and senate committees on ways and means that
details any changes to the rules, regulations or guidelines established by
the department in the previous fiscal year to carry out its duties under
chapter 119 of the General Laws including, but not limited to: (aa) criteria
used to determine whether a child has been abused or neglected; (bb)
guidelines for removal of a child from the home; and (cc) standards to
determine what reasonable efforts are being made to keep a child in the
home; provided further, that on a monthly basis, the department shall
provide the caseload forecasting office with data on children receiving
services, young adults receiving services as defined in section 21 of said
chapter 119 who continue to receive services as authorized in subsection
(f) of section 23 of said chapter 119 and other pertinent data related to
items 4800-0038 and 4800-0041 that is requested by the office; provided
further, that the report shall also contain the number of children and
families served by the family resource centers, by area, and an evaluation
of the services provided and their effectiveness; provided further, that to
the extent feasible within existing appropriations, the department shall
maintain existing services for the aging-out population; provided further,
that the commissioner of children and families may transfer funds from
item 4800-1100 to this item to maintain appropriate staffing ratios under
the memorandum of agreement between the commonwealth and the
Alliance/Local 509, SEIU executed on March 25, 2013; provided further,
that not less than 15 days before any such transfer, the commissioner shall
notify the house and senate committees on ways and means; provided
further, that not more than 2 per cent of the funds from said item 4800-
1100 shall be transferred in fiscal year 2027; provided further, that the
commissioner may transfer funds between items 4800-0030, 4800-0038,
4800-0040 and 4800-0041 for services only and, as necessary, under an
allocation plan, which shall detail, by object class, the distribution of the
funds to be transferred; provided further, that transfers shall not be made
for administrative costs; provided further, that not less than 15 days before
any such transfer, the commissioner shall notify the house and senate
committees on ways and means; provided further, that not less than
$125,000 shall be expended to Rick’s Place, Inc. of Wilbraham for
providing grief support to youth and their families in the Pioneer Valley;
provided further, that funds shall be expended for a unit to help identify at-
risk youth and provide preventative services and to implement a missing
or absent youth recovery response policy; and provided further, that not
later than January 15, 2027, the department shall submit a report to the
house and senate committees on ways and means and the joint committee
on children, families and persons with disabilities that shall include, but not
be limited to, the: (aaa) number of young adults as defined in said section
21 of said chapter 119 who are continuing to receive services from the
department as set forth in said subsection (f) of said section 23 of said
chapter 119, by each area office of the department; and (bbb) total cost of
such services .................................................................................................. $156,573,247
4800-0016 For the department of children and families, which may expend for the
operation of the transitional employment program not more than
$2,000,000 from retained revenues collected from various state, county
and municipal government entities and state authorities for the costs
related to the provision of services by the participants and the overhead

Conference Committee Report
costs and expenses incurred by the not-for-profit managing agent selected
by the commissioner of children and families for administering the
program; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, the commissioner may enter into a contract with Roca, Inc. to
manage the transitional employment program and to provide services to
participants from the aging-out population, parolees, probationers, youth
service releasees and other community residents considered to have
employment needs .............................................................................................. $2,000,000
4800-0025 For foster care review services ........................................................................... $5,585,836
4800-0030 For the continuation of local and regional administration and coordination
of services provided by lead agencies through purchase-of-service
contracts, including flex services; provided, that not less than $150,000
shall be expended to the Weymouth Teen Center for job skills training,
technology support, remedial education services and to promote a social
service program for growth and social welfare .................................................... $19,324,028
4800-0036 For a sexual abuse intervention network program to be administered in
conjunction with the district attorneys .................................................................... $971,752
4800-0038 For guardianship, foster care, adoption, family preservation and kinship
services provided by the department of children and families; provided,
that services funded through this item shall include shelter services,
substance use treatment, young parent programs, parent aides, education
and counseling services, foster care, adoption and guardianship
subsidies, tiered reimbursements used to promote the foster care
placement of children with special medical and social needs, assessment
of the appropriateness of adoption for children in the care of the
department for more than 12 months, protective services provided by
partnership agencies, targeted recruitment and retention of foster families,
respite care services, post-adoption services and support services for
foster, kinship and adoptive families and juvenile fire setter prevention
programs and services for people at risk of domestic violence, including
payroll costs; provided further, that funds may be expended on programs
that received funding in fiscal year 2013; provided further, that funds may
be expended to support reforms at the department to improve foster care
and placement stability and to ensure positive permanency outcomes for
children; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to
the Rise Above Foundation, Inc. for additional programming for additional
youth; provided further, that not less than 30 days before making each such
reform, the department shall provide an assessment of the racial impact
of such reform, including whether it is likely to have a disproportionate or
unique impact on racial and ethnic minorities in the commonwealth;
provided further, that such assessment shall be submitted to the joint
committee on children, families and persons with disabilities, the house
and senate committees on ways and means and the clerks of the senate
and house of representatives; provided further, that not less than $250,000
shall be expended for the Tempo program at the Wayside Youth and
Family Support Network, Inc; provided further, that the department may
contract with provider agencies for the coordination and management of
services, including flex services; and provided further, that not less than
$500,000 shall be expended to the Jewish Family and Children’s Service,
Inc.’s Center for Early Relationship Support, including the Fragile
Beginnings program, the Project Newborns Exposed to Substances:

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
Support and Therapy and related clinical and community services for
vulnerable families with children from birth to age 5, inclusive ....................... $343,981,153
4800-0040 For family preservation, reunification and service coordination; provided,
that services shall include family support and stabilization services
provided by the department of children and families ...................................... $129,614,767
4800-0041 For congregate care services; provided, that funds may be expended from
this item to provide community-based services, including in-home support
and stabilization services, to children who would otherwise be placed in
congregate settings; and provided further, that the department of children
and families shall oversee area review teams that shall evaluate the
feasibility of maintaining the child in the community in this manner
whenever possible before recommending placement in a congregate care
setting .............................................................................................................. $450,734,746
4800-0058 For the support of a foster care campaign to recruit new foster parents;
provided, that not later than April 1, 2027, the department of children and
families shall submit a report to the joint committee on children, families
and persons with disabilities and the house and senate committees on
ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to, the: (i) number of
new foster care parents as a result of the foster care campaign; and (ii)
methods used by the department to recruit foster care parents ............................ $945,945
4800-0091 For the department of children and families, which may expend not more
than $5,142,531 in federal reimbursements received under Title IV-E of
the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 670 et. seq. during fiscal year 2027 to
develop a training institute for professional development at the
department; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to
the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the
department may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for
payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most
recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system; and
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, federal reimbursements received in excess of $5,142,531 shall
be credited to the General Fund ......................................................................... $5,142,531
4800-0200 For the support and maintenance of family resource centers throughout
the commonwealth; provided, that funds may be expended to expand
services at existing centers or to establish new centers in areas with
identified coverage gaps; provided further, that centers supported through
this item shall be subject to the selection and reporting requirements of
item 4000-0051; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be
expended to the Eliot Family Resource Center in the city of Everett for the
implementation of additional programming; and provided further, that not
less than $3,300,000 shall be expended for the Juvenile Court Mental
Health Advocacy Project for kids administered by Health Law Advocates,
Inc. to increase access to mental health treatment for at-risk children and
adolescents involved in or diverted from juvenile courts .................................. $35,100,000
4800-1100 For the AA and DD object class costs of the department of children and
families’ social workers; provided, that funds shall mitigate social worker
caseloads in those area offices furthest above the statewide weighted
caseload standard and towards achieving a social worker caseload ratio

Conference Committee Report
of 15 to 1 statewide; and provided further, that only employees of
bargaining unit 8, as identified in the Massachusetts personnel
administrative reporting and information system, shall be paid from this
item.................................................................................................................. $320,870,628
OFFICE OF HEALTH SERVICES.
Department of Mental Health.
5011-0100 For the operation of the department of mental health; provided, that not
less than $1,200,000 shall be expended to Mass211, Inc. to support
continued staffing growth; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall
be expended to the Mental Health Collaborative for service expansion;
provided further, that the department of mental health, in consultation with
the department of correction, shall conduct a comprehensive investigation
into the steps necessary to transfer the oversight and management of
Bridgewater state hospital from the department of correction to the
department of mental health; and provided further, that not later than June
30, 2027, the department of mental health shall submit an implementation
plan to the joint committee on mental health, substance use and recovery,
joint committee on public safety and homeland security and the senate
and house committees on ways and means detailing the findings and
recommendations of the comprehensive investigation which shall include,
but not be limited to: (i) an estimated timeline for the implementation of a
secure transition of oversight and management of the operations of
Bridgewater state hospital by not later than December 31, 2028 without
requiring the designation or construction of a new facility; (ii) the potential
impact that department of mental health oversight would have on access
to clinical mental health services and supports for residents; (iii) drafts of
legislation necessary to facilitate the transfer of oversight and
management of the hospital; (iv) proposed enhancements to staff training
to ensure compliance with the legal requirements regarding the use of
restraints and seclusion on patients in a residential mental health care
facility; (v) an analysis of current staffing ratios; (vi) proposed measures to
reduce and prevent mold growth and improve air quality; (vii) the fiscal
impacts associated with the transfer of oversight and management; and
(viii) any additional measures to provide a safe and improved therapeutic
environment for providers and residents of the hospital .................................. $37,772,029
5042-5000 For child and adolescent services, including the costs of psychiatric and
related services provided to children and adolescents determined to be
medically-ready for discharge from acute hospital units or mental health
facilities and who are experiencing unnecessary delays in being
discharged due to the lack of more appropriate settings; provided, that to
fund said services, the commissioner of mental health may allocate funds
from the amount appropriated in this item to other departments within the
executive office of health and human services; provided further, that the
department of mental health shall not refer or discharge a child or
adolescent to the custody or care of the department of children and
families until the department of mental health forwards its assessment and
recommendation as to whether the child or adolescent is appropriate for
foster care or, due to severe emotional disturbance, is more appropriate
for group care; provided further, that the department of children and
families shall maintain the same number of intensive residential treatment
programs and clinically intensive residential treatment programs as were

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
maintained in fiscal year 2026; provided further, that the department shall
expend not less than $4,375,000 for the Massachusetts Child Psychiatry
Access Program, or MCPAP; provided further, that not less than $675,000
of that amount shall be expended for MCPAP for Moms statewide to
address mental health concerns in pregnant and postpartum people and
to expand support for pregnant and postpartum people by adding
substance use disorder-specific education, training, consultation and care
coordination to the project’s existing capacity; provided further, that not
less than $500,000 of that amount shall be expended to MCPAP to
develop and implement behavioral health consultation services that are
accessible to school personnel and students in kindergarten to grade 12,
inclusive; provided further, that amounts expended from this item for
MCPAP that are related to services provided on behalf of commercially-
insured clients shall be assessed by the commissioner on surcharge
payors as defined in section 64 of chapter 118E of the General Laws and
shall be collected in a manner consistent with the department’s
regulations; provided further, that not later than March 15, 2027, the
department shall report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means on: (i) an overview of MCPAP care coordination efforts; (ii) the
number of psychiatric consultations, face-to-face consultations and
referrals made to specialists on behalf of children with behavioral health
needs in fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027; and (iii) recommendations
to: (a) increase the number of specialists receiving referrals through
MCPAP; (b) increase access to MCPAP in regions currently underutilizing
the project; and (c) improve care coordination efforts to identify specialists
available and accepting new child and adolescent patients, with priority to
those children and adolescents who exhibit complex conditions and
experience long wait lists for specialty psychiatry; provided further, that not
later than April 1, 2027, the department shall report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means on: (1) the distribution of funds,
delineated by initiative; (2) the number of individuals served; (3) the
outcomes measured; and (4) recommendations for expanding cost-
effective and evidence-based early mental health identification and
prevention programming for children and adolescents in fiscal year 2027
and fiscal year 2028; provided further, that not less than $4,700,000 shall
be expended for a program to provide assertive community treatment for
individuals under the age of 22 who exhibit symptoms of serious emotional
disturbance, demonstrate an inability to consistently use less intensive
levels of care in the community and have functional impairment and a
history of difficulty in functioning safely and successfully in community,
school, home or workplace settings; provided further, that the program
shall: (I) include a team-based approach to service delivery that tailors
services to the specific needs and acuity of each individual; (II) provide
mental health services and social service assistance through a person-
centered approach which may include, but shall not be limited to, clinical
assessment and outreach, medication treatment and outreach, care
coordination, including primary care, symptom management, harm
reduction, family services, housing support and needs that arise in
carrying out activities of daily living; (III) be consistent, to the maximum
extent possible, with the evidence-based practice standards for assertive
community treatment as found in the federal Substance Abuse and Mental
Health Services Administration’s assertive community treatment
evidence-based practices kit; and (IV) not limit program services to a
specific physical location; provided further, that the department shall
prioritize geographic equity in administering the program; provided further,
that not later than April 1, 2027, the department shall submit a report to

Conference Committee Report
the house and senate committees on ways and means detailing the: (A)
funds distributed through the program, delineated by recipient; (B) number
of new programs created with those funds, delineated by recipient,
location, number of individuals served and ages of individuals served; and
(C) projected need for the creation of new programs in the next fiscal year;
provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended to
Shrewsbury Youth and Family Services, Inc. in the town of Shrewsbury to
provide mental health services in the commonwealth; provided further, that
not less than $50,000 shall be expended to Boston Community Pediatrics,
Inc. to support the Integrated Behavioral Health program; provided further,
that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the Children's Room
Center for Grieving Children & Teenagers, Inc. in the town of Arlington for
student mental health support; provided further, that not less than
$250,000 shall be expended to The NAN Project to increase mental health
awareness and suicide prevention; provided further, that not less than
$6,500,000 shall be expended for the department's emergency room
diversion initiative to stabilize youth in crisis; provided further, that not less
than $250,000 shall be expended to Children’s Services of Roxbury, Inc.
to expand statewide youth mental health and family stabilization services
and prevent out-of-home placements, mental health hospitalization and
department of children and families’ involvement; and provided further,
that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to Community Teamwork
Inc. in the city of Lowell to operate programs promoting children's
behavioral health and educational success .................................................... $138,363,638
5046-0000 For adult mental health and support services; provided, that the
department of mental health may allocate not more than $5,000,000 from
item 5095-0015 to this item, as necessary, under allocation plans
submitted to the house and senate committees on ways and means not
less than 30 days before any such transfer, for residential and day services
for clients formerly receiving care at department facilities; provided further,
that not later than February 3, 2027, the department shall report to the
house and senate committees on ways and means on the distribution of
funds per adult and child planning population and the types of services
received in each region in fiscal year 2027; provided further, that the
department shall maintain in fiscal year 2027 the same amount of
community-based placements as in the previous 3 fiscal years; provided
further, that in fiscal year 2027, the department shall expend on
clubhouses not less than the amount expended on clubhouses in fiscal
year 2026; provided further, that funds shall be expended for rental
subsidies for the department’s clients; provided further, that not less than
$19,000,000 shall be expended for the jail diversion program; provided
further, that funds shall be expended at not less than the same level as
the prior fiscal year for jail diversion programs in municipalities that provide
equal matching funds from other public or private sources; provided
further, that not later than March 2, 2027 the department shall report to the
house and senate committees on ways and means regarding the: (i)
number of crisis intervention team and jail diversion efforts; (ii) amount of
funding per grant, delineated by city, town or provider; (iii) potential
savings achieved; (iv) recommendations for expansion; and (v) outcomes
measured; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
for a grant to the Massachusetts Chapter of the National Association of
Social Workers, Inc. to provide assistance in connecting consumers to
licensed clinical social workers through the Therapy Matcher program;
provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended on the
expansion of low threshold, safe haven housing for mentally ill men and

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
women who have been chronically homeless and are currently living in
emergency shelters or on the streets in Boston; provided further, that the
department shall expend not less than $250,000 for the assisted outpatient
treatment program at Eliot Community Human Services, Inc. to treat
residents who suffer from serious and persistent mental illness and
experience repeated interaction with law enforcement or have a high rate
of recurring hospitalization due to mental illness, either through a voluntary
agreement with the resident or by a court order mandating that the resident
receive the treatment described in this program; provided further, that
$19,000,000 may be expended for the department's emergency room
diversion initiative to stabilize adults in crisis; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended to the Boston Chinatown Neighborhood
Center, Inc. for costs associated with opening a licensed outpatient
mental health clinic in the city of Quincy; and provided further, that not less
than $300,000 shall be expended for the International Institute of New
England, Inc. for culturally and linguistically appropriate mental health
services…. ...................................................................................................... $695,076,424
5046-2000 For homelessness services .............................................................................. $27,421,425
5046-4000 For the department of mental health, which may expend not more than
$125,000 in retained revenues collected from occupancy fees charged to
the tenants in the creative housing option in community environments, or
CHOICE, program under chapter 167 of the acts of 1987; provided, that
all fees collected under said CHOICE program shall be expended for the
routine maintenance and repair of its facilities ....................................................... $125,000
5047-0001 For emergency service programs and acute inpatient mental health care
services; provided, that the department of mental health shall require a
performance specification to be developed for safe aftercare options for
adults upon release from acute inpatient mental health care services; and
provided further, that the emergency service programs shall take all
reasonable steps to identify and invoice the third-party insurer of all persons
serviced by the programs ................................................................................... $22,035,764
5055-0000 For forensic services provided by the department of mental health;
provided, that not less than $1,500,000 shall be expended for juvenile court
clinics ................................................................................................................. $17,518,309
5095-0015 For the operation of hospital facilities and community-based mental health
services; provided, that in order to comply with the decision in Olmstead
v. L.C. ex rel. Zimring, 527 U.S. 581 (1999) and to enhance care for clients,
the department of mental health shall discharge clients residing in inpatient
facilities to residential services in the community if the following criteria are
met: (i) the client is deemed clinically suited for a more integrated setting;
(ii) the community residential service capacity and resources available are
sufficient to provide each client with an equal or improved level of service;
and (iii) the cost to the commonwealth of serving the client in the
community is less than or equal to the cost of serving the client in inpatient
care; provided further, that any client transferred to another inpatient
facility as the result of a facility closure shall receive a level of care that is
equal to or greater than the care that had been provided at the closed
facility; provided further, that the department may allocate funds of not
more than $5,000,000 from this item to item 5046-0000, as necessary,
under allocation plans submitted to the house and senate committees on
ways and means not less than 30 days before any transfer for residential

Conference Committee Report
and day services for clients formerly receiving inpatient care at the centers
and facilities; provided further, that the department shall maintain not less
than 671 inpatient beds in its system in fiscal year 2027; provided further,
that of said 671 beds, not less than 45 beds shall be continuing care
inpatient beds on the campus of Taunton state hospital; and provided
further, that within the existing appropriation, the department may operate
more beds at Taunton state hospital ............................................................... $395,160,989
5095-0017 For the purposes of a loan forgiveness program for clinical behavioral
health workers across the department of mental health; provided, that the
department shall create a loan forgiveness and tuition reimbursement
program for clinical behavioral health workers, including but not limited to
nurse practitioners, psychologists, psychiatrists, peer counselors and
behavioral health navigators; and provided further, that not later than
September 30, 2026, the department of mental health shall report to the
house and senate committees on ways and means detailing: (i) the
framework and eligibility criteria of the program; (ii) the number of
participants in the program; and (iii) the average amount forgiven per
person in the program ......................................................................................... $3,000,000
Department of Developmental Services.
5911-1003 For the administration and operation of the department of developmental
services; provided, that the department shall not charge user fees for
transportation or community day services; provided further, that the
department shall not charge fees for eligibility determination for services
provided by the department or for applications or requests for transfer of
guardianship; provided further, that regional employment collaboratives
shall be funded at not less than the amount funded in fiscal year 2026;
provided further, that the department shall issue a report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means not later than February 19, 2027
detailing: (i) significant expense increases incurred by the department; (ii)
measures implemented by the department to reduce costs; and (iii)
improved outcomes in programs and services funded by the department;
provided further, that the commissioner of developmental services may
transfer funds between items 5920-2025, 5920-2000, 5911-2000 and
5920-3000; provided further, that the commissioner shall notify the house
and senate committees on ways and means not less than 30 days before
any such transfer; provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall be
expended for the Massachusetts Down Syndrome Congress, Inc.;
provided further, that not less than $150,000 shall be expended to
Operation House Call at Arc Massachusetts, Inc. to maintain and expand
training to medical students and other graduate level health care
professionals to work with individuals with autism and other developmental
and intellectual disabilities; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall
be expended for the Center for Autism and Neurodevelopmental Disorders
at the University of Massachusetts memorial medical center and the
University of Massachusetts medical school based on the patient-centered
medical home concept; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall
be expended to Raising Harts Corporation located in the town of Hanover
for inclusive programming for individuals with disabilities; and provided
further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended for Attleboro
Enterprises Incorporated for the creation of a program center to support
adults with a broad range of neurodiverse and intellectual and

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
developmental disabilities in the town of Plainville and for the creation of a
wheelchair garden in the city known as the town of North Attleborough ........ $107,762,218
5920-2000 For vendor-operated, community-based residential adult services,
including intensive individual supports; provided, that annualized funding
shall be expended for turning 22 clients who began receiving services in
fiscal year 2025 under item 5920-5000 of section 2 of chapter 140 of the
acts of 2024; provided further, that not later than March 2, 2027, the
department of developmental services shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means detailing the use of shared-
living services which shall include, but not be limited to, the: (i) number of
clients living in shared-living placements, broken down by age and
location; (ii) average cost of shared-living services; (iii) number of clients
living in a shared-living placement with individuals they knew prior to the
arrangement; (iv) department’s oversight of the application and placement
process; (v) safeguards in place for clients receiving these services; and
(vi) potential for growth of the program; provided further, that the
commissioner of developmental services may transfer funds from this item
to item 5920-2010, as necessary, under an allocation plan that shall detail,
by object class, the distribution of the funds to be transferred and that shall
be submitted to the house and senate committees on ways and means not
less than 30 days before any such transfer; provided further, that not less
than $100,000 shall be expended to Cape Abilities, Inc. to create energy-
efficient exterior transformation of their primary service hub for individuals
with disabilities; and provided further, that not more than $5,000,000 shall
be transferred from this item in fiscal year 2027…. ..................................... $2,067,601,853
5920-2003 For supportive technology and remote services for individuals served by
the department of developmental services ......................................................... $5,227,910
5920-2010 For state-operated, community-based residential services for adults,
including community-based health services; provided, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to Berkshire Family and Individual Resources,
Inc.; and provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to
Harbor Health Services, Inc. to be used for equipment and technology
improvements at their Harbor Community Health Center in the village of
Hyannis in the city known as the town of Barnstable ....................................... $372,359,320
5920-2025 For community-based day and work programs and associated
transportation costs for adults; provided, that the department of
developmental services shall provide transportation which shall be
prioritized by need; provided further, that the department shall support
individuals with disabilities who transitioned from employment services
offered at sheltered workshops to community-based employment as part
of the commonwealth’s employment first initiative; provided further, that
any public-private partnerships with employers and nonprofits shall
encourage the highest level of independence among individuals with
disabilities and shall provide options to maximize community involvement
and participation; provided further, that not later than April 1, 2027, the
department shall submit a report to the joint committee on children,
families and persons with disabilities and the house and senate
committees on ways and means detailing: (i) the number of eligible
individuals employed in community-based employment in fiscal year 2026
and the number estimated for fiscal year 2027; (ii) the number and types
of community-based employment partners; (iii) the outcomes measured;
and (iv) recommendations for expansion; provided further, that the

Conference Committee Report
commissioner of developmental services may transfer such funds from
this item to items 5920-2000, 5911-2000, 5920-3000, 5920-5000 and
5930-1000; and provided further, that the commissioner shall notify the
house and senate committees on ways and means not less than 30 days
before any such transfer ................................................................................. $313,470,092
5920-3000 For respite services and intensive family supports ......................................... $131,417,406
5920-3010 For contracted support services for families of children with autism through
the autism division at the department of developmental services; provided,
that the department shall expend not less than $5,500,000 to provide
services under the children’s autism spectrum disorder waiver under
section 1915 of the Social Security Act; provided further, that the waiver
shall include children with autism spectrum disorder ages 0 to 8, inclusive,
including children with autism spectrum disorder ages 0 to 3, inclusive,
who are receiving services through the department of public health’s early
intervention program; provided further, that the department of
developmental services shall take all steps necessary to ensure that the
waiver program is fully enrolled and that eligible children with autism
immediately begin to receive services under said waiver; provided further,
that the department shall immediately file any waiver amendment that may
be necessary with the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
to comply with the requirements of this item; provided further, that not later
than January 19, 2027, the department shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means, the joint committee on
education and the joint committee on children, families and persons with
disabilities on: (i) the number of contracted support services provided for
families with children with autism under this item; (ii) the costs associated
with such services; (iii) the services provided by the children’s autism
spectrum disorder waiver, with information regarding the number of
children enrolled in the waiver and receiving services; (iv) the linguistic and
cultural diversity, age, gender and geographic representation of the
applicants and the children enrolled in the program; (v) the department’s
plans to continue to assess the demand for waiver services; (vi) any plans
by the executive office of health and human services to expand the waiver
for children on the autism spectrum of all ages in the future; and (vii) other
information determined to be relevant by the department; and provided
further, that the department shall submit copies of amended waivers to the
house and senate committees on ways and means, the joint committee on
education and the joint committee on children, families and persons with
disabilities upon submission of the amendment ................................................. $7,907,222
5920-3020 For the implementation of chapter 226 of the acts of 2014, including
services and supports for individuals with a developmental disability
attributable to autism spectrum disorder, Smith-Magenis syndrome or
Prader-Willi syndrome; provided, that the department shall submit
quarterly reports to the house and senate committees on ways and means
detailing the: (i) number of individuals eligible for services; (ii) number of
eligible individuals served; (iii) type of services provided; (iv) cost per
service; and (v) cost of services per individual; and provided further, that
not less than $300,000 shall be expended for the commission on autism
established in section 217 of chapter 6 of the General Laws ......................... $102,467,129
5920-3025 For funding to support initiatives to address the needs of individuals with
developmental disabilities who are aging including, but not limited to,
individuals with Down syndrome and Alzheimer’s disease, through the

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
identification of best practices for services for affected individuals,
including: (i) medical care coordination models that address conditions
common to individuals with developmental disabilities who are aging; (ii)
training for direct care and other staff in the identification of dementia or
other age-related conditions; and (iii) the collection of data regarding the
effectiveness of the initiatives included in this item; provided, that not later
than April 1, 2027, the department of developmental services shall submit
a report to the executive office for administration and finance and the
house and senate committees on ways and means on the status of these
initiatives, which shall include, but not be limited to: (a) the number of
participants served by each initiative; (b) the participant outcomes,
including impacts on the physical and cognitive health of participants; (c)
the cost of each initiative and the cost per participant; (d) the
implementation plans for these initiatives in fiscal years 2028 and 2029;
and (e) recommendations for enhancing the care of individuals with
developmental disabilities who are aging ................................................................ $98,010
5920-5000 For services to clients of the department who turn 22 years of age during
fiscal years 2026 and 2027 ............................................................................. $110,347,273
5930-1000 For the operation of facilities for individuals with intellectual disabilities;
provided, that in order to comply with the decision in Olmstead v. L.C. ex
rel. Zimring, 527 U.S. 581 (1999) and to enhance care for clients, the
department of developmental services shall discharge clients residing in
intermediate care facilities for individuals with intellectual disabilities or
ICF/IID, to residential services in the community if: (i) the client is deemed
clinically suited for a more integrated setting; (ii) community residential
service capacity and resources available are sufficient to provide each
client with an equal or improved level of service; and (iii) the cost to the
commonwealth of serving the client in the community is less than or equal
to the cost of serving the client in an ICF/IID; provided further, that any
client transferred to another ICF/IID as the result of a facility closure shall
receive a level of care that is equal to or greater than the level of care that
had been provided at the closed ICF/IID; provided further, that the
department may allocate funds from this item to items 5920-2000, 5920-
2010 and 5920-2025, as necessary, under allocation plans that shall be
submitted to the house and senate committees on ways and means not
less than 30 days before any transfer for residential and day services for
clients formerly receiving inpatient care at an ICF/IID; and provided further,
that not later than March 2, 2027, the department shall report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means, on: (a) all efforts to comply
with the decision in Olmstead v. L.C. ex rel. Zimring, 527 U.S. 581 (1999);
(b) the enhancement of care within available resources to clients served
by the department; and (c) the steps taken to consolidate or close an
ICF/IID ............................................................................................................. $134,334,811
BOARD OF LIBRARY COMMISSIONERS.
7000-9101 For the operation of the board of library commissioners .................................... $2,052,106
7000-9401 For state aid to regional public libraries; provided, that the board of library
commissioners may provide quarterly advances of funds as it deems
appropriate under clauses (1) and (3) of section 19C of chapter 78 of the
General Laws to regional public library systems throughout each fiscal
year, in compliance with the office of the comptroller’s regulations on state

Conference Committee Report
grants pursuant to 815 C.M.R. 2.00; provided further, that notwithstanding
any general or special law to the contrary, in calculating the fiscal year
2027 distribution of funds appropriated in this item, the board shall employ
the population figures used to calculate the fiscal year 2026 distribution;
provided further, that the board shall provide funds for the continued
operation of a single regional library system to serve the different
geographic regions of the commonwealth; provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the library for
the commonwealth shall receive not less than 47.5 cents for each resident
of the commonwealth; and provided further, that said amount shall not
exceed 25 per cent of the amount appropriated under this item ...................... $19,380,000
7000-9402 For the talking book library at the Worcester public library .................................... $726,181
7000-9406 For the Perkins Braille and Talking Book Library in the city of Watertown,
including the operation of the machine lending agency ...................................... $4,134,510
7000-9501 For state aid to public libraries; provided, that notwithstanding any general
or special law to the contrary, no city or town shall receive funds from this
item in any year when the appropriation of the city or town for free public
library service is below an amount equal to 102.5 per cent of the average
of the appropriations for free public library services for the 3 years
immediately preceding; provided further, that notwithstanding any general
or special law to the contrary, the board of library commissioners may
grant waivers in excess of the waiver limit set forth under the second
paragraph of section 19A of chapter 78 of the General Laws for fiscal year
2027 for not more than 1 year; provided further, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, of the amount by which this item
exceeds the amount appropriated under item 7000-9501 of section 2 of
chapter 194 of the acts of 1998, funds shall be distributed under the
guidelines of the municipal equalization grant program, the library
incentive grant program and the nonresident circulation offset program;
and provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to
the contrary, any payment made under this item shall be deposited with
the treasurer of the city or town and held in a separate account and shall
be expended by the public library of that city or town without appropriation
.......................................................................................................................... $20,400,000
7000-9506 For the technology and automated resource sharing networks .......................... $6,296,144
7000-9508 For the Massachusetts Center for the Book, Inc., chartered as the
commonwealth affiliate of the Center for the Book in the Library of
Congress; provided, that the Massachusetts Center for the Book, Inc. shall
continue its work as a public-private partnership ................................................... $428,400
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF LABOR AND WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT.
Office of the Secretary.
7002-1091 For the development and operation of career technical institutes in
vocational-technical schools in partnership with industry and community
stakeholders; provided, that career technical institutes shall build out
industry recognized credentialing pathways for adult learners in technical
and trade fields to retrain and grow the workforce; provided further, that at
the direction of the secretary of labor and workforce development,

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
development funds may be transferred to the Workforce Competitiveness
Trust Fund established in section 2WWW of chapter 29 of the General
Laws to issue competitive grants to support the start-up and educational
costs of career technical institutes; and provided further, that not less than
$150,000 shall be expended to the Massachusetts Marine Trades
Association for workforce development training opportunities and
technical education in secondary and post-secondary schools for careers
in the marine trades ............................................................................................ $9,048,244
General Fund ........................................................ 66.41%
Gaming Economic Development Fund ................. 33.59%
7003-0100 For the operation of the executive office of labor and workforce
development; provided, that not later than February 23, 2027, the
department shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means, including, but not limited to: (i) sector by sector barriers
to workers returning to work during the 2019 novel coronavirus pandemic,
including the retail sector; and (ii) current programs that may be utilized to
target the workforce in each sector; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the Leduc Center for Civic Engagement at
the University of Massachusetts Dartmouth for transportation costs related
to the America Reads/Counts program; provided further, that not less than
$200,000 shall be expended for Urban League of Eastern of
Massachusetts, Inc. for workforce development programming; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to support staffing at
African Cultural Services Inc in the city of Waltham; provided further, that
not less than $100,000 shall be expended to Year Up, Inc. to implement
workforce development programs that provide job opportunities for young
adults; and provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be
expended to for a grant program at St. Mary's Center for Women and
Children, Inc. in the Dorchester neighborhood of the city of Boston for
workforce development and educational programming for women; and
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for
Community Action Inc.’s Make It Haverhill program to support their
workforce training, digital literacy and other supportive services ....................... $2,902,440
7003-0101 For the costs of core administrative functions performed within the
executive office of labor and workforce development; provided, that
common functions that may be designated core administrative functions
include, without limitation, human resources, financial management,
information technology, legal, procurement and asset management;
provided further, that the executive office shall, in consultation with the
comptroller, develop a detailed plan for the expenditure of said funds, and
for increasing efficiency and reducing costs through shared services;
provided further, that not later than January 29, 2027, the secretary of
labor and workforce development and the comptroller shall jointly submit
the plan to the joint committee on labor and workforce development and
the house and senate committees on ways and means; and provided
further, that the General Fund shall be reimbursed the amount appropriated
in this item attributed to the department of industrial accidents based on
rates approved by the office of the comptroller and for associated indirect
and direct fringe benefit costs from assessments levied under section 65 of
chapter 152 of the General Laws ....................................................................... $20,446,536
7003-0150 For the operation of a re-entry workforce development and supportive
services program for formerly incarcerated individuals transitioning from a

Conference Committee Report
house of correction or the department of correction to a steady job or
career; provided, that funds shall be used for: (i) job training for formerly
incarcerated individuals in order to facilitate job placement; (ii) wage
subsidies to facilitate private sector employment and professional
development; and (iii) support services and programs for court-involved
youths; provided further, that the executive office of labor and workforce
development shall take all necessary steps to secure private sector
funding for this program; provided further, that the executive office shall
coordinate with a local public or private nonprofit university to examine and
develop a longitudinal evaluation framework to assess the efficacy and
efficiency of the program; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall
be expended for New England Culinary Arts Training; provided further, that
not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Liberal Arts for Returning
Citizens Project at Clark University to support its programs and operations;
and provided further, that not later than April 1, 2027, the executive office
shall submit a report to the executive office for administration and finance
and the house and senate committees on ways and means describing the
administrative functions of the program, client outcomes and plans for the
longitudinal evaluation framework ....................................................................... $2,500,250
Gaming Economic Development Fund .................... 100%
7003-0151 For the purposes of expanding and diversifying registered apprenticeships
including, but not limited to, in the priority manufacturing, health care and
information technology industries; provided, that not less than $250,000
shall be expended to the Massachusetts Biotechnology Education
Foundation, Inc. to increase career pathways for the life sciences sector ......... $3,583,577
Department of Economic Research.
7003-0105 For the operation of the department of economic research ................................... $780,308
Department of Labor Standards.
7003-0152 For the operation of the division of apprenticeship standards ............................... $360,324
7003-0200 For the operation of the department of labor standards ..................................... $4,747,296
7003-0201 For the department of labor standards, which may expend not more than
$454,428 received from fees collected under section 3A of chapter 23 of
the General Laws and civil fines issued under section 197B of chapter 111
of the General Laws, section 46R of chapter 140 of the General Laws and
section 6F½ of chapter 149 of the General Laws .................................................. $454,428
Department of Labor Relations.
7003-0900 For the operation of the department of labor relations ........................................ $3,741,076
7003-0902 For the operation of the joint labor management committee for municipal
police and fire ......................................................................................................... $350,000
Department of Career Services.
7002-0012 For a youth-at-risk program targeting high-risk areas; provided, that these
funds may be expended for the development and implementation of a

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
year-round employment program for youth-at-risk and existing year-round
employment programs, including programs that serve youth who are not
more than 25 years of age, including lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender,
queer and questioning youth, youth of color, youth of all abilities, national
origins and religions and low-income youth, including single income
households, youth who are experiencing housing insecurity and other
youth determined to be eligible by the Commonwealth Corporation;
provided, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Allston-
Brighton Community Development Corporation to continue their youth
development grant program supporting local youth-based organizations in
the Allston-Brighton neighborhood of the city of Boston; provided further,
that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the city of Malden for the
Mayor’s Youth Employment program; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the Essex National Heritage for the Future
Leaders program to employ underserved youth in Essex County; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to LEAP for
Education, Inc. for the New Era Fund program and operations to expand
paid internships, career readiness experiences, industry-aligned
opportunities, training systems and coordinated youth support across the
cities of Salem and Lynn, while strengthening alignment with MyCAP and
other school-based career readiness efforts; provided further, that
$500,000 of these funds shall be matched by private organizations;
provided further, that the Commonwealth Corporation shall partner with
the school-to-career connecting activities program at the department of
elementary and secondary education to develop appropriate connections
between the 2 programs; and provided further, that funds shall be
available for expenditure through September 1, 2027, prior appropriation
continued ........................................................................................................... $15,565,000
Gaming Economic Development Fund ................. 78.80%
General Fund ........................................................ 21.20%
7003-0606 For the operation and maintenance of the Massachusetts Manufacturing
Extension Partnership, Inc. to maintain and promote manufacturing as an
integral part of the economy, and for programs designed to assist small
and mid-sized manufacturing companies ............................................................... $2,000,000
7003-0607 For the Commonwealth Corporation for an employment training program
for unemployed young adults with disabilities; provided, that funds shall be
awarded competitively by the Commonwealth Corporation to community-
based organizations with recognized success in creating strong
collaborations with employers to consider young adults with disabilities;
and provided further, that a community-based organization that receives
funding under this item shall provide extensive training and internship
programming and ongoing post-placement support for participants and
employers ............................................................................................................ $1,000,000
Gaming Economic Development Fund .................... 100%
7003-0608 For the 1199SEIU Training and Upgrading Fund to deliver innovative
worker training for eligible health care workers to improve the lives of
health care workers, reduce costs and improve the quality of health care
provided by MassHealth personal care attendants and provided at nursing
homes, community health centers, hospitals and health systems ...................... $1,000,000

Conference Committee Report
7003-0800 For the operation of the MassHire department of career services; provided,
that funds may be expended for the MassHire Workforce System .................... $2,012,922
7003-0803 For the operation of the one-stop career centers, including workforce
development services for priority populations and emergency assistance
shelter clients; provided, that the career centers shall, in coordination with
the executive office of labor and workforce development, establish
parameters for regular data reporting ................................................................. $7,927,586
Gaming Economic Development Fund .................... 100%
7003-1206 For the Massachusetts Service Alliance, Inc., to administer state service
corps grants and provide training and support to volunteer and service
organizations ....................................................................................................... $1,686,000
7003-1207 For the operation of the Massachusetts AFL-CIO Workforce Development
Programs, Inc. to provide dislocated worker assistance, layoff aversion
and job training with a focus on pathways to quality careers through
traditional and non-traditional apprenticeship and pre-apprenticeship
training ................................................................................................................... $150,000
Department of Industrial Accidents.
7003-0500 For the operation and administrative expenses of the department of
industrial accidents; provided, that not later than January 29, 2027, the
department shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means detailing the scope, objective and results of grant
recipients’ safety training program; and provided further, that the General
Fund shall be reimbursed the amount appropriated in this item and for
associated indirect and direct fringe benefit costs from assessments levied
under section 65 of chapter 152 of the General Laws ...................................... $23,822,988
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.
Office of the Secretary.
7002-0010 For the operation of the office of the secretary of economic development,
including the operation of the Massachusetts permit regulatory office and
the operation of the office of the director of wireless and broadband affairs;
provided, that agencies within the executive office may, with the prior
approval of the secretary, streamline and improve administrative
operations pursuant to interdepartmental service agreements; provided
further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended for the
Massachusetts Association of Community Development Corporations,
Inc., to offer organizational capacity building, staff training, technical
assistance and other supports to certified community development
corporations and other community development non-profits; provided
further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended for LEADS, Inc. to
support leadership development; provided further, that not less than
$250,000 shall be expended for MassChallenge, Inc. to provide support
for entrepreneurial programs; provided further, that not less than $15,000
shall be expended for East Somerville Main Streets in the city of
Somerville; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be
expended for the Asian American Women's Political Initiative for

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
programming needs; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be
expended for the Beacon Communities Charitable Fund, Inc. for the
Tierney Learning Center; provided further, that not less than $250,000
shall be expended to the Historic New England to support its Welcome
Center, programs and exhibits; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be expended to Pal Pueblo, Inc. community organization;
provided further, that not less than $150,000 shall be expended for the
Pioneer Valley Planning Commission to develop an industrial lands
analysis for the region to help guide future land use decisions,
infrastructure investments and regional economic development strategies;
provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended to the
Massachusetts LGBT Chamber of Commerce, Inc.; provided further, that
not less than $250,000 shall be expended as a grant to SouthCoast
Community Foundation, Inc. to provide supports to local or regional
community-based organizations; and provided further, that not less than
$30,000 shall be expended to MetroWest Nonprofit Network, Inc. for a
nonprofit management certificate program ......................................................... $6,978,815
7002-0017 For the provision of information technology services within the executive
office of economic development ......................................................................... $2,176,276
7002-0025 For operational support grants to community action agencies; provided, that
criteria for the distribution of the grants, including minimum or maximum
grant size, eligible uses and any relevant reporting and accountability
measures shall be developed jointly with the Massachusetts Association for
Community Action, Inc. or MASSCAP; and provided further, that the grants
shall be used to assist the agencies in their mission to assist residents of
the commonwealth living with low incomes to stabilize their lives and
achieve economic prosperity, and in creating and expanding opportunity
for those residents in the neighborhoods and municipalities where they
live and work ............................................................................................................ $3,000,000
7002-0032 For the operation of the Massachusetts Technology Park Corporation
established in section 3 of chapter 40J of the General Laws and doing
business as the Massachusetts Technology Collaborative, including the
John Adams Innovation Institute ......................................................................... $3,450,000
7002-0040 For a transfer to the growth capital division at the Massachusetts
Development Finance Agency established in section 2 of chapter 23G of
the General Laws for the small business technical assistance grant
program; provided, that grants shall be disbursed to community
development corporations certified under chapter 40H of the General
Laws, nonprofit community development financial institutions certified by
the United States Department of the Treasury or nonprofit community-
based organizations to provide technical assistance or training programs
to businesses with not more than 20 employees; provided further, that not
less than $50,000 shall be expended to ACT Lawrence Inc. to empower
residents with a range of community development initiatives and activities
such as affordable housing, foreclosure prevention, first-time homebuyer
education, family financial literacy and business and youth development;
and provided further, that priority shall be given to those organizations that
focus on reaching underserved markets and to worker cooperatives and
businesses governed by employee stock ownership plans; provided
further, that grants recipients shall be notified of grant awards not later
than October 1, 2026; and provided further, that not later than January 29,
2027, the growth capital division at the Massachusetts Development

Conference Committee Report
Finance Agency shall submit a report to the house and senate committees
on ways and means and the joint committee on community development
and small businesses detailing the: (i) community development
corporations that received grants in fiscal year 2026; (ii) community
development corporations that received or are expected to receive grants
in fiscal year 2027; and (iii) criteria considered in the distribution of these
grants .................................................................................................................. $5,050,000
7002-0081 For the operation of the Social Enterprise grant program, to be administered
as a competitive grant by the executive office of economic development ............. $1,000,000
7002-1502 For the Transformative Development Fund established in section 46 of
chapter 23G of the General Laws; provided, that the initiative shall be
developed in consultation with the Massachusetts Association of
Community Development Corporations and the Massachusetts Institute for
a New Commonwealth, Inc. and shall focus on identifying and implementing
strategies for reclaiming vacant, abandoned and blighted properties and
restoring them to productive use as homeownership opportunities or rental
housing, as well as on capacity-building at the local level to address this
need .............................................................................................................................. $250,000
7002-1517 For technical assistance to municipalities to promote compact, walkable
downtowns that have a vibrant mix of commercial and residential uses,
cultural and recreational amenities and access to public transportation ................... $600,000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HOUSING AND LIVABLE COMMUNITIES.
7004-0001 For the operation of the commission on Indian affairs ........................................... $157,954
7004-0099 For the operation of the executive office of housing and livable
communities; provided, that the executive office may make expenditures
against federal grants for certain direct and indirect costs under a cost
overhead allocation plan approved by the comptroller; provided further,
that the comptroller shall maintain an account on the state accounting and
reporting system to make these expenditures; provided further, that not
less than $200,000 shall be expended to Revitalize Community
Development Corporation to support the growth of service to more low-
income individuals in need and filling a gap in serving individuals at home
to prevent the need for hospitalization; provided further, that not less than
$40,000 shall be expended for Maverick Landing Community Services,
Inc. to provide information, education and assistance on housing rights
and eviction and foreclosure issues including, completing and submitting
housing assistance applications for tenants and small homeowners,
through a housing support station in the East Boston section of the city of
Boston; provided further, that expenditures made against the account shall
not be subject to appropriation and may include the cost of personnel;
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, the executive office may conduct annual verifications of
household income levels based upon state tax returns to administer the
state and federal housing subsidy programs funded by items 7004-0108,
7004-9005, 7004-9024, 7004-9030, 7004-9033 and 7004-9316 of this
section and items 7004-9009, 7004-9014, 7004-9019 and 7004-9020 of
section 2D; provided further, that as a condition of eligibility or continued
occupancy by an applicant or tenant, the executive office may require
disclosure of the social security numbers of the applicant or tenant and

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
members of the applicant’s or tenant’s household solely for use in
verification of income eligibility; provided further, that the executive office
may deny or terminate participation in subsidy programs for failure by an
applicant or tenant to provide a social security number for use in
verification of income eligibility; provided further, that the executive office
may consult with the department of revenue, the department of transitional
assistance or any other state or federal agency to conduct said income
verification; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special
law to the contrary, these state agencies shall consult and cooperate with
the executive office and furnish any information in the possession of the
agencies including, but not limited to, tax returns and applications for
public assistance or financial aid; provided further, that in conducting
income verifications, the executive office may enter into an
interdepartmental service agreement with the department of revenue to
utilize the department of revenue’s wage reporting and bank match system
to verify the income and eligibility of participants in federally-assisted
housing programs and that of members of the participants’ households;
provided further, that notwithstanding section 12 of chapter 490 of the acts
of 1980, the executive office may authorize neighborhood housing services
corporations to retain, reassign and reloan funds received in repayment of
loans made under the neighborhood housing services rehabilitation
program; provided further, that not later than September 16, 2026, the
executive office shall promulgate and uniformly enforce regulations
clarifying that a household that otherwise qualifies for any preference or
priority for state-subsidized housing based on homeless or at-risk status
shall retain that preference or priority notwithstanding receipt of assistance
that is intended to be temporary including, but not limited to, any temporary
or bridge subsidies provided with state or federal funds, which shall include
households receiving assistance under item said 7004-0108 after July 1,
2013; provided further, that the executive office shall operate local offices
in the 10 cities and towns in which the executive office maintained office
locations as of January 1, 2026 in order to continue to accept in-person
applications and provide other services related to the emergency
assistance housing program funded by item 7004-0101; provided further,
that the offices shall have sufficient staffing to determine eligibility promptly
and provide other program services to families; provided further, that the
executive office may operate additional local offices in other municipalities
that are geographically convenient to those families who are experiencing
homelessness or are at risk of homelessness; provided further, that not
later than September 2, 2026, the executive office shall submit a report to
the house and senate committees on ways and means that shall include,
but not be limited to, for each local office: (i) the municipality in which each
office is located; (ii) the ways in which applicants can submit applications
and connect with staff, including, if available, in-person, by telephone and
online; (iii) the daily business hours of in-person and telephonic operation
of each office; (iv) the number of full-time equivalent staff assigned to each
office; (v) the average wait time for direct communication with a staff
member whether in-person or by telephone; and (vi) any steps the
executive office plans to take to increase accessibility to intake services
related to emergency assistance housing programs across the
commonwealth; provided further, that at least annually, the executive
office shall conduct staff trainings which shall include, but not be limited
to, notice of changes in laws related to items of appropriation under the
administration of the executive office; provided further, that the executive
office shall provide the caseload forecasting office with enrollment data
and any other information pertinent to caseload forecasting that is

Conference Committee Report
requested by the office on a monthly basis; provided further, that such
information shall be provided in a manner that meets all applicable federal
and state privacy and security requirements; provided further, that not less
than $200,000 shall be expended for Massachusetts Fair Housing Center,
Inc. to protect residents from housing discrimination; and provided further,
that not less than $175,000 shall be expended for technical assistance for
municipalities implementing the seasonal community designation under
section 32 of chapter 23B of the General Laws; ............................................... $22,400,301
7004-0100 For the operations of the homeless shelter and services unit, including the
compensation of caseworkers and support personnel; provided, that the
executive office of housing and livable communities shall take steps to
extend intake hours for families seeking assistance from item 7004-0101;
and provided further, that not less than $2,240,000 shall be expended to the
city of Boston for a grant program to providers as contracted service
coordinators, to provide supportive recovery housing, such as sober and
halfway housing, for individuals to continue their recovery .................................. $29,515,982
7004-0101 For certain expenses of the emergency housing assistance program under
section 30 of chapter 23B of the General Laws, including homelessness
prevention, diversion and strategic re-housing, and contracted family
shelters; provided, that eligibility shall be limited to families with incomes
at or below 115 per cent of the 2026 or a later-issued higher federal
poverty level; provided further, that any family whose income exceeds 200
per cent of the federal poverty level for a sustained and consecutive period
of 120 days while the family is receiving assistance funded by this item
shall become ineligible for assistance; provided further, that families who
are eligible for assistance through a temporary emergency family shelter
shall include families who: (i) are at risk of domestic abuse in their current
housing situation or are homeless because they fled domestic violence
and have not had access to safe, permanent housing since leaving the
housing situation that they fled; (ii) through no fault of their own, are
homeless due to fire, flood or natural disaster; (iii) through no fault of their
own, have been subject to eviction from their most recent housing due to:
(a) foreclosure; (b) condemnation; (c) conduct by a guest or former
household member who is not part of the household seeking emergency
shelter and over whose conduct the remaining household members had
no control; or (d) nonpayment of rent caused by a documented medical
condition or diagnosed disability or caused by a documented loss of
income within the last 12 months directly as a result of a change in
household composition or a loss of income source through no fault of the
family; or (iv) are in a housing situation where they are not the primary
leaseholder or are in a housing situation not meant for human habitation
and where there is a substantial health and safety risk to the family that is
likely to result in significant harm should the family remain in the housing
situation; provided further, that not less than $40,000 shall be expended to
Boston GLASS programming through Justice Resource Institute Health
program to reengage the community into services offered by bolstering its
3 main service areas which are the drop-in space, STI testing, and
therapy; provided further, that not less than $350,000 shall be expended
for Horizons for Homeless Children, Inc.; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended for Jewish Family Services of Metrowest
to develop a collaborative partnership for implementing innovative housing
solutions, including the education related to and development of accessory
dwelling units; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended for El Buen Samaritano Food Program, Inc, in partnership with

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
the city of Worcester’s division of emergency management, to support the
creation and administration of a support center for individuals displaced by
building fires; provided further, that benefits under this item shall only be
provided to families consisting entirely of residents of the commonwealth
who are citizens of the United States or persons lawfully admitted for
permanent residence or otherwise permanently residing under the color of
law in the United States, except in cases where a child in the family is a
citizen of the United States, a person lawfully admitted for permanent
residence or a person permanently residing under color of law in the
United States; provided further, that temporary emergency assistance
shall be provided to families who, on the date of application for emergency
assistance, have no other feasible alternative housing as defined under
760 CMR 67.06(1)(b), whether in the commonwealth or elsewhere, and
who, but for not having spent 1 night in a public or private place not
designed for or ordinarily used as a regular sleeping accommodation for
human beings including, but not limited to, a car, park, abandoned
building, medical facility, bus or train station, airport or campground, would
be eligible for emergency assistance under clauses (i) to (iv), inclusive;
provided further, that the executive office of housing and livable
communities shall submit quarterly reports, broken down by month, to the
house and senate committees on ways and means detailing expenditures
under the preceding proviso, including: (1) the number of families who
received emergency assistance under the preceding proviso; (2) the
number of families entering the emergency assistance system after having
already stayed in a place not meant for human habitation; (3) the number
of families entering the emergency assistance system having stayed in a
place not meant for human habitation after having requested services
provided for in this item within the preceding 6 months and within the
preceding week; (4) the number of families described under clause (3) who
received a written denial of their request for services prior to staying in a
place not meant for human habitation and the number who neither entered
the emergency shelter system nor received a written denial on the day of
their request; and (5) available data on the race and ethnicity of the
families described under clauses (1) to (4) inclusive; provided further, that
nothing contained in this item shall require that emergency assistance be
provided to a family that, on the date of application for emergency
assistance, has other feasible housing as defined under said 760 CMR
67.06(1)(b), whether in the commonwealth or elsewhere, and that said
housing adequately accommodates the size and disabilities of the family;
provided further, that not less than annually, the executive office shall
provide training to relevant staff to ensure compliance with legal
requirements related to eligibility for the emergency housing assistance
program, including eligibility based on a family having no other feasible
alternative housing as defined under said 760 CMR 67.06(1)(b); provided
further, that the executive office shall collaborate with the executive office
of health and human services, the Massachusetts interagency council on
housing and homelessness and family homelessness service providers on
strategies and best practices for the prevention of family homelessness;
provided further, that the health and safety risk shall be determined by the
department of children and families or a department-approved entity
through risk assessments; provided further, that a family who receives
emergency housing assistance due to domestic abuse shall be connected
to the appropriate social service agency; provided further, that temporary
assistance under this item shall be terminated upon the offer of available
housing or other assistance sufficient to maintain or stabilize housing;
provided further, that a family may not decline an offer for available

Conference Committee Report
housing if the offer adequately accommodates the size and disabilities of
the family and the new housing placement would not result in a job loss
for the client; provided further, that any family who declines an adequate
offer of available housing or other assistance sufficient to maintain or
stabilize housing shall become ineligible for assistance from this item;
provided further, that families receiving benefits under this item shall have
30 per cent of their income set aside in a savings account, subject to
reasonable exceptions as set forth under executive office regulations in
effect in fiscal year 2027; provided further, that the amount saved shall be
exempt from otherwise applicable asset limits; provided further, that the
family may withdraw the amount placed in savings upon transition to
permanent housing or losing eligibility for shelter services; provided
further, that families receiving emergency assistance shall receive housing
search assistance that attempts to facilitate a sustainable housing
placement within 4 weeks of entry into the emergency assistance shelter,
motel or hotel; provided further, that families receiving assistance for
longer than 32 weeks shall have an executable shelter exit plan that
facilitates a housing placement in a new sustainable tenancy or a safe
residence including, but not limited to, a placement for which the family is
not the primary leaseholder, as soon as possible; provided further, that
funds may be advanced to contracted service providers to cover 1-time
upfront costs needed to operate shelters; provided further, that as part of
executive office efforts to prevent abuse of the emergency assistance
program, the executive office shall enter into a wage match agreement
with the department of revenue; provided further, that eligibility for shelter
by an otherwise eligible family shall not be impaired by prior receipt of any
nonshelter benefit; provided further, that an eligible household that is
approved for shelter placement shall be placed in a shelter as close as
possible to the household’s home community, unless a household
requests otherwise; provided further, that if the closest available
placement is not within 20 miles of the household’s home community, the
executive office shall, to the extent practicable, make best efforts to
transfer the household to an appropriate shelter within 20 miles of its home
community at the earliest possible date, unless the household requests
otherwise; provided further, that the executive office shall notify local
school departments of the placement of a family in its district within 5 days
of placement; provided further, that the executive office shall make every
effort to ensure that children receiving services from this item shall
continue attending school in the community in which they lived before
receiving services funded from this item; provided further, that the
executive office shall use its best efforts to ensure that a family placed by
the emergency housing assistance program shall be provided with access
to refrigeration and basic cooking facilities; provided further, that if a family
with a child under the age of 3 is placed in a hotel or motel, the executive
office shall ensure that the hotel or motel provides a crib that meets all
state and federal safety codes for each child under the age of 3; provided
further, that the executive office may require identity and custody
verifications needed to ensure the safety of children prior to placement into
shelter; provided further, that the executive office shall verify, through
third-party verification or otherwise, prior to placement in an emergency
shelter, for each emergency housing assistance applicant, their: (A)
identity; (B) Massachusetts residency; (C) relationship status; (D)
pregnancy status; and (E) other eligibility requirements in this item and
pursuant to 760 CMR 67.00 or any successor regulations; provided
further, that the executive office shall not be required to provide shelter to
families who are unable to provide required verifications pursuant to the

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
previous proviso prior to placement; provided further, that the executive
office may offer a case-specific waiver for exigent circumstances and at
the discretion of the executive office pursuant to regulations promulgated
by the executive office including case-specific waivers for: (I) an imminent
threat of domestic violence; (II) families with a family member who has a
documented disability; (III) a qualified veteran under clause Forty-third of
section 7 of chapter 4 of the General Laws who is not enrolled in services
specifically tailored to veterans including, but not limited to, those
administered by the executive office of veterans services; and (IV) families
with a family member who has a high-risk pregnancy or who has recently
given birth; provided further, that the executive office shall require each
applicant for emergency housing assistance program benefits to establish
residency in the commonwealth; provided further, that an applicant shall
be required to show an intent to remain in in the commonwealth, which
may be shown through sources of verification accepted by the executive
office pursuant to regulations, including documentation showing a person
receives MassHealth, documentation showing a person receives public
benefits in the commonwealth, a bill or other insurance documentation with
an address, email, letter or statement from a licensed health care worker
on office letterhead or office email stating that the person lives in the
commonwealth or a photo identification issued by the commonwealth;
provided further, that families receiving shelter benefits who are found
ineligible for continuing shelter benefits shall be eligible for aid pending a
timely appeal under said chapter 23B; provided further, that this item shall
be subject to appropriation and in the event of a deficiency, nothing in this
item shall give rise to or shall be construed as giving rise to any
enforceable right or entitlement to services in excess of the amounts
appropriated in this item; provided further, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, not less than 90 days before
promulgating or amending any regulations, administrative practices or
policies that would alter eligibility for or the level of benefits under this
program, other than that which would benefit the clients, the executive
office shall submit a report to the joint committee on children, families and
persons with disabilities, the house and senate committees on ways and
means and the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate
setting forth justification for such changes including, but not limited to, any
determination by the secretary of housing and livable communities that
available appropriations will be insufficient to meet projected expenses
and the projected savings from any proposed changes; provided further,
that no funds from this item shall be expended for personnel or
administrative costs; provided further, that the executive office shall submit
quarterly reports, broken down by month, to the house and senate
committees on ways and means detailing emergency assistance system
capacity; provided further, that the executive office shall submit quarterly
reports to the house and senate committees on ways and means, broken
down by month, with the most recently available monthly data, including
data on the race and ethnicity of all families where available and applicable
and expressed as a percentage of the total, on: (A) applications for
services provided for in this item and in item 7004-0108 and requests for
services under this item and item 7004-0108, with a request for services
defined as any point at which the household seeking services provides
information to the executive office as part of any enrollment, triage or
eligibility determination, regardless of whether a formal application is
completed and regardless of whether the contact is by telephone, by office
visit or by other means; (B) front-door entries into the emergency
assistance system; (C) applications and requests for services provided for

Conference Committee Report
in this item and in said item 7004-0108 that are denied and the bases of
all such denials expressed as a percentage of the total; (D) applications
and requests for services provided for in this item and in said item 7004-
0108 that do not result in a formal denial, a front-door entry into the
emergency assistance system or verified diversion as a result of
HomeBASE household assistance expressed as a percentage of the total;
(E) the number of households submitting multiple applications or making
multiple requests for services within the previous 1-month period and the
previous 6-month period; (F) diversions as a result of HomeBASE
household assistance; (G) exits from the emergency assistance system,
delineated by reason for exit, including at-fault terminations, exits because
the household is no longer income eligible, exits through HomeBASE
household assistance with no other subsidy and exits to affordable,
subsidized or otherwise assisted housing; (H) the number of applications
and requests that do not result in the household entering emergency
assistance shelter within 48 hours and for which such non-entry is
attributable to each of the following: written denial, pending documentation
or verifications, no imminent homelessness or household withdrawal of the
application; (I) the average, minimum and maximum cost per family of
emergency assistance under this item; (J) the number of families served
under this item who required further assistance under this item or under
said item 7004-0108 at a later date; (K) the type of assistance later
required and provided; (L) the total number of families receiving assistance
under item 7004-0101 that have received assistance under this item or
said item 7004-0108 during each of the previous 1, 2 and 3 years; (M) the
number of children served under this item broken down by age; (N) the
number of applications and requests from households that became
homeless within 12 months of depleting their HomeBASE household
assistance under said item 7004-0108; (O) the reasons for homelessness
in the applications and requests received under clause (N) and the number
of applications and requests received under said clause (N) that are
denied; and (P) the average and maximum length of stay for families
currently staying in an emergency assistance shelter placement; provided
further, that said quarterly reports shall also include the following
information from the department of children and families: (I) the number of
families assessed for a health and safety risk in the previous quarter; (II)
the number of families determined to be at a substantial health and safety
risk; (III) the number of families receiving multiple health and safety
assessments within the previous 6-month period; and (IV) the standards
used to determine a substantial health and safety risk; provided further,
that said quarterly reports shall also include: (i) the number of families that
applied for a transfer from their current shelter placement to a unit that can
accommodate their disability-related needs, delineated by reason for the
application; (ii) the number of families whose applications for reasonable
accommodation have been approved but that are waiting for transfer due
to lack of available units able to accommodate their disability-related
needs, delineated by category of accommodation including, but not limited
to, access to cooking facilities, first-floor or elevator access, non-carpeted
unit, physical modification to unit, scattered site unit, geographic proximity
to service providers and wheelchair accessibility; (iii) the number of
families currently in shelter units located more than 20 miles away from
their home community; (iv) the number of families with at least 1 child who
attends a school other than the child’s school of origin as a result of
placement in a shelter unit outside of their home community; (v) both the
average and maximum number of days that families spend in placements
under the circumstances described in clauses (ii) to (iv), inclusive, prior to

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
being transferred to a shelter unit for which none of the circumstances in
said clauses (ii) to (iv), inclusive, apply; (vi) the percentage of applications
for a transfer that were approved; and (vii) the average number of days
and the maximum number of days between the application submission
and the approval; provided further, that funds shall be expended on shelter
units suitable to meet the needs of households with disabilities requiring
reasonable accommodation; provided further, that funds shall be
expended for expenses incurred as a result of families being housed in
hotels due to the unavailability of contracted shelter beds; and provided
further, that not less than $800,000 shall be expended for the Home Works
program to provide opportunities for children in the emergency housing
assistance program to attend out-of-school time and summer
programming run by youth-serving organizations; provided further, that a
youth-serving organization shall apply to contract with the executive office
of housing and livable communities to receive contract slots to serve
children in the Home Works program; provided further, that the executive
office may expend funds for the administration and implementation of the
Home Works program ..................................................................................... $259,900,648
7004-0102 For the homelessness program to assist individuals who are homeless or
in danger of becoming homeless, including assistance to organizations
that provide shelter, transitional housing and services that help individuals
avoid entry into shelters or successfully exit shelters; provided, that no
organization providing services to the homeless shall receive less than an
average per bed, per night rate of $25; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended for the United Way of Pioneer Valley on behalf
of the Western Massachusetts Network to End Homelessness to facilitate
regional coordination across Hampden, Hampshire, Franklin and
Berkshire Counties to prevent and end homelessness with a Housing First
approach that centers around racial equity; provided further, that no funds
shall be expended for costs associated with the homeless management
information system; provided further, that the executive office shall submit
quarterly reports to the house and senate committees on ways and means
on the contracts awarded to service providers; provided further, that the
reports shall include, but not be limited to: (i) each contracted service
provider; (ii) the amount of the contracts; (iii) a description of the services
to be provided; (iv) the length of said contract; and (v) the date upon which
each contract was executed; provided further, that not less than
$94,000,000 appropriated in this item shall be allocated to contracted
service providers of homeless individuals in fiscal year 2020; and provided
further, that programs currently providing shelter may renegotiate how to
use said program's shelter fund, with the agreement of the executive office
and the host municipality, to provide alternative services proven to be
effective, including housing first models, transitional housing and diversion
away from shelters .......................................................................................... $114,086,718
7004-0104 For the home and healthy for good program operated by the
Massachusetts Housing and Shelter Alliance, Inc. to reduce the incidence
of chronic and long-term homelessness in the commonwealth; provided,
that not less than $250,000 shall be expended to continue a supportive
housing initiative for unaccompanied homeless young adults who identify
as lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer or questioning; provided
further, that the Massachusetts Housing and Shelter Alliance, Inc. shall be
solely responsible for the administration of this program; provided further,
that not later than March 3, 2027, the Massachusetts Housing and Shelter
Alliance, Inc. shall submit a report to the executive office of housing and

Conference Committee Report
livable communities, the joint committee on housing the house and senate
committees on ways and means and the clerks of the house of
representatives and the senate, detailing: (i) the number of people served,
including available demographic information; (ii) the average cost per
participant; (iii) whether participants have previously received services
from the executive office; and (iv) any projected cost-savings to the
commonwealth associated with this program; and provided further, that not
less than $500,000 shall be expended to the Massachusetts Housing and
Shelter Alliance, Inc. for the purpose of promotion, resource development
and technical assistance related to the creation of permanent supportive
housing for persons with disabilities who are experiencing homelessness
and other solutions to homelessness ................................................................... $8,890,000
7004-0105 For permanent supportive housing units to house individuals experiencing
homelessness and mitigate overcrowding in homeless shelters; provided,
that not less than $2,100,000 may be expended to sustain low-threshold
sponsor-based leasing that had been previously linked to the pay-for-
success projects funded through the Social Innovation Financing Trust Fund
established under section 35VV of chapter 10 of the General Laws; provided
further, that the executive office of housing and livable communities shall
prioritize geographic equity when expending funds from this item; provided
further, that the executive office may contract directly with the
organizations that received Social Innovation Financing vouchers funded
under item 7004-9024 in fiscal year 2022; and provided further, that not
later than March 3, 2027, the executive office shall submit a report to the
house and senate committees on ways and means detailing the
distribution methodology and locations of units supported by this item ............ $10,572,875
7004-0106 For the continued implementation and evaluation of the homeless family
preference in private multi-family housing program established by New
Lease for Homeless Families, Inc. ......................................................................... $250,000
7004-0107 For the administration of local housing programs; provided, that not less
than $125,000 shall be expended for the Friendly House, Inc. in the city of
Worcester; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
for the Quinsigamond Village Community Center,Inc. at Greenwood park
in the city of Worcester; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall
be expended to the Housing Assistance Corporation for the development
of housing and project feasibility studies to expedite the creation of year-
round housing, and for technical assistance related to accessory dwelling
units for year-round rentals; provided further that not less than $50,000
shall be expended to Housing Families Inc. for its homeless children
program in Malden; provided further, that not less than $30,000 shall be
expended to Emmaus, Inc. to support their shelter and services to the
homeless population of Haverhill; provided further, that not less than
$5,000 shall be expended to the North Attleborough Housing Authority to
purchase furniture and other needs for the properties’ common areas;
provided, that not less than $5,000 shall be expended to the Mansfield
Housing Authority to purchase furniture and other needs for the properties’
common areas; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to the Greater Lawrence Community Action Council, Inc. to
support the Heal Lawrence program in providing critical emergency
relocation assistance, comprehensive stabilization services, and proactive
community education for families displaced by fires and other residential
emergencies in the city of Lawrence; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to Quincy Community Action Programs, Inc.

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
for homelessness prevention service; provided further, that not less than
$500,000 shall be expended for the Saving Towards Affordable and
Sustainable Homeownership program administered by the Massachusetts
Affordable Homeownership Alliance, Inc. to assist first-generation
homebuyers in a regionally equitable manner to benefit communities
throughout the commonwealth; and provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended for a van for the Housing Corporation of
Arlington; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended
for the New Americans Community Development Corporation to support
the development of affordable housing; provided further, that not less than
$150,000 shall be expended to Compass Working Capital, Inc. to support
the expansion of the Family Self-Sufficiency program to eligible
households in the greater Boston area; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be expended for the Southwest Boston Community
Development Corporation to assist with planning, programming and
operations; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended
for SouthCoast Fair Housing, Inc. to promote equitable access to safe,
affordable housing for all residents throughout Bristol and Plymouth
counties; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended
for Action for Boston Community Development, Inc. for its mobile
homeless outreach team for service in the cities of Boston, Everett,
Malden and Medford; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be
expended for Community Action Agency of Somerville, Inc. for tenant
rights education and advocacy; provided further, that not less than
$200,000 shall be expended to the city of Somerville to continue a short-
term housing bridge pilot program to facilitate interim housing stability for
individuals applying for more affordable permanent housing situations;
provided further, that eligibility for the pilot program shall include
households with individuals: (i) age 60 or older residing in the city of
Somerville, who are otherwise eligible for housing under item 7004-9005
or item 7004-9024; (ii) with incomes not more than 80 per cent of the area
median income; and (iii) at risk of eviction due to their inability to
consistently pay rent; provided further, that households participating in the
pilot program shall not, while receiving such assistance, be required to pay
more than 30 per cent of their monthly adjusted income for rent; provided
further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended for Housing
Families Inc. for regional shared services; provided further, that not less
than $75,000 shall be expended for Community Day Center of Waltham,
Inc. to maintain patient safety and security; provided further, that not less
than $75,000 shall be expended for W.A.T.C.H., Inc. to support staffing
and its programs to prevent evictions; provided further, that not less than
$300,000 shall be expended as a grant to the Lynn Housing Authority to
provide housing stabilization services and information and referral
services to households who face significant barriers to sustaining housing,
including, but not limited to, those who are currently or previously have
been served with: (i) residential assistance payments under item 7004-
9316; or (ii) emergency rental assistance and other services under the
state 2019 novel coronavirus eviction diversion initiative; provided further,
that not less than $150,000 shall be expended for The Builder Coalition,
Inc. to advance efforts to meet the commonwealth’s housing production
and affordable housing goals by providing support and training to enable
emerging local developers to meet construction and community standards
and needs; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
to the city of Revere for its first time homebuyer downpayment assistance
program; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
for North Suffolk Community Services, Inc. to coordinate and implement

Conference Committee Report
eviction sealing outreach and coordination; provided further, that not less
than $60,000 shall be expended for Welcome Home, Inc. in the city of
Newton for its home goods pantry; provided further, that not less than
$45,000 shall be expended for Newton At Home, Inc. to provide financial
assistance to qualifying seniors in the city of Newton; provided further, that
not less than $95,000 shall be expended to Pathway to Possible, Inc. in
the city of Newton to provide housing, support and advocacy for people
with cognitive and developmental disabilities; provided further, that not
less than $150,000 shall be expended for the Jewish Alliance for Law and
Social Action, Inc. for outreach related to and the operation of its
confronting the history of housing discrimination curriculum and for the
development of additional curriculum units; provided further, that not less
than $100,000 shall be expended for B-HOUSE Inc. to provide support
and resources for homeless youth; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be expended for the Boston Affordable Housing Coalition,
Inc., doing business as the Mass Alliance of HUD Tenants, for the
establishment of a tenancy preservation fund for low-income
individuals facing eviction in the city of Boston; provided further, that not
less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Boston Housing Authority to
support planning, design and relocation expenses for housing in the
Charlestown section of the city of Boston; provided further, that not less
than $25,000 shall be expended to Centro De Apoyo Familiar (the
“Corporation”) to build affordable housing in the city of Haverhill; provided
further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the Brockton
Housing Authority for the redevelopment of the Campello High Rise in the
city of Brockton; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be
expended for the Big Hope Project Inc in the city of Fitchburg for the launch
and operation of Hope House, a reentry-focused transitional housing,
recidivism prevention and workforce development program serving
justice-impacted individuals across the commonwealth; provided further,
that not less than $25,000 shall be expended for Belonging to Each Other,
Inc. to provide transitional housing for adults experiencing homelessness
during the cold weather months and housing restoration services year-
round in the town of Falmouth; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be expended to the Lower Cape Cod Community
Development Corporation for the study, analysis and promotion of funding
affordable and attainable year-round housing, including recommended
policy tools, to support year-round communities on the lower and outer
cape; provided further, that not less than $150,000 shall be expended for
Jewish Family Service of Metrowest, Inc. to develop a collaborative
partnership for implementing innovative housing solutions, including
education related to and the development of accessory dwelling units;
provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended to Manna
Kitchen, Inc. for its work to support unhoused and housing insecure
individuals at St. John's Episcopal Church in the city of Northampton; and
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the
Center for Human Development, Incorporated for a grant to the Western
Massachusetts Network to End Homelessness to support housing stability
and homelessness prevention programs ............................................................ $3,685,000
7004-0108 For a program of short-term housing assistance to help families eligible for
temporary emergency shelter under item 7004-0101 in addressing
obstacles to maintaining or securing housing; provided, that the assistance
shall include not less than 12 months of housing stabilization and
economic self-sufficiency case management services for each family
receiving benefits under this item; provided further, that a family shall not

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
receive more than $30,000 in a 24-month period from this item; provided
further, the executive office of housing and livable communities shall
provide household assistance in an amount up to $15,000, or a higher cap
established in item 7004-0108, for a subsequent 12-month period to
eligible families; provided further, that not less than $2,500,000 shall be
made available to administering agencies for circumstances in which the
administering agency believes an award greater than $30,000 in a 24-
month period is essential to resolve a housing crisis, in accordance with
guidance from the executive office of housing and livable communities;
provided further, that so long as a family meets the requirements of its
housing stabilization plan, a family that received household assistance
under this item whose income increases shall not become ineligible for
assistance due to exceeding the income limit; provided further, that a
family shall not be deemed ineligible as a result of any single violation of
a self-sufficiency plan; provided further, that the executive office of housing
and livable communities shall take all steps necessary to enforce
regulations to prevent abuse in the short-term housing transition program,
including a wage match agreement with the department of revenue;
provided further, that a family that was terminated from the program or did
not make a good faith effort to follow its housing stabilization plan during
the term of its assistance shall be ineligible for benefits under said item
7004-0101 and this item for 12 months from the last date the family
received financial assistance under said item 7004-0101 and this item;
provided further, that a family’s housing stabilization plan shall adequately
accommodate the ages and disabilities of the family members; provided
further, that families receiving benefits under this program who are found
ineligible for continuing benefits shall be eligible for aid pending a timely
appeal under chapter 23B of the General Laws; provided further, that
families who are denied assistance under this item may appeal that denial
under said chapter 23B, including subsection (F) of section 30 of said
chapter 23B and regulations adopted to implement said chapter 23B;
provided further, that the executive office, as a condition of continued
eligibility for assistance under this program, may require disclosure of social
security numbers by all members of a family receiving assistance under
this item for use in verification of income with other agencies, departments
and executive offices; provided further, that if a family member fails to
provide a social security number for use in verifying the family's income
and eligibility, then the family shall no longer be eligible to receive benefits
from this program; provided further, that the executive office shall
administer this program through the following agencies unless
administering agencies are otherwise procured by the executive office: the
Hearthway, Inc.; Central Massachusetts Housing Alliance, Inc.;
Community Teamwork Inc.; the Housing Assistance Corporation; the
Franklin county regional housing and redevelopment authority; Way
Finders, Inc.; Metropolitan Boston Housing Partnership, Inc., d/b/a Metro
Housing Boston; the Lynn Housing Authority and Neighborhood
Development Group, Inc.; the South Middlesex Opportunity Council, Inc.;
NeighborWorks Housing Solutions; and RCAP Solutions, Inc.; provided
further, that the executive office shall reallocate funding based on
performance-based statistics from underperforming service providers to
above average service providers in order to move as many families from
hotels, motels or shelters into more sustainable housing; provided further,
that the executive office shall use funds provided under this program for
stabilization workers to focus efforts on housing retention and to link
households to supports, including job training, education, job search and
child care opportunities available, and may enter into agreements with

Conference Committee Report
other public and private agencies for the provision of such services;
provided further, that a stabilization worker shall be assigned to each
household; provided further, that funds shall be used to more rapidly
transition families served by the program into temporary or permanent
sustainable housing; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, not less than 90 days before promulgating or
amending any regulation, administrative practice or policy that would alter
eligibility for or the level of benefits under this program to less than the
benefit level available on June 30, 2026, the executive office shall submit
a report to the house and senate committees on ways and means and the
clerks of the house of representatives and the senate setting forth the
justification for such changes including, but not limited to, any
determination by the secretary of housing and livable communities that
available appropriations will be insufficient to meet projected expenses;
provided further, that the executive office shall submit quarterly reports to
the house and senate committees on ways and means, which shall
include, but not be limited to, the: (i) number of families served, including
available demographic information, as well as the number of children
served under this item broken down by age; (ii) type of assistance given;
(iii) average, minimum and maximum cost per family of said assistance;
(iv) total number of families receiving benefits under said item 7004-0101
that have received assistance under said item 7004-0108 during the
previous 1, 2 and 3 years, including available demographic information;
(v) the amount of shelter exits created by this line item; and (vi) the amount
of families diverted from emergency assistance shelters; provided further,
that the executive office shall expend funds under said item 7004-0108 on
families residing in temporary emergency shelters and family residential
treatment or sober living programs under items 4512-0200 and 4513-1136
if said families otherwise meet all eligibility requirements applicable to
emergency shelter under item 7004-0101, except that, solely for the
purposes of this item, the fact that a family is residing in a temporary
emergency domestic violence shelter under item 4513-1136 or in a family
residential treatment or sober living program under item 4512-0200 shall
not preclude said family from receiving assistance; provided further, that
this item shall be subject to appropriation and, in the event of a deficiency,
nothing in this item shall give rise to, or shall be construed as giving rise
to, any enforceable right or entitlement to services in excess of the
amounts appropriated in this item; provided further, the executive office of
housing and livable communities shall submit quarterly reports to the house
and senate committees on ways and means, which shall include, but not be
limited to, efforts made to work in collaboration with the office for refugees
and immigrants and resettlement agencies; and provided further, that
household assistance funds shall be advanced to the administering
agencies at the end of each month and before the next month's
disbursement, the amount of which shall be estimated based on the prior
month’s expenditure with a reconciliation not less than annually ..................... $82,322,001
7004-0109 For the shelter workforce development initiative, to provide pathways to
careers in fields related to housing and homelessness; provided, that funds
shall be expended to address barriers to obtaining and sustaining shelter
employment including, but not limited to, transportation, loan repayment,
tuition or certification fee reimbursement and child care; provided further,
that, not less than $5,000,000 be made available to shelters contracted
through item 7004-0101; provided further, that not less than $5,000,000 be
made available to shelters contracted through item 7004-0102; and
provided further, that not later than March 3, 2027, the secretary of housing

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
and livable communities shall submit a report to the joint committee on
housing and the house and senate committees on ways and means
detailing the expenditures and hiring outcomes of the program ...................... $10,000,000
7004-0110 For diversion of homeless families from emergency assistance shelters;
provided, that services shall be targeted to families who are either eligible
for the emergency housing assistance program under 7004-0101, or likely
to become eligible for services under 7004-0101, according to guidance
developed by the executive office of housing and livable communities ............. $5,000,000
7004-0202 For the rapid transition of homeless individuals into sustainable permanent
housing; provided, that programs under this item shall be administered by
direct service providers contracted under item 7004-0102; provided
further, that these programs may include, but shall not be limited to,
vocational training, temporary assistance and permanent supportive
housing; and provided further, that not later than February 3, 2027, the
executive office of housing and livable communities shall submit a report
to the house and senate committees on ways and means on the: (i) total
number of people served; (ii) total number of people transitioned into
permanent housing; (iii) types of programs implemented; (iv) vocational
training programs, delineated by job type; (v) number of people participating
in said training programs; (vi) number of people who transitioned from said
training programs into full time employment; (vii) number of people exiting
the shelter system as a result of full time employment; and (viii) number of
people diverted from the shelter system ............................................................ $5,000,000
7004-3036 For housing services and counseling; provided, that funds shall be
expended as grants to 9 regional housing consumer education centers
operated by the regional nonprofit housing authorities; provided further,
that the grants shall be awarded through a competitive application process
under criteria established by the executive office of housing and livable
communities; provided further, that the executive office shall submit annual
reports to the secretary of administration and finance, the house and senate
committees on ways and means and the joint committee on housing
detailing all expenditures of the program, including each regional housing
consumer education center, the total number of persons who received
information and referral services, the costs for such services rendered per
consumer and the identification of consumer issues and trends; provided
further, that not later than January 4, 2027, the executive office shall submit
a report to the house and senate committees on ways and means on
possible savings and efficiencies that may be realized through the
consolidation of said services; and provided further, that not less than
$200,000 shall be expended for the Regional Housing Network of
Massachusetts, Inc. for coordination and information technology ...................... $5,700,000
7004-4314 For the expenses of a service coordinators program established by the
executive office of housing and livable communities to assist tenants
residing in state-aided public housing; provided, that the executive office
shall distribute funding for resident service coordinators in a
geographically equitable manner; and provided further, that funding shall
be made available for resident service coordinators that serve multiple
smaller housing authorities ................................................................................. $6,500,000
7004-9005 For subsidies to housing authorities and nonprofit organizations, including
funds for deficiencies caused by certain reduced rentals in housing for the
elderly, handicapped, veterans, families and relocated persons under

Conference Committee Report
sections 32 and 40 of chapter 121B of the General Laws; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, all housing
authorities operating elderly public housing shall offer first preference for
elderly public housing units that are vacant on the effective date of this act,
and thereafter, to those persons 60 years of age or older as of June 30,
2026 receiving rental assistance from the Massachusetts rental voucher
program; provided further, that the executive office of housing and livable
communities may expend funds appropriated under this item for
deficiencies caused by certain reduced rentals that may be anticipated in
the operation of housing authorities for the first quarter of the subsequent
fiscal year; provided further, that no funds shall be expended from this item
to reimburse the debt service reserve included in the budgets of housing
authorities; provided further, that not less than $15,000 shall be expended
for necessary repairs within the Norwell Housing Authority in the town of
Norwell; provided further, that not less than $15,000 shall be expended for
necessary repairs within the Rockland Housing Authority in the town of
Rockland; provided further, that no funds shall be expended from this item
in the AA object class for the compensation of state employees; provided
further, that the amount appropriated in this item shall be considered to
meet all obligations under said sections 32 and 40 of said chapter 121B;
provided further, that new reduced rental units developed in fiscal year
2027 and eligible for subsidies under this item shall not cause any
annualization that results in an amount exceeding the amount
appropriated in this item; provided further, that all funds in excess of
normal utilities, operations and maintenance costs may be expended for
capital repairs; provided further, that no employee of a housing authority
shall simultaneously be an elected executive officer within the same
municipality in which the authority is located; and provided further, that the
administration shall make every attempt to direct efforts toward
rehabilitating housing authority family units requiring $10,000 or less in
repairs ............................................................................................................. $117,840,000
7004-9007 For costs associated with the implementation of the duties of the executive
office of housing and livable communities under chapter 235 of the acts of
2014; provided, that in conjunction with said duties, funds may be
expended on the creation and implementation of an information
technology platform for state-aided public housing to be administered by
the executive office; and provided further, that the executive office, in
making changes to said information technology platform, shall collaborate
and coordinate with housing authorities to ensure equitable and effective
systems ............................................................................................................... $1,243,831
7004-9024 For the Massachusetts rental voucher program to provide rental
assistance for low-income families and elderly persons through mobile and
project-based vouchers; provided, that the income of eligible households
shall not exceed 80 per cent of the area median income; provided further,
that the executive office of housing and livable communities may require
that not less than 75 per cent of newly issued vouchers be targeted to
households whose income at initial occupancy does not exceed 30 per
cent of the area median income; provided further, that the executive office
may award mobile vouchers to eligible households currently occupying
project-based units that shall expire due to the non-renewal of project-
based rental assistance contracts; provided further, that the executive
office may require disclosure of social security numbers by participants
and members of a participant’s household in the Massachusetts rental
voucher program for use in verification of income with other agencies,

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
departments and executive offices; provided further, that if a participant or
member of a participant’s household fails to provide a social security
number for use in verifying the household’s income and eligibility, then that
household shall no longer be eligible for a voucher or to receive benefits
from the voucher program; provided further, that a household receiving
assistance with a project-based voucher shall pay 30 per cent of its
monthly net income towards gross rent, with gross rent defined as the
contract rent plus an amount allowed by the executive office for tenant-
paid utilities, except that the household payment in any project-based unit
that is subsidized under another federal or state subsidy or public housing
program shall be subject to applicable limits on tenant paid rent under such
federal or state program; provided further, that until the implementation of
such payment standard, the monthly dollar amount of each voucher shall
be the executive office-approved monthly rent of the unit less the monthly
amount paid for rent by the household; provided further, that any
household that is proven to have caused intentional damage to its rental
unit in an amount exceeding 2 months of rent during any 1-year period
shall be terminated from the program; provided further, that if the use of a
mobile voucher is or has been discontinued, then the mobile voucher shall
be reassigned; provided further, that the executive office shall pay regional
administering agencies not less than $50 per voucher per month for the
costs of administering the program; provided further, that subsidies shall
not be reduced due to the cost of inspections; provided further, that the
executive office shall provide assistance using a payment standard so that
the required household payment for a household choosing a unit with
gross rent less than or equal to the payment standard shall be not more
than 30 per cent of the household’s monthly adjusted income, with gross
rent defined as the contract rent plus an amount allowed by the executive
office for tenant-paid utilities; provided further, that the payment standard
shall be set, at the discretion of the executive office, at either 110 per cent
of the current area-wide fair market rent or 110 per cent of the current
small area fair market rent, both as established by the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development for the same size of
dwelling unit in the same region, except as necessary as a reasonable
accommodation for a household member with a disability or as otherwise
directed by the executive office, except that a reduction by the United
States Department of Housing and Urban Development in such fair market
rental shall not reduce the payment standard applied to a household
continuing to reside in a unit without a change in voucher size for which
the household was receiving assistance at the time the fair market rent or
small area fair market rent was reduced; provided further, that if the gross
rent for the unit does not exceed the applicable payment standard, the
monthly assistance payment for the household for a mobile voucher shall
be equal to the gross rent less the required household payment; provided
further, that for a household receiving a mobile voucher under this item, if
the household chooses a unit with a gross rent that exceeds the applicable
payment standard, the monthly assistance payment for the household
shall be limited to the amount by which the applicable payment standard
exceeds 30 per cent of the monthly adjusted income of the household;
provided further, that even if a household with a mobile voucher chooses
a unit with gross rent exceeding the payment standard, at the time the
household initially leases that unit with a mobile voucher, the total amount
that the household may be required to pay toward gross rent, including the
amount by which the gross rent exceeds the payment standard, shall not
exceed 40 per cent of the monthly adjusted income of the household at
the time the household initially leases a unit with their mobile voucher;

Conference Committee Report
provided further, that households receiving mobile vouchers under this
section may pay more than 40 per cent of the monthly adjusted income of
the household, at their option; provided further, that the executive office
shall establish the amounts of the mobile and project-based vouchers so
that the appropriation in this item shall not be exceeded by payments for
rental assistance and administration; provided further, that the executive
office shall not enter into commitments that shall cause it to exceed the
appropriation set forth in this item; provided further, that participating local
housing authorities may take all steps necessary to enable them to
transfer mobile voucher program participants from the Massachusetts
rental voucher program into another housing subsidy program; provided
further, that the executive office’s approved monthly rent limits for mobile
vouchers issued or leased on or after July 1, 2026 shall be equal to 110
per cent of the area-wide or small area fair market rent, except as
necessary as a reasonable accommodation for a household member with
a disability, as determined by the executive office, based on unit size as
established annually by the United States Department of Housing and
Urban Development; provided further, that the requested rent level for
mobile vouchers shall be determined reasonable by the administering
agency; provided further, that for mobile vouchers currently leased, the
new rent limit shall not begin until the anniversary date of the lease;
provided further, that the executive office may assist housing authorities at
their written request, in the immediate implementation of a homeless
prevention program utilizing alternative housing resources available to
them for low-income families and the elderly by designating participants in
the Massachusetts rental voucher program as at risk of displacement by
public action through no fault of their own; provided further, that not later
than December 2, 2026, the executive office of housing and livable
communities shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means and the joint committee on housing on the utilization of
rental vouchers during the last 3 fiscal years under this item and item 7004-
9030; provided further, that the report shall include, but not be limited to, the:
(i) number and average value of rental vouchers currently distributed in the
commonwealth in each county and in each municipality; (ii) average number
of days that it takes for a household to utilize a voucher after receiving it
from the administering agency; (iii) number of households that reach the
date by which they must lease up their voucher without having found an
available unit; (iv) number of households that apply for an extension by the
deadline to lease up their voucher and the number of extensions granted;
(v) actions taken by the executive office to reduce the wait time for
households to lease up their voucher; (vi) number of distributed vouchers
available to be utilized; (vii) number and type of new vouchers issued after
July 1, 2026, including the costs associated with each type of new voucher;
(viii) number of families on a waitlist for an available rental voucher; (ix)
average number of days that it takes for project-based vouchers awarded
by the executive office to be utilized after the award is made; and (x)
obstacles faced by the executive office in its efforts to provide the
information detailed in the preceding provisos, if applicable; provided
further, that the report shall comply with state and federal privacy
standards; and provided further, that the executive office may expend
funds from this item for costs related to the completion of the voucher
management system, prior appropriation continued ....................................... $278,341,728
7004-9030 For the rental assistance program established in section 16 of chapter 179
of the acts of 1995; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special
law to the contrary, assistance may be provided in the form of either mobile

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
vouchers or project-based vouchers; provided further, that the vouchers
shall be in varying dollar amounts set by the executive office of housing
and livable communities based on considerations including, but not limited
to, household size, composition, household income and geographic
location; provided further, that the executive office’s approved monthly rent
limits for vouchers shall be set, at the discretion of the executive office, at
either up to 110 per cent of the current area-wide fair market rent or up to
110 per cent of the current small area fair market rent, except as necessary
as a reasonable accommodation for a household member with a disability
or as otherwise directed by the executive office, both based on unit size
as established annually by the United States Department of Housing and
Urban Development for the same size of dwelling unit in the same region;
provided further, that the requested rent level for vouchers shall be
determined reasonable by the administering agency; provided further, that
for vouchers currently leased, the new rent limit shall not begin until the
anniversary date of the lease; provided further, that any household that is
proven to have caused intentional damage to its rental unit in an amount
exceeding 2 months of rent during any 1-year period shall be terminated
from the program; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, there shall be no maximum percentage
applicable to the amount of income paid for rent by each household
holding a mobile voucher; provided further, that unless the executive office
implements a payment standard or utility allowance for the program, each
household may be required to pay not less than 25 per cent of its net
income as defined under regulations promulgated by the executive office
for units if payment of utilities is not provided by the unit owner or not less
than 30 per cent of its income for units if payment of utilities is provided by
the unit owner; provided further, that payments for the rental assistance
program may be provided in advance; provided further, that the executive
office shall establish the amounts of the mobile vouchers so that the
appropriation in this item is not exceeded by payments for rental
assistance and administration; provided further, that the executive office
shall not enter into commitments that shall cause it to exceed the
appropriation set forth in this item; provided further, that the amount of a
rental assistance voucher payment for an eligible household shall not
exceed the rent less the household’s minimum rent obligation; and
provided further, that not later than December 16, 2026, the executive
office shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways
and means detailing: (i) expenditures from this item; (ii) the number of
outstanding rental vouchers; and (iii) the number and types of units leased,
prior appropriation continued ............................................................................ $19,263,183
7004-9033 For rental subsidies to eligible clients of the department of mental health;
provided, that the executive office of housing and livable communities shall
establish the amounts of such subsidies so that payment of the rental
subsidies and of any other commitments from this item shall not exceed
the amount appropriated in this item. ................................................................ $17,548,125
7004-9034 For a housing assistance for re-entry transition pilot program; provided,
that the program shall be administered by the executive office of housing
and livable communities in consultation with the executive office of public
safety and security; provided further, that funds shall be expended for
rental subsidies to participants in re-entry programs funded under items
8000-0655 and 8900-1100 and nonprofit re-entry programs serving
participants returning to the community from a county correctional facility
or state prison; provided further, that the executive office of housing and

Conference Committee Report
livable communities shall establish the amount of said subsidies so that
executive office spending does not exceed the amount appropriated;
provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall be expended to Justice
4 Housing, Inc for housing, vocational and family reunification services for
justice involved individuals; provided further, that not less than $120,000
shall be expended for a kinship reentry pilot program to be administered
in coordination with the department of correction; and provided further, that
not later than June 30, 2027, the executive office of housing and livable
communities, in consultation with the department of correction, shall
submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and means,
which shall include but not be limited to: (i) the number of participants in
the pilot program; (ii) the counties of participants served; and (iii) the
purposes for which funds have been distributed to support family members
in welcoming and assisting individuals reentering society, prior
appropriation continued ...................................................................................... $3,320,000
7004-9315 For the executive office of housing and livable communities, which may
expend for the administration and monitoring of the low-income housing
tax credit and local administration programs not more than $3,651,061
from fees collected under these programs; provided, that funds may be
expended for the costs of administering and monitoring the programs,
including the costs of personnel, subject to the approval of the secretary
of housing and livable communities; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose
of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the executive office may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system ........................................................ $3,651,061
7004-9316 For a program to provide assistance in addressing obstacles to
maintaining or securing housing for families with a household income: (i)
not more than 30 per cent of area median income who are homeless and
moving into subsidized or private housing or are at risk of becoming
homeless; or (ii) more than 30 per cent but not more than 50 per cent of
area median income who are homeless and moving into subsidized or
private housing or are at risk of becoming homeless due to a significant
reduction of income or increased expenses; provided, that assistance shall
be administered by the executive office of housing and livable
communities through contracts with the regional HomeBASE agencies;
provided further, that not less than 50 per cent of the funds shall be
provided to households with an income not more than 30 per cent of area
median income, subject to the executive office’s discretion based on data
reflecting program demand and usage; provided further, that in distributing
50 per cent of the funds, the executive office shall prioritize those families
most likely to otherwise require shelter services under item 7004-0101;
provided further, that the amount of financial assistance shall not exceed
$7,000 in any 12-month period; provided further, not less than $30,000
shall be expended to Northern Bristol County Assistance Collaborative for
costs associated with the construction of low to mid-income senior
housing; provided further, that residential assistance payments may be
made through direct vendor payments according to standards to be
established by the executive office; provided further, that the agencies
shall establish a system for referring families approved for residential
assistance payments, who the agencies determine would benefit from
these services, to existing community-based programs that provide

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
additional housing stabilization supports, including assistance in obtaining
housing subsidies and locating alternative housing that is safe and
affordable for any such families; provided further, that the program shall
be administered under guidelines established by the executive office;
provided further, that income verification shall be conducted by using: (a)
documentation provided by the household, requiring the same
documentation and process used to conduct income verification under this
item in fiscal year 2026 or fewer documents as directed by the executive
office; (b) third-party income verification; or (c) validated receipt of certain
MassHealth or department of transitional assistance benefits
demonstrating that the household earns less than 50 per cent of area
median income; provided further, that the manner in which income
verification is conducted shall be at the discretion of the executive office
but that the executive office shall not discontinue the use of said options
for income verification listed in the preceding proviso; provided further, that
the executive office shall allow a short, simple application requiring
minimal processing time; provided further, that the executive office shall
submit quarterly reports to the house and senate committees on ways and
means detailing the: (1) number of families who applied for assistance; (2)
number of families approved for assistance; (3) minimum, median and
average amount of financial assistance awarded; (4) total amount of
assistance awarded to date, including a breakdown by income category;
and (5) number of families falling into each income category; provided
further, that the executive office shall track a family’s reason for assistance
by the same categories used in said item 7004-0101; provided further, that
not less than $3,000,000 shall be expended to provide assistance to
households of all sizes and configurations including, but not limited to,
elders, persons with disabilities and unaccompanied youths; provided
further, that household assistance funds shall be advanced to the
administering agencies at the end of each month and prior to the next
month’s disbursement, the amount of which shall be estimated based on
the prior month’s expenditure with a reconciliation not less than annually;
provided further, that notwithstanding clauses (i) and (ii), funds shall be
expended to families and individuals who are at risk of injury or harm due
to domestic violence in their current housing situation and whose
household income is not more than 60 per cent of the area median income;
provided further, that families and individuals that are at risk of injury or
harm from domestic violence who meet the qualifications of enrollment in
the address confidentiality program shall be afforded the opportunity to
register with and become enrolled in the address confidentiality program
as offered by the secretary of the commonwealth; and provided further, that
the executive office shall distribute funds under this item as well as federal
sources and other public and private sources of short-term rental and
mortgage assistance in a manner that prioritizes geographic equity ................. $209,000,000
Office of Consumer Affairs and Business Regulation.
7006-0000 For the office of consumer affairs and business regulation, including
expenses of an administrative services unit; provided, that not less than
$200,000 shall be expended for the office’s paid fellowship, co-op and
internship program to support operations and support functions including,
but not limited to, the operation of its consumer hotline ..................................... $2,003,593
7006-0043 For the office of consumer affairs and business regulation, which may
expend not more than $1,097,747 from fees collected from the registration

Conference Committee Report
and renewal of home improvement contractor registrations under section
11 of chapter 142A of the General Laws for the administration and
enforcement of the home improvement contractor registration program;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary,
for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the
receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the office may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system ........................................................ $1,097,747
Division of Banks.
7006-0010 For the operation of the division of banks; provided, that notwithstanding
any general or special law to the contrary, the division shall assess 100
per cent of the amount appropriated in this item and the associated fringe
benefit costs for personnel paid from this item upon financial institutions
that the division currently regulates under section 2 of chapter 167 of the
General Laws .................................................................................................... $27,039,886
7006-0011 For the costs incurred by the division of banks associated with licensure
of loan originators under chapter 255F of the General Laws; provided, that
the division may expend revenues of not more than $1,500,000 from the
revenue received from administrative fees associated with the licensure
fees and from civil administrative penalties collected under said chapter
255F; provided further, that $1,500,000 shall be expended by the
commissioner of banks as grants for the operation of a program for best
lending practices, first-time homeowner counseling for nontraditional loans
and not less than 10 foreclosure education centers under section 16 of
chapter 206 of the acts of 2007 and that the grants shall be awarded
through a competitive application process using criteria established by the
division; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special
law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the division may incur expenses and the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization
or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting
system ................................................................................................................. $1,500,000
Division of Insurance.
7006-0020 For the operation of the division of insurance, including the expenses of
the board of appeal on motor vehicle policies and bonds, the associated
fringe benefit costs for personnel paid from this item, certain other costs
of supervising motor vehicle liability insurance and the expenses of the
fraudulent claims board; provided, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, 100 per cent of the amount appropriated in this
item and the associated fringe benefit costs for personnel paid from this
item shall be assessed upon the institutions which the division currently
regulates under general or special laws or regulations, except for licensed
business entity producers; and provided further, that the assessment shall
be in addition to any assessments currently assessed upon those
institutions ......................................................................................................... $16,708,706
7006-0029 For the operation of the health care access bureau under the division of
insurance; provided, that the full amount appropriated in this item and the

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
associated fringe benefit costs for personnel paid from this item shall be
assessed upon the carriers licensed under chapters 175, 176A, 176B,
176E and 176G of the General Laws, as provided under section 7A of
chapter 26 of the General Laws .......................................................................... $1,144,857
7006-0030 For the operation of pharmacy benefit manager regulation, oversight and
licensure under the division of insurance pursuant to section 2 of chapter
176Y of the General Laws ..................................................................................... $989,339
Division of Occupational Licensure.
7006-0040 For the operation and administration of the division of occupational
licensure ............................................................................................................ $12,516,221
7006-0142 For the administration of the office of public safety and inspections under
the division of occupational licensure, which may expend not more than
$20,199,541 in revenues collected from fees or fines for annual elevator
inspections, building inspections, amusement park ride inspections, state
building code trainings and courses of instruction, licensing of pipefitters
and hoisting equipment operators, all licensing programs administered by
the office of public safety and inspections, revenues from fines collected
under section 65 of chapter 143 of the General Laws and fees for appeals
of civil fines issued under section 22 of chapter 22 of the General Laws
and said section 65 of said chapter 143; provided, that funds shall be
expended for the administration of the office of public safety and
inspections including, but not limited to: (i) inspectional services; (ii)
licensing services; (iii) the architectural access board; (iv) elevator
inspections; (v) building inspections; and (vi) amusement device
inspections; provided further, that the division shall employ not less than
70 full-time equivalent elevator inspectors, including an additional
engineer, and that funds shall be expended to address the existing
elevator inspection backlog and to defray the costs associated with
performing overtime elevator inspections; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended for a reimbursement program to be
managed by the division of occupational licensure, which shall provide for
the costs associated with the testing for the presence of pyrrhotite; and
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between
the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the office may
incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not
to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system ........................................ $20,199,541
Division of Standards.
7006-0060 For the operation of the division of standards ..................................................... $1,838,249
7006-0064 For the division of standards' oversight of motor vehicle repair shops .................. $320,000
7006-0065 For the division of standards, which may retain not more than $903,561
from registration fees and fines collected under sections 184B to 184E,
inclusive, of chapter 94 of the General Laws and section 56D of chapter
98 of the General Laws to support its enforcement activities as provided
under subsection (h) of section 184D of said chapter 94 and from revenues
received from item-pricing violations collected through municipal

Conference Committee Report
inspection efforts and from weights and measures fees and fines collected
from cities and towns for enforcement of weights and measures laws;
provided, that notwithstanding said subsection (h) of said section 184D of
said chapter 94, the division shall not fund the municipal grant program as
provided under said subsection (h) of said section 184D of said chapter
94; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law
to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the
division may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment
amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent
revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system .............................. $903,561
7006-0066 For support of municipal inspection efforts at the division of standards;
provided, that not more than 15 per cent of the amount appropriated in this
item shall be expended for administrative costs of the division ............................. $160,372
Department of Telecommunications and Cable.
7006-0071 For the operation of the department of telecommunications and cable;
provided, that notwithstanding the second sentence of section 7 of chapter
25C of the General Laws, the assessments levied for fiscal year 2027 shall
be made at a rate sufficient to produce 100 per cent of the amount
appropriated in this item and the associated fringe benefit costs for
personnel paid from this item .............................................................................. $3,542,967
Massachusetts Office of Business Development.
7007-0150 For the Massachusetts office of business development for contracts with
regional economic development organizations under the program
established under sections 3J and 3K of chapter 23A of the General Laws
............................................................................................................................ $1,000,000
7007-0300 For the operation of the Massachusetts office of business development,
including the operation of the Massachusetts international trade office and
for marketing and promoting the commonwealth to attract and retain
targeted businesses and industries; provided, that not less than $100,000
shall be expended for South Eastern Economic Development Corporation
to support its lending and technical assistance programs for small
businesses; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be
expended for training or programming at the Center for Women &
Enterprise, Inc.; and provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall be
expended for the Massachusetts center for employee ownership to
contract for services and other operational costs that further the mission
of the center ........................................................................................................ $1,942,715
7007-0500 For the operation and maintenance of the Massachusetts Biomedical
Initiatives, Inc. for the commercialization of new, academic-based
research and development and raising the scientific awareness of the
communities of the commonwealth; provided, that such initiatives may
include, but shall not be limited to: (i) investments in minority-owned
businesses; (ii) grants to school districts with significant minority student
populations for the development of curricula, purchase of equipment and
the provision of internships; (iii) planning and implementation of strategies
to recruit, develop and retain a diverse workforce in the fields of life
sciences and biotechnology; and (iv) identifying structural and cultural

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
obstacles to the full inclusion of diverse populations in the life sciences
and biotechnology field, along with recommendations for removing those
obstacles; provided further, that not later than January 29, 2027, the
institute shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways
and means on the development, implementation and success of these
initiatives, including the disbursement of funds to specific entities as
defined in this item; and provided further, that the institute shall seek out
private funds necessary to match contributions equal to $1 for every $1
contributed by this item .............................................................................................. $500,000
7007-0800 For a state matching grant for the small business development center;
provided, that no funds shall be expended from this item until the United
States Small Business Administration has made a payment or has
executed a contract to pay the University of Massachusetts at Amherst for
the operation of the center; provided further, that the funds expended from
this item shall not exceed 25 per cent of the gross operating cost of the
center; provided further, that not more than $300,000 from this item shall
be expended for federal procurement technical assistance services within
the center; provided further, that such services shall include, but not be
limited to, assisting businesses in securing federal contracts, obtaining
contract financing, generating responses to requests for proposals,
interpreting bid documents, providing educational workshops and
seminars and for the electronic identification and tracking of federal bid
opportunities; and provided further, that funds expended for federal
procurement technical assistance services within the center shall be
subject to the receipt of matching funds from federal or private sources,
including the United States Department of Defense ........................................... $1,411,960
7007-0952 For the operation of the Commonwealth Zoological Corporation
established in chapter 92B of the General Laws; provided, that funds
appropriated in this item shall be expended to promote private fundraising,
achieve self-sufficiency and serve as a catalyst for urban economic
development and job opportunities for local residents; provided further,
that the corporation shall take all steps necessary to increase the amount
of private funding available for the operation of the zoos; provided further,
that funding in this item shall not be transferred through interdepartmental
service agreements; provided further, that not later than January 29, 2027,
the corporation shall submit a report to the house and senate committees
on ways and means on the status of, and amounts collected from, the
private fundraising and enhanced revenue efforts identified in the draft
Massachusetts Zoos Business and Operations Plan dated December
1996; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to
the Lupa Zoo in Ludlow to support marketing and outreach efforts that
expand access to its conservation and educational programming; provided
further, that funds may be expended on a matching program to encourage
private and corporate donations to support the Franklin Park Zoo and the
Walter D. Stone Memorial Zoo; provided further, that not less than
$250,000 shall be expended to the Worcester Natural History Society for
its zoological park to support the daily care of animals, community
education programming and capital improvements to animal habitats; and
provided further, that not less than $125,000 shall be expended to the
Forest Park Zoological Society, Inc. to support workforce and economic
development, travel, tourism and wildlife conservation ...................................... $7,050,000
Massachusetts Marketing Partnership.

Conference Committee Report
7008-0900 For the operation and administration of the office of travel and tourism;
provided, that the office shall be the commonwealth’s official and lead
agency to facilitate and attract: (i) major sports events and championships;
and (ii) motion picture production and development; provided further, that
not less than $100,000 shall be expended for a matching grant program
to the Enrichment Center located in Dorchester neighborhood of the city
of Boston; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
for No Books No Ball; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be
expended to Friends of Reggie Wong Park, Inc.; provided further, that not
less than $25,000 shall be expended to Lena Park Community Center;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended for
Dorchester Elite Eagles; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall
be expended for Lady Raiders; provided further, that not less than
$350,000 shall be expended to the Naismith Memorial Basketball Hall of
Fame, Inc., for the replacement of HVAC parts and 2 elevator pump
systems; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended
to the Milford Highway Department for increased public access
improvements to the Upper Charles recreational trail; provided further, that
not less than $35,000 shall be expended for the DeFillipo Playground in
the city of Boston; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the Milford Legion Baseball Club Inc., for increased public
awareness, outreach and education; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be expended for the 60th Head of the Charles Regatta to
cover costs associated with public safety; provided further, that not less
than $75,000 shall be expended for the Waltham Tourism Council, Inc.;
provided further, that not less than $150,000 shall be expended to Boston
Asian: Youth Essential Service, Inc.; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended for Beverly Main Streets; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the International Volleyball Hall
of Fame, Inc. to expand international tourism; provided further, that not
less than $375,000 shall be expended to the Commonwealth Shakespeare
Company, Inc. for the purpose of free programming on the Boston
Common; provided further, that not less than $150,000 shall be expended
for the New American Association of Massachusetts, Inc.; provided
further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended to the West End
Museum, Incorporated to support growing capacity and to promote
awareness of the West End and Boston's central role in shaping modern
urban planning; provided further, that not less than $35,000 shall be
expended to the Friends of Quabbin, Inc. to support their marketing and
operations for their annual Quabbin Days event; provided further, that not
less than $125,000 shall be expended for the Bay State Games; provided
further, that not less than $175,000 shall be expended for the moving
ahead program at the St. Francis House in the city of Boston; provided
further, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended for the Boch
Center’s Folk Americana Roots Hall of Fame (FARHOF) located in the city
of Boston to support the Hall of Fame’s educational mission as well as
local economic development through programming and performances at
the FARHOF; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to the Fenway Community Center, in the Fenway neighborhood
of the city of Boston; provided further, that not less than $1,300,000 shall
be expended to the city of Boston for the HBCU Kickoff Classic Weekend
at Harvard University, including but not limited to providing career fairs and
mentorship opportunities for students; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the Quincy Asian Resources, Inc. in the city
of Quincy; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
to the Germantown Neighborhood Center in the city of Quincy; provided
further, that not less than $35,000 shall be expended to North End Youth
Organization Inc.; provided further, that not less than $175,000 shall be
expended to the Boston Children’s Museum for waterfront climate
resilience planning and related improvements, including flood mitigation
and the protection of facilities along the Fort Point Channel; provided
further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the Italian Cultural
Center of Western Massachusetts, Inc. in the city of Springfield; provided
further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to the Dennis
Chamber of Commerce, Inc. for marketing initiatives for small businesses
in the town of Dennis; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be
expended to Chinatown Business Association Inc.; provided further, that
not less than $10,000 shall be expended to the Brewster Chamber of
Commerce, Inc. for marketing initiatives for small businesses in the town
of Brewster; provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended
to the Yarmouth Chamber of Commerce, Inc. for marketing initiatives for
small businesses in the town of Yarmouth; provided further, that not less
than $25,000 shall be expended to Boston LGBTQIA+ Museum for an
artist support program; and provided further, that not later than March 5,
2027 the office shall submit a report to the house and senate committees
on ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to: (A) an
overview of the tourism industry in the commonwealth; (B) the economic
impact of domestic and international travelers to the commonwealth; (C) a
breakdown of the regional tourism council grant allocations; and (D)
initiatives undertaken to promote travel and tourism in the commonwealth
............................................................................................................................ $4,155,000
7008-1116 For the commonwealth’s local economic development projects; provided,
that not less than $150,000 shall be expended to the Salvation Army
Fitchburg for upgrades to support its community and human service
programming; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be
expended for Magic for Maddie, Inc. in the town of Southampton for
assistance to local families with a child battling cancer; provided further,
that not less than $100,000 shall be expended for the town of Ayer for the
design, construction and installation of a senior center and other related
expenses; provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be
expended to the Fitchburg Redevelopment Authority for downtown
redevelopment efforts in the city of Fitchburg; provided further, that not
less than $100,000 shall be expended for the Jamaica Plain Neighborhood
Development Corporation to promote access to safe and affordable
housing; provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to
the West Roxbury branch of the Boston public library for the purpose of
restoring their courtyard fountain; provided further, that not less than
$10,000 shall be expended to Anna's Pals, Inc. for infrastructure and
program assistance to provide a safe place to recover for
immunocompromised pediatric cancer patients and their families;
provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be expended for
Museum of African American History, Incorporated to continue its work to
showcase the historical contributions of African Americans; provided
further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the town of
Walpole to assist with traffic and roadway intersection improvements;
provided further, that not less than $15,000 shall be expended to the town
of Andover for costs related to improvements to the basketball court and
other playground equipment in Memorial circle; provided further, that not
less than $50,000 shall be expended to the town of Andover for costs
related to improvements to the Chandler road recreation area; provided

Conference Committee Report
further, that not less than $35,000 shall be expended to Presentation
School Foundation, Inc.’s community center in the Brighton section of the
city of Boston to support the community room and food insecurity
programs; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended
to Urban Impact Initiative Massachusetts Nonprofit Corporation to support
programs that reduce the impacts of poverty; provided further, that not less
than $200,000 shall be expended for Coalition for an Equitable Economy,
Inc. to promote economic diversification and growth in the small business
sector; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for
the Worcester public library to provide funding and support staff for the
Library in Every Classroom Project; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be expended to the Tufts Library in Weymouth for material
and equipment upgrades; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall
be expended for bathroom renovations at Livingston street park in the
town of Tewksbury; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be
expended for roadway improvements at the Tewksbury cemetery in the
town of Tewksbury; provided further, that not less than $5,000 shall be
expended for exhibit modernization, artifact and record preservation and
public engagement improvement at the Public Health Museum in
Massachusetts, Incorporated in the town of Tewksbury; provided further,
that not less than $55,000 shall be expended for the revitalization of the
downtown and pocket park in the town of North Andover; provided further,
that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the town of North Andover
for any costs related to robotic lawn mowers to maintain town playing
fields; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to
the town of Halifax for the replacement of the roof at the Holmes public
library; provided further, that not less than $60,000 shall be expended to
the town of Wilmington for any costs related to intersection upgrades
necessitated by construction of schools in the town; provided further, that
not less than $30,000 shall be expended for the construction of a
playground in the town of Merrimac; provided further, that not less than
$45,000 shall be expended to the Berkshire Community Action Council,
Inc.; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for
Buttonwood Park Zoological Society, Inc. to support public access to the
zoo for underserved residents in the city of New Bedford; provided further,
that not less than $200,000 shall be expended for We Are ALX Inc. to
promote economic diversification and growth; provided further, that not
less than $25,000 shall be expended as a grant to the United Way of
Pioneer Valley, Inc. to support organizations and programs in the cities of
Springfield and Chicopee; provided further, that not less than $300,000
shall be expended to the University of Massachusetts at Lowell for costs
related to its Career Connected Experience Ecosystem programming;
provided further, that not less than $45,000 shall be expended to the town
of Chelmsford for a pilot curbside composting program; provided further,
that not less than $75,000 shall be expended to Waltham Partnership for
Youth, Inc. to support an internship program for Waltham high school
students; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
to 18 Degrees, Inc. in the city of Pittsfield for improvements to its facilities
to support its early education, youth development, foster care and family
support services; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be
expended for Madison Park Development Corporation for the Hibernian
Hall cultural center for arts and cultural programming, including original
and collaborative arts programming, immersive multidisciplinary cultural
experiences, youth arts and literacy programming and children’s writing
and publishing workshops; provided further, that not less than $60,000
shall be expended to Charles River Museum of Industry and Innovation,

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
Inc. for the youth leadership and peer mentoring program; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Boston
Housing Authority for recruitment, training, engagement and payroll costs
to support resident employment in the construction industry and green jobs
within the Third Suffolk district; provided further, that not less than $50,000
shall be expended to Friends of the Public Garden, Inc. to expand
infrastructure to increase accessibility of public bathrooms at the Boston
Common and Public Garden in the city of Boston; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended to Boston Minstrel Company
Charitable Trust, doing business as Music with Heart, for the purpose of
organizational development; provided further, that not less than $25,000
shall be expended for the 250th Celebration Committee of Adams for the
purpose of sponsoring events in commemoration of the United States’
sestercentennial anniversary; provided further, that not less than $25,000
shall be expended for Assets for Artists Inc. in the city of North Adams for
the purpose of marshaling resources and strategies for creative sector
individuals to pursue self-determined careers; provided further, that not
less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Berkshire regional planning
commission to support the work of the Berkshire Funding Focus program;
provided further, that not less than $35,000 shall be expended to Historic
Newton, Inc. to upgrade and develop exhibits that educate the public on
local history; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended for Dalton American Legion to support the veteran community;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to Veronica
Robles Cultural Center Corp in the East Boston section of the city of
Boston to support its arts and culture community programming; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the city of Newton
for the Spears park community garden for fence repairs and other
improvements; provided further, that not less than $30,000 shall be
expended to West Newton Cinema Foundation, Inc. to restore its historic
glass and wood lobby and vestibule doors; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended to Nonprofit Center of the Berkshires Inc.
to provide resources and technical assistance for local nonprofit
organizations in the county of Berkshire; provided further, that not less
than $25,000 shall be expended for town of Washington to sponsoring
events in commemoration of the town’s sestercentennial anniversary;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to
Springfield Museums Corporation to build an immersive dinosaur dig in
Dinosaur Hall at the museum; provided further that not less than $25,000
shall be expended to Suit Up Springfield for operating costs to support its
young professional program in the city of Springfield; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended to Hope Community
Development Corporation in the city of Springfield for community outreach;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to Seeding
Ventures Inc. to support minority and LGBTQ small business owners in
the cities of Springfield and Chicopee; provided further, that not less than
$85,000 shall be expended for Saheli, Inc. in the city of Woburn for legal
and housing assistance work for immigrant survivors of domestic abuse;
provided further, that not less than $90,000 shall be expended for Social
Capital Inc. in the city of Woburn for youth leadership and civic engaging
programming, migrant support and health equity work; provided further,
that not less than $100,000 shall be expended for Civic Action Project, Inc.
to provide programming and training to civic leaders for new strategic,
public-private partnerships for innovative policies; provided further that not
less than $100,000 shall be expended to the Massachusetts Partnerships
for Youth, Inc. to continue delivering remote or on-site training and

Conference Committee Report
capacity building for school and community leaders in the areas of youth
violence risk assessment and harm reduction for at-risk youth; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for Friends of Jack
Foundation, Inc. to provide direct supports to pediatric patients and their
families in southeastern Massachusetts; provided further, that not less
than $45,000 shall be expended for the Latin American Business
Organization Inc. to provide technical assistance to historically
disadvantaged businesses in Worcester county focused on financial
management, access to capital, legal compliance, startup fundamentals
and supplier diversity certification; provided further, that not less than
$200,000 shall be expended to the Massachusetts Women of Color
Coalition, Inc. to support its continued operation and expand program
delivery; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to
Worcester Refugee and Immigrant Support and Empowerment (RISE) for
Health, Inc to support community healthcare workers; provided further,
that not less than $25,000 shall be expended for the Manny 267
Foundation to increase the capacity to prevent water-related deaths in
central Massachusetts and Worcester county; provided further, that not
less than $10,000 shall be expended for the Black Heritage Juneteenth
festival in the city of Worcester; provided further, that not less than $10,000
shall be expended for Casita Cultura Latina, Inc for the Día de los Muertos
event and other cultural events in the city of Worcester; provided further,
that not less than $10,000 shall be expended for AIDS Project –
Worcester, Inc. for the Pride Worcester festival to be celebrated by the
greater Worcester community; provided further, that not less than $5,000
shall be expended for the Worcester Youth Orchestras, Inc. for financial
aid for students; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the Worcester Community Action Council, Inc. for the
implementation of equity strategies in the Greater Worcester Community
Health Improvement Plan; provided further, that not less than $25,000
shall be expended to ArtsWorcester, Inc. for the Future Arts Workers
internship program for the Future Arts Workers internship program;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to African
Community Education Program, Inc for renovations of its facility and for
the creation of a new student and community gathering room; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended for East End House,
Inc. in the city of Cambridge to provide comprehensive support services
for families; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
for the Cambridge Economic Opportunity Committee, Inc. in the city of
Cambridge for economic stability and mobility services; provided further,
that not less than $25,000 shall be expended for the Margaret Fuller
House, Incorporated in the city of Cambridge for community advancement
programming; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to Cambridge Nonprofit Coalition Inc. for its services and
community programs in the city of Cambridge; provided further, that not
less than $50,000 shall be expended for Just-A-Start Corporation’s
biomedical careers program in the city of Cambridge; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the East Cambridge Business
Association, Inc. for services to provide for community activities; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended for Transition House,
Inc. in the city of Cambridge to address domestic violence through
intervention and prevention in the city of Cambridge to address domestic
violence through intervention and prevention; provided further, that not
less than $25,000 shall be expended for Eliot Family Resource Center in
the city of Everett for comprehensive community-based services and
resources; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
for La Comunidad, Inc. in the city of Everett to support community
programming and services; provided further, that not less than $25,000
shall be expended for Latinos Unidos en Massachusetts in the city of
Everett to provide community resources, programming and support;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the
Everett Haitian Community Center in the city of Everett for community
programming, resources and services; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended for the John F. Kennedy Family Service
Center, Inc. in the Charlestown section of the city of Boston to provide
community services; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended for Special Townies – Autistic & Exceptional Children Programs,
Inc. in the Charlestown section of the city of Boston; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended for Chelsea Black Community,
Inc. in the city of Chelsea for community-based services and resources;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for
Community Action Programs Inter-City, Inc. in the city of Chelsea for
economic stability and mobility services; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended to Angkor Dance Troupe, Inc. in the city
of Lowell for cultural programming; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to New England Invents Inc. for the Pinnacle
Co-Working Hub; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the Lowell Festival Foundation in the city of Lowell for the
Lowell Folk Festival; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the Lowell Festival Foundation in the city of Lowell for the
Lowell Summer Music Series; provided further, that not less than $25,000
shall be expended to the town of Dunstable for municipal improvements;
provided further, that not less than $30,000 shall be expended to the town
of Phillipston for the purchase of plow truck equipment and upgrades;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town
of Swampscott for the expansion of electric vehicle charging infrastructure;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town
of Tyngsborough for municipal improvements; provided further, that not
less than $200,000 shall be expended to Greater Lowell Community
Foundation, Inc. in the city of Lowell for community programs in the First
Middlesex senatorial district; provided further, that not less than $100,000
shall be expended to Methuen Arlington Neighborhood, Inc. to increase
and enhance entrepreneurial opportunities, neighborhood investment,
revitalization activities and the self-sufficiency of low-income and
moderate-income residents of the Methuen Arlington section of the city of
Methuen; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
for the Immigrant City Archives, Inc. for its archival access, safety and
preservation infrastructure project; provided further, that not less than
$280,000 shall be expended to Blackstone Valley Chamber of Commerce,
Inc. in the village of Whitinsville in the town of Northbridge for workforce
training, small business expansion and regional economic development
initiatives; provided further, that not less than $9,000 shall be expended to
the Blackstone Valley Community Chorus, Inc. in the village of Whitinsville
in the town of Northbridge for upgrades and replacement of musical and
sound equipment and transportation costs; provided further, that not less
than $20,000 shall be expended to the town of Blackstone for costs
associated with the town’s 250th anniversary celebration; provided further,
that not less than $63,434 shall be expended for the Downtown Brockton
Association, Inc. for the cleanup and beautification of the downtown area
of the city of Brockton; provided further, that not less than $15,000 shall
be expended to the town of East Bridgewater for electrical upgrades at the
East Bridgewater public library; provided further, that not less than

Conference Committee Report
$50,000 shall be expended for the Albert & Amelia Ferst Operating
Foundation, LLC in the city of Westfield for capital improvements and
operations at the Amelia Park Arena to support local youth sports
programming; provided further, that not less than $65,000 shall be
expended to the city of Taunton for downtown safety and revitalization
improvements, including lighting, cameras, parking and streetscape
enhancements; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be
expended to Waters Farm Preservation, Inc. for infrastructure projects for
their 250th anniversary celebration; provided further, that not less than
$5,000 shall be expended to the Western Massachusetts Veterans
Service Officers Association in the city of Northampton to support local
veterans; provided further, that not less than $5,000 shall be expended for
Veteran Outreach Into Community Engagement Inc. in the town of Granby
for regional programming and veteran outreach initiatives; provided
further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended for Community Roots
Neighborhood Services, Inc. in the city of Holyoke to support local
veterans; provided further, that not less than $45,000 shall be expended
for the Westfield Woman’s Club, Inc. in the city of Westfield for capital
improvements and programming; provided further, that not less than
$200,000 shall be expended for the Cape Verdean Association of Boston
Inc. for community programming including English as a second language,
citizenship training and workforce development and job pathway
programs; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
for the Irish Cultural Center, Inc. of Western New England in the city known
as the town of West Springfield for building improvements and operational
costs to promote tourism in the western region of the commonwealth;
provided further, that not less than $70,000 shall be expended to the town
of Wareham for improvements to Merchant’s way, including waste
enclosures, signage, lighting and murals to support downtown
revitalization; provided further, that not less than $125,000 shall be
expended for the Massachusetts Cabo Verdean cultural center
commission established in chapter 1 of the resolves of 2024 to support
work of the commission including, but not limited to, the procurement of a
consultant to conduct the feasibility study under said chapter 1, the
facilitation of statewide listening sessions and community engagement
activities, administrative support, research, planning and other duties
necessary to carry out the commission’s responsibilities; provided further
that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to the town of Wenham for
software to analyze historic graveyards; provided further, that not less than
$20,000 shall be expended to the town of West Newbury to support
compliance with newly imposed Americans with Disabilities Act
accessibility requirements for its website; provided further, that not less
than $100,000 shall be expended to the National Center of Afro-American
Artists, Inc. to support arts education, cultural programming, museum
exhibitions, preservation of African diasporic artistic heritage, youth
engagement and community-based visual and performing arts
programming in the Roxbury section of the city of Boston and across the
commonwealth; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be
expended to the town of Manchester-By-The-Sea to support the
completion of the senior community center project; provided further that
not less than $78,000 shall be expended to the city of Newburyport for an
Airvac sewer system pilot oversight program on Plum Island; provided
further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended for the New
England Medical Association, Inc. to address health disparities and
increase the diversity of the physician workforce in the commonwealth,
including the recruitment and retention of underrepresented physicians

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
and improvement of health outcomes in underserved communities;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the
Museum of African American History, Incorporated in the town of
Nantucket for the preservation and programming at the African meeting
house; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for
the J.V. Fletcher Library in the town of Westford for physical upgrades;
provided further, that not less than $15,000 shall be expended to the town
of Ashby for necessary improvements to the Ashby town gazebo; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to Camp Fire North
Shore, Inc. for youth programming; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended for the Kakrona Center, Inc. for programming
in the city of Lynn; provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be
expended to the town of Abington for purposes including, but not limited
to, the office of veterans' services’ operation of a transportation program;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the city
of Quincy for purposes including, but not limited to, communications
infrastructure upgrades and repairs; provided further, that not less than
$5,000 shall be expended for Abington public library for purposes
including, but not limited to, programming and services; provided further,
that not less than $70,000 shall be expended for senior center
improvements in the town of Bellingham; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended for the design and permitting of the Dover
road retaining wall in the town of Dover; provided further, that not less than
$15,000 shall be expended for a utility trailer for the town clerk’s office in
the town of Medfield; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended for accessibility improvements at the town hall in the town of
Milford; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended for
the reconstruction of the parking lot at the Lansing Millis memorial building
in the town of Millis; provided further, that not less than $70,000 shall be
expended for exercise equipment at the Center at the Heights in the town
of Needham; provided further, that not less than $40,000 shall be
expended for senior center parking lot improvements in the town of Norfolk
; provided further, that not less than $45,000 shall be expended for radios
for the department of public works in the town of Plainville; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the city of Peabody
for rehabilitation efforts at the George Peabody House Museum including,
but not limited to, the installation of new perimeter fencing to enhance
visitor safety, preserve museum assets and support the site’s ongoing
educational programming; provided further, that not less than $50,000
shall be expended for the Peabody Cultural Collaborative Inc. to establish
a Peabody activation regrant fund in said city; provided further, that not
less than $70,000 shall be expended to the town of Easton for the
redevelopment, maintenance and management of Swift park; provided
further, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended for Jett Foundation,
Inc. in the town of Norwell for empowering individuals and families
impacted by Duchenne muscular dystrophy through transformative
programming; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to Wellspring, Inc. located in the town of Hull for program
development and community outreach support; provided further, that not
less than $25,000 shall be expended to South Shore SNAP, Inc. to provide
athletic programming to children with intellectual and developmental
disabilities; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended
to the Magical Moon Foundation, Inc. in the town of Marshfield to support
programming for children with cancer and other life threatening conditions;
provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to Norwell
Grange Corporation in the town of Norwell to encourage agricultural and

Conference Committee Report
environmental sustainability; provided further, that not less than $10,000
shall be expended to South Humarock Civic Association Inc. located in the
town of Scituate for facility improvements; provided further, that not less
than $20,000 shall be expended to South Shore Irish Heritage Trail, Inc.
in the town of Scituate to promote regional tourism; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended to Norwell Visiting Nurse
Association, Inc. in the town of Norwell to deliver quality in-home care to
those in need; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the LOOK. Foundation, Inc. in the town of Scituate to raise
awareness and support the treatment of PANS and PANDAS; provided
further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to Friends of the
Homeless of the Southshore, Inc. in the city known as the town of
Weymouth to support families and children in need throughout the south
shore; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to
Crossroads of Boston, Inc. located in the city of Boston for youth
development at Camp Wing in the town of Duxbury; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended to James P. Harrington
Organization, Inc. located in the town of Marshfield to support health and
wellness programming at Ferry hill community center and day camp;
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to
Empower Grieving Children, Inc. located in the town of Cohasset to
support services and programming for children facing parent loss;
provided further, that not less than $5,000 shall be expended to St. John
the Evangelist Church in the town of Hingham to support the program
known as Laundry Love to provide laundry assistance to low-income
individuals throughout the South Shore; provided further, that not less than
$30,000 shall be expended to the town of Sutton for costs associated with
per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances remediation efforts; provided further,
that not less than $200,000 shall be expended for Massachusetts
Women’s History Center, Inc. to amplify the history of women of all
backgrounds in the commonwealth; provided further, that not less than
$15,000 shall be expended to the Vinton Street Hope Initiative, Inc. for the
operation of its programs; provided further, that not less than $15,000 shall
be expended to the the Codman Square Neighborhood Council, Inc. for
the operation of the Codman square farmers market and the Codman
square summer program; provided further, that not less than $15,000 shall
be expended to Bay State Performing Arts, Inc. for the Boston Gay Men's
Chorus; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to
Bowdoin/Geneva Main Streets, Inc. for maintenance and community
programming; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be
expended to Greater Ashmont Main Streets for maintenance and
community programming; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall
be expended for Caribbean American Carnival Association of Boston, Inc.
for cultural events in the community; provided further, that not less than
$20,000 shall be expended for The People’s Academy, Inc. to support its
pre-apprenticeship program training inner-city residents in the copper
trade; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to
365Dad Life Inc. for its Youth Announcers program; provided further, that
not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the Berkeley Community
Garden Inc for the purpose of repairing irrigation systems; provided
further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the Puerto Rican
Veterans of Boston, Inc. to erect a Puerto Rican veterans memorial;
provided further, that not less $20,000 shall be expended to Economic
Mobility Pathways, Inc. for supporting women’s advancement; provided
further, that not less than $45,000 shall be expended to South Boston
Neighborhood House, Inc. for community programming; provided further,

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
that not less than $45,000 shall be expended to Ella J. Baker House Inc.
for youth programming; that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to
the South Boston Neighborhood Development Corporation for the South
Boston Street festival to be enjoyed by local residents; provided further,
that not less than $70,000 shall be expended to the Harry McDonough
Sailing Center, Inc. for free programming; provided further, that not less
than $20,000 shall be expended to Boston Women’s Heritage Trail, Inc.
for the Cedar Grove project; provided further, that not less than $20,000
shall be expended for Julie's Family Learning Program, Inc. for family
support, wellness and education initiatives; provided further, that not less
than $10,000 shall be expended to All Dorchester Sports & Leadership,
Inc. for programming and youth workforce development; provided further,
that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to Brazilian Women’s Group,
Inc. in the city of Boston for services for immigrants; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town of Dracut for
municipal improvements; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall
be expended to the town of Falmouth for the Falmouth urban forest;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town
of Pepperell for municipal improvements; provided further, that not less
than $100,000 shall be expended to the town of Stoughton for public
programming at the town community center and associated event
planning; provided further, that not less than $100,000 be expended to the
Springfield Jewish Community Center, Inc. to continue to provide public
and inclusive services and programming for the community; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the town of
Stoughton for the train depot revitalization project and the construction of
a new community center; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall
be expended for Western Mass Wheelers, Inc., to expand adapted outdoor
biking programs for elder adults across Western Massachusetts; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for the Plymouth
County Development Council, Inc. to support tourism in the town and
county of Plymouth; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be
expended for the Cape Cod Chamber of Commerce, Inc. to strengthen
local economies by promoting, supporting and guiding local businesses,
civic leadership and social agencies; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to The Cambodian Mutual Assistance
Association of Greater Lowell, Inc. in the city of Lowell for transitional
services for refugees; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall
be expended to Meher Foundation, Inc. for transitional services for
refugees in the city of Lowell; provided further, that not less than $40,000
shall be expended for Martha’s Vineyard Shellfish Group, Inc. for a
feasibility study for the John T. Hughes Hatchery and Research Station in
the town of Oak Bluffs; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall
be expended for the Cape Cod Blue Economy Foundation, Inc. for
CapeTide Economic Development Corporation programming and
operations to support entrepreneurship and small business development
on Cape Cod; provided further, that not less than $30,000 shall be
expended to the town of Marion for municipal technology upgrades,
including replacement of obsolete desktop and laptop computers;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended for Amplify
POC Cape Cod Inc. for its entrepreneurship programming; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to Beat the Odds Inc.
to support the city of Boston's low-income communities through its
Creative Youth Development program; provided further, that not less than
$40,000 shall be expended for Freedom House, Inc. to support the PUSH-
to-Start Gap Year Program, a workforce development and transition

Conference Committee Report
initiative providing youths and young adults in the city of Boston with
career exploration, job readiness training, individualized coaching,
workforce exposure and postsecondary pathway support; provided
further, that not less than $30,000 shall be expended to the city of Boston
for River street neighborhood improvements to support community
beautification, public infrastructure enhancements, pedestrian safety,
streetscape improvements and other neighborhood stabilization and
quality-of-life initiatives; provided further, that not less than $30,000 shall
be expended for the Greater Mattapan Neighborhood Council to support
community engagement, neighborhood improvement initiatives, resident
leadership development, public safety collaboration, youth and family
programming and civic participation efforts in the Mattapan section of the
city of Boston; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to Massachusetts Voter Education Network, Inc. to support
nonpartisan civic engagement, voter education, youth leadership
development, voter registration and participation efforts and community-
based democracy and electoral justice initiatives; provided further, that not
less than $20,000 shall be expended to Mattapan Square Main Streets,
Inc. to support economic development, small business support, cultural
programming, placemaking initiatives and community engagement efforts
in Mattapan square in the Mattapan section of the city of Boston; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for The EON
Foundation, Inc. to provide programs, services and technical assistance
to support economic opportunities in the cannabis industry for people from
communities harmed by the war on drugs; provided further, that not less
than $100,000 shall be expended the town of Ashland for the renovation
and improvement of the Ashland community center; provided further, that
not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the town of Holliston for
municipal employee mental health support; provided further, that not less
than $100,000 shall be expended to the town of Medway for Americans
with Disabilities Act related improvements to recreational facilities;
provided further, that not less than $105,000 shall be expended to Greater
Northampton Chamber of Commerce, Inc. to support efforts to address
the primary care crisis; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall
be expended to Friends of the Wendell Meetinghouse, Inc. for accessibility
improvements, repairs and modifications; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended to the town of Royalston for design,
engineering, repairs and improvements to the King street bridge; provided
further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended to the Swansea
redevelopment authority to create an urban renewal plan along the United
States highway route 6 corridor in the town of Swansea; provided further,
that not less than $15,000 shall be expended to Keep Massachusetts
Beautiful Inc. for expanded programming, marketing and supplies;
provided further, that not less than $40,000 shall be expended to the
Boyden library in the town of Foxborough for the purchase of new furniture
and equipment for makerspace, children's room and facilities and for
information technology upgrades; provided further, that not less than
$15,000 shall be expended to Oxford public schools for transportation
needs; provided further, that not less than $12,500 shall be expended to
the Westborough public library to purchase a book bike; provided further,
that not less than $500,000 shall be expended to the Black Economic
Council of Massachusetts, Inc.; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be expended to the town of Wilbraham for the purchase of
materials and installation of permanent bleachers at the Wilbraham
Athletic Facility; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be
expended to the town of Monson to provide camera coverage with access

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
control and camera with multi-lens, pan/tilt/zoom camera, switch, and
boom lift for the back parking area of town offices/police station and the
Veterans Field; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be
expended to the Wilbraham Nature and Cultural Council for tourism,
marketing and advertising purposes; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be expended to Springfield Symphony Orchestra, Inc. for
creating new, diverse concert performances and targeting special events
for youth education and performance opportunities that are vital to
revitalize the performing arts in Springfield; provided further, that not less
than $250,000 shall be expended to Wharf District Council, Inc., for climate
resiliency planning; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the town of Carlisle for capital improvements and renovations
to the Gleason public library; provided further, that not less than $25,000
shall be expended to the town of Concord for improvements and upgrades
to the playground at the Alcott elementary school; provided further, that
not less than $40,000 shall be expended to the town of Rutland for support
of the engineering and design services necessary to advance the
rehabilitation of the Rutland community pool; provided further, that not less
than $75,000 shall be expended to the city of Framingham to establish a
small business university to provide entrepreneurs with specialized
guidance and support to improve equity and economic development;
provided further, that not less than $85,000 shall be expended to NEADS,
Inc. Service Dogs for Veterans program; provided further, that not less
than $25,000 shall be expended to the city of Lowell for improvements and
upgrades to the Bailey school playground; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended to the Quaboag regional school district
academy; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended
to the town of Ashland for pedestrian accessibility improvements; provided
further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the city of
Framingham for pedestrian accessibility improvements; provided further,
that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to ABCD North End;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Lynn
Veterans Council to organize the North Shore Veterans and First
Responders Parade; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the Whitfield-Manjiro Friendship Society, Inc.; provided
further, that not less than $5,000 shall be expended to the city of Fall River
for improvements to Abbott Court playground park; provided further, that
not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the Bellingham senior center
for parking lot improvements; provided further, that not less than $20,000
shall be expended to the Blackstone-Millville-regional school district for
security system and safety upgrades; provided further, that not less than
$20,000 shall be expended to the town of Uxbridge for planning of the
town’s 300th Anniversary; provided further, that not less than $20,000
shall be expended to Millville elementary school for a generator
replacement; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to the town of Pembroke for the planning of the re-use of the
former police station building; provided further, that not less than $50,000
shall be expended to the town of Kingston for the restoration of the Historic
Reed Building; provided further, that not less than $15,000 shall be
expended for Responsible Urbanites For Fido, Inc.; provided further, that
not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the town of Plympton for
infrastructure improvements at the town complex; provided further, that
not less than $75,000 shall be expended to the town of Danvers for the
replacement of the ceiling at the Peabody Institute library of Danvers;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the
Neponset River Regional Chamber of Commerce to support the creation

Conference Committee Report
of a business incubator to assist in the development and growth of new
regional businesses; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the Everett Haitian Community Center to support youth
enrichment; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
to the city of Chelsea’s Resiliency Fund; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the Chelsea Chamber of Commerce for
programming initiatives; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall
be expended to GreenRoots, Inc.; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to La Colaborativa, Inc. to support economic
development; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to Bay Village Neighborhood Association, Inc.; provided further,
that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the New Bedford Festival
Theatre, Inc.; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be
expended to AHA! Art, History & Architecture in the city of New Bedford;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the
Frederick Douglass House in the city of New Bedford; provided further,
that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Cape Verdean
Association of New Bedford; provided further, that not less than $50,000
shall be expended to the Zeiterion Performing Arts Center in city of New
Bedford for production programming; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the city of Revere for a child safety program;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the
Revere Chamber of Commerce, Inc.; provided further, that not less than
$75,000 shall be expended to the city of Revere’s senior home
improvement fund; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be
expended to the city of Revere McMackin field for infrastructure
improvements; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the town of Hingham to support Revolution 250 celebrations;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town
of Hull to support Revolution 250 celebrations; provided further, that not
less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Cohasset Community
Assistance Fund to build capacity and expand its direct financial
assistance program; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the city of Lynn for the maintenance of Goldfish Pond;
provided further, that not less than $5,000 shall be expended to Riverwalk
Arts, Inc. for improvements along the ten-mile river walkway; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Inquilinos
Boricuas en Acción, Inc. (IBA Boston) to address critical technology and
programmatic capacity gaps necessary to fully operationalize IBA – La
CASA, and sustain core high-quality educational and youth development
opportunities; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be
expended to the Soccer Unity Project Inc. for increasing play for girls and
youth with disabilities, as well as providing programming for their three
new locations in low-income areas; provided further, that not less than
$150,000 shall be expended to the Community Music Center of Boston;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the
Boston Food Access Council; provided further, that not less than $25,000
shall be expended to the Waltham Chamber of Commerce for staffing;
provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the town
of Southbridge for veterans’ monuments; provided further, that not less
than $175,000 shall be expended for Boston Chinatown Post 328
Association; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to ABCD for the operation, administration and programming of
the West End Neighborhood Center; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be expended to the Boston Landmarks Orchestra, Inc. for
the purpose of providing free public concerts in Boston; provided further,

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the town of Great
Barrington for upgrades to the assessors software; provided further, that
not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the town of Burlington to
enhance and modernize interior and exterior signage across the town
campus to improve navigation, accessibility, and compliance with current
ADA and safety standards; provided further, that not less than $50,000
shall be expended to the city of Beverly for maintenance, repairs, and
improvements to the Beverly council on aging/senior center building;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended for the Age
Strong commission in the city of Boston for senior programming in the
North End, Chinatown, Downtown and Bay Village neighborhoods of the
city of Boston; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be
expended to the town of Merrimac to refurbish a basketball court floor;
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the
Fitchburg Public Market for the capital maintenance costs of the food hub
services; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended
to Latinos for Education, Inc; provided further, that not less than $25,000
shall be expended to the North Quabbin Chamber of Commerce, Inc;
provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended to the
historic Chevalier Theatre in Medford; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended for a project celebrating Fiestas Patronales to
its fiscal agent Nueva Esperanza, Inc.; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the town of Hamilton for a backup generator
for the historic town hall to ensure continuity of operations during winter
storms; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to
the Asian Community Development Corporation for the purposes of
expanding their retirement matched savings program for low-income
Asian elders; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to the Jones library in the town of Amherst to support the
construction of a gender inclusive ADA compliant restroom; provided
further, that not less than $9,000 shall be expended to the Puerto Rican
Art Comic Conference to its fiscal agent, the Holyoke public library;
provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended to the town
of North Reading for flooring maintenance at the Flint Memorial library in
the town of North Reading; provided further, that not less than $25,000
shall be expended to the town of Bridgewater for roadway and public
safety improvements in Central square; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the Benevento Little League fields in the
town of North Reading; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall
be expended to Lynnfield middle school auditorium for lighting and sound
repairs, replacement and upgrades; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the town of Lynnfield for playground
upgrades at Newhall park; provided further, that not less than $75,000
shall be expended to Boston Village for the purpose of improving their
capacity to expand technological improvements and the provision of
programming services for older adults; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended for the Coconut Grove Memorial Committee in
the city of Boston; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the town of Raynham to continue building a gravel parking lot
and canoe launch on the Taunton river off South street west in Raynham;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to Three
Saints, Inc. in the city of Lawrence to support community services and
promote Italian heritage; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall
be expended to the Merrimack Valley Chamber of Commerce to support
business development, networking, and economic opportunity initiatives
in the Merrimack Valley; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall

Conference Committee Report
be expended to Middleton Council on Aging for the purchase of an ADA
compliant van; provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be
expended for the development a new Easthampton skate park; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Age Strong
commission in the city of Boston for senior programming in the South End
neighborhood in the city of Boston; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended for the Boston Chinatown Neighborhood
Center for the purposes of arts and cultural programming at the Pao Arts
Center; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to
Age Strong commission in the city of Boston for senior programming in the
Dorchester and Roxbury neighborhoods in the city of Boston; provided
further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be expended to the New
Commonwealth Fund to assist in their work of expanding grant
opportunities for Black and Brown-led nonprofits across the
commonwealth; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the Springfield Black Chambers community outreach;
provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended for the
Harambee Festival; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended for the Caribbean Festival; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the historic West Medford Community
Center; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to
the Stoughton Community Center for exterior work; provided further, that
not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Paul Revere Heritage Site
in the town of Canton; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the Stone Soul, Inc. Festival; provided further, that not less
than $25,000 shall be expended to Martin Luther King Jr. Family Services,
Inc.; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to
Springfield Partners for Community Action, Inc.; provided further, that not
less than $175,000 shall be expended to the Western Massachusetts
Sports Commission; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be
expended to the city known as the town of Agawam for a feasibility study
of a new and modernized recreational center at Perry Lane park; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Haymarket
Pushcart Association; provided further, that not less than $150,000 shall
be expended to the city known as the town of West Springfield for
infrastructure improvement projects to Mittineague park; provided further,
that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Brookline Interactive
Group to support cablecasting and streaming of Brookline town meetings,
hearings and committees to catalyze and maintain vital civic engagement;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the
Brookline Teen Center, Inc. for facility upgrades consistent with the YMCA
of Greater Boston merger; provided further, that not less than $75,000
shall be expended to The Urban League of Springfield; provided further,
that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the Boys & Girls Club of
Greater Haverhill, Inc. for the capital campaign project for the construction
of a new state of the art facility in the city of Haverhill; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended to Whittier Birthplace in Haverhill;
provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the
Haverhill Downtown Boxing Club; provided further, that not less than
$10,000 shall be expended to Build Boston LLC for entrepreneurship
programming at the Gateway Academy in Haverhill; provided further, that
not less than $70,000 shall be expended to the town of Westborough for
conducting a study of the Route 9 corridor and abutting lands for various
purposes; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended
for the North End/Waterfront Resilience Alliance for Climate Resiliency
planning; provided further, that not less than $30,000 shall be expended

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
to the town of Northborough for sidewalk and roadway projects; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the city of Haverhill
for the purchase of street lighting and pedestrian safety measures;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended for
Belchertown Animal Control to replace its current vehicle and acquire
modern animal transport equipment; provided further, that not less than
$20,000 shall be expended to St. Vincent de Paul Diaper Bank; provided
further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to Sarah’s Place
Adult Day Health Center, Inc.; provided further, that not less than $350,000
shall be expended to the Westmass Area Development Corporation to
offset and pay any and all costs incurred and related to, but not limited to,
operational costs and expenses involved with the revitalization of the
Ludlow Mills Industrial Complex; provided further, that not less than
$30,000 shall be expended to the town of Hopkinton for energy-efficiency
renovations and upgrades at Hopkinton senior center; provided further,
that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the town of Millis for the
continued renovation of the original town offices and the revitalization of
unused spaces; provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be
expended to Springfield Black Tennis program; provided further, that not
less than $200,000 shall be expended to the renovation of laboratory
space and equipment upgrades to support the life and health science
programs at American International College; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended to Rites of Passage & Empowerment, Inc.
in the city of Pittsfield to fund supportive programming for young women
of color in Berkshire county; provided further, that not less than $75,000
shall be expended to Berkshire Black Economic Council Inc. for technical
support to Black-owned businesses in the city of Pittsfield; provided
further, that not less than $150,000 shall be expended for Rose Kennedy
Greenway Conservancy; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall
be expended to the Franklin Downtown Partnership, Inc. to promote
economic development in the town of Franklin; provided further, that not
less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town of Acton for the design,
construction and installation of building improvements at the West Acton
Citizens' library, including but not limited to building accessible shelving
units for the storage of all library books, and other related expenses;
provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the city
of Attleboro for rehabilitation, redesign, renovation and other costs
associated with the otter exhibit at the Capron Park zoo; provided further,
that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Dedham Greenspace
Coalition, Inc.; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be
expended to the Gardner Community Action Committee, Inc. to support
capital improvements and operations; provided further, that not less than
$35,000 shall be expended to North End Athletic Association, Inc. in the
city of Boston; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be
expended to the Planning Office for Urban Affairs, Inc. for capital
improvements for the affordable and workforce housing units at The Hayes
at Railroad Square development in downtown Haverhill; provided further,
that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to Families First to support
their free, multilingual parenting education programs across
Massachusetts, partnering with childcare centers, schools and community
sites to reach families with young children in the commonwealth; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Age Strong
Commission in the city of Boston for senior programming in the Jamaica
Plain and Roxbury neighborhoods in the city of Boston; provided further,
that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the Bunker Hill Day
Parade Committee, in the Charlestown section of the city of Boston, for

Conference Committee Report
promoting tourism, production and promotional expenditures; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Cape Cod
Cape Verdean Museum and Cultural Center, Inc. in the town of Falmouth
for programs and meeting space expansion; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended to the Cape Cod Children’s Museum in
the town of Mashpee for upgrades to the fire alarm and prevention
systems and required ADA accessibility upgrades; provided further, that
not less than $50,000 shall be expended for the North End Historical
Society, Inc.; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be
expended to the Old Colony YMCA, Plymouth Branch, for Camp Clark, in
recognition of its 100th anniversary, for the purchase, replacement and
installation of new docks on Hyles pond in Plymouth; provided further, that
not less than $50,000 shall be expended to Project D.E.E.P Assoc., Inc;
provided further, that not less than $40,000 shall be expended to the
Lawrence recreation department for the procurement of a vehicle to
support the department’s efforts to provide summertime support to the at-
risk youth of the city; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to Barnstable public schools for maintenance and
improvements to school playgrounds and play spaces; provided further,
that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to North Shore Latino
Business Association, Inc. to support small business development,
technical assistance and entrepreneurial growth initiatives for minority and
immigrant-owned businesses in Lynn and across the North Shore;
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the town
of Sharon for roadway and pedestrian safety improvements at the Sharon
public library; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to the town of Stoughton for planning and implementation of
Stoughton’s 300th Anniversary Celebration; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended to the town of Walpole for sidewalk paving
and maintenance equipment; provided further, that not less than $25,000
shall be expended to Paws & Pets & Prayers Rescue Inc. in the city of
Revere for operations costs; provided further, that not less than $700,000
shall be expended for the 7UICE Foundation, Inc. to bridge opportunity
gaps and empower youth in underserved communities through education
and innovation; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to South End Baseball; provided further, that not less than
$75,000 shall be expended to the Age Strong Commission in the city of
Boston for senior programming in the Dorchester neighborhood in the city
of Boston; provided further, that not less than $150,000 shall be expended
to the Association of Haitian Women, Inc. in the city of Boston; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Haitian
Community Partners in the city of Brockton for staffing and other purposes;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the
Massachusetts Law Enforcement Memorial Foundation, Inc. for the
maintenance and upkeep of the Massachusetts law enforcement
memorial; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended
to Revolutionary Spaces, Inc. to address deferred maintenance and make
improvements necessary for the operation of the Old State House and Old
South Meeting House in Boston; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the Age Strong Commission in the city of
Boston for senior programming in the West End, Back Bay, Fenway and
Beacon Hill neighborhoods in the city of Boston; provided further, that not
less than $500,000 shall be expended to the First Night Boston Inc. for
operations in Boston; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall
be expended to the Friends of the Public Garden, Inc. to activate the
Brewer Plaza area in the Boston common in Boston to enhance public

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
safety and quality of life for residents; provided further, that not less than
$150,000 shall be expended to the city of Fall River for infrastructure
upgrades to Lafayette park; provided further, that not less than $40,000
shall be expended to the Day of Portugal Fall River Inc; provided further,
that not less than $30,000 shall be expended to Community Connections
in the city of Fall River for young adult day programming; provided further,
that not less than $30,000 shall be expended to the Fall River Arts and
Culture Coalition; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be
expended to Massachusetts Alliance for Economic Development, Inc. for
technical assistance to the region and municipalities of the
commonwealth; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the town of Cheshire for improvements to Cheshire lake;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the town
of Needham for the contracting of an economic development consultant;
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the
Asian Business Empowerment Council in the city of Boston; provided
further, that not less than $200,000 shall be expended for the St. Francis
House in the city of Boston for renovations, repairs and ongoing
maintenance of the day shelter; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to OCA-APAA-NE, INC.; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Newton Suzuki School of
Music, to improve ADA compliance and add educational and community
space as part of a larger restoration of a 1750 farmhouse housing a full-
day music and arts pre-school serving the greater Newton community and
families throughout eastern Massachusetts; provided further, that not less
than $25,000 shall be expended to the Menino Arts Center, an arts
organization located in the Hyde Park section of the city of Boston;
provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to the
purposes of the operation of the programs of Riverside Theatre Works,
Inc. located in the Hyde Park section of the city of Boston; provided further,
that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to LGBTQ Senior Housing
Inc. to facilitate access to welcoming, safe and affordable housing for low-
income LGBTQ seniors through development of affordable housing,
inclusive housing services and programming that addresses the needs of
LGBTQ seniors, and to support and preserve open space to serve seniors
in Boston; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
to the Pond Plain Improvement Association in the city known as the town
of Weymouth; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to Boston’s Forgotten Felines, Inc.; provided further, that not
less than $20,000 shall be expended to the town of Pepperell for the
replacement of carpeting at the Lawrence library; provided further, that not
less than $20,000 shall be expended to the town of Townsend for roof
repairs at the Townsend library; provided further, that not less than
$40,000 shall be expended to the Hampshire regional school district for
technology, curricular materials, resources, consumables and
professional development; provided further, that not less than $50,000
shall be expended for the replacement or repair of the damaged floating
dock at the state boat ramp located in Westport; provided further, that not
less than $20,000 shall be expended to the city of Fall River for the
purchase of upgrades to Desmarias park for the support and promotion of
outdoor activities; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be
expended to the East Springfield Neighborhood Council, Inc. in Springfield
for neighborhood beautification and community engagement; provided
further, that not less than $200,000 shall be expended for the Addiction
Treatment Center of New England, Inc. for the expansion of the three-
quarter step unit program; provided further, that not less than $20,000

Conference Committee Report
shall be expended to the Indian Orchard Citizens Council, Inc. in
Springfield for neighborhood beautification and community engagement;
provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the Pine
Point Community Council, Inc. in Springfield for neighborhood
beautification and community engagement; provided further, that not less
than $20,000 shall be expended to the 16 Acres Civic Association in
Springfield for neighborhood beautification and community engagement;
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to
Springfield Community Resources, Inc; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the Idlewell Educational Improvement
Association Inc. in the city known as the town of Weymouth; provided
further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the town of
Millbury for the improvements and upgrades of Asa Waters Historical
Mansion; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
to Millbury public schools for new chromebooks in the town of Millbury;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Ella
Fleming building in the town of Tewksbury for the repair, rehabilitation or
other supporting work; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall
be expended to Human Relations Service, Inc. in the town of Wellesley to
address the mental and behavioral health needs of families and children;
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the town
of Burlington for town campus and public space improvements; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town of Sterling
for rehabilitation and improvement work at the 1835 Town Hall; provided
further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the town of
Lancaster for the replacement and upgrade of the HVAC system at the
Thayer Memorial library, including related improvements to support the
long-term maintenance and operation of the facility; provided further, that
not less than $30,000 shall be expended to the Penn’s Hill Neighborhood
Association, Inc. in the city of Quincy; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the town of Clinton for downtown
beautification, including the purchase of furnishings, related improvements
and the installation of drinking water fountains in Depot square and Central
park; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to
the town of Berlin for the purchase of advanced life support equipment for
its ambulances, including cardiac monitoring, ventilation, ultrasound and
infusion pump equipment; provided further, that not less than $75,000
shall be expended to The Tech Foundry to expand workforce development
and digital literacy programming in Western Massachusetts; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for Friends of Herter
Park, Inc. for the maintenance of the outdoor theater in Artesani park with
approval from the department of conservation and recreation; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Age Strong
Commission in the city of Boston for senior programming in the South
Boston neighborhood in the city of Boston; provided further, that not less
than $25,000 shall be expended to the Boston Music Project, Inc. to
provide educational instruction and social-emotional learning practices in
the South Boston section of the city of Boston; provided further, that not
less than $20,000 shall be expended to the town of Milton for purposes of
dugout improvements at Andrews park; provided further, that not less than
$75,000 shall be expended to the restoration of the Edward F. Searles
estate in the city of Methuen; provided further, that not less than $50,000
shall be expended to the Greater Haverhill Chamber of Commerce to
support local businesses and promote the local economy in the Merrimack
Valley; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to
Creative Haverhill, Incorporated in support of their new location in the city

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
of Haverhill; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
to the city of Quincy for the Quincy high school baseball field practice
facilities; provided further, that not less than $640,000 shall be expended
to the Adams Presidential Center in the city of Quincy; provided further
that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to Debbie's Treasure Chest,
Inc. to continue their ongoing support of local communities; provided
further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to Irish Cultural
Centre, Inc. for the restoration and improvements of the Cultural Centre in
the town of Canton; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to Roslindale Village Main Street, Inc. to further support
economic and community development opportunities in its business
district; provided further, that not less than $40,000 shall be expended to
Mutual Aid Eastie to facilitate mutual aid programming in the East Boston
section of the city of Boston; provided further, that not less than $40,000
shall be expended to Neighbors United for a Better East Boston to facilitate
their work in civic engagement and community programming; provided
further, that not less than $40,000 shall be expended to the Center for
Cooperative Development and Solidarity, Inc. in the East Boston section
of the city of Boston to facilitate their work in the community including, but
not limited to, the acquisition of a permanent organization space; provided
further, that not less than $30,000 shall be expended to the Indian Lake
Community Association, Inc.’s Community Teaching Garden Literacy
project located at 149 West Boylston drive in the city of Worcester to
improve infrastructure, programing and design work including, but not
limited to expanding Americans with Disabilities Act compliant accessibility
for all visitors; provided further, that not less than $150,000 shall be
expended to Americans with Disabilities Act compliant pedestrian access
improvements to Woodland park and the surrounding greater
neighborhoods in the town of West Boylston; provided further, that not less
than $100,000 shall be expended to the Latino Economic Development
Corporation, Inc. for start-up and existing small businesses in the
downtown section of the city of Springfield with directed mini-grants to be
used for marketing and direct operational support; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Hispanic-American Library,
Inc. in the city of Springfield; provided further, that not less than $50,000
shall be expended to the Women’s Fund of Western Massachusetts, Inc.
in the city of Springfield; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall
be expended to Dress for Success of Western Massachusetts, Inc. in the
city of Springfield; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to The Spirit of Springfield, Inc. to produce events that provide
a sense of community, civic pride and opportunities for celebration;
provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to the New
North Citizens Council, Inc. in the city of Springfield for the Latino Health
Salsa in the Parks Family Summertime Intervention; provided further, that
not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Greater Springfield
Convention and Visitors Bureau, Inc. for the Latino marketing initiative;
provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall be expended to the
Developspringfield Corporation to offset and pay any and all costs incurred
and related to, but not limited to, operational costs and expenses involved
with the management and revitalization of the Springfield Innovation
Center on Bridge street in the city of Springfield; provided further, that not
less than $25,000 shall be expended to Blues to Green, Inc. for the
operation of the Springfield Jazz & Roots festival; provided further, that not
less than $15,000 shall be expended to East Boston Main Streets to
support their operations and efforts to revitalize signage in neighborhood
business corridors; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be

Conference Committee Report
expended to the town of Mansfield to study and create a targeted
economic development strategy that will help modernize industrial areas,
improve infrastructure readiness and position the town for future economic
growth; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to
the town of West Boylston for a landfill monitoring program to prevent the
contamination of groundwater; provided further, that not less than $10,000
shall be expended to the Starboard Institute, Inc. for the development of
the Golden Thread project highlighting history and culture in the East
Boston section of the city of Boston; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the Age Strong Commission in the city of
Boston for senior programming in the East Boston neighborhood in the city
of Boston; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
to the Garrison-Trotter Neighborhood Association, Inc.; provided further,
that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for the Charles River
Watershed Association to engage with Allston-Brighton residents in
understanding and reviewing the climate resilience implications of planned
development in the Allston-Brighton sections of the city of Boston;
provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be expended to the
New England Aquarium Corporation for their operations in the cities of
Boston and Quincy; provided further, that not less than $175,000 shall be
expended to the Woburn Golf and Ski Authority in the city of Woburn for
capital improvements; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the Friends of the Robbins Town Gardens, Inc. in the town of
Arlington; provided further, that not less than $45,000 shall be expended
to the Arlington Historical Society; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the town of Tewksbury for water
infrastructure repairs and improvements; provided further, that not less
than $250,000 shall be expended to the city of Waltham for downtown
revitalization as well as public safety infrastructure improvements along
Moody street and in the south side of the city; provided further, that not
less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town of Andover to support
public art; provided further, that not less than $125,000 shall be expended
for the Let’s Row Boston program administered by Community Rowing,
Inc. in the city of Boston; provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall
be expended to Easton Wings of Hope for youth substance use
prevention; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
to the Arc of Greater Brockton for building improvements; provided further,
that not less than $45,000 shall be expended to the town of North Andover
for security cameras at major intersections; provided further, that not less
than $25,000 shall be expended to the Nonantum Neighborhood
Association in the city of Newton; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to St. Mary of Carmen Society in the
Nonantum section of the city of Newton to support families and individuals
in need; provided further, that not less than $125,000 shall be expended
to the Armenian Cultural Association of America, Inc. Watertown
Education project in the city of Watertown; and provided further, that not
less than $40,000 shall be expended to the city of Attleboro for the
renovation of the educational amphitheater at the Capron Park zoo ............... $30,011,934
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF EDUCATION.
Office of the Secretary.
7009-1700 For the operation of information technology services within the executive
office of education ............................................................................................. $28,086,218

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
7009-6379 For the operation of the office of the secretary of education; provided, that
not later than December 16, 2026, the executive office of education, in
consultation with the department of elementary and secondary education
and the department of higher education, shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means and the joint committee on
education on the implementation and expansion of the high quality college
and career pathways initiative, including but not limited to, early college,
innovation pathways and dual enrollment programs; provided further, that
the report shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the public schools and
districts participating in early college, innovation pathways, dual
enrollment or career and vocational technical education programs; (ii) the
institutions of higher education partnering with public schools and districts
to offer early college, innovation pathways, dual enrollment or career and
vocational technical education programs; (iii) the employers and employer
partners participating in the innovation pathways program; (iv) the number
of students participating in high quality college and career pathways; and
(v) recommendations to enhance student participation in high quality
college and career pathways .............................................................................. $3,372,215
7009-6600 For the development and initial implementation of high-quality early
college and career programs, including the growth of current programs
and the strategic expansion of new programs; provided, that such
programs shall incorporate the guiding principles of designated early
college pathways, as developed jointly by the department of higher
education and the department of elementary and secondary education;
provided further, that priority shall be given to programs that serve
students who are currently underrepresented in college; provided further,
that not less than $175,000 shall be expended to Westfield State
University, for early college programming for nursing and health science
pathways to support labor force development with western Massachusetts
hospitals and health care providers; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the Cape Cod Maritime Museum, Inc. for
the expansion of youth access to summer programming of Blue Economy
History; and provided further, that funds may be expended for programs
or activities during the summer months ............................................................ $15,200,000
Department of Elementary and Secondary Education.
1596-2422 For the reimbursement of school districts and participating schools for the
costs of providing universal free school meals pursuant to section 1C of
chapter 69 of the General Laws; provided, that districts receiving funds
under this item shall not implement a meal charge for students; provided
further, that participating districts that are eligible for reimbursement under
the community eligibility provision or provision 2 of the National School
Lunch Program or an applicable provision of the National Child Nutrition
Act, Public Law 111-296, shall adopt said provision to maximize access to
federal funds; and provided further, that not later than January 15, 2027,
the department of elementary and secondary education shall submit a
report to the house and senate committees on ways and means, the joint
committee on education and the executive office for administration and
finance that shall include: (i) data on any change in utilization of school
lunch services in districts receiving funding under this item, delineated by
free, reduced and paid students as defined by the National School Lunch
Program; (ii) the distribution of funding paid through this item and, for the

Conference Committee Report
purpose of universal free school meals in fiscal year 2025, item 7053-1925
delineated by school district; and (iii) options to reform, modify or extend
the program in a manner that promotes equity, maximizes federal funds
and improves predictability and sustainability of funding ................................ $180,000,000
Education and Transportation Fund ........................ 100%
1596-2424 For a competitive grant program administered by the department of
elementary and secondary education, in consultation with Massachusetts
clean energy center, for K-12 public schools or districts for projects to
install or maintain clean energy infrastructure pursuant to section 37 of
chapter 69 of the General Laws .......................................................................... $2,000,000
Education and Transportation Fund ......................... 100%
1596-2436 For the development of a statewide birth through higher education
framework for mental and behavioral health which may include, but shall
not be limited to: (i) guiding principles and strategies related to providing
social emotional supports; (ii) mental and behavioral health supports; (iii)
suicide prevention; and (iv) relevant professional development in
educational settings; provided, that the framework shall be developed in
collaboration with the executive office of health and human services and
the department of mental health, experts in childhood mental health,
educators including those from early education and care programs,
elementary and secondary public schools, and public institutions of higher
education, students, families, and other stakeholders as appropriate;
provided further, that funds may be expended to implement the framework
and relevant mental and behavioral health supports for students; and
provided further, that not later than May 28, 2027, the department of
secondary and elementary education shall submit a report on (i) the
implementation of the framework; and (ii) the number of districts
implementing framework findings, prior appropriation continued ....................... $2,000,000
Education and Transportation Fund ........................ 100%
1596-2451 For reimbursements to regional school districts for the transportation of
pupils and to cities, towns, regional vocational or county agricultural school
districts, independent vocational schools and collaboratives for certain
expenditures for transportation of nonresident pupils to approved
vocational-technical programs of any regional or county agricultural school
district, city, town, independent school or collaborative under section 8A of
chapter 74 of the General Laws; provided further, that funds from this item
for reimbursements to regional school districts for the transportation of
pupils shall be in addition to funds appropriated in item 7035-0006; and
provided further, that the commissioner of elementary and secondary
education may transfer funds from this item to said item 7035-0006 ............... $58,415,894
Education and Transportation Fund ........................ 100%
7010-0005 For the operation of the department of elementary and secondary
education; provided, that notwithstanding chapter 66A of the General
Laws, the department of elementary and secondary education, the
department of early education and care, the department of children and
families and the disabled persons protection commission may share with
each other personal data regarding students who receive services in
special education programs approved, licensed, monitored or regulated by

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
the department of elementary and secondary education and the
department of early education and care to carry out their respective
responsibilities under state and federal law; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended to the town of Winchester for the
implementation of literacy programming in the Winchester public school
system; and provided further, that the department of elementary and
secondary education may fund direct support to teachers and
administrators who are providing services to assist in state education
initiatives; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended
for the foundation budget review commission established in section 4 of
chapter 70 of the General Laws; provided further, that the department of
elementary and secondary education shall conduct an assessment on the
education workforce in school districts across the commonwealth;
provided further, that such assessment shall include, but not be limited to:
(i) the number of teachers who have completed a certification program in
high-need subject areas, which may include, but shall not be limited to
science, technology, mathematics, computer science, special education
and English as a second language; (ii) the number of teacher vacancies
in high-need subject areas by school district; (iii) the number of vacancies
in high-need subject areas as compared to total number of teacher
vacancies; and (iv) the ratio of teachers to students in each school district;
provided further, that not later than February 2, 2027, the department of
elementary and secondary education, in consultation with the executive
office of education, shall submit a report on their findings to the clerks of
the house of representatives and the senate, the house and senate
committees on ways and means and the joint committee on education;
provided further, that not less than $2,000,000 shall be expended as
grants to school districts to support the education of students on safe,
responsible and healthy social media use, which may include, but shall not
be limited to: (i) curriculum frameworks and other instructional materials
that promote evidence-based practices; and (ii) educator training and
professional development; and provided further, that not less than
$375,000 shall be expended for grants to support hands-on
cardiopulmonary resuscitation training in public schools across the
commonwealth .................................................................................................. $16,089,723
7010-0012 For grants to cities, towns and regional school districts for payments of
certain costs and related expenses for the program to eliminate racial
imbalance established under section 12A of chapter 76 of the General
Laws; provided, that funds shall be made available for payment for
services rendered by the Metropolitan Council for Educational Opportunity
(METCO), Inc. and Springfield public schools; provided further, that all
grant applications submitted to and approved by the department of
elementary and secondary education shall include a detailed line item
budget specifying how such funds shall be allocated and expended;
provided further, that not later than January 29, 2027, the department shall
submit a report to the joint committee on education and the house and
senate committees on ways and means on the impact of the grant program
on student outcomes, the expenditure of funds by districts and the extent
to which the services rendered by METCO support the goals of the grant
program; and provided further, that funds appropriated in this item for fiscal
year 2027 shall not revert to the General Fund but shall be available until
December 31, 2027........................................................................................... $30,908,286
7010-0033 For literacy and early literacy grant programs; provided, that literacy and
early literacy programs receiving funding through this item shall submit

Conference Committee Report
ongoing evaluations and documentation of outcomes to the department of
elementary and secondary education; provided further, that said
evaluations shall be compared to measurable goals and benchmarks
developed by the department; provided further, that not less than $440,000
shall be expended for HILL for Literacy, Inc.; provided further, that funds
provided to HILL for Literacy, Inc. in fiscal year 2027, may be expended
through June 30, 2028; and provided further, that funds may be expended
for programs or activities during the summer months ......................................... $5,706,750
7010-1192 For grants to cities, towns, school districts and nonprofit entities for
educational improvement projects; provided, that not less than $75,000
shall be expended to Leominster public schools for the purpose of
launching new adult and after hours educational vocational programming;
provided further, that not less than $70,000 shall be expended to Monson
public schools, for the purchase of 280 chromebooks to sustain equitable
access to instructional technology; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended for the E-Team Machinist Program in the city
of Lynn; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to
the city of Chicopee for financial assistance and waivers for applications
in youth sports programs; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall
be expended for youth programs at Dennison Memorial Community
Center, Inc. in New Bedford; provided further, that not less than $150,000
shall be expended to the city of Boston for a study of the redevelopment
and economically integrated housing at Jackson Mann community center
complex in the Union Square section of Allston in the city of Boston;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for a grant
to Collaborative for Educational Services, Inc. located in the city of
Northampton for the trauma-informed Hampshire county initiative;
provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to the
Kiwanis Club for the purpose of expanding assistance for local students
pursuing higher education in Massachusetts; provided further, that not less
than $100,000 shall be expended to the city of Medford for Robotics 360
programming for elementary and high school students; provided further,
that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the city of Medford for
transportation to career technical education co-op programming for
students in the city of Medford; provided further, that not less than $25,000
shall be expended to Easton public schools for programming with Raising
Multicultural Kids; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the Taunton Performing Arts Center for the purchase of their
building; provided further, that not less than $30,000 shall be expended to
the town of Salisbury for repairs to the Salisbury elementary school
playground; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
to Third Sector New England, Inc. for the Commonwealth Seminar to
support its civic education, training, and leadership program focused on
underserved communities; provided further, that not less than $100,000
shall be expended to the Coalition for Anti-Racism and Equity, Inc. and the
Commonwealth Seminar for a joint fellowship program for high school and
college students from underrepresented communities of color; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to Beyond Soccer,
Inc. for innovative health, athletic and leadership programming for low-
income youth in the city of Lawrence; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to Kinetic Smiles, Inc. to support youth cycling,
fitness, and wellness programming for children in the city of Lawrence and
surrounding communities; provided further, that not less than $20,000
shall be expended to the Hill View Montessori Foundation, Inc. for a
security system at Hill View Montessori Charter Public School; provided

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended to the city known as
the town of North Attleborough for the construction of a new playground
for the Community School; provided further, that not less than $40,000
shall be expended to the town of Mansfield for renovation, repair and
replacement of equipment at the Mansfield high school auditorium;
provided further, that not less than $5,000 shall be expended to Unique
Steps Dance Academy in North Attleborough; provided further, that not
less than $100,000 shall be expended to the Dedham Education
Foundation, Inc. to support their mission of student enrichment programs
for Dedham public schools; provided further, that not less than $25,000
shall be expended to Haverhill public schools for the renovation of the
Haverhill high school weight room and related athletic activities; provided
further, that not less than $150,000 shall be expended to Braintree public
schools for mental health services; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be expended for the All Dorchester Sports League, Inc. for
educational support, nutrition, and other community benefits; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to Asociación
Carnavalesca de Massachusetts, Inc. in the city of Lawrence, to highlight
the colorful tradition of Dominican Carnival in the Merrimack Valley and to
provide at-risk youth with assistance programming and after school
activities; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
to Instituto Cultural de Puerto Rico, Inc. in the City of Lawrence, to highlight
the colorful tradition of Puerto Rican culture in the Merrimack Valley;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to Ateneo
Dominicano Del Merrimack Valley to maintain and promote Dominican
culture throughout the Merrimack Valley through history, literature, arts,
customs, and family values; provided further, that not less than $25,000
shall be expended to the P2P Basketball Corp. for the costs of expanding
their programming to serve youth in Salem; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended for grants to support hands-on CPR
training in public schools across the commonwealth; provided further, that
not less than $250,000 shall be expended for Catie’s Closet, Inc. to
provide students in schools with a high percentage of low-income and
homeless students with: (i) in-school access to clothing, toiletries, and
basic necessities; and (ii) community-based resources including, but not
limited to, social services, mental health services and behavioral health
services; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended
to the Lunenburg public schools for technology upgrades; provided further,
that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to the Acushnet council on
aging and community center to replace its outdated HVAC system;
provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to the
Westport public schools for the replacement of HVAC filters, parts, and
service; provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to
the Acushnet public schools for the replacement of HVAC filters, parts,
and service; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
for Community Investors, Inc.’s PowerPlay Initiative in the town of
Wellesley in support of the expansion of an inclusive after-school and out-
of-school-time recreational program at urban and suburban
Massachusetts schools; provided further, that not less than $15,000 shall
be expended to the West Newton Cinema Foundation, Inc. for accessibility
improvements; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be
expended to BPE, Inc., to support the educator career pathways program;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the
Newton Cultural Alliance, Inc./The Allen Center for the purchasing of
equipment and related technical support to expand access; provided
further, that not less than $125,000 shall be expended to Stonehill College

Conference Committee Report
for the development of a nursing simulation lab to enhance clinical training
and expand the health workforce pipeline; provided further, that not less
than $100,000 shall be expended to the John F. Kennedy Library for the
expansion and modernization of digital infrastructure; provided further,
that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Community Music
School of Springfield, Inc.; provided further, that not less than $50,000
shall be expended to Newton public schools for professional development
opportunities for educators including diversity, equity and inclusion
initiatives and to support a leadership network across the Newton public
schools; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to
Woburn public schools for computer lab upgrades at the Woburn memorial
high school in the city of Woburn; provided further, that not less than
$20,000 shall be expended to the Cuniff Elementary School
Parent/Caregiver Teacher Organization in the city of Watertown to
improve the academic and social experiences of students through
enhanced volunteer partnerships between students, parents, caregivers
and teachers; provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall be
expended to the city of Worcester for the Recreation Worcester program;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the
Belmont public schools for stipends for afterschool programs; and
provided further, that not less than $15,000 shall be expended to Belmont
Against Racism for afterschool transportation and other student
programing; provided further, that not less than $60,000 shall be expended
to Westborough public schools for the purchase of cell phone pouches;
provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to Auburn
Youth and Family Services, Inc. to support its food pantry and the healthy
development of youth and families; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be expended to Wachusett regional high school for the
purchase of security cameras; provided further, that not less than $49,000
shall be expended for Amesbury public schools for chromebooks for third-
grade students; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be
expended for the New Bedford Youth Court and Fall River Youth Court
programs in the cities of New Bedford and Fall River to support juvenile
diversion programs based on the principles of peer-lead restorative justice;
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the
Friends of the Medford Family Network Corp. to provide early childhood,
parent education and family support services in the city of Medford;
provided further, that not less than $500,000 shall be expended for the
SouthCoast Community Foundation, Inc. to administer a 1-time grant
program to provide access to resources for underserved residents in the
greater New Bedford area; provided further, that funds appropriated for
the grant program in fiscal year 2024, fiscal year 2025 and fiscal year 2026
shall not revert and shall be made available for the purposes of the
program in fiscal year 2027; provided further, that not less than $40,000
shall be expended to the town of Stoneham for school playground
improvements; provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall be
expended to Berkshire Educational Resources K-12 to perform
regionalization and efficiency work with public school districts in Berkshire
county and with the Mohawk Trail regional school district in Franklin
county; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to
the town of Belmont for the replacement of textbooks in Belmont public
schools; provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended for
Grad Nite Live, Inc. located in the town of Marshfield to support student
safety and drug and alcohol free entertainment to local high school
seniors; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for
Child Care of the Berkshires, Inc. to support the stability of the Magic

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
Seasons Early Childhood center in the town of Adams and to complete
final essential upgrades to the Monument Square Early Childhood and
School-Age center in the city of North Adams; provided further, that not
less than $20,000 shall be expended for Zamir Chorale of Boston, Inc. to
support its musical and educational programming for the public; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for Greenagers, Inc.
to provide teen and young adult environmental programming; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town of
Cummington for capital improvements and repairs to historical structures
at the J.S. Bryant School; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall
be expended to Mary Lyon Foundation, Inc. for services and financial
support to students and families in Franklin county; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended for Railroad Street Youth Project,
Inc. in the town of Great Barrington to support youth-inspired projects;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for the
Springfield Day Nursery Corporation in the city of Springfield to support at-
risk children, address learning gaps and prepare students for school
achievement; provided further, that not less than $85,000 shall be
expended for Arlington Youth Counseling Center, Inc. in the town of
Arlington for youth mental health support; provided further, that not less
than $100,000 shall be expended for English at Large, Inc. in the city of
Woburn for English language tutoring and small group instruction;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended for the
Together for Kids Coalition in the city of Worcester to promote the health,
wellbeing and success of young children and their families; provided
further, that not less than $40,000 shall be expended to the Worcester
Education Collaborative and the United Way of Central Massachusetts,
Inc. for the Worcester Literacy Partnership to increase literacy
achievement among children; provided further, that not less than $25,000
shall be expended for LEAP for Education, Inc. to support school-day,
MyCAP-aligned education and career planning for students in the city of
Salem, including individualized post-secondary advising, career
exploration, work-based learning preparation and connections to local
mentors and employers; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall
be expended to the Essex National Heritage Commission, Inc. for the
Teaching Hidden Histories program; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the Loop Lab, Inc. to empower youth to
access careers in media arts through job training and paid internships;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to
Courageous Sailing Center for Youth, Inc. in the Charlestown section of
the city of Boston for youth programming and enrichment opportunities;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to Girls on
the Run Greater Boston, Inc to provide social-emotional learning and
physical activity curriculum to elementary and middle school-aged girls in
the cities of Chelsea, Everett and Cambridge and the Charlestown section
of the city of Boston; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to La Vida, Inc. doing business as La Vida Scholars in the city
of Chelsea to support their college preparation programs; provided further,
that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Art Lab Everett in the
city of Everett for youth development projects and its arts apprenticeship
program; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
to Everett Community Growers, Inc. in the city of Everett to provide food
justice education and services; provided further, that not less than $25,000
shall be expended to First Start Foundation Inc. to support equipment
costs of Prophecy Wrestling Club, help expand its reach and facilitate the
participation of youth in the cities of Lawrence and Methuen; provided

Conference Committee Report
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for Lawrence
CommunityWorks, Inc. for Movement City to help engage youth through
creative education; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to Haverhill Inner City Boxing Club, Inc. to provide support for
underprivileged youth in the Greater Haverhill area; provided further, that
not less than $125,000 shall be expended to Lawrence high school to
create a career pathway partnership for medical professions in partnership
with Merrimack Health, Inc.; provided further, that not less than $50,000
shall be expended to Chico Summer Shootout Foundation Inc for the
operation of their spring and summer programming for youth in and around
the cities of Methuen and Lawrence; provided further, that not less than
$15,000 shall be expended for the Agawam Robotics Education
Foundation, Inc. in the city known as the town of Agawam for programming
and operational costs; provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall
be expended toward academic and financial support services for students
of the Urban College of Boston: A Two-Year College, Inc. to expand
access for students of economically disadvantaged backgrounds;
provided further, that not less than $16,566 shall be expended to the
Halifax elementary school for the replacement of the telephone system;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for the
Choices4Teens Mentoring Group Inc. for a mentoring program to improve
outcomes for at-risk youth, to address social and behavioral issues and to
support violence prevention in the city of Brockton; provided further, that
not less than $1,000,000 shall be expended for programs and resources
to support farm to school and food system literacy programming in public
elementary and secondary schools and early education programs;
provided further, that not less than $750,000 of such funds shall be used
to offer grants through the current operating farm to school FRESH Grant
program; provided further, that $150,000 of such funds shall be used to
expand the Massachusetts School Wellness Coaching Program; provided
further, that not less than $100,000 of such funds shall be used to develop
food literacy curricula, tools and resources for use by public schools;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town
of North Reading for youth programming; provided further, that not less
than $200,000 shall be expended for Easter Seals Massachusetts, Inc. to
provide college navigator services; provided further, that not less than
$26,000 shall be expended for Raising Multicultural Kids, Inc. in the town
of Easton for educational programming and teacher recruitment; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the town of
Lynnfield for capital improvements to the middle school; provided further,
that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to The American Exchange
Project, Inc. to launch a pilot-to-scale program in public schools in the city
of Lynn; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to
Hanover public schools for purposes including, but not limited to,
implementing a cardiac screening program; provided further, that not less
than $15,000 shall be expended to the town of Rockland for purposes
including, but not limited to, an engineering study for the Union street
entrance to and the front steps of Rockland Memorial library; provided
further, that not less than $60,000 shall be expended for the town of
Franklin public school district for lighting upgrades to the middle school
auditorium; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
for water treatment improvements and PFAS removal at Pine Hill
elementary school in the town of Sherborn; provided further, that not less
than $500,000 shall be expended to the Behavioral health Integrated
Resources for Children (BIRCH) center to continue the operations of the
school-based behavioral health technical assistance center; provided

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for the Link to
Libraries, Inc. to provide new, culturally-responsive and engaging books
for school libraries while supporting underserved elementary school
students in building their own home libraries; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended for Girls on the Run of Western MA, Inc.
to provide social-emotional learning and physical activity curricula to
elementary and middle school-aged girls; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended for the Pembroke public schools for
infrastructure maintenance and improvements and energy affordability
initiatives; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
to Marblehead public schools for the refurbishment of the Glover
Elementary School playground; provided further, that not less than
$30,000 shall be expended for Top Floor Learning, Inc. in the city known
as the town of Palmer to provide low cost or free tutoring and classes for
adults; provided further, that not less than $35,000 shall be expended for
the Dennet elementary school in the town of Plympton; provided further,
that not less than $20,000 shall be expended for Cape Cod Foundation,
Inc. for its Fund for Sandwich permanent endowment fund; provided
further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended for The Soul Project,
Inc. in the town of West Bridgewater for the Soulful Girls Club program and
other programming for young women as they transition out of teen
programs to ensure continued access to community connection and
growth; provided further, that not less than $30,000 shall be expended for
Nantucket Community Television, Inc. to support Nantucket High School
sports broadcasting through Nantucket Sports Connection programming
and initiatives; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be
expended for the Afrimerican Culture Initiative Inc. for the Afrimerican
Academy for programming to provide youth with workforce development,
career readiness training, financial literacy, public speaking, project-based
learning, civic engagement and youth-led public programming that
connects local history, cultural education, and long-term educational and
career pathways; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended for Chica Project to support culturally-affirming, trauma-
informed youth development, mentoring, leadership development, civic
engagement and college readiness programming for young women and
girls in the city of Boston; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall
be expended for The Modern Mentor Inc. for youth mentorship and
personal development; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall
be expended for Hoops Collaborative Youth Development Program,
Incorporated to support free youth basketball programming, mentorship,
leadership development, community engagement activities and
wraparound support services for young people in the Greater Boston area;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended for
Mattapan/Greater Boston Technology Learning Center, Inc. to support
operations, the expansion of workforce development programming, digital
literacy training, youth STEM programs and community-based technology
initiatives serving residents of the Roxbury, Mattapan, Dorchester and
Hyde Park sections of the city of Boston and the Greater Boston area;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to Greatest
MINDS to support mentorship, college and career readiness, leadership
development, workforce training, civic engagement and educational
programming for middle school, high school and college students in the
city of Boston; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be
expended to Framingham public schools for the purchase of a wheelchair-
accessible van; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be
expended to Westport public schools to conduct a traffic study; provided

Conference Committee Report
further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to Confikids Inc. to
provide children with access to recreational sports, arts and activities;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to Mansfield
public schools for expenses related to the creation of a multimedia lab
space in Mansfield high school to offer production courses for students;
and provided further, that funds shall be expended fully and, on a
schedule, consistent with the provisions of section 9B of chapter 29 of the
General Laws ...................................................................................................... $7,971,566
7010-1196 For programs and services offered by Smart from the Start, Inc. to promote
the healthy development of young children and their families living in
underserved communities in the city of Boston through trauma-informed,
multi-generational family support and community engagement ............................ $500,000
7027-0019 For school-to-career connecting activities; provided, that notwithstanding
any general or special law to the contrary, the board of elementary and
secondary education, in cooperation with the executive office of labor and
workforce development and the state workforce investment board, may
establish and support a public-private partnership to link high school
students with economic and learning opportunities on the job as part of the
school-to-career transition program; provided further, that this program
may include the award of matching grants to workforce investment boards
or other local public-private partnerships involving local community job
commitments and worksite learning opportunities for students; provided
further, that the grants shall require at least a 200 per cent match in wages
for the students from private sector participants; provided further, that the
program shall include, but not be limited to, a provision that business
leaders commit resources to pay salaries, to provide mentoring and
instruction on the job and to work closely with teachers; provided further,
that public funds shall pay for the costs of connecting schools and
businesses to ensure that students serve productively on the job; provided
further, that not less than $200,000 shall be expended to Girls Inc. for the
operation of the SMART and Eureka programs at the Framingham,
Holyoke, Lowell, Lynn, Pittsfield and Worcester chapters of Girls Inc.; and
provided further, that the program shall partner with the YouthWorks
program at the Commonwealth Corporation to develop appropriate
connections between the 2 programs ................................................................. $6,672,081
7027-0020 For the implementation, operation and expansion of innovation pathway
programs; provided, that such programs shall incorporate the guiding
principles of innovation pathway programs, as developed jointly by the
department of elementary and secondary education and the department
of higher education; and provided further, that preference shall be given
to programs that encourage career opportunities in high demand
industries ............................................................................................................. $4,764,496
7027-1004 For services that improve outcomes for English language learners,
including, but not limited to, English language acquisition professional
development to improve the academic performance of English language
learners; provided, that funds shall be expended to implement the
programs under chapter 71A of the General Laws; provided further, that
funds may be expended for the professional development of vocational-
technical educators who educate English language learners; provided
further, that funds may be expended to administer the requirements under
chapter 138 of the acts of 2017; provided further, that not less than
$1,000,000 shall be expended on grants to high-quality, intensive English

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
language learning programs in districts serving gateway municipalities as
defined under section 3A of chapter 23A of the General Laws; provided
further, that funds shall be expended for districts to provide support for
middle and high school students deemed to be at risk of dropping out of
school as a result of language barriers or challenges in English language
acquisition; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
to the Hudson Maynard Adult Learning Center; and provided further, that
funds may be expended for programs or activities during the summer
months ................................................................................................................ $3,762,905
7028-0031 For the expenses of school-age children in institutional schools under
section 12 of chapter 71B of the General Laws; provided, that the
department of elementary and secondary education may provide special
education services to eligible incarcerated persons in houses of correction;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to
Fundacion CEMDPCD to support, educate, and advocate on behalf of low-
income parents of students with learning disabilities in the city of
Lawrence; and provided further, that the department of elementary and
secondary education shall continue to collaborate with the department of
youth services to align curriculum at the department of youth services with
the statewide curriculum frameworks and to support the reintegration of
youth from facilities at the department of youth services into regular public
school settings .................................................................................................... $8,775,748
7035-0001 For a program to be operated by the department of elementary and
secondary education for planning and implementation grants for regional
and local partnerships to develop and expand existing and new career and
technical education programs, including the establishment and support of
career technical institutes, including technical institutes established in
chapter 74 of the General Laws; provided, that preference shall be given
in awarding planning and implementation grants to vocational schools with
demonstrable waitlists for admission; and provided further, that funding
from this item may be used for transportation costs that are not otherwise
reimbursed by the regional school transportation program ................................ $3,087,315
7035-0002 For the provision and improvement of adult basic education services;
provided, that grants shall be distributed to a diverse network of
organizations that have demonstrated a commitment and an effectiveness
in the provision of such services and that are selected competitively by the
department of elementary and secondary education; provided further, that
such grants shall support the successful transition of students from other
adult basic education programs to community college certificate and
degree-granting programs; provided further, that the grants shall be
contingent upon satisfactory levels of performance as defined and
determined by the department; provided further, that preference in
awarding grants shall be given to organizations providing services to high
percentages of parents of infants, toddlers and preschool and school-age
children; provided further, that funds shall be expended to reduce the
waitlist of students for English language learning services; provided
further, that grants shall not be considered an entitlement to a grant
recipient; provided further, that the department shall consult with
community colleges and other service providers in supporting and
implementing content, performance and professional standards for adult
basic education programs and services; provided further, that funds shall
be expended on phase 2 pay-for-performance contracts based on
outcomes-based contract measuring and funding services that result in

Conference Committee Report
employment and wage gains and that require bridge funding while final
performance results are being analyzed; provided further, that efforts shall
be taken to reduce the wait list; and provided further, that the department
shall fund a professional development system to provide training and
support for adult basic education programs and services ................................ $58,391,405
7035-0006 For reimbursements to regional school districts for the transportation of
pupils; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, the commonwealth’s obligation shall not exceed the amount
appropriated in this item; provided further, that the department of
elementary and secondary education shall explore alternative
transportation delivery, contracting and reimbursement models to identify
possible economical and efficient approaches by which districts can
transport students to public schools and related opportunities; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the town of
Hopedale for the planning, design and implementation of a security system
for the Hopedale Junior Senior High School; and provided further, that not
later than February 2, 2027, the department shall submit the results of its
review to the joint committee on education, the house and senate
committees on ways and means and the executive office for administration
and finance ........................................................................................................ $57,162,492
7035-0008 For reimbursements to cities, towns and regional school districts for the
cost of transportation of nonresident pupils as required by the federal
McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act, 42 U.S.C. 119; provided, that
not later than February 12, 2027, the department of elementary and
secondary education shall submit to the house and senate committees on
ways and means a preliminary estimate of the costs eligible for
reimbursement under this item in fiscal year 2028; and provided further,
that the commonwealth’s obligation shall not exceed the amount
appropriated in this item .................................................................................... $35,219,466
7035-0035 For a statewide program to increase participation and performance in
advanced placement courses, particularly among underserved
populations, to prepare students for college and career success in
science, technology, engineering, mathematics and English; provided,
that the department of elementary and secondary education shall establish
an advanced placement test fee program which may reimburse fees to
assist students with paying the fee for advanced placement tests based
on financial need to be determined by the department; provided further,
that funds shall support programs with the following program elements: (i)
open access to courses; (ii) identifying underserved students and
increasing their rates of participation in advanced placement courses; (iii)
equipment and supplies for new and expanded advanced placement
courses; (iv) support for the costs of advanced placement exams; and (v)
support for student study sessions; provided further, that these funds may
support teacher professional development, including a College Board-
endorsed advanced placement summer institute for math, science and
English advanced placement teachers; provided further, that said program
shall provide a matching amount of not less than $1,000,000 in private
funding for direct support of educators; provided further, that the programs
shall be chosen through a competitive process; provided further, that funds
shall be disbursed by the beginning of the 2026-2027 school year to cover
costs expended between August 3, 2026 and July 31, 2027, inclusive;
provided further, that this program shall work in conjunction with an existing,
separately funded, statewide pre-advanced placement program; and

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
provided further, that funds may be expended for programs or activities
during the summer months ................................................................................. $2,250,320
Education and Transportation Fund ........................ 100%
7053-1909 For reimbursements to cities and towns for partial assistance in the
furnishing of lunches to school children, including partial assistance in the
furnishing of lunches to school children under section 6 of chapter 548 of
the acts of 1948, as inserted by chapter 538 of the acts of 1951, and for
supplementing funds allocated for the special milk program; provided, that
authorized payments in the aggregate for partial assistance in the
furnishing of lunches to school children shall not exceed the required state
revenue match contained in the National School Lunch Act, 42 U.S.C.
1751 et seq., as amended, and implementing regulations; and provided
further, that all cities and towns shall publish and disseminate meal charge
policies in accordance with the United States Department of Agriculture
guidance memorandum SP 46-2016, issued July 8, 2016, in a format that is
easily accessible and, if possible, made available for parents and guardians
before the start of the 2026-2027 school year, but not later than September
30, 2026............................................................................................................... $5,314,176
7053-1925 For the school breakfast program for public and nonpublic schools and for
grants to improve summer food programs during the summer school
vacation period; provided, that within the summer food program, priority
shall be given to extending such programs for the full summer vacation
period and promoting increased participation in such programs; provided
further, that the department of elementary and secondary education shall
solicit proposals from returning sponsors and school food authorities in
time for implementation of such grant program during the summer of 2027;
provided further, that such grants shall only be awarded to sponsors who
can demonstrate their intent to offer full summer programs or increase
participation; provided further, that the department shall require sufficient
reporting from each grantee to measure the success of such grant
program; provided further, that not later than April 1, 2027, the department
shall select grantees for the program authorized by this item; provided
further, that funds shall be expended for the universal school breakfast
program through which all children in schools receiving funds under such
program shall be provided free, nutritious breakfast; provided further, that
subject to regulations by the board of education that specify time and
learning standards, breakfast shall be served during regular school hours;
provided further, that participation shall be limited to those elementary
schools mandated to serve breakfast under section 1C of chapter 69 of
the General Laws where not less than 60 per cent of the students are
eligible for free or reduced price meals under the federally funded school
meals program; provided further, that not later than November 13, 2026, the
department shall select school sites for programs authorized by this item
and shall report to the house and senate committees on ways and means
on the preliminary results of these grants not later than February 5, 2027;
provided further, that kindergarten to grade 12, inclusive, public schools
that are required to serve breakfast under said section 1C of said chapter
69 and where not less than 60 per cent of students are eligible for free or
reduced price meals shall offer school breakfast after the instructional day
has begun and the tardy bell rings; provided further, that not later than
September 1, 2026, the department shall submit a report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means on the status of school district
compliance with this requirement including, but not limited to, all data

Conference Committee Report
regarding breakfast-delivery models utilized and participation rates;
provided further, that not less than $700,000 shall be expended for a grant
with Project Bread-The Walk for Hunger, Inc., to enhance and expand the
summer food service outreach program and the school breakfast outreach
program; and provided further, that nothing in the universal school
breakfast program shall give rise to legal rights in any party or provide
enforceable entitlement to services, prior appropriation continued .................... $4,429,965
7061-0008 For school aid to cities, towns, regional school districts, counties
maintaining agricultural schools, independent vocational schools and
independent agricultural and technical schools to be distributed under
chapters 70 and 76 of the General Laws and section 3 .............................. $7,658,399,506
General Fund ........................................................ 84.48%
Education and Transportation Fund ....................... 7.64%
Student Opportunity Act Investment Fund .............. 7.42%
Education Fund ....................................................... 0.46%
7061-0012 For the reimbursement of extraordinary special education costs under
section 5A of chapter 71B of the General Laws; provided, that the
approved costs threshold for fiscal year 2027 shall be as defined in said
section 5A of said chapter 71B and the program shall reimburse
municipalities for both the eligible instructional costs and for the cost of
required out-of-district transportation associated with implementing
individual education plans of students receiving special education services
in a manner consistent with said section 5A of said chapter 71B; provided
further, that notwithstanding section 27 of chapter 132 of the acts of 2019,
the program shall reimburse 75 per cent of all required out-of-district
transportation costs eligible for reimbursement in fiscal year 2027;
provided further, that reimbursements shall be prorated as necessary so
that the expenses of this item shall not exceed the amount appropriated in
this item; provided further, that upon receipt by the department of
elementary and secondary education of required special education cost
reports from school districts, the department of elementary and secondary
education shall reimburse districts based on fiscal year 2026 claims;
provided further, that the department of elementary and secondary
education may expend funds to continue and expand voluntary residential
placement prevention programs between the department of elementary
and secondary education and other departments within the executive
office of health and human services that develop community-based
support services for children and their families; provided further, that the
department of elementary and secondary education shall provide not less
than $11,700,000 to the department of developmental services for the
voluntary residential placement prevention program; provided further, that
the department of elementary and secondary education shall fully
cooperate in providing information and assistance necessary for the
department of developmental services to maximize federal reimbursement
and to effectively serve students in less restrictive settings; provided
further, that not less than $750,000 shall be expended for students with
intellectual disabilities through the Massachusetts chapter of Best Buddies
International, Inc.; provided further, that the department of elementary and
secondary education shall expend not less than $200,000: (i) to provide
books in accessible synthetic audio format that are made available through
the National Instructional Materials Access Center repository; and (ii) for
outreach to and training of teachers and students on the use of National
Instructional Materials Accessibility Standard format and the use of human

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
speech audio digital textbooks; provided further, that the department of
elementary and secondary education shall expend funds for the costs of
borrowing audio textbooks by special education students; provided further,
that not less than $250,000 shall be expended for school districts in which
special education costs exceed 25 per cent of the total district costs and
in which tuition and other circuit--breaker eligible costs for placements at
an approved private school located within the district exceed both
$1,000,000 and 20 per cent of all tuition and other circuit-breaker eligible
costs for placements at approved private schools; provided further, that
funds may be expended for the monitoring and follow-up activities of the
department of elementary and secondary education’s complaint
management system, review and approval of local educational authority
applications and local school districts’ compliance with the requirements
of part B of the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, as amended in
2004, by the Individuals with Disabilities Education Improvement Act of
2004, Public Law 108-446, 20 U.S.C. 1400 et seq., in the provision of
special education and related services to children with disabilities;
provided further, that funds may be expended to administer the
reimbursements funded in this item; provided further, that funds may be
expended to reimburse districts for extraordinary increases in costs
incurred during fiscal year 2027 that would be reimbursable under said
section 5A of said chapter 71B; provided further, that reimbursements for
current year costs shall be limited to school districts that experience
increases of greater than 25 per cent from costs reimbursable under said
section 5A of said chapter 71B and incurred during fiscal year 2026 to
costs reimbursable under said section 5A of said chapter 71B and incurred
during fiscal year 2027 or other cases of extraordinary hardship where
special education costs increase in relationship to total district costs as the
department of elementary and secondary education may define through
regulations or guidelines; provided further, that reimbursements for current
year costs shall be allocated as 1-time grants; provided further, that the
department of elementary and secondary education shall conduct audits of
fiscal year 2026 claims; provided further, that if the fiscal year 2026 claims
are found to be inaccurate, the department of elementary and secondary
education shall recalculate the fiscal year 2027 reimbursement amount
and adjust the third and fourth quarter payments to the districts to reflect
the new reimbursement amount; provided further, that not later than
January 29, 2027, the department of elementary and secondary education
shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means on the results of the audit; and provided further, that not later than
February 26, 2027, the department of elementary and secondary education
shall submit to the house and senate committees on ways and means a
preliminary estimate of the costs eligible for reimbursement through this
item in fiscal year 2028, prior appropriation continued ................................... $654,644,886
7061-0028 For grants to school districts, charter schools and educational
collaboratives to adapt, expand or strengthen multi-tiered systems of
support to respond to the social emotional and behavioral health needs of
students, families and educators; provided, that the department of
elementary and secondary education shall develop the criteria for the
grants; provided further, that grants may be awarded to school districts,
charter schools and educational collaboratives that: (i) integrate equitable,
culturally-competent and accessible social emotional learning skills into
curriculum; (ii) implement targeted and evidenced-based supports for
students at risk of not reaching social and behavioral expectations; (iii)
provide professional development for staff members to recognize and

Conference Committee Report
respond to mental and behavioral health challenges that may arise during
in-person or remote learning; and (iv) solicit feedback from a culturally and
regionally diverse cross-section of students, families and caregivers to
ensure that social emotional learning efforts reflect the school community’s
values and priorities; provided further, that preference in awarding grants
shall be given to applicants that prioritize racial equity and cultural
responsiveness; provided further, that the department shall, to the extent
feasible, take affirmative steps to ensure the success of grant recipients in
strengthening multi-tiered systems of support including, but not limited to,
increased outreach and administrative support; provided further, that not
less than $1,000,000 shall be expended for a pilot program to provide
universal mental health screenings for students in kindergarten to grade
12, inclusive; provided further, that participants in the pilot program shall
establish mental health support teams composed of existing student
support personnel and screenings shall be performed by a member of
such a team; provided further, that grants awarded through the program
may be used to support costs related to implementation of screening
protocols, professional development and technical assistance; provided
further, that not later than July 1, 2027, each participant in the pilot
program shall submit a report to the department of elementary and
secondary education which shall include, but not limited to, the: (a) number
of students who received mental health screenings, delineated by
demographic group and grade level; (b) number of students requiring
additional support or follow-up screenings, including students who
indicated suicidal ideation or intent to self-harm; (c) length of time between
the initial screening and subsequent support services provided; (d)
number of students referred for additional support services outside of the
school district; and (e) types of screening tools used; provided further, that
not later than September 1, 2027, the department shall submit a report to
the joint committee on education, the joint committee on mental health,
substance use and recovery and the house and senate committees on
ways and means that shall include: (1) a description of the participants in
the pilot program; (2) a summary of the data collected from program
participants; and (3) any recommendations to further expand the
availability of mental health screenings for students; and provided further,
that not less than $500,000 shall be expended for behavioral health and
mental health supports for nonpublic schools including, but not limited to,
mental health counselors .................................................................................... $3,500,000
7061-0029 For the office of school and district accountability established in section
55A of chapter 15 of the General Laws; provided, that notwithstanding said
section 55A of said chapter 15, the office shall perform not less than 20
school district audits for fiscal year 2027 ............................................................ $1,599,268
7061-0033 For a reserve to assist towns negatively impacted by shortfalls in federal
impact aid for the education of children in families employed by the federal
government on military reservations located within a town’s limits;
provided, that any grants provided under this item shall be expended by a
school committee without further appropriation; and provided further, that
not less than $150,000 shall be made available to the town of Lincoln to
mitigate the costs of educating the children of retired-military families .............. $1,455,500
7061-9010 For fiscal year 2027 reimbursements to certain cities, towns and regional
school districts of charter school tuition and the per-pupil capital facilities
component included in the charter school tuition amount for
commonwealth charter schools, as calculated under subsections (ff) and

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
(gg) of section 89 of chapter 71 of the General Laws; provided, that
notwithstanding said subsection (ff) of said section 89 of said chapter 71
or any other general or special law to the contrary, the per-pupil capital
facilities component of the commonwealth charter school tuition rate for
fiscal year 2027 shall be $1,288; provided further, that under section 25 of
chapter 132 of the acts of 2019, the department shall provide under this
appropriation not less than 100 per cent of the total eligible state obligation
in fiscal year 2027; and provided further, that if the amount appropriated is
insufficient to fully fund all reimbursements required by said section 89 of
said chapter 71, the department shall fund the reimbursements in
accordance with the following priorities: (i) the payment of the first year
tuition for students previously enrolled in a private or parochial school or
students who are homeschooled; (ii) the payment of tuition for siblings
where required by subsection (i) of said section 89 of said chapter 71; (iii)
the per-pupil capital facilities component; (iv) the 100 per cent increase
reimbursement; and (v) the remaining increase reimbursements,
beginning with the most recent year ............................................................... $200,402,605
7061-9200 For the department’s education data analysis and support for local districts
............................................................................................................................ $1,302,145
7061-9400 For student and school assessment, including the administration of the
Massachusetts Comprehensive Assessment System exam established by
the board of elementary and secondary education under sections 1D and
1I of chapter 69 of the General Laws and for grants to school districts to
develop portfolio assessments for use in individual classrooms as an
enhancement to student assessment; provided, that the portfolio
assessments shall not replace the statewide standardized assessment
based on the curriculum frameworks; provided further, that funds may be
expended for any further exams approved by the board under said
sections 1D and 1I of said chapter 69; provided further, that funds may
also be expended on the development and implementation of related
curriculum standards and instructional support; provided further, that the
department of elementary and secondary education shall expend funds for
school and student assessment in accordance with the determination
made by the board of elementary and secondary education as to the
method of assessment in the 2026-2027 school year; provided further, that
funds may be expended for the development of new high school
assessments and assessments in history and social science; and provided
further, that all school assessments shall center on the academic standards
embodied in the curriculum frameworks and shall involve gauges which
shall be relevant and meaningful to students, parents, teachers,
administrators and taxpayers under the first paragraph of said section 1I of
said chapter 69 .................................................................................................. $40,832,690
7061-9401 For the University of Massachusetts at Amherst to manage an alternative
assessment pilot program; provided, that the program shall be
administered under a contract with the Massachusetts Consortium for
Innovative Education Assessment to directly support the member districts
of the consortium in developing and piloting tools and practices to assess
student and school performance; provided further, that funds shall be
expended for the university to disseminate tools and practices developed
within the consortium, making such tools and practices freely available to
all schools and districts; and provided further, that the consortium shall
submit an annual report that includes recommendations to the
commissioner of elementary and secondary education, the senate and

Conference Committee Report
house committees on ways and means, and the joint committee on
education ................................................................................................................ $495,000
7061-9406 For a statewide college and career readiness program implemented by
JFYNetWorks, a nonprofit corporation, to: (i) provide online instructional
curricula to help students meet the Massachusetts state standards at each
grade level and reduce learning loss and achievement gaps; and (ii)
prepare students for required assessments and college placement tests in
middle and high schools ........................................................................................ $875,000
7061-9408 For targeted assistance and support to schools and school districts at risk
of or determined to be underperforming or chronically underperforming
under sections 1J and 1K of chapter 69 of the General Laws, including
schools and school districts that have been identified as in need of
“focused support/targeted support” or “broad/comprehensive support”
within the commonwealth’s framework for accountability and assistance
under departmental regulations and guidelines; provided, that no funds
shall be expended in any school or district that fails to file a comprehensive
school or district plan under section 1I of said chapter 69; provided further,
that the department shall only approve reform plans with proven, replicable
results in improving student performance, using research-based effective
practices for turnaround to build multi-tiered systems of support; provided
further, that the department shall only prioritize funding for turnaround efforts
which are based on the turnaround practices identified by the department
as key focus areas for successful school turnaround including, but not
limited to: (i) leadership, shared responsibility and professional
collaboration; (ii) intentional practices for improving student instruction; (iii)
student-specific supports and instruction provided to all students; and (iv)
school climate and culture that provide a safe, orderly and respectful
environment for students and families; provided further, that in carrying out
this item, the department may contract with school support specialists,
turnaround partners and such other external assistance as necessary in
the expert opinion of the commissioner of elementary and secondary
education to successfully turn around failing school and district
performance; provided further, that no funds shall be expended on
targeted assistance unless the department has approved, as part of the
comprehensive district improvement plan, a professional development
plan that addresses the needs of the district as determined by the
department; provided further, that grants made under this item shall be
awarded in coordination with the department of early education and care
and the department of higher education; provided further, that funds shall
be available for the establishment of a new school leadership initiative
through cohort-based training and coaching; provided further, that funds
may be expended for the purchase of instructional materials under section
57 of chapter 15 of the General Laws; provided further, that no funds shall
be expended on instructional materials except where the purchase of such
materials is part of a comprehensive plan to align the school or district
curriculum with the Massachusetts curriculum frameworks; provided
further, that preference in distributing funds shall be given to proposals
that coordinate reform efforts within all schools in a district in order to
prevent conflicts between multiple reforms and interventions among the
schools, and which demonstrate innovative approaches that have improved
student performance including, but not limited to, partnerships between
community-based organizations and school districts; provided further, that
not later than January 15, 2027, the department shall submit a report to the
executive office for administration and finance, the house and senate

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
committees on ways and means and the joint committee on education
describing and analyzing all targeted assistance efforts funded by this
item; provided further, that no funds shall be expended on recurring school
or school district expenditures unless the department and school district
have developed a long-term plan to fund such expenditures from the
district’s operational budget; provided further, that not less than $100,000
shall be expended for the recruitment and training of educators offered by
Teach for America Massachusetts to expand the teacher corps to address
teacher vacancies in high need public schools and to close achievement
gaps; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the
Gravel Pit Academy Foundation for the expansion of equitable access to
high-quality athletic development and educational support for underserved
youth across the south shore; provided further, that funds may be
expended for programs or activities during the summer months; and
provided further, that any funds distributed from this item to a city, town or
regional school district shall be deposited with the treasurer of such city,
town or regional school district and held in a separate account and shall
be expended by the school committee of such city, town or regional school
district without further appropriation, notwithstanding any general or special
law to the contrary .................................................................................................. $16,533,966
7061-9601 For the department of elementary and secondary education, which shall
expend not more than $2,620,882 for teacher preparation and certification
services from fees related to such services; provided, that for the purpose
of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the
lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported
in the state accounting system ............................................................................ $2,620,882
7061-9607 For the administrative and programmatic costs of recovery high schools;
provided, that the department of elementary and secondary education
shall work collaboratively with the bureau of substance addiction services
for the successful transition and continued operation of the recovery high
schools model; provided further, that not later than April 1, 2027, the
department shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to, the: (i) number of
youths served per high school; and (ii) outcomes measured for youths; and
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended for the
implementation of recovery high schools ............................................................ $2,775,683
7061-9611 For grants or subsidies for after-school and out-of-school programs;
provided, that preference shall be given to after-school proposals
developed collaboratively and that support quality enhancements and
increased access to after-school and summer learning programs by public
and nonpublic schools and private community-based programs; provided
further, that the department of elementary and secondary education shall
fund only those applications which contain accountability systems and
measurable outcomes, under guidelines to be determined by the
department in consultation with the department of early education and
care; provided further, that applicants shall detail funds received from all
public sources for existing after-school and out-of-school programs and
the types of programs and students served by the funds; provided further,
that funds shall be expended for services that actively include children with
disabilities in after-school programs that also serve nondisabled children,
and services that include children for whom English is a second language

Conference Committee Report
and children identified as low-income; provided further, that the
department of elementary and secondary education shall consult with the
executive office of health and human services and the department of early
education and care to maximize the provision of wrap-around services and
to coordinate programs and services for children and youths during after-
school and out-of-school programs; provided further, that not later than
September 30, 2026, the department of elementary and secondary
education shall select the grant recipients and shall report on the
preliminary results of said grants not later than January 8, 2027 to the
secretary of administration and finance, the joint committee on education
and the house and senate committees on ways and means; provided
further, that funds may be expended for programs or activities during the
summer months; provided further, that funds shall be expended to
convene regional networks to work with the department of elementary and
secondary education and the department of early education and care to
support the implementation of school and community partnerships;
provided further, that funds shall be expended for the continued operation
of a pilot data-sharing program designed to provide school districts with
funds to partner with local community-based organizations and share
identifiable student data to the extent allowed by law; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Coalition for a Better Acre
to provide more than 20 teens from the Acre neighborhood section of the
city of Lowell with hands-on training in podcast creation; provided further,
that not less than $75,000 shall be expended to the New Bedford public
schools for the Girls Design Academy; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to Steps to Success to provide academic and
personal support for low-income students from 4th grade to college
graduation; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be granted
to the Cape Verdean Association of Brockton for employment positions for
at-risk youth within their YEP! We Can Summer Program; provided further,
that not less than $15,000 shall be expended to the Paris Street Council
to support programming, including expanded accessible recreation and
partnerships with the Special Olympics; provided further, that not less than
$10,000 shall be expended to Harlem Lacrosse Boston to support
operations and programming at their East Boston site; provided further,
that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to Natick public schools to
support targeted academic initiatives and family engagement efforts to
accommodate multilingual learners at Natick public schools and to support
programs designed to aid students who may benefit from additional
academic support; provided further, that not later than June 30, 2027, the
grantee shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways
and means on the effects of the pilot program on students participating in
the programs partnered with school districts; provided further, that not less
than $250,000 shall be expended as a grant to the Crystal Springs school
in the town of Freetown to support programs and services for children,
adolescents and young adults with developmental disabilities; and
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for the
Boston Athletic Academy, Incorporated located in the Hyde Park section
of the city of Boston to provide youth development through education and
athletics ............................................................................................................... $7,803,178
General Fund ........................................................ 77.07%
Youth Development & Achievement Fund ............ 22.93%
7061-9612 For the implementation of subsection (f) of section 1P of chapter 69 of the
General Laws to create safe and supportive school environments;

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
provided, that funds shall be expended for the safe and supportive schools
grant program and for a full-time staff member devoted to carrying out the
responsibilities under said subsection (f) of said section 1P of said chapter
69; provided further, that funds shall be expended for: (i) an annual
statewide safe and supportive schools conference that shall highlight the
grant program, include presentations by grantee schools and districts about
their work, teach attendees about the safe and supportive schools
framework and self-assessment tool, include presentations about the grant
application process and emphasize best practices for incorporating
developmentally appropriate input from students into safe and supportive
schools grant applications and school-wide action plans; (ii) expert
technological assistance in upgrading the usability of the online self-
assessment tool; and (iii) an evaluation of the grant program; provided
further, that funds shall be expended for leadership summits to assist
superintendents and principals with developing safe and supportive school
and district cultures including, but not limited to, the implementation of the
online self-assessment tool; provided further, that grants shall be awarded
to schools and school district teams that create school-wide action plans
based on all the elements of the safe and supportive schools framework
and self-assessment tool; provided further, that grant awards shall be
prioritized for applications that include a process for developmentally
appropriate input from students who are reflective of the school population;
provided further, that schools receiving continuation grants to implement
school-wide action plans shall incorporate such action plans into their
school improvement plans developed under section 1I of said chapter 69;
provided further, that the safe and supportive schools commission shall
conduct an analysis of such schoolwide action plans and school
improvement plans, which the department shall provide to the commission,
and shall include in its annual report the results of such analysis and any
recommendations, including any recommendations related to improving the
framework or the self-assessment tool; provided further, that not later than
November 3, 2026, grant awards under this item shall be allocated by the
department of elementary and secondary education to schools and school
districts; provided further, that districts shall create district plans that
support recipient schools; and provided further, that any unexpended
funds in this item shall not revert to the General Fund but shall be made
available for this item until June 30, 2028 .............................................................. $648,949
7061-9619 For the Benjamin Franklin Cummings Institute of Technology; provided,
that the institute shall have access to the Massachusetts education
computer system; and provided further, that the institute may join the state
buying consortium ............................................................................................................. $1
7061-9624 For the School of Excellence program at the Worcester Polytechnic
Institute; provided, that every effort shall be made to recruit and serve
equal numbers of male and female students; provided further, that sending
districts of students attending the institute shall not be required to expend
any funds for the cost of these students while in attendance at the institute;
and provided further, that the Massachusetts Academy of Math and
Science at the Worcester Polytechnic Institute shall provide professional
development activities at the academy, including salary and benefits for
teachers and visiting scholars ............................................................................. $2,000,000
7061-9626 For grants to the members of the Massachusetts YouthBuild Coalition, Inc.
to provide comprehensive education, workforce training and skills
development to youth; provided, that not less than $100,000 shall be

Conference Committee Report
expended to the city of Everett’s Youth Development and Enrichment
Department for the workforce development and summer jobs program in
the city of Everett; and provided further, that not less than $35,000 shall
be expended to the Everett Art Labs in the city of Everett to support
Listening Works, a youth development and apprenticeship program .................. $3,135,000
7061-9634 For the Mass Mentoring Partnership, Inc., which shall be responsible for
administering a competitive statewide grant program for public and private
agencies to start or expand youth mentoring programs according to
current best practices and for purposes including, but not limited to,
advancing academic performance, self-esteem, social competence and
workforce development; provided, that the department of elementary and
secondary education shall transfer the amount appropriated in this item to
the Mass Mentoring Partnership, Inc., for these grants; provided further,
that in order to be eligible to receive funds from this item, each public or
private agency shall provide a matching amount equal to $1 for every $1
disbursed from this item; and provided further, that not later than March
15, 2027, the Mass Mentoring Partnership, Inc. shall submit a report to the
department detailing the impact of the grants, expenditure of funds and
the amount and source of matching funds raised ............................................... $1,500,000
7061-9650 For the Supporting Healthy Alliances Reinforcing Education (SHARE)
grant program to provide an integrated student wellness grant program to
assist schools with addressing nonacademic barriers to student success;
provided, that grants shall be used to support school districts establishing
an infrastructure to facilitate integrated coordination of school and
community-based resources including, but not limited to, social services,
mental health and behavioral health resources; provided further, that not
less than $250,000 shall be awarded by the department to schools and
school districts serving high percentages of low-income students; provided
further, that said supports may include funding to assist public school
districts in contracting with licensed community-based health care service
providers, including mental and behavioral health providers; provided
further, that said program shall be administered by the department of
elementary and secondary education in coordination with the executive
office of health and human services; provided further, that the department
shall prioritize applications for such services that are submitted by school
districts whose applications are consistent with infrastructure and
coordination efforts linking schools to community-based resources in
accordance with item 7061-9612 of section 2 of chapter 154 of the acts of
2018; provided further, that such support grants may be expended to
assist school districts in connecting students with community-based
services to maximize coordination with service providers and establish
more comprehensive continuums of care; provided further, that such
grants may also be expended to support increased professional
development opportunities for public school employees to identify
students in need of mental and behavioral health support; provided further,
that not later than December 30, 2026, the department shall issue a report
outlining all student support efforts funded by this item; provided further,
that the report shall be provided to the senate president, the speaker of
the house of representatives, the house and senate committees on ways
and means and the joint committee on education; provided further, that for
the purposes of this item, appropriated funds may be expended for
programs or activities during the summer months; provided further, that
any unexpended funds in this item shall not revert but shall be made
available for the purposes of this item until August 27, 2027; and provided

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, any
funds distributed from this item to a city, town or regional school district
shall be deposited with the treasurer of such city, town or regional school
district and held in a separate account and shall be expended by the school
committee of such city, town or regional school district without further
appropriation, notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary ............ $250,000
7061-9813 For rural school aid to eligible towns and regional school districts,
excluding vocational schools, independent agricultural, technical schools
and charter schools; provided, that a school district shall be eligible for
rural school aid if a school district has a student density of not more than
35 students per square mile and an average annual per capita income of
not more than the average annual per capita income for the
commonwealth for the same period; provided further, that rural school aid
shall be allocated equitably in the following priority order: (i) school districts
serving less than 11 students per square mile; (ii) school districts serving
not more than 21 students per square mile; and (iii) school districts serving
not more than 35 students per square mile; provided further, that not later
than December 1, 2026, the department of elementary and secondary
education shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means detailing: (a) recommendations for additional
adjustments to the rural school aid calculation for fiscal year 2028 to
improve the accuracy and equity of the student density component and
the per capita income component; and (b) the calculation and planned
distribution of funds to school districts; provided further, that not later than
February 2, 2027, any district receiving funds under this item shall submit
a plan to the department of elementary and secondary education outlining
steps the district will take to increase regional collaboration, consolidation
or other efficiencies over the next 3 fiscal years; provided further, that not
later than April 1, 2027, that the department of elementary and secondary
education shall submit a report to the joint committee on education and
the house and senate committees on ways and means detailing steps that
participating districts have taken in regionalization and consolidation; and
provided further, that funds distributed from this item shall not be
considered chapter 70 aid for the calculation of the minimum required local
contribution for fiscal year 2028 ........................................................................ $16,000,000
7061-9814 For a competitive grant program to support the development and
expansion of high-quality, comprehensive summer learning opportunities
for students in districts with high concentrations of low-income students;
provided, that the department of elementary and secondary education
shall develop the criteria for grants; provided further, that grants shall be
awarded to programs that: (i) include not less than 150 hours of
programming with a focus on academic and college and career readiness
skills, including critical thinking, collaboration and perseverance; (ii) are
research-based summer programs; and (iii) engage with a variety of
organizations and leverage cost-sharing partnerships with local districts,
private funders and nonprofit institutions; and provided further, that funds
may be expended for programs or activities during the summer months ........... $2,940,300
7061-9815 For a grant program administered by the department of elementary and
secondary education in coordination with the executive office of public
safety and security for the prevention of hate crimes, as defined under
section 32 of chapter 22C of the General Laws, and incidences of bias in
public schools; provided, that grants shall be used for education,
professional development, prevention or community outreach; provided

Conference Committee Report
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended on Mosaic Interfaith
Youth Action; and provided further, that the department of elementary and
secondary education shall develop guidelines for grant distribution
including, but not limited to, prioritizing schools that have experienced hate
crimes or incidences of bias within the last 2 years ............................................ $1,039,500
Department of Higher Education.
1596-2414 For a scholarship program to provide financial assistance to
Massachusetts students enrolled in and pursuing a program of higher
education in any public institutions of higher education in the
commonwealth; provided, that funds from this item may be expended on
the administration of the scholarship program; provided further, that the
commissioner of higher education, in coordination with the Massachusetts
state scholarship office, shall adopt regulations governing the eligibility
and the awarding of financial assistance under this item; provided further,
that funds may be expended for an office of higher education success and
completion within the department of higher education to support: (i) data
collection and tracking; and (ii) the development of best practices for
higher education student success and degree completion including, but
not limited to, the alignment of community college programming with labor
market demands;provided further, that the department shall distribute
funds to the public institutions of higher education for the purpose of this
item for the academic year beginning in 2026 not later than August 31,
2026; provided further, that discrepancies between the initial distribution
and actual award amounts shall be reconciled and be accounted for in a
subsequent distribution of funds prior to January 29, 2027; and provided
further, that the department shall provide notice of preliminary funding
estimates to the public institutions of higher education for the academic
year beginning in 2027 based on said actual award amounts and any
changes to eligiblity criteria or regulations proposed by the department not
later than January 1, 2027 ................................................................................ $85,000,000
Education and Transportation Fund ........................ 100%
1596-2423 For a scholarship program to provide financial assistance to students in
the commonwealth who are enrolled in and pursuing a program of higher
education at a public institution of higher education, as defined in section
5 of chapter 15A of the General Laws, for an in-demand profession as
defined by the executive office of labor and workforce development's study
on labor market conditions pursuant to section 16A of said chapter 15A;
provided, that funds from this item may be expended on the administration
of said scholarship program; provided further, that the board of higher
education, in coordination with the Massachusetts state scholarship office,
shall adopt guidelines governing the eligibility for and the awarding of
financial assistance; provided further, that not less than $1,500,000 shall
be expended for a scholarship program to provide financial assistance to
students from the commonwealth who: (i) are enrolled in and pursuing
either an associate degree or certificate program at a municipal college;
(ii) are age 25 or older as of the first day of classes; (iii) have not previously
earned a college degree; and (iv) are enrolled in at least 6 credits; provided
further, that the funds shall be expended to cover any remaining tuition
and fees due and an allowance for the cost of books, supplies and other
expenses for any eligible student after all non-loan aid have been
exhausted; provided further, that funds from this item may be expended

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
on student support services, administration and the marketing of said
scholarship program; and provided further, that funds may be expended
for programs or activities during the summer months ......................................... $5,000,000
Education and Transportation Fund ......................... 100%
1596-2439 For state university cohort counseling to ensure student success
(SUCCESS) grants to state universities to provide wraparound supports
and services to improve outcomes for their most vulnerable populations
including, but not limited to, low-income, first-generation, minority and
disabled students and lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer and
questioning students; provided, that funds shall be disbursed based on a
formula and criteria developed by the department of higher education;
provided further, that eligible wraparound support activities shall include,
but not be limited to, peer mentors, academic skills workshops and
targeted academic, career and scholarship advising; provided further, that
appropriated funds may be expended for programs or activities during the
2028 academic year; provided further, that all funds distributed may be
spent solely on personnel costs at the discretion of the universities; and
provided further, that not later than March 3, 2027, the state universities
council of presidents, in consultation with the department of higher
education shall report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means on the progress made on implementing and funding this program,
including any regulations, guidelines or criteria used to distribute the funds
and on the final distribution of funds to campuses ............................................ $14,000,000
Education and Transportation Fund ........................ 100%
1596-2501 For a free community college program; provided, that funds shall be
expended to cover any remaining tuition and fees due and an allowance
for the cost of books, supplies and other expenses for any eligible student
after all other sources of federal and state grant aid have been exhausted;
provided further, that students whose household income is at or below 125
per cent of the state median income shall be granted an allowance of up
to $1,200 per academic year for books, supplies and other expenses for
attending a community college program; provided further, that the
department of higher education shall provide written notice to the house
and senate committees on ways and means not less than 120 days prior
to the implementation of any reduction in the allowance; provided further,
that the allowance shall not preclude students from receiving assistance
through MassGrant or MassGrant Plus, subject to the regulations of said
programs; provided further, that the commissioner of higher education, in
consultation with the executive office of education and the Massachusetts
Association of Community Colleges, and in coordination with the
Massachusetts state scholarship office, shall adopt guidelines governing
eligibility for and the awarding of financial assistance under this item;
provided further, that funds from this item may be expended on student
support services, administration and marketing of said scholarship
program; provided further, that students aged 25 or older may be referred
to as MassReconnect students; provided further, that funds from this item
may be expended to create awareness and conduct public outreach
related to MassReconnect; provided further, that funds may be expended
for programs or activities during the summer months; provided further, that
tuition and fees at public community colleges shall not increase more than
the lesser of: (i) the ratio of the value of the implicit price deflator for state
and local government purchases in the third quarter of the prior fiscal year

Conference Committee Report
to its value in the third quarter of the fiscal year 2 years prior; and (ii) 1.045;
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, students enrolled in courses that meet the initial training
requirements for emergency medical technician and paramedic
certification shall be awarded sufficient financial assistance to cover any
remaining tuition and fees due and an allowance for the cost of books,
supplies and other expenses after all other sources of federal and state
grant aid have been utilized, regardless of the number of credits the
student is enrolled in or whether the student has previously earned a
baccalaureate degree or equivalent certification; provided further, that the
department, after consultation with the Massachusetts Association of
Community Colleges, shall analyze the faculty and staff capacity to meet
the needs of the program established in this item, to ensure a sufficient
workforce; provided further, that not later than February 2, 2027, the
department of higher education, in consultation with the Massachusetts
Association of Community Colleges, shall submit a report to the joint
committee on higher education and the house and senate committees on
ways and means detailing program uptake, funding distribution, and the
metrics and benchmarks being used to measure program success
including, but not limited to: (i) enrollment; (ii) retention; (iii) barriers to
student participation; and (iv) demographic data related to program
participants; and provided further, that not later than May 28, 2027, the
department of higher education shall submit information to the executive
office for administration and finance, the board of higher education, the
joint committee on higher education and the house and senate committees
on ways and means on the number of students participating in the program
at each community college ............................................................................. $137,048,000
Education and Transportation Fund ........................ 100%
7066-0000 For the operation of the department of higher education; provided, that the
department shall recommend savings proposals that permit public
institutions of higher education to achieve administrative and program cost
reductions, resource reallocation and program reassessment and to utilize
resources otherwise available to such institutions; provided further, that
not less than $1,000,000 shall be expended for the state university
internship incentive program established in item 7066-0000 of section 2 of
chapter 139 of the acts of 2012; provided further, that the commonwealth
shall contribute funds to each institution in an amount necessary to match
private contributions in the current fiscal year to the institution's internship
incentive program; provided further, that the commonwealth's contribution
shall be equal to $1 for every $1 privately contributed to each university's
board of trustees or foundation; provided further, that the maximum total
contributions from the commonwealth shall be not more than the amount
appropriated in this item; provided further, that funds from this program shall
not result in a direct or an indirect reduction in the commonwealth's
appropriations to the institutions for operations, scholarships, financial aid
or any state appropriation and the department shall promulgate regulations
and criteria for the program; provided further, that in order to meet the
estimated costs of employee fringe benefits provided by the
commonwealth on account of employees of the Massachusetts State
College Building Authority and the University of Massachusetts Building
Authority and in order to meet the estimated cost of heat, light, power and
other services, if any, to be furnished by the commonwealth to projects of
these authorities, the boards of trustees of the community colleges, state
universities and the University of Massachusetts shall transfer to the

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
General Fund, from the funds received from the operations of the projects,
the costs, if any, as shall be incurred by the commonwealth for these
purposes in the current fiscal year as determined by the appropriate
building authority, verified by the commissioner of higher education and
approved by the secretary of administration and finance; provided further,
that not less than $150,000 shall be expended for a campus violence
prevention administrator and such other activities as are needed to fund
the full implementation of chapter 337 of the acts of 2020 to advance
statewide campus safety initiatives, including sexual violence prevention;
provided further, that funds shall be expended to meet existing statutory
requirements and provide orientation, professional development and
support for the boards of trustees in areas including, but not limited to,
recruitment, training and accountability; provided further, that funds shall
be expended for the training resources and internship networks, or TRAIN,
grant program established in section 179 of chapter 46 of the acts of 2015;
provided further, that not less than $1,500,000 shall be expended for
monthly stipends and other support services for participants in order to
facilitate participation in the program; provided further, that not more than
$100,000 shall be expended for administrative costs for the program;
provided further, that the department shall seek additional proposals to
expand the TRAIN grant program to additional community colleges in
fiscal year 2027; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, any grant administered by the department,
including but not limited to those established in this item, item 7100-4002
and item 1596-2439 for fiscal year 2027 shall be distributed not later than
September 30, 2026 pursuant to a transfer schedule determined by the
executive office of administration and finance; and provided further, that
not less than $450,000 shall be expended for Journey into Education &
Teaching, Inc. to strengthen the educator workforce pipeline ............................ $5,756,186
7066-0009 For the New England Board of Higher Education .................................................. $433,525
7066-0015 For the community college workforce training incentive grant program
established in section 15F of chapter 15A of the General Laws; provided,
that eligible incentive revenues under this program may also include
workforce training contracts administered or paid through public agencies,
municipalities, public grants, nonprofit organizations or private gifts; and
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to Holyoke
Community College for the Recompete Program to provide wraparound
services in partnerships with local employers ....................................................... $1,444,842
7066-0016 For a program of financial aid to support the matriculation at public and
private institutions of higher education of persons in the custody of the
department of children and families under a care and protection petition
upon reaching 18 years of age or persons in the custody of the department
matriculating at such an institution at an earlier age; provided, that no such
person shall be required to remain in the custody of the department
beyond 18 years of age to qualify for such aid; provided further, that said
aid shall not exceed $6,000 per recipient per year; and provided further,
that said aid shall only be granted after exhausting all other sources of
financial support .................................................................................................. $1,470,150
7066-0019 For the department of higher education to support the dual enrollment
program allowing qualified high school students to take college courses;
provided, that public, municipal and private institutions of higher education
may offer courses in high schools in addition to courses offered at the

Conference Committee Report
institutions or online if the number of students is sufficient; provided
further, that preference in awarding grants for early college programs shall
be given to public institutions of higher education; and provided further,
that funds may be expended in summer months .............................................. $12,900,000
7066-0021 For reimbursements to public institutions of higher education for foster and
adopted child fee waivers under section 19 of chapter 15A of the General
Laws; provided, that no funds shall be distributed from this item before
certification by the state universities, community colleges and the
University of Massachusetts of the actual amount of tuition and fees
waived for foster and adopted children attending public institutions of
higher education under said section 19 of said chapter 15A that would
otherwise have been retained by the campuses according to procedures
and regulations promulgated by the board of higher education; and
provided further, that reimbursements to public institutions of higher
education for fee waivers granted in prior fiscal years may be expended
from this item ....................................................................................................... $7,221,962
7066-0040 For adult college transition services focused on low-income and entry-level
workers; provided, that funds shall be awarded competitively by the board
of higher education to adult basic education providers, including local
education agencies, community-based organizations, community colleges
and correctional facilities with recognized success in bridging academic
gaps of underserved populations and resulting in college entrance,
retention and completion; provided further, that not less than $250,000
shall be expended for Jewish Vocational Service, Inc. with a targeted focus
on academic and coaching support for immigrants and refugees; provided
further, that not later than February 12, 2027, program awardees shall
report to the department of higher education on attendees’ successful
transition to college and that the department of higher education shall
deliver to the joint committee on education and the house and senate
committees on ways and means an evaluation of the program and its
impact on student achievement, particularly as it relates to closing
achievement gaps; and provided further, that appropriated funds may be
expended for programs or activities during the summer months ........................... $500,000
7066-9600 For a discretionary grant program to provide funds to school districts and
public institutions of higher education partnering together to offer inclusive
concurrent enrollment programs for school age children with disabilities,
as defined in section 1 of chapter 71B of the General Laws, who are
between the ages of 18 and 22, inclusive; provided, that the grant program
shall be limited to students who are considered to have severe disabilities
and, in the case of students age 18 or 19, shall be limited to students with
severe disabilities who have been unable to achieve the competency
determination necessary to pass the Massachusetts Comprehensive
Assessment System exam; provided further, that on a discretionary basis,
public institutions of higher education may choose to additionally include
students with severe developmental disabilities over 21 years of age
through the grant program; provided further, that such students with
disabilities shall be offered enrollment in credit and noncredit courses that
include students without disabilities, including enrollment in credit and
noncredit courses in audit status for students who may not meet course
prerequisites and requirements; provided further, that the partnering
school districts shall provide supports, services and accommodations
necessary to facilitate a student’s enrollment; provided further, that the
department of higher education shall develop guidelines to ensure that the

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
grant program promotes civic engagement and mentoring of faculty in
public institutions of higher education and supports college success, work
success, participation in student life of the college community and
provision of a free appropriate public education in the least restrictive
environment; provided further, that the department shall develop
strategies and procedures to help sustain and replicate the existing
inclusive concurrent enrollment programs initiated through the grant
program including, but not limited to: (i) providing funds to retain
employment specialists; (ii) assisting students in meeting integrated
competitive employment and other transition-related goals; (iii) adopting
procedures and funding mechanisms to ensure that new partnerships of
public institutions of higher education and school districts providing
inclusive concurrent enrollment programs fully utilize the models and
expertise developed in existing partnerships; and (iv) conducting
evaluations and research to further identify student outcomes and best
practices; provided further, that the department shall develop a
mechanism to encourage existing and new partnerships to expand the
capacity to respond to individual parents and schools in underserved
areas that request an opportunity for their children to participate in the
inclusive concurrent enrollment initiative; provided further, that tuition for
courses shall be waived by the state institutions of higher education for
students enrolled through this grant program; provided further, that the
department shall maintain the position of inclusive concurrent enrollment
coordinator who shall be responsible for administering the grant program,
coordinating the advisory committee, developing new partnerships,
assisting existing partnerships in creating self-sustaining models and
overseeing the development of videos and informational materials as well
as evaluation and research through the institute for community inclusion
to assist new colleges and school districts; provided further, that the
department shall distribute grant funds to recipients for fiscal year 2027
not later than July 17, 2026, to allow a full year of service for inclusive
concurrent enrollment programs initiated through the grant program;
provided further that the department shall distribute a request for fiscal
year 2028 grant proposals and shall select fiscal year 2028 grant
recipients subject to future appropriation not later than May 28, 2027;
provided further, that not later than January 29, 2027, the department of
higher education, in consultation with the department of elementary and
secondary education, shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means, the joint committee on education and the
joint committee on higher education on student outcomes in programs
funded under this item; provided further, that funds may be expended for
programs or activities during the summer months; and provided further,
that not less than $2,000,000 shall be transferred to the Massachusetts
Inclusive Concurrent Enrollment Initiative Trust Fund established in
section 2VVVVV of chapter 29 of the General Laws .......................................... $5,000,000
7070-0065 For a scholarship program to provide financial assistance to
Massachusetts students enrolled in and pursuing a program of higher
education in any approved public or independent college, university,
school of nursing or any other approved institution furnishing a program of
higher education; provided, that funds from this item may be expended on
the administration of said scholarship program; provided further, that the
commissioner of higher education, in coordination with the Massachusetts
state scholarship office, shall follow adopted guidelines governing the
eligibility for and the awarding of financial assistance; provided further, that
funds from this item shall be made available for the MASSGrant and

Conference Committee Report
MASSGrant Plus programs in an amount not less than the amount made
available in fiscal year 2026; provided further, that the priority application
deadline for the MASSGrant program shall be June 30, 2026; provided
further, that that not less than $22,000,000 shall be made available for the
Gilbert Grants; provided further, that not less than $5,000,000 shall be
made available for early educator scholarships; provided further, that
funds from this item shall be made available for paraprofessional grants in
amounts not less than the amounts made available in fiscal year 2026;
provided further, that not less than $480,000 shall be made available for
One Family, Inc. for costs in connection with the One Family Scholars
program; provided further, that not less than $150,000 shall be made
available for the Chief Justice Ralph D. Gants Scholarship program,
administered by the Massachusetts Bar Foundation to provide stipends for
judicial internships to current law students with demonstrated financial
need, prior appropriation continued; and provided further, that not less
than $500,000 shall be expended for financial assistance to students
enrolled in independent, nonprofit vocational technical institutions of
higher education in the commonwealth that are minority-serving
institutions as defined by the United States Department of Education not
less than twice in the previous 5 years and whose majority of students are
eligible for Pell grants ...................................................................................... $177,188,311
7077-0023 For the Cummings School of Veterinary Medicine at Tufts University;
provided, that funds shall be expended under a resident veterinary tuition
remission plan as approved by the commissioner of higher education for
supportive veterinary services provided to the commonwealth; provided
further, that funds from this item may support collaborative arrangements
that may include teaching partnerships, articulation agreements or both
with community colleges and vocational-technical schools that offer
veterinary technician programs, veterinary health care programs or both
approved by the board of higher education; provided further, that the
school may work in consultation with the Norfolk county agricultural high
school on veterinary programs; provided further, that the school may work
in consultation with the Bristol county agricultural high school on veterinary
programs; and provided further, that funds appropriated in this item shall
support bioterrorism prevention research conducted in consultation with
emergency management authorities in the commonwealth relative to
diseases that can be transmitted from animals to humans................................. $6,750,000
7100-4002 For Supporting Urgent Community College Equity through Student
Services (or SUCCESS) grants to community colleges to provide
wraparound supports and services to improve outcomes for their most
vulnerable populations, which may include, but shall not be limited to, low-
income, first-generation, minority and disabled students and lesbian, gay,
bisexual, transgender, queer and questioning students; provided, that
funds shall be disbursed based on a formula and criteria developed in
consultation with the Massachusetts Association of Community Colleges;
provided further, that eligible wraparound support activities shall include,
but not be limited to, peer mentors, academic skills workshops, field trips
to 4-year schools and targeted academic, career, transfer and scholarship
advising; provided further, that funds may be expended for programs or
activities during the summer months; provided further, that all funds
distributed may be spent solely on personnel costs at the discretion of the
colleges; and provided further, that not later than April 30, 2027, the
department shall report to the joint committee on higher education and the
house and senate committees on ways and means on the progress made

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
on implementing and funding this program, including any regulations,
guidelines or criteria used to distribute the funds, and on the final
distribution of funds to campuses, prior appropriation continued ..................... $14,000,000
Education and Transportation Fund ........................ 100%
7100-4003 For the department of higher education to support a hunger-free campus
initiative to address food insecurity at 2- and 4-year public institutions of
higher learning and higher education institutions that have been shown to
primarily enroll historically underrepresented groups as determined by the
department of higher education; provided, that the department shall award
grants to campuses that: (i) maximize student enrollment in federal
nutrition benefit programs; (ii) promote on-campus grocers that accept
nutrition program benefits; (iii) increase access to available meal cards
and meal swipe options, where feasible; (iv) maximize student access to
on-campus or area food pantries in collaboration with regional food banks;
and (v) support other campus-designed projects to address college
student food insecurity; provided further, that prior to awarding grants
under this item, the department shall issue a request for proposals through
which colleges may apply and shall make grant awards based on the
demonstrated need and a proposed implementation plan submitted by
each applicant; provided further, that not later than 45 days after the
effective date of this act, the department shall issue the request for
proposals to eligible public institutions under this item; and provided
further, that not later than 90 days after the effective date of this act, the
department shall submit to the house and senate committees on ways and
means, the joint committee on higher education and the clerks of the
house of representatives and the senate a report detailing a list of grantees
and the grant amount distributed to each grantee ................................................. $500,000
7520-0424 For a health and welfare reserve for eligible personnel employed at
community colleges and state universities ......................................................... $7,131,153
University of Massachusetts.
7100-0200 For the operation of the University of Massachusetts; provided, that not
later than January 29, 2027, the university shall meet with the chairs of the
house and senate committees on ways and means and the chairs of the
joint committee on higher education to review: (i) the 5-year projected
spending plan for academic years 2026 to 2031, inclusive, including
anticipated cost savings initiatives and efforts to reduce student tuition and
fees; and (ii) a comprehensive report on spending over the previous
academic year; provided further, that the report shall include, but not be
limited to: (a) personnel costs, delineated by staff type and type of pay
including, but not limited to, base pay and bonus pay; (b) the number of full-
time equivalent employees, delineated by staff type; (c) noninstructional
administrative costs; (d) costs related to asset management and acquisition;
(e) annual enrollment growth; (f) annual tuition and fee growth; (g) fee
structure; (h) expenditures on direct student financial aid; and (i) average
financial aid award per financial aid recipient; provided further, that funding
for each center and institute at the University of Massachusetts at Boston
shall be provided at an amount not less than in fiscal year 2018; provided
further, that if, as a result of extraordinary or unforeseen circumstances,
the university deems it necessary to reduce funding to any of said centers
or institutions, the university shall submit a report detailing: (i) the reasons

Conference Committee Report
for such reductions; (ii) all steps taken to avoid such reductions including,
but not limited to, the identification of other sources of existing funds,
raising of new revenues and the pursuit of savings initiatives and
efficiencies; and (iii) a mitigation plan to ameliorate the effects of such
reductions on students and university staff, for which input from students
and university staff shall be solicited; provided further, that the report shall
be submitted to the joint committee on higher education and the house
and senate committees on ways and means not less than 120 days prior
to any such funding reduction or institutional closure; provided further, that
not later than January 4, 2027, the University of Massachusetts at Boston
shall submit a report to the joint committee on higher education and the
house and senate committees on ways and means detailing the progress
made on implementing the April 2019 taskforce on centers and institutes'
recommendations; provided further, that not less than $10,000,000 shall be
expended for SUCCESS programming to provide wraparound supports and
services to improve outcomes for their most vulnerable populations
including, but not limited to, low-income, first-generation, minority and
disabled students and lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer and
questioning students; provided further, that the university shall expend funds
for the University of Massachusetts at Amherst Cranberry Station; provided
further, that the university shall expend funds for the operation of the
Massachusetts office of public collaboration at the University of
Massachusetts at Boston and for annual operations of the advanced
technology and manufacturing center in the city of Fall River; provided
further, that not less than $15,000 shall be expended for the health services
to support access to women's health care; provided further, that funds may
be expended operation of the Future of Work Research Initiative at the
University of Massachusetts labor centers at the university’s Amherst,
Boston, Dartmouth and Lowell campuses; provided further, that not less
than $250,000 shall be expended for the University unified procurement
services team to offer other public institutions of higher education optional
access to centralized procurements for products and services; and provided
further, that not less than $4,000,000 shall be expended by the university on
student behavioral health services including, but not limited to, crisis
services, therapy, the assessment of learning disorders, responses to
sexual assault, substance use disorder services and assistance to students
struggling with stress, anxiety or other mental health needs ............................ $866,770,000
General Fund ........................................................ 96.73%
Education Fund ....................................................... 2.11%
Education and Transportation Fund ....................... 1.15%
7100-0700 For the operation of the statewide community mediation center grant
program administered by the Office of Public Collaboration at the
University of Massachusetts at Boston under section 47 of chapter 75 of
the General Laws; provided, that funding from this item shall be made
available for pre-court mediation services to promote housing stabilization;
and provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall be expended for
the Massachusetts prisoner re-entry mediation program, prior
appropriation continued ........................................................................................... $2,813,465
7100-0701 For the Center for Portuguese Studies and Culture at the University of
Massachusetts at Dartmouth; provided, that funds shall be allocated
directly to the center, prior appropriation continued ............................................... $250,000

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
7100-0702 For the Institute for Asian American Studies at the University of
Massachusetts at Boston to study the history and experiences of anti-
Asian racism in the United States and in the commonwealth ................................ $300,000
State Universities.
7109-0100 For Bridgewater State University; provided, that not less than $100,000
shall be expended for the Racial Equity and Justice Institute at
Bridgewater State University for the expansion of professional
development and consultative supports to aid in the closing of educational
achievement gaps in higher education ............................................................. $76,758,735
7110-0100 For Fitchburg State University .......................................................................... $46,942,816
7112-0100 For Framingham State University ..................................................................... $46,687,984
7113-0100 For the Massachusetts College of Liberal Arts ................................................. $25,351,763
7113-0101 For Gallery 51 at the Berkshire Cultural Resource Center in the city of
North Adams to be administered by the Massachusetts College of Liberal
Arts ........................................................................................................................... $50,000
7114-0100 For Salem State University ............................................................................... $70,013,015
7114-0110 For the Frederick E. Berry Institute for Politics and Civic Engagement at
Salem State University; provided, that the institute shall promote public
service and civic engagement through programs, educational
opportunities and related events that offer inclusive and firsthand civic
learning experiences for students .......................................................................... $200,000
7115-0100 For Westfield State University ........................................................................... $44,099,532
7116-0100 For Worcester State University; provided, that not less than $125,000 shall
be expended to the John J. Binienda Center for Civic Education; and
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended for the
Latino Education Institute and pre-collegiate programs .................................... $43,867,881
7117-0100 For the Massachusetts College of Art and Design ........................................... $28,845,407
7118-0100 For the Massachusetts Maritime Academy ....................................................... $27,278,705
Community Colleges.
7502-0100 For Berkshire Community College .................................................................... $16,278,126
7503-0100 For Bristol Community College ......................................................................... $33,958,964
7504-0100 For Cape Cod Community College ................................................................... $18,300,828
7505-0100 For Greenfield Community College ................................................................... $16,423,542
7506-0100 For Holyoke Community College ...................................................................... $29,613,654

Conference Committee Report
7507-0100 For Massachusetts Bay Community College; provided, that not less than
$85,000 shall be expended for Massachusetts Bay Community College’s
Center for Cybersecurity Education .................................................................. $24,463,539
7508-0100 For Massasoit Community College ................................................................... $31,590,662
7509-0100 For Mount Wachusett Community College ....................................................... $22,775,619
7509-0101 For the Senator Stephen M. Brewer Center for Civic Learning and
Community Engagement at Mount Wachusett Community College to
increase service learning and volunteerism in the north central
Massachusetts region of the commonwealth, to support the development
of a food pantry and other emergency services for students at risk of
dropping out due to financial circumstances, for deliberative dialogues
within the community addressing issues of concern within society and for
programmatic development, updates and technologies within the center ............. $150,000
7510-0100 For Northern Essex Community College .......................................................... $29,344,939
7511-0100 For North Shore Community College ................................................................ $32,481,189
7512-0100 For Quinsigamond Community College ............................................................ $32,355,003
7514-0100 For Springfield Technical Community College .................................................. $36,611,994
7515-0100 For Roxbury Community College ...................................................................... $16,293,886
7515-0120 For the operation of the Reggie Lewis Track and Athletic Center at
Roxbury Community College .............................................................................. $1,128,694
7515-0121 For the Reggie Lewis Track and Athletic Center at Roxbury Community
College; provided, that the college may expend not more than $2,500,000
received from fees, rentals and facility expenses associated with the
running and operation of national track meets, high school track meets,
high school dual meets, Roxbury Community College athletic events and
other special athletic events, conferences, meetings and programs;
provided further, that only expenses for contracted services associated
with these events, event staff, utilities and capital needs of the facility shall
be funded from this item; and provided further, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating
timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the college may incur expenses and the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization
or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting
system ................................................................................................................. $2,500,000
7516-0100 For Middlesex Community College ................................................................... $34,823,915
7518-0100 For Bunker Hill Community College; provided further, that not less than
$190,000 shall be expended for the Boston Welcome Back Center at
Bunker Hill Community College to assist internationally-educated nurses
in their efforts to become licensed to practice nursing in the commonwealth
.......................................................................................................................... $40,631,102
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND SECURITY.

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
Office of the Secretary.
8000-0038 For the operation of a witness protection program under chapter 263A of
the General Laws ................................................................................................... $245,025
8000-0070 For the research and analysis of the committee on criminal justice,
established in section 156 of chapter 6 of the General Laws; provided, that
funds may be expended to support the work of the Massachusetts
sentencing commission, established in section 1 of chapter 211E of the
General Laws ............................................................................................................... $136,262
8000-0202 For the purchase and distribution of sexual assault evidence collection kits
................................................................................................................................. $91,768
8000-0313 For local public safety projects and grant programs; provided, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended to the city of Leominster for the purpose
of upgrading the IT servers at Leominster City Hall; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the city of Leominster for the
purpose of acquiring a camera system for the monitoring of Doyle Field in
the city of Leominster; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the Norton police department for the purpose of acquiring
conducted energy weapons for the police department in the town of
Norton; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to
the Swansea police department for a digital training simulator; provided
further, that not less than $125,000 shall be expended to Recidiviz, Inc. for
technology and data integration with the Massachusetts parole board;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town
of Mattapoisett for the replacement of end-of-life automated external
defibrillators; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to the Chicopee police department for public safety upgrades;
provided further, that not less than $125,000 shall be expended to the
Dismas House of Massachusetts, Inc. in Worcester; provided further, that
not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the town of Saugus police
department for gear and equipment purchases; provided further, that not
less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Boston Human Exploitation
Advocacy Team for a mobile triage van for service delivery; provided
further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the town of
Bedford for the replacement of aging vehicles within the Bedford police
department; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
to the town of Manchester-by-the-Sea for purchasing a police motorcycle;
provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the town
of Rockport for the purpose of purchasing body worn cameras for the
Rockport police department; provided further, that not less than $150,000
shall be expended to Portal to Hope Corp. for services related to domestic
violence, at-risk youth and school-based violence prevention education;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town
of Raynham for computer and technological equipment at the new public
safety building; provided further, that not less than $30,000 shall be
expended to the town of Southborough police department for aerial
drones; provided further, that not less than $30,000 shall be expended to
the town of Holliston for the reimbursement of local non-profits for police
details at town events; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall
be expended to the town of Harvard for police station and equipment
upgrades; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended

Conference Committee Report
for Recidiviz Inc. for reentry support in the department of correction;
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the city
known as the town of Braintree police department for the family services
unit; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the
city known as the town of Braintree fire department for equipment
purchases; provided further, that not less than $40,000 shall be expended
to the town of Grafton for public safety improvements; provided further,
that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town of Northbridge
for public safety improvements; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the town of Upton for public safety
improvements; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be
expended to the Northeastern Massachusetts Law Enforcement Council,
Inc.; provided further, that not less than $25,000 be expended to the city
of Everett police department for a drone unit; provided further, that not less
than $25,000 shall be expended to the town of Tyngsborough for the
marine patrol unit for use on Lake Mascuppic; provided further, that not
less than $60,000 shall be expended to the town of Tyngsborough for
replacement fire alarm panels; provided further, that not less than $75,000
be expended to the town of Freetown for the procurement of a rescue boat;
provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the town
of Dover police department for technological improvements; provided
further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the city of Boston
for the payroll costs of the Boston police department for dedicated patrols
of the Fairmount housing development in the Hyde Park section of the city
of Boston; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended
to the town of Dunstable police department for bullet-proof vests; provided
further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the town of Groton
for new automated external defibrillators for the police and fire
departments; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the town of Auburn police department for public safety
equipment and programs; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall
be expended to the town of Wilmington for traffic mitigation planning,
surveying and construction of pedestrian and road safety infrastructure on
the property of and roads adjacent to public schools in the town of
Wilmington; provided further, that not less than $150,000 be expended to
the town of Stoneham police department for gear and facility upgrades;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the city
of Fitchburg police department for report, roll call and training room
upgrades; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
to the town of Randolph police department for portable radios and
emergency communications upgrades; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the city of Revere for Revere fire department
fleet maintenance and acquisition; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the town of Westford police department for
a wellness center; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to the city of Boston for the payroll costs of the Boston police
department for dedicated patrols of the Foley apartments, Monsignor
Powers apartments and West 9th Street apartments in the South Boston
section of the city of Boston; provided further, that not less than $25,000
shall be expended to the town of Easton fire department; provided further,
that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the city of Waltham police
department for public safety initiatives; provided, that not less than
$55,000 shall be expended to the town of Auburn for the purchase of a 3D
laser scanner; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be
expended to the town of Millbury for the purchase of a canine police cruiser
for the Millbury police department; provided further, that not less than

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
$150,000 shall be expended to the town of Shrewsbury for the purchase
of a police boat for the Shrewsbury police department; provided further,
that not less than $75,000 shall be expended to the city of Worcester for
the purchase of a canine police cruiser for the Worcester police
department; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended
for CASA Project, Inc. for its court appointed special advocate program in
the county of Worcester; provided further that not less than $100,000 shall
be expended for BlueForce Strategies Inc. to provide law enforcement
organizations with no-cost training in areas such as de-escalation and
stress mitigation and management through its Community First Project;
provided further, that not less than $33,000 shall be expended to the town
of Oakham to support and make upgrades to the police and fire
departments; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be
expended to the city of Haverhill for overtime pay for members of its police
and fire departments who responded to the mill fires in April and May,
2026; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to
the city of Melrose to purchase public safety and emergency medical
equipment; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended
to the police department in the town of Carlisle for the purchase of a traffic
message board; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended for the Berkshire Volunteer Ambulance Squad, Inc. to provide
out-of-hospital advanced life support care to communities in western
Massachusetts; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended for Pioneer Valley Riverfront Club, Inc. for its counter-criminal
continuum, or C3, police management program in low income and
downtown neighborhoods to facilitate community involvement; provided
further, that not less than $70,000 shall be expended to the town of
Burlington for the police department for unanticipated payroll
expenditures; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be
expended to the Berkshire regional planning commission to establish a
mental health emergency alternative response task force in coordination
with the sheriff of the county of Berkshire and The Brien Center for Mental
Health and Substance Abuse Services, Inc.; provided further, that not less
than $15,000 shall be expended to the town of Bourne for the police
department to purchase a 3D scanner; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the Hull police department to support their
canine program; provided further, that not less than $24,000 shall be
expended to the town of Oxford for the police department to purchase of
a full matrix sign and related equipment for road safety; provided further,
that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to the town of Middleborough
for police department equipment, technology and operational support to
enhance public safety; provided further, that not less than $15,000 shall
be expended to the town of Dighton for police department equipment,
technology and operational support to enhance public safety; provided
further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended for the K9 PTSD
Research Center, Inc. in the town of Seekonk for the care, rehabilitation
and research of retired military and law enforcement canines; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the town of
Seekonk for a police body-worn camera program; provided further, that
not less than $200,000 shall be expended to the department of state police
Troop H for dedicated patrols including, but not limited to, the community
action team, mounted unit and marine unit; provided further, that not less
than $100,000 shall be expended to the Massachusetts Bay
Transportation Authority police department for additional dedicated patrols
at train stations along the orange line, red line and commuter rail within
the First Suffolk district; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall

Conference Committee Report
be expended to the city of Boston to enable the fire department to conduct
dedicated emergency services through its delta units vehicles; provided
further, that not less than $15,000 shall be expended to the Holyoke for its
police department to purchase a drone to support swift and effective
search and rescue efforts in emergencies; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended for the city known as the town of Agawam
for costs associated with enhancing the town’s cybersecurity measures;
provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended to the town
of Berkley for the purchase and upfitting of a police cruiser; provided
further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to the town of Marion
for replacement of the uninterruptible power supply system supporting
emergency communications; provided further, that not less than $75,000
shall be expended to We Are Better Together Warren Daniel Hairston
Project, Inc. to support its Caregivers Program, a trauma-informed, cohort-
based initiative providing wraparound support, healing services, peer
mentoring and reentry planning assistance to caregivers and families
impacted by incarceration, violence and community trauma; provided
further that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town of
Hamilton for the purchase of a generator; provided further, that not less
than $350,000 shall be expended for a grant program to be administered
by the executive office of public safety and security for municipalities,
public colleges and universities and community-based nonprofit programs
to purchase automated external defibrillators; provided further, that such
grant program shall give priority to municipalities with a population of not
more than of 20,000 persons and to nonprofit organizations; provided
further, that not later than March 1, 2027, the executive office shall submit
a report to the clerks of the house of representatives and senate and the
house and senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but
not be limited to: (i) a list of grant applicants, (ii) a list of the successful
grant applications, including the amounts awarded and (iii) the criteria
used to evaluate grant applications; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the town of Holbrook for upgrades to the
public safety building located at 300 South Franklin street including, but
not limited to, heating, air conditioning and ventilation upgrades, main
apparatus floor waterproofing, carpeting replacements, electronic lockset
replacements and fitness center renovations; provided further, that not
less than $50,000 shall be expended to replace heat pumps in the public
safety building in the town of Wrentham; provided further, that not less
than $100,000 shall be expended to the city of Beverly for the acquisition
of 2 police vehicles; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be
expended for the Randolph police department for dedicated speed
prevention patrols on state highway route 28 in the city known as the town
of Randolph; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be
expended for AccessMA, Inc. to expand access to health and human
services resources for formerly incarcerated individuals, their families and
impacted communities; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall
be expended for Bike Life New England Foundation Inc. for the
Score4More, Inc.’s annual Save R Streets event, a 2-day basketball
tournament and peace weekend aimed at reducing violence in the city of
Boston; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended
to the Natick police and fire departments for the purchase of health and
safety training and equipment; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be expended to the Franklin Regional Council of
Governments for efforts to improve the delivery of emergency medical
services in Franklin county; provided further, that not less than $140,000
shall be expended for the town of Lakeville to support modernizing and

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
transferring public safety communication equipment; provided further, that
not less than $110,000 shall be expended for the town of Rochester to
support public safety including, but not limited to, the purchase of body-
worn cameras for the police department and a new truck for the fire
department; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended
to the Swansea police department for de-escalation training; provided
further, that not less than $150,000 shall be expended to the Westport
police department for de-escalation training; provided further, that not less
than $10,000 shall be expended to the Society of St. Vincent de Paul
District Council of Attleboro for the Attleboro Cincentian immersion reentry
project that serves incarcerated and formerly incarcerated individuals
throughout Bristol county; provided further, that not less than $100,000
shall be expended to the Ashland police department for a recovery coach
and related costs to support a response model aimed at supporting mental
health and substance use challenges in the community; and provided
further, that not less than $15,000 shall be expended to the city of Attleboro
for the purchase of active shooter protective gear and response equipment
............................................................................................................................ $5,707,000
8000-0600 For the office of the secretary of public safety and security, including the
highway safety bureau, to provide matching funds for a planning and
administration grant under 23 U.S.C. 402 and the costs associated with
the implementation of chapter 122 of the acts of 2019; provided, that the
executive office of public safety and security staff may provide
administrative processing for departments under the executive office’s
purview; provided further, that not less than $1,600,000 shall be provided
for the Boston, Cambridge and Everett fire department hazardous material
response teams; provided further, that not less than $150,000 shall be
expended to the city of Boston for a Co-Response Mobile Operations Center
vehicle and ongoing operating expenses; provided further, that local police
departments, sheriffs’ offices, the department of state police, the
department of correction and other state agencies, authorities and
educational institutions with law enforcement functions as determined by
the secretary that receive funds for the cost of the replacement of
bulletproof vests through the office of the secretary may expend without
further appropriation these funds to purchase additional vests in the fiscal
year in which they receive such reimbursements; provided further, that not
less than $100,000 shall be expended for the executive office of public
safety and security, in collaboration with department of public health, to
conduct an analysis and recommend a plan to modernize and improve the
efficiency, efficacy, service delivery and long term sustainability of
emergency medical services in the commonwealth; provided further, that
the analysis and plan shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the feasibility
and fiscal impacts of transferring the administration and oversight of the
state emergency medical services system from the department of public
health to a new agency within the executive office of public safety and
security; (ii) best practices among states in the administration of
emergency medical services; (iii) the current state of the emergency
medical services workforce in the commonwealth and methods of
enhancing recruitment and retention; (iv) the integration of emergency
medical services with other public safety agencies including police and
fire; (v) the utilization and effectiveness of the statewide communication
system among emergency medical services providers and methods of
improving interoperability, including for central medical emergency
direction statewide; (vi) a review of the different service delivery
requirements for emergency and interfacility transports; and (vii) revisions

Conference Committee Report
to the EMS system advisory board established in section 13 of chapter
111C of the General Laws to promote stakeholder engagement and
effectiveness of the board; provided further, that the executive office shall
engage with stakeholders including, but not limited to: (a) the Fire Chiefs
Association of Massachusetts; (b) the Professional Fire Fighters of
Massachusetts; (c) the Massachusetts Call/Volunteer Firefighters
Association; (d) the Massachusetts Hospital Association; (e) the
Massachusetts Ambulance Association; (f) the International Association of
EMTs and Paramedics; and (g) the Massachusetts Chiefs of Police
Association; provided further, that the executive office shall solicit public
input and hold not less than 4 public hearings in different geographic areas
of the commonwealth; and provided further, that not later than June 30,
2027, the executive office shall submit its final analysis and
recommendation, including any legislative and regulatory changes, to the
clerks of the house of representatives and senate, the house and senate
committees on ways and means, the joint committee on public health and
the joint committee on public safety and homeland security .............................. $8,602,912
8000-0605 For efforts to combat human trafficking, including a competitive grant
program to be administered by the executive office of public safety and
security; provided, that not later than March 2, 2027, the executive office
shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means detailing expenditures from this item, including a list of grant
recipients ................................................................................................................ $100,000
8000-0655 For a grant program to be administered by the executive office of public
safety and security for emerging adults re-entry programs to reduce
recidivism among emerging adults who are returning to the community
from state prisons and county correctional facilities; provided, that the
secretary of public safety and security shall distribute funds through a
competitive grant program; provided further, that grants shall be awarded
to applicants that: (i) are community-based nonprofit programs; (ii) have a
demonstrated commitment from the department of correction or a sheriff’s
office to work collaboratively to deliver services in their respective facilities;
(iii) provide both pre-release and post-release services to emerging adults
who are returning to the community from state prisons and county
correctional facilities including, but not limited to, probationers and
parolees; (iv) provide a continuum of programming from state prisons or
county correctional facilities into the community; (v) provide pre-release
services for all participating individuals that include transition plans,
education programs, workforce readiness and life skills programs and
counseling; (vi) provide post-release services that include case
management for not less than 12 months after participating individuals
have been released; and (vii) provide a plan for ensuring that proposed
programs shall be implemented with adherence to a research-based,
evidence-based or evidence-informed program design; provided further,
that not more than 6 grants shall be awarded; provided further, that not
more than 7.5 per cent of the total appropriation in this item shall be used
to provide administrative support and training to grantees, including
program design, technical assistance and program evaluation, and to
provide training and technical assistance to any other organization or
institution working on emerging adult justice initiatives; provided further,
that contracts for grantees may be awarded for periods of not more than 5
years with options for additional renewal periods; and provided further, that
not later than March 2, 2027, the executive office shall submit a report to
the house and senate committees on ways and means which shall include,

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
but not be limited to, the: (a) successful grant applications and the services
they provide; (b) amount of funds awarded to each grantee; (c) criteria
used to evaluate grant applications; (d) number of participants served by
each program and the communities to which they are returning; and (e)
outcomes and recidivism rates of the participants in each of the programs
............................................................................................................................ $6,930,000
Marijuana Regulation Fund ...................................... 100%
8000-1001 For the Boston regional intelligence center, or BRIC, to upgrade, expand
and integrate technology and protocols related to anti-terrorism, anti-
crime, anti-gang and emergency response; provided, that intelligence
developed shall be shared with the BRIC communities and other state,
municipal and federal agencies as necessary; and provided further, that
the BRIC shall provide technology required to access the intelligence with
its municipal partners, the department of state police, the Massachusetts
Bay Transportation Authority, the Massachusetts Port Authority and
appropriate federal agencies to assure maximum interagency
collaboration for public safety and homeland security ........................................... $750,000
8000-1127 For a nonprofit security grant program to provide support for target
hardening and other security enhancements to nonprofit organizations
that are at high risk of terrorist attacks or hate crimes, as defined under
section 32 of chapter 22C of the General Laws; provided, that prioritization
shall be given to nonprofit organizations that have experienced instances
of terrorist attacks or hate crimes, as defined under said section 32 of said
chapter 22C; provided further, that: (i) at least 1 such grant shall be
awarded to a nonprofit organization in the eastern region of the
commonwealth; (ii) at least 1 such grant shall be awarded to a nonprofit
organization in the central region of the commonwealth; and (iii) at least 1
such grant shall be awarded to a nonprofit organization in the western region
of the commonwealth; provided further, that the grants shall be distributed
in a geographically equitable manner across the eastern, central and
western regions of the commonwealth; provided further, that not later than
March 2, 2027, the executive office of public safety and security shall
submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and means
that shall include, but not be limited to, the: (i) number of grant applicants;
(ii) successful grant applicants; (iii) criteria used to evaluate grant
applications; and (iv) amount of funds awarded to each grant recipient;
provided further, that not less than $750,000 shall be expended by the
executive office for a security personnel program to be piloted at nonprofits
that have demonstrated to be at high risk for terrorist attacks or hate
crimes; and provided further, that participating nonprofits shall contribute
matching funds to the pilot program equal to $1 for every $1 contributed
by the commonwealth ........................................................................... …………$5,450,000
8000-1213 For the school of reentry; provided, that funds may be spent on the credible
messenger program ............................................................................................ $1,294,519
8000-1225 For the operation of the office of grants and research ........................................... $281,611
8000-1700 For the provision of information technology services within the executive
office of public safety and security .................................................................... $21,055,192
8100-0111 For a grant program to be known as the Senator Charles E. Shannon, Jr.
community safety initiative, to be administered by the executive office of

Conference Committee Report
public safety and security to support regional, multidisciplinary approaches
to combat gang violence through coordinated programs for prevention and
intervention, coordinated law enforcement, including regional gang task
forces and regional crime mapping strategies, focused prosecutions and
reintegration strategies for formerly incarcerated persons; provided, that
the secretary of public safety and security shall distribute grant funds
through a competitive grant program that gives preference to applications
that: (i) demonstrate high levels of youth violence, gang problems and
substance use in a region; (ii) demonstrate a commitment to regional,
multi-jurisdictional strategies to deal with such community safety issues,
including written commitments for municipalities, law enforcement
agencies, community-based organizations and government agencies to
work together; (iii) clearly outline a comprehensive plan that establishes
measurable outcomes for municipalities to work with law enforcement,
community-based organizations and government agencies to address
gang activity; (iv) outline measurable outcomes that demonstrate program
success, detail a plan for collecting data related to achieving said
measurable outcomes and commit to sharing the data with the executive
office; (v) make a written commitment to match grant funds with a 25 per
cent match provided by either municipal or private contributions; and (vi)
identify a local governmental unit to serve as the fiscal agent; provided
further, that clusters of municipalities, in partnership with nonprofit
organizations and other agencies, including district attorneys’ offices, may
apply for such grant funds; provided further, that such grant funds shall be
considered 1-time grants awarded to public agencies and shall not
annualize into fiscal year 2028 or subsequent years; provided further, that
administrative costs for successful grant applications shall not exceed 10
per cent of the value of the grant; provided further, that no grant funds shall
be awarded to the department of state police; provided further, that not
later than August 14, 2026, the executive office shall publish guidelines
and an application for the competitive portion of the grant fund program;
provided further, that not later than December 15, 2026, grant funds shall
be made available to applicants; provided further, that not later than 60
days after the distribution of grant funds, the executive office shall submit
a report to the executive office for administration and finance and the
house and senate committees on ways and means detailing the
distribution of grant funds; and provided further, that not later than March 3,
2027, the office shall submit a report to the house and senate committees
on ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to: (a) the number
of young adults served by the grant program during fiscal year 2027; (b)
executive summaries of the programs currently operating under the grant
program; and (c) outcomes and findings that demonstrate program success
from the grant awards from fiscal year 2026 ...................................................... $10,587,424
Chief Medical Examiner.
8000-0105 For the operation of the office of the chief medical examiner established in
section 2 of chapter 38 of the General Laws; provided, that not later than
January 15, 2027, the office shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to: (i)
the current caseload of the office and each of its medical examiners and
the caseload for fiscal year 2026; (ii) the number of procedures performed
in fiscal year 2026; (iii) the current turnaround time and backlogs; (iv) the
current response time to scenes; (v) the number of cases completed in
fiscal year 2026; (vi) the current status of accreditation with the National

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
Association of Medical Examiners; (vii) progress in identification and
completion of reports; and (viii) progress in improving delays in decedent
release.. ............................................................................................................ $19,761,334
8000-0122 For the office of the chief medical examiner, which may expend for its
operations not more than $8,851,118 in revenues collected from fees for
services provided by the office; provided, that notwithstanding any general
or special law to the contrary, for accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the
office may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment
amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent
revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system ........................... $8,851,118
Department of Criminal Justice Information Services.
8000-0110 For the operation of the department of criminal justice information
services, including criminal justice information services, criminal offender
record information services, firearms support services and victim services;
provided, that funds may be expended to enable housing authorities to
have access to criminal offender record information when qualifying
applicants for state-assisted housing.. ................................................................ $3,469,021
8000-0111 For the operation of the public safety information system and the criminal
records review board within the department of criminal justice information
services, which may expend for the operation of the board not more than
$5,816,920 in revenues collected from fees for services provided by the
board; provided, that funding from this item may be retained and expended
from fees charged and collected under section 172A of chapter 6 of the
General Laws; provided further, that funds may be expended to assist
formerly incarcerated persons in obtaining and maintaining employment
and to provide education and assistance regarding criminal records under
said section 172A of said chapter 6; provided further, that the
commissioner of criminal justice information services may make funds
from this item available for a competitive grant process to provide such
training and education; provided further, that notwithstanding any general
or special law to the contrary, for accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the
board may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment
amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent
revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system; and provided
further, that any unexpended funds in this item shall not revert but shall be
made available for this item until June 30, 2028 ................................................. $5,816,920
Sex Offender Registry.
8000-0125 For the operation of the sex offender registry including, but not limited to,
the costs of maintaining a computerized registry system and the
classification of persons subject to the registry; provided, that the
registration fee paid by convicted sex offenders under section 178Q of
chapter 6 of the General Laws shall be retained and expended by the sex
offender registry board; and provided further, that not later than December
15, 2026, the sex offender registry board shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means outlining: (i) the utilization of
data-sharing agreements with state agencies to find addresses of
offenders that are out of compliance; (ii) plans to establish new data-

Conference Committee Report
sharing agreements with other executive branch agencies; and (iii)
detailed plans to improve overall data collection and registry maintenance
to enhance public safety ..................................................................................... $7,406,884
Department of State Police.
8100-0006 For the department of state police, which may expend for the costs of
private police details, including administrative costs, an amount not more
than $52,000,000 from revenues collected from fees charged for such
details; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between
the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the department
may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts
not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system ........................................ $52,000,000
8100-0012 For the department of state police, which may expend for the costs of
security services provided by state police officers, including overtime and
administrative costs, not more than $3,500,000 from fees charged for
those services; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law
to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the
department may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for
payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most
recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system ................ $3,500,000
8100-0018 For the department of state police, which may expend not more than
$3,205,922 from revenues collected for certain police activities provided
under agreements authorized in this item; provided, that for fiscal year
2027, the colonel of the state police may enter into service agreements
with the commanding officer or other person in charge of a military
reservation of the United States under the control of the Massachusetts
Development Finance Agency and any other service agreements as
necessary to enhance the protection of persons, assets and infrastructure
from possible external threat or activity; provided further, that said
agreements shall establish the responsibilities pertaining to the operation
and maintenance of police services including, but not limited to: (i)
provisions governing payment to the department for the cost of regular
salaries, overtime, retirement and other employee benefits; and (ii)
provisions governing payment to the department for the cost of furnishings
and equipment necessary to provide the police services; provided further,
that the department may charge any recipients of police services for the
cost of the services under this item; provided further, that the colonel may
expend from this item for costs associated with joint federal and state law
enforcement activities from federal reimbursements received; and
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of
retained revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system ........................................................ $3,205,922
8100-0102 For the costs associated with state police personnel assigned to the
Massachusetts Port Authority, which may expend for the costs of police
activities provided by state police officers, including overtime and

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
administrative costs, not more than $52,000,000 from fees collected for
such activities; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law
to the contrary, for accommodating timing discrepancies between the
receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the department of
state police may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for
payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most
recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system .............. $52,000,000
8100-0515 For the costs associated with hiring, equipping and training state police
recruits to maintain appropriate staffing levels for the state police;
provided, that funds shall be expended to promote diversity and inclusion
in the hiring of police recruits; and provided further, that funds shall be
expended to implement comprehensive racial bias training within the
department of state police to address racial inequities in policing practices
.......................................................................................................................... $10,434,091
8100-1001 For the administration and operation of the department of state police;
provided, that the department shall expend funds from this item to
maximize federal grants for the operation of a counter-terrorism unit and
the payment of overtime for state police officers; provided further, that the
department shall maintain the division of field services, which shall include,
but not be limited to, the bureau of metropolitan district operations;
provided further, that not less than 40 state police officers shall be
provided to the department of conservation and recreation to patrol its
watershed property; provided further, that the department of state police
shall enter into an interagency agreement with the department of
conservation and recreation to provide police coverage on department of
conservation and recreation properties and parkways; provided further,
that not less than $1,200,000 shall be expended for the payroll costs of
the department of state police directed patrols; provided further, that not
less than $30,000 of said funds shall be expended for Troop A of the
department of state police to conduct mounted, directed patrols throughout
Revere beach, the Lynn Fells and the Middlesex Fells Reservation park
among other identified areas; provided further, that subject to
appropriation communities receiving funds for directed patrols in fiscal
year 2008 shall receive an equal disbursement of funds in proportion to
the current appropriation in fiscal year 2024; provided further, that funds
shall be expended for directed patrols at Constitution beach in the East
Boston section of the city of Boston; provided further, that not less than
$95,000 of said funds shall be expended for additional patrols for the
summer season at Wollaston beach and Furnace Brook parkway in the
city of Quincy; provided further, that not less than $95,000 shall be
expended for department of state police patrols in the Wollaston beach
and Quincy Shore drive area and Furnace Brook parkway of the city of
Quincy from May 31 to September 1; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended for department of state police patrols and
traffic enforcement functions on the Harry Truman parkway, Neponset
Valley parkway and Dedham parkway in the Hyde Park section of the city
of Boston; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
for directed patrols in the South Boston section of the city of Boston
including, but not limited to, Day boulevard, Carson beach, M Street
beach, Marine park and Castle Island; provided further, that funds shall be
expended from this item for the administration and operation of an
automated fingerprint identification system and for the motor carrier safety
assistance program; provided further, that the creation of a new or an
expansion of the existing statewide communications network shall include

Conference Committee Report
the office of law enforcement in the executive office of energy and
environmental affairs at no cost to or compensation from the executive
office; provided further, that the department of state police may expend
funds from this item for the administration of budgetary, procurement,
fiscal, human resources, payroll and other administrative services of the
office of the chief medical examiner, the municipal police training
committee and the department of criminal justice information services; and
provided further, that the department shall submit quarterly reports to the
house and senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but
not be limited to: (i) the total compensation paid to each officer, delineated
by category of payout; (ii) the total compensation paid to each troop in the
aggregate, delineated by regular and overtime compensation; (iii) the
average hours of overtime accumulated, delineated by officer and reason
for the use of overtime; (iv) the average hours of overtime accumulated,
delineated by troop in the aggregate; and (v) a detailed plan outlining steps
to decrease overtime usage and increase accountability and oversight
within the department ...................................................................................... $407,718,479
State Police Crime Laboratory.
8100-1004 For the operation and related costs of the state police crime laboratory,
including the analysis of samples used in the prosecution of controlled
substance offenses conducted at the former department of public health
facilities; provided, that the analysis of narcotic drug synthetic substitutes,
poisons, drugs, medicines and chemicals shall be funded from this item in
order to support the law enforcement efforts of the district attorneys, the
department of state police and municipal police departments; provided
further, that the practices and procedures of the state police crime
laboratory shall be informed by the recommendations of the forensic
science oversight board; provided further, that the department of state
police shall submit quarterly reports to the house and senate committees
on ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the caseload
of each lab; (ii) all relevant information regarding turnaround time and
backlogs by type of case; and (iii) the accreditation status of each lab;
provided further, that not later than October 5, 2026, the first such report
shall be submitted; provided further, that funds shall be spent on phase II of
the processing of sexual assault evidence kits; and provided further, that not
later than March 3, 2027, the department of state police shall submit a report
to the house and senate committees on ways and means that shall include,
but not be limited to: (a) the status of phase II of the processing of sexual
assault evidence kits; (b) an anticipated timeline for completion of phase II;
and (c) the year to date cost of processing sexual assault evidence kits as
part of phase II ....................................................................................................... $30,718,350
8100-1005 For the analysis of narcotic drug synthetic substitutes, poisons, drugs,
medicines and chemicals at the University of Massachusetts medical
school to support the law enforcement efforts of the district attorneys, the
department of state police and municipal police departments ............................... $651,506
Municipal Police Training Committee.
8200-0200 For the operation of veteran, reserve and in-service training programs
conducted by the municipal police training committee; provided, that no
expenditures authorized by this item shall be charged to item 8200-0222....... $18,895,529

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
General Fund ........................................................ 93.67%
Public Safety Training Fund .................................... 6.33%
8200-0222 For the municipal police training committee, which may collect and expend
not more than $2,800,000 to provide training to new recruits; provided, that
the committee shall charge $3,200 per recruit for the training; provided
further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
committee shall charge a fee of $3,200 per person for training programs
operated by the committee for all persons who begin training not later than
July 1, 2026; provided further, that said fee shall be retained and expended
by the committee; provided further, that the trainee or, if the trainee is a
recruit, the municipality in which the recruit shall serve, shall provide the
fee in full to the committee not later than the first day of orientation for the
program in which the trainee or recruit has enrolled; provided further, that
no recruit or person shall begin training unless the municipality or the
person has provided the fee in full to the committee; provided further, that
for recruits of municipalities, upon the completion of the program, the
municipality shall deduct the fee from the recruit’s wages in 23 equal
monthly installments unless otherwise negotiated between the recruit and
the municipality in which the recruit shall serve; provided further, that if a
recruit withdraws from the training program prior to graduation, the
committee shall refund the municipality in which the recruit was to have
served a portion of the fee according to the following schedule: (i) if a
recruit withdraws from the program prior to the start of week 2, 75 per cent
of the fee shall be refunded; (ii) if a recruit withdraws from the program
after the start of week 2 but prior to the start of week 3, 50 per cent of the
fee shall be refunded; (iii) if a recruit withdraws from the program after the
start of week 3 but prior to the start of week 4, 25 per cent of the fee shall
be refunded; and (iv) if a recruit withdraws after the start of week 4, the fee
shall not be refunded; provided further, that a recruit who withdraws from
the program shall pay the municipality in which the recruit was to have
served the difference between the fee and the amount forfeited by the
municipality according to the schedule; provided further, that the schedule
shall also apply to trainees other than recruits who enroll in the program;
provided further, that no expenditures shall be charged to this item that
are not directly related to new recruit training; provided further, that no
expenditures shall be charged to this item that are related to chief, veteran,
in-service or reserve training or any training not directly related to new
recruits; provided further, that the committee shall submit a report on the
status of recruit training, including the number of classes, start and end
dates of each class, total number of recruits enrolled and graduating in each
class, cost per recruit and cost per class for fiscal years 2026 and 2027;
provided further, that not later than January 8, 2027, the report shall be
submitted to the house and senate committees on ways and means; and
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of
retained revenues and related expenditures, the committee may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system ........................................................ $2,800,000
Department of Fire Services.
8324-0000 For the administration of the department of fire services, including the
office of the state fire marshal, the hazardous materials emergency

Conference Committee Report
response program, the board of fire prevention regulations established in
section 4 of chapter 22D of the General Laws, the expenses of the fire
safety commission and the Massachusetts firefighting academy, including
the Massachusetts fire training council certification program, municipal
and non-municipal fire training and expenses of the council; provided, that
the fire training program shall use the split days option; provided further,
that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, 100 per
cent of the amount appropriated in this item for the administration of the
department of fire services, the office of the state fire marshal, the
Massachusetts firefighting academy, critical incident stress management
programs, the On-Site Academy, other fire department training
academies, the regional dispatch centers, radio and dispatch center
improvements and associated fringe benefit costs of personnel paid from
this item for these purposes shall be assessed upon insurance companies
writing fire, homeowners multiple peril or commercial multiple peril policies
on property situated in the commonwealth and paid within 30 days after
receiving notice of this assessment from the commissioner of insurance;
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, 100 per cent of the amount appropriated in item 8100-1001 for
all purposes related to fire and arson investigation shall be assessed upon
insurance companies writing fire, homeowners multiple peril or
commercial multiple peril policies on property situated in the
commonwealth, and paid within 30 days after receiving notice of this
assessment from the commissioner of insurance; provided further, that not
more than 10 per cent of the amount designated for the arson prevention
program shall be expended for the administrative cost of the program;
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, 100 per cent of the amount appropriated in this item for the
operation of the hazardous materials emergency response program and
the associated fringe benefit costs of personnel paid from this item for
these purposes shall be assessed upon insurance companies writing
commercial multiple peril, non-liability portion policies on property situated
in the commonwealth and commercial auto liability policies as referenced
in line 5.1 and line 19.4, respectively, in the most recent annual statement
on file with the commissioner of insurance; provided further, that not less
than $100,000 shall be expended by the department for critical incident
stress management; provided further, that not less than $2,000,000 shall
be expended by the department for the On-Site Academy for critical
incident stress management services in support of emergency medical
services, fire, correction officers, and law enforcement officers; provided
further, that not less than $2,000,000 shall be allocated by the department
for the student awareness fire education program; provided further, that
not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the town of Holbrook for the
Holbrook Regional Emergency Communication Center; provided further,
that not less than $1,700,000 shall be expended for the Boston fire
department training academy to provide training and instruction for public
safety agencies in the city of Boston and municipal and political
subdivisions across the commonwealth; provided further, that funds shall
be expended for the hazardous materials emergency response program
under chapter 21K of the General Laws; and provided further, that funds
shall be expended for costs associated with additional operational capacity
and hazardous materials emergency response teams coverage for special
events ................................................................................................................ $44,350,301
8324-0050 For the commonwealth’s local fire departments; provided, that not less
than $100,000 shall be expended to the county of Barnstable for fire

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
training programs and equipment; provided further, that not less than
$30,000 shall be expended to the town of Norwood for the fire department
to purchase lifesaving rescue, emergency, and tactical training apparatus;
provided further, that not less than $37,000 shall be expended for the
purchase and installation of a door access control system for the fire
department in the town of Spencer; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be expended to the town of Holden for improvements and
renovations at the fire substation; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the town of West Brookfield for the fire
department to purchase new fire radios; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the town of Duxbury for the fire department
to purchase equipment and other resources; provided further, that not less
than $40,000 shall be expended for the Boylston fire department for
necessary information technology upgrades; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended to the city of Easthampton for the fire
department to purchase interoperable communications equipment;
provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended for a
municipal grant program administered by the state fire marshal for
firefighter cancer screenings, including advance blood testing and
imaging; provided further, that not less than $90,000 shall be expended
for the Northwestern Youth Fire Intervention Response, Education and
Safety Partnership (NoFIRES) program to support fire safety education
and intervention services for families in the region; provided further, that
not less than $500,000 shall be expended to the New Bedford fire
department for personnel costs, including maintaining staffing at Fire
Station 9 to keep the facility open to sustain sufficient emergency response
times across the city; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the town Topsfield to support the completion of a fire
compressor and cylinder fill station for the fire department; provided
further, that not less than $40,000 shall be expended to the town of North
Andover to replace the fire department’s fire life safety training trailer;
provided further, that not less than $40,000 shall be expended to the city
of Gloucester to purchase an emergency response all-terrain vehicle for
the fire department; provided further that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the town of Newbury for the purchase of a LUCAS chest
compression device for the fire department; provided further, that not less
than $25,000 shall be expended to the town of Nahant fire department for
upgrades to its public safety equipment; provided further, that not less than
$75,000 shall be expended to the city of Lynn for the purchase of
equipment for the fire department; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be expended for the Fire Chiefs' Association of Plymouth
County, Inc. for purposes including, but not limited to, program needs and
long-term planning to enhance mutual aid operations in Plymouth county;
provided further, that not less than $40,000 shall be expended for the
Kingston fire department for equipment related to cardiovascular support
and rescue; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
for the American National Red Cross, Southeastern Chapter, to provide
fire and disaster relief, organize blood drives, provide services to veterans
and teach lifesaving skills to the public; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended for the Framingham fire department to support
senior home safety assessments; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be expended for the Somerset fire department to purchase
self-contained breathing apparatuses; provided further, that not less than
$55,000 shall be expended to the city of Quincy for a hazardous materials
emergency response program; provided further, that not less than $75,000
shall be expended to the town of North Andover for a fire life safety training

Conference Committee Report
trailer replacement; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to the town of Boxford for the replacement of Boxford fire
department hydraulic rescue tools used for vehicle extrication; provided
further, that not less than $35,000 shall be expended to the city of
Framingham for the Framingham fire department to establish a senior
home safety initiative to provide free home safety assessments for seniors;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town
of Rehoboth fire department for the purchase of turnout gear; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Plymouth fire
department to support the modernization of its radio communications
system and transition to a platform that is aligned with the Commonwealth
of Massachusetts Interoperable Radio System (CoMIRS); provided
further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended to the town of
Mendon fire department for the purchase of an electric pickup truck;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the
Topsfield fire department for the procurement of a new fire compression
and oxygen cylinder fill station; provided further, that not less than $40,000
shall be expended to the Marblehead fire department for a replacement
boiler; provided further, that not less than $45,000 shall be expended to
the Dudley fire department for security and access system repairs and
upgrades; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended
to the Charlton fire department to establish community fire safety and fire
extinguisher training programs; provided further, that not less than
$75,000 shall be expended to the Saugus fire department for the
replacement of safety gear and equipment; provided further, that not less
than $45,000 shall be expended to the Lunenburg fire department for the
replacement of aging portable radios; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the Lynn fire department for the purchase
of a self-contained breathing air system trailer; provided further, that not
less than $50,000 shall be expended to the town of Wakefield for the
acquisition of a high speed washer-extractor and dryer-extractor for the
fire department; provided further, that not less than $24,000 shall be
expended to the town of Wakefield for a new lighting grid for use by
Wakefield Community Access Television; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended to the Amherst fire department to support
the purchase of equipment, including, but not limited to, a station alerting
system; provided further, that not less than $60,000 shall be expended to
the Granby fire department to support the purchase of equipment,
including, but not limited to, portable communication radios; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Bridgewater
fire department for battery-powered extrication tools; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the South Hadley fire
department (district 2) to upgrade personal radios to P25-compliant
equipment; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
to the Easthampton fire department to upgrade vehicle extrication
equipment; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended
to the city known as the town of North Attleborough for firefighter gear,
equipment or other related expenses; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the Westwood fire department for the
Westwood fire station 1 project; provided further, that not less than
$30,000 shall be expended to the Milton fire department for a replacement
pump for the department’s brush truck; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the Bourne fire department for equipment
purchases, maintenance and personnel training; provided further, that not
less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Everett fire department for
active shooter training; provided further, that not less than $60,000 shall

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
be expended to the town of Dracut for the design of a rescue boat ramp
for the Merrimack river in the town of Dracut; provided further, that not less
than $15,000 shall be expended to the Ashby fire department for extracting
equipment; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
to the Stoneham fire department for gear and equipment purchases and
maintenance; provided further, that not less than $150,000 be expended
to the town of Winchester for first responder and dispatch communication
upgrades; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended
to the town of Weston for updates and modifications to a fire vehicle;
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the town
of Weston for design funds for the fire department project; provided further,
that not less than $150,000 shall be expended to the town of Stow for new
firefighting water cisterns; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall
be expended to the city known as the town of Winthrop for thermal imaging
cameras and related equipment for the Winthrop fire department; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the city known as
the town of Winthrop for required evidence room upgrades at the Winthrop
police department; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the Norton fire department for safety gear and equipment
replacements; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be
expended for the Andover fire rescue department for any costs related to
a replacement vehicle and outfitting materials to support emergency
response and firefighter safety; and provided further, that not less than
$20,000 shall be expended to the city known as the town of North
Attleborough for the purchase of new turnout gear for firefighters ..................... $3,711,000
8324-0304 For the department of fire services, which may expend for enforcement
and training not more than $8,500 from revenue generated under chapter
148A of the General Laws; provided, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, for accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the
department may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for
payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most
recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system ....................... $8,500
8324-0500 For the department of fire services, which may expend not more than
$2,410,369 in revenues collected from fees for annual issuance of boiler
and pressure vessel certificates and inspections; provided, that funds shall
be expended for the operation of the department and to address the
existing boiler and pressure vessel inspection backlog; provided further,
that funds shall be expended for hiring additional engineering inspectors
or engineers; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, for accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the
department may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for
payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most
recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system ................ $2,410,369
Military Division.
8700-0001 For the operation of the military division, including the offices of the
adjutant general and state quartermaster, the operation of the armories,
the Camp Curtis Guild rifle range and certain national guard aviation
facilities; provided, that notwithstanding chapter 30 of the General Laws,
certain military personnel in the military division may be paid salaries

Conference Committee Report
according to military pay grades; provided further, that the division may
expend funds appropriated in this item for the administration of budgetary,
procurement, fiscal, human resources, payroll and other administrative
services; provided further, that the adjutant general shall maintain a roster
of Massachusetts veterans as directed by section 15 of chapter 33 of the
General Laws; and provided further, that not less than $300,000 shall be
expended for suicide prevention services for military personnel ...................... $13,954,218
8700-1140 For the military division, which may expend for the costs of national guard
missions and division operations not more than $1,900,000 from fees
charged for the nonmilitary rental or use of armories and from
reimbursements generated by national guard missions; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the division may incur expenses and
the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower
of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in
the state accounting system ............................................................................... $1,900,000
8700-1150 For reimbursement of the costs of the national guard tuition and fee
waivers under section 19 of chapter 15A of the General Laws; provided,
that no funds shall be distributed from this item prior to certification by the
state universities, community colleges and the University of
Massachusetts of the actual amount of tuition and fees waived for national
guard members attending public institutions of higher education under said
section 19 of said chapter 15A that would otherwise have been retained
by the campuses according to procedures and regulations promulgated by
the military division; provided further, that funds from this item may be
expended for the reimbursement of the tuition and fees waived for classes
taken during the summer months; and provided further, that the funds
appropriated under this item shall not revert but shall be made available
for these purposes until June 30, 2028.. ............................................................. $5,334,769
8700-1160 For life insurance premiums under section 88B of chapter 33 of the
General Laws ...................................................................................................... $1,153,552
Massachusetts Emergency Management Agency.
8800-0001 For the operations of the Massachusetts emergency management
agency; provided, that expenditures from this item shall be contingent
upon the prior approval of the proper federal authorities; provided further,
that the funds appropriated under this item shall not revert but shall be made
available for these purposes through June 30, 2028; provided further, that
the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed $5,000,000
in excess of the current appropriation; and provided further, that such
expenditures shall be approved by the secretary of public safety and
security, who shall cite a state of emergency declaration for each approved
expenditure, in consultation with the secretary of administration and
finance ................................................................................................................. $7,163,274
Department of Correction.
8900-0001 For the operation of the department of correction; provided, that not later
than January 15, 2027, the commissioner of correction and the secretary
of public safety and security shall report to the house and senate

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
committees on ways and means and the joint committee on public safety
and homeland security on the point score compiled by the department’s
objective classification system for all prisoners confined in each prison
operated by the department; provided further, that to maximize bed
capacity and re-entry capability, the department shall submit quarterly
reports, utilizing standardized reporting definitions developed mutually
with the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc. on caseload,
admissions, classification, releases and recidivism of all pre-trial,
sentenced and federal incarcerated persons; provided further, that the
department shall submit the reports on a quarterly basis not more than 30
days following the last day of the quarter; provided further, that not less
than $125,000 shall be expended for the Disability Law Center, Inc. to
monitor the efficacy of service delivery reforms at Bridgewater state
hospital, including units at the Old Colony correctional center and the
treatment center; provided further, that the Disability Law Center, Inc. may
investigate the physical environment of said facilities, including
infrastructure issues, and may use methods including, but not limited to,
testing and sampling the physical and environmental conditions, whether
or not they are utilized by patients or incarcerated persons; provided
further, that the Disability Law Center, Inc. may monitor the continuity of
care for persons who are discharged from Bridgewater state hospital to
county correctional facilities or department of mental health facilities,
including assessment of the efficacy of admission, discharge and transfer
planning procedures and coordination between the department of
correction, Wellpath LLC, the department of mental health and county
correctional facilities; and provided further, that at least once every 6
months, the Disability Law Center, Inc. shall report on the impact of these
reforms on those served at Bridgewater state hospital to the joint
committee on mental health, substance use and recovery, the joint
committee on the judiciary, the house and senate committees on ways and
means, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives; provided further, that the department shall submit
biannual reports to the joint committee on the judiciary, the joint committee
on public safety and homeland security and the house and senate
committees on ways and means on the use of solitary confinement, also
known as segregation, in state prisons; provided further, that 1 of the
reports shall cover the period from July 1, 2026 to December 31, 2026,
inclusive, and 1 of the reports shall cover the period from January 1, 2027
to June 30, 2027, inclusive; provided further, that such reports shall
include, but not be limited to, the: (i) number of prisoners subjected to
solitary confinement and their voluntarily disclosed sexual orientation as
defined under section 3 of chapter 151B of the General Laws and gender
identity as defined in section 7 of chapter 4; (ii) length of time spent in
solitary confinement; (iii) number of prisoners with mental illness subjected
to solitary confinement, delineated by diagnosis; (iv) number of prisoners
21 years of age or younger subjected to solitary confinement; (v) number
of prisoners subjected to multiple stays in solitary confinement in a given
reporting period; (vi) number of prisoners released directly into the
community from solitary confinement or released into the community not
later than 30 days after having been in solitary confinement; and (vii) rate
of recidivism for individuals that were subject to solitary confinement;
provided further, that the department shall validate each educational
program offered to incarcerated persons against an evidence-based
model chosen by the secretary of public safety and security at least once
every 3 years; provided further, that the department shall collaborate with
the executive office of education in order to ensure high-quality

Conference Committee Report
educational programming at the department and to support the
reintegration of formerly incarcerated persons into the community from
state prisons; provided further, that not later than February 2, 2027, the
department shall submit a report to the joint committee on public safety
and homeland security and the house and senate committees on ways
and means detailing efforts undertaken to ensure high-quality educational
programming for incarcerated persons under the department’s
supervision; and provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be
expended for municipalities hosting department of correction facilities .......... $859,650,607
8900-0002 For the operation of the Massachusetts Alcohol and Substance Abuse
Center ..................................................................................................................... $24,521,860
8900-0003 For the implementation of mandated reforms to mental and behavioral
health and residential treatment related to the department of correction
under chapter 69 of the acts of 2018; provided, that funds from this item
may be expended for contracted service providers specializing in relevant
areas including, but not limited to, behavioral health and residential
treatment; and provided further, that said funds shall only be expended in
the AA or DD object classes if said funds are to be utilized for counselors,
teachers, mental health personnel, medical personnel or additional legal
staff...................................................................................................................... $4,831,338
8900-0010 For prison industries and farm services; provided, that the commissioner
of correction or a designee shall determine the cost of manufacturing
motor vehicle registration plates and certify to the comptroller the amounts
to be transferred from the Commonwealth Transportation Fund
established in section 2ZZZ of chapter 29 of the General Laws to the
department of correction revenue source; and provided further, that not
later than March 11, 2027 the department shall submit a report to the
executive office of public safety and security, the joint committee on the
judiciary, the joint committee on public safety and homeland security and
the house and senate committees on ways and means that shall include,
but not be limited to: (i) a comprehensive quantitative analysis of the impact
that the program has on participating incarcerated persons as compared to
non-participating incarcerated persons, including their disciplinary record
while in custody, their recidivism rate after release and their employment
rate after release; (ii) information on the demographics of participants; (iii)
information on the customers of the program, including whether they are a
public entity, a private business or a nonprofit; and (iv) the compensation
rates for participants ............................................................................................ $7,129,800
8900-0011 For the prison industries and farm services program, which may expend
for the operation of the program not more than $5,600,000 in revenues
collected from the sale of products, for materials, supplies, equipment,
maintenance of facilities and compensation of employees; provided, that
the commissioner of correction may allocate year-end net profits to the
cost of drug, substance use and rehabilitative programming; and provided
further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department of correction may
incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not
to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system .......................................... $5,600,000

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
8900-0050 For the department of correction, which may expend not more than
$8,600,000 in revenues collected from existing assessments, and the state
criminal alien assistance program; provided, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, for accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the department may incur expenses and the comptroller
may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state
accounting system .............................................................................................. $8,600,000
8900-1100 For re-entry programs at the department of correction that are intended to
reduce recidivism rates; provided, that said programs shall be in addition
to such provided in fiscal year 2026; and provided further, that not less
than $80,000 shall be expended for the department of correction to cover
costs associated with coordinating and supporting partnerships with
higher education institutions that provide post-secondary education
programs in state prisons .................................................................................... $1,503,854
Parole Board.
8950-0001 For the operation of the parole board ............................................................... $25,527,789
8950-0002 For the victim and witness assistance program under chapter 258B of the
General Laws ......................................................................................................... $270,032
SHERIFFS.
Hampden Sheriff’s Office.
8910-0102 For the operation of the Hampden sheriff’s office; provided, that not later
than December 15, 2026, the office shall provide a comprehensive
inventory of all current programs and practices, in a manner to be
determined by the executive office of public safety and security, to the
executive office for administration and finance, the executive office of
public safety and security and the house and senate committees on ways
and means; provided further, that the office shall provide relevant data to
the executive office of public safety and security to allow for the reporting
of recidivism rates for all pre-trial, county sentenced and state sentenced
incarcerated persons on a quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending
September 30, 2026 which shall be due not later than 30 days after the
last day of each quarter; provided further, that no funds in this item shall
be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided further, that not
later than November 2, 2026, the Hampden sheriff’s office shall submit a
report to the executive office for administration and finance and the house
and senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be
limited to: (i) a detailed breakdown of all programs and services provided
by the Hampden sheriff’s office in and outside of the sheriff’s office
facilities; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of providing each program and
service; (iii) information on the participants or customers of the program,
including whether they are incarcerated persons, a public entity, a private
business or a nonprofit; (iv) comprehensive quantitative analysis of the
impact that the program has on said participants, including their
disciplinary record while in custody, their recidivism rate after release and
their employment rate after release when applicable; and (v) the

Conference Committee Report
compensation rates for participants; and provided further, that the office
shall provide relevant data to the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc.
to allow for the reporting of all requirements under item 8910-7110 .................. $3,671,223
8910-0103 For the AA and DD object class costs of the Hampden sheriff’s office;
provided, that staffing costs shall not be projected to exceed the amount
appropriated in this item; provided further, that not later than November 2,
2026, the Hampden sheriff’s office shall submit a report to the executive
office for administration and finance and the house and senate committees
on ways and means on the current fiscal year payroll spending projections
including, but not limited to: (i) the number of full time equivalent
employees; (ii) the current salary of each employee; (iii) the bargaining
unit of each employee; (iv) the additional costs of implementing any
collective bargaining agreement for each employee over the next 12
months; (v) any plans to hire additional employees and the costs
associated with those employees; and (vi) the ratio of full time equivalent
employees to average daily supervisory population ......................................... $92,276,918
8910-0104 For the operation of a regional section 35 program, under section 35 of
chapter 123 of the General Laws, in western Massachusetts for the
counties of Hampden, Hampshire, Worcester, Franklin and Berkshire that
provides involuntary commitment to a treatment facility for not more than
90 days of an individual who has an alcohol use disorder or a substance
use disorder; provided, that the program shall be located in Hampden
county to provide treatment, case management, medical and mental
health services, withdrawal management and ongoing monitoring,
medication addiction treatment and safety and security staffing as well as
release planning and after care services; and provided further, that
additional costs associated with said program shall include medication,
food, clothing, medical needs and psychiatric services .................................... $14,000,000
8910-1000 For the Hampden sheriff’s office, which may expend for the operation of a
prison industries program not more than $3,631,252 in revenues collected
from the sale of products for materials, supplies, equipment, maintenance
of facilities, reimbursement for community service projects and
compensation of employees of the program; provided, that not later than
March 16, 2027, the office shall submit a report to the executive office of
public safety and security, the joint committee on the judiciary, the joint
committee on public safety and homeland security and the house and
senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be
limited to: (i) a comprehensive quantitative analysis of the impact that the
program has on participating incarcerated persons as compared to non-
participating incarcerated persons, including their disciplinary record while
in custody, their recidivism rates after release and their employment rates
after release; (ii) information on the demographics of participants; (iii)
information on the customers of the program, including whether they are
a public entity, a private business or a nonprofit organization; and (iv) the
compensation rates for participants; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the office may incur expenses and the
comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of
this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system ..................................................................................... $3,631,252

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
8910-1010 For the operation of a regional behavioral evaluation and stabilization unit
to provide forensic mental health services within existing physical facilities
for incarcerated persons in the care of correctional facilities; provided, that
the unit shall be located in Hampden county to serve the needs of
incarcerated persons in the care of Berkshire, Franklin, Hampden,
Hampshire and Worcester counties; provided further, that the services of
the unit shall be made available to incarcerated persons in the care of the
department of correction; provided further, that the Hampden sheriff’s
office shall work in cooperation with the Middlesex sheriff’s office to
determine a standardized set of definitions and measurements for patients
at both regional behavioral evaluation and stabilization units; provided
further, that not later than February 16, 2027, the Hampden sheriff’s office,
in cooperation with the department of correction and the Massachusetts
Sheriffs Association, Inc., shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to,
the: (i) number of incarcerated persons in facilities located in counties that
were provided services in each unit; (ii) number of incarcerated persons in
department of correction facilities that were provided services in each unit;
(iii) alleviation of caseload at Bridgewater state hospital associated with
fewer incarcerated persons in the care of counties being attended to at the
hospital; (iv) estimated and projected cost savings in fiscal year 2027 to
the sheriffs’ offices and the department of correction associated with the
regional units; and (v) deficiencies in addressing the needs of incarcerated
women; and provided further, that the department of mental health shall
maintain the monitoring and quality review functions of the unit ........................ $1,413,224
8910-1020 For costs related to department of correction incarcerated persons with
not more than 2 years of their sentence remaining who have been
transferred to the care of the Hampden sheriff’s office .......................................... $667,690
8910-1031 For the operation of the western Massachusetts regional women’s
correctional center............................................................................................... $5,041,957
8910-1040 For the delivery of a medication-assisted treatment program in Hampden
sheriff’s office facilities across Hampden county; provided, that no funds
in this item shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided
further, that not later than November 2, 2026, the Hampden sheriff’s office
shall submit a report to the executive office for administration and finance
and the house and senate committees on ways and means that shall
include, but not be limited to: (i) the number of participants in said program;
(ii) the breakdown of dosage and type of medications administered; and
(iii) the cost breakdown of said medications….. .................................................. $2,333,907
8910-1060 For the costs of providing voice communication services, including phone
calls, and other communication services free of charge to the person
initiating and the person receiving the communication pursuant to section
87A of chapter 127 of the General Laws; provided, that no funds in this
item shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided further,
that beginning November 2, 2026, the Hampden sheriff’s office shall
submit quarterly reports to the executive office for administration and
finance and to the house and senate committees on ways and means on
documentation of communication services provided free of charge
including, but not limited to: (i) amounts expended for communication
services, delineated by facility; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of each call by
minute, delineated by facility; (iii) a breakdown of the cost of each other
communication service offered by minute, delineated by facility; (iv) the

Conference Committee Report
number of phone calls, video communications, electronic communications
and other communications services, delineated by facility; and (v) any
changes in contracts for voice communication services, including any
progress in maximizing purchasing power and consolidating contracts
between the sheriffs and the department of correction; and provided
further, that the executive office for administration and finance may require
additional documentation as deemed necessary by the secretary ........................ $538,188
Worcester Sheriff’s Office.
8910-0105 For the operation of the Worcester sheriff’s office; provided, that not later
than December 15, 2026, the office shall provide a comprehensive
inventory of all current programs and practices, in a manner to be
determined by the executive office of public safety and security, to the
executive office for administration and finance, the executive office of
public safety and security and the house and senate committees on ways
and means; provided further, that the office shall provide relevant data to
the executive office of public safety and security to allow for the reporting
of recidivism rates for all pre-trial, county sentenced and state sentenced
incarcerated persons on a quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending
September 30, 2026 and which shall be due not later than 30 days after
the last day of each quarter; provided further, that no funds in this item
shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided further, that
not later than November 2, 2026, the Worcester sheriff’s office shall submit
a report to the executive office for administration and finance and the
house and senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but
not be limited to: (i) a detailed breakdown of all programs and services
provided by the Worcester sheriff’s office in and outside of the sheriff’s
office facilities; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of providing each program and
service; (iii) information on the participants or customers of the program,
including whether they are incarcerated persons, a public entity, a private
business or a nonprofit; (iv) comprehensive quantitative analysis of the
impact that the program has on said participants, including their
disciplinary record while in custody, their recidivism rate after release and
their employment rate after release when applicable; and (v) the
compensation rates for participants; and provided further, that the office
shall provide relevant data to the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc.
to allow for the reporting of all requirements under item 8910-7110 .................. $7,407,247
8910-0106 For the AA and DD object class costs of the Worcester sheriff’s office;
provided, that staffing costs shall not be projected to exceed the amount
appropriated in this item; provided further, that not later than November 2,
2026, the Worcester sheriff’s office shall submit a report to the executive
office for administration and finance and the house and senate committees
on ways and means on the current fiscal year payroll spending projections
including, but not limited to: (i) the number of full time equivalent
employees; (ii) the current salary of each employee; (iii) the bargaining
unit of each employee; (iv) the additional costs of implementing any
collective bargaining agreement for each employee over the next 12
months; (v) any plans to hire additional employees and the costs
associated with those employees; and (vi) the ratio of full time equivalent
employees to average daily supervisory population ......................................... $55,104,159
8910-1011 For the delivery of a medication-assisted treatment program in Worcester
sheriff’s office facilities across Worcester county; provided, that no funds

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
in this item shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided
further, that not later than November 2, 2026, the Worcester sheriff’s office
shall submit a report to the executive office for administration and finance
and the house and senate committees on ways and means that shall
include, but not be limited to: (i) the number of participants in said program;
(ii) the breakdown of dosage and type of medications administered; and
(iii) the cost breakdown of said medications .......................................................... $733,951
8910-1012 For the costs of providing voice communication services, including phone
calls and other communication services free of charge to the person
initiating and the person receiving the communication pursuant to section
87A of chapter 127 of the General Laws; provided, that no funds in this
item shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided further,
that beginning November 2, 2026, the Worcester sheriff’s office shall
submit quarterly reports to the executive office for administration and
finance and to the house and senate committees on ways and means on
documentation of communication services provided free of charge
including, but not limited to: (i) amounts expended for communication
services, delineated by facility; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of each call by
minute, delineated by facility; (iii) a breakdown of the cost of each other
communication service offered by minute, delineated by facility; (iv) the
number of phone calls, video communications, electronic communications
and other communications services, delineated by facility; and (v) any
changes in contracts for voice communication services, including any
progress in maximizing purchasing power and consolidating contracts
between the sheriffs and the department of correction; and provided
further, that the executive office for administration and finance may require
additional documentation as deemed necessary by the secretary ..................... $1,562,237
Middlesex Sheriff’s Office.
8910-0107 For the operation of the Middlesex sheriff’s office; provided, that not later
than December 15, 2026, the office shall provide a comprehensive
inventory of all current programs and practices, in a manner to be
determined by the executive office of public safety and security, to the
executive office for administration and finance, the executive office of
public safety and security and the house and senate committees on ways
and means; provided further, that the office shall provide relevant data to
the executive office of public safety and security to allow for the reporting
of recidivism rates for all pre-trial, county sentenced and state sentenced
incarcerated persons on a quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending
September 30, 2026 and which shall be due not later than 30 days after
the last day of each quarter; provided further, that no funds in this item
shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided further, that
not later than November 2, 2026, the Middlesex sheriff’s office shall submit
a report to the executive office for administration and finance and the
house and senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but
not be limited to: (i) a detailed breakdown of all programs and services
provided by the Middlesex sheriff’s office in and outside of the sheriff’s
office facilities; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of providing each program and
service; (iii) information on the participants or customers of the program,
including whether they are incarcerated persons, a public entity, a private
business or a nonprofit; (iv) comprehensive quantitative analysis of the
impact that the program has on said participants, including their
disciplinary record while in custody, their recidivism rate after release and

Conference Committee Report
their employment rate after release when applicable; and (v) the
compensation rates for participants; and provided further, that the office
shall provide relevant data to the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc.
to allow for the reporting of all requirements under item 8910-7110 .................. $6,925,992
8910-0450 For the Middlesex sheriff's office, which may expend not more than
$100,000 in revenues collected from public or private entities or persons
for community programs; provided, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, for accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the
office may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment
amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent
revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system .............................. $100,000
8910-1013 For the AA and DD object class costs of the Middlesex sheriff’s office;
provided, that staffing costs shall not be projected to exceed the amount
appropriated in this item; provided further, that not later than November 2,
2026, the Middlesex sheriff’s office shall submit a report to the executive
office for administration and finance and the house and senate committees
on ways and means on the current fiscal year payroll spending projections
including, but not limited to: (i) the number of full time equivalent
employees; (ii) the current salary of each employee; (iii) the bargaining
unit of each employee; (iv) the additional costs of implementing any
collective bargaining agreement for each employee over the next 12
months; (v) any plans to hire additional employees and the costs
associated with those employees; and (vi) the ratio of full time equivalent
employees to average daily supervisory population ......................................... $72,711,719
8910-1014 For the delivery of a medication-assisted treatment program in Middlesex
sheriff’s office facilities across Middlesex county; provided, that no funds
in this item shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided
further, that not later than November 2, 2026, the Middlesex sheriff’s office
shall submit a report to the executive office for administration and finance
and the house and senate committees on ways and means that shall
include, but not be limited to: (i) the number of participants in said program;
(ii) the breakdown of dosage and type of medications administered; and
(iii) the cost breakdown of said medications…. ................................................... $1,539,813
8910-1015 For the costs of providing voice communication services, including phone
calls and other communication services free of charge to the person
initiating and the person receiving the communication pursuant to section
87A of chapter 127 of the General Laws; provided, that no funds in this
item shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided further,
that beginning November 2, 2026, the Middlesex sheriff’s office shall
submit quarterly reports to the executive office for administration and
finance and to the house and senate committees on ways and means on
documentation of communication services provided free of charge
including, but not limited to: (i) amounts expended for communication
services, delineated by facility; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of each call by
minute, delineated by facility; (iii) a breakdown of the cost of each other
communication service offered by minute, delineated by facility; (iv) the
number of phone calls, video communications, electronic communications
and other communications services, delineated by facility; and (v) any
changes in contracts for voice communication services, including any
progress in maximizing purchasing power and consolidating contracts
between the sheriffs and the department of correction; and provided

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
further, that the executive office for administration and finance may require
additional documentation as deemed necessary by the secretary .................... .$1,525,788
8910-1100 For the Middlesex sheriff’s office, which may expend for the operation of a
prison industries program not more than $75,000 in revenues collected
from the sale of products, for materials, supplies, equipment, recyclable
reimbursements, printing services, maintenance of facilities and
compensation of employees of said program; provided, that not later than
March 16, 2027, the office shall submit a report to the executive office of
public safety and security, the joint committee on the judiciary, the joint
committee on public safety and homeland security and the house and
senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be
limited to: (i) a comprehensive quantitative analysis of the impact that the
program has on participating incarcerated persons as compared to non-
participating incarcerated persons, including their disciplinary record while
in custody, their recidivism rates after release and their employment rates
after release; (ii) information on the demographics of participants; (iii)
information on the customers of the program, including whether they are
a public entity, a private business or a nonprofit organization; and (iv) the
compensation rates for participants; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the office may incur expenses and the
comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of
this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system .......................................................................................... $75,000
8910-1101 For the operation of a regional behavioral evaluation and stabilization unit
to provide forensic mental health services within existing physical facilities
for incarcerated persons in the care of correctional facilities; provided, that
the unit shall be located in Middlesex county to serve the needs of
incarcerated persons in the care of the counties of Barnstable, Bristol,
Dukes County, Essex, Nantucket, Middlesex, Norfolk, Plymouth and
Suffolk; provided further, that the services of the unit shall be made
available to incarcerated persons in the care of the department of
correction; provided further, that the Middlesex sheriff’s office shall work
in cooperation with the Hampden sheriff’s office to determine a
standardized set of definitions and measurements for patients at both
regional behavioral evaluation and stabilization units; provided further, that
not later than February 16, 2027, the Middlesex sheriff’s office, in
cooperation with the department of correction and the Massachusetts
Sheriffs Association, Inc., shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to,
the: (i) number of incarcerated persons in facilities located in counties that
were provided services in each unit; (ii) number of incarcerated persons in
department of correction facilities that were provided services in each unit;
(iii) alleviation of caseload at Bridgewater state hospital associated with
fewer incarcerated persons in the care of counties being attended to at the
hospital; and (iv) estimated and projected cost savings in fiscal year 2027
to the sheriffs’ offices and the department of correction associated with the
regional units; and provided further, that the department of mental health
shall maintain the monitoring and quality review functions of the unit ................ $1,822,285
Hampshire Sheriff’s Office.

Conference Committee Report
8910-0110 For the operation of the Hampshire sheriff’s office; provided, that not later
than December 15, 2026, the office shall provide a comprehensive
inventory of all current programs and practices, in a manner to be
determined by the executive office of public safety and security, to the
executive office for administration and finance, the executive office of
public safety and security and the house and senate committees on ways
and means; provided further, that the office shall provide relevant data to
the executive office of public safety and security to allow for the reporting
of recidivism rates for all pre-trial, county sentenced and state sentenced
incarcerated persons on a quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending
September 30, 2026 and which shall be due not later than 30 days after
the last day of each quarter; provided further, that no funds in this item
shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided further, that
not later than November 2, 2026, the Hampshire sheriff’s office shall
submit a report to the executive office for administration and finance and
the house and senate committees on ways and means that shall include,
but not be limited to: (i) a detailed breakdown of all programs and services
provided by the Hampshire sheriff’s office in and outside of the sheriff’s
office facilities; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of providing each program and
service; (iii) information on the participants or customers of the program,
including whether they are incarcerated persons, a public entity, a private
business or a nonprofit; (iv) comprehensive quantitative analysis of the
impact that the program has on said participants, including their
disciplinary record while in custody, their recidivism rate after release and
their employment rate after release when applicable; and (v) the
compensation rates for participants; and provided further, that the office
shall provide relevant data to the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc.
to allow for the reporting of all requirements under item 8910-7110 .................. $1,916,369
8910-0111 For the AA and DD object class costs of the Hampshire sheriff’s office;
provided, that staffing costs shall not be projected to exceed the amount
appropriated in this item; and provided further, that not later than
November 2, 2026, the Hampshire sheriff’s office shall submit a report to
the executive office for administration and finance and the house and
senate committees on ways and means on the current fiscal year payroll
spending projections including, but not limited to: (i) the number of full time
equivalent employees; (ii) the current salary of each employee; (iii) the
bargaining unit of each employee; (iv) the additional costs of implementing
any collective bargaining agreement for each employee over the next 12
months; (v) any plans to hire additional employees and the costs
associated with those employees; and (vi) the ratio of full time equivalent
employees to average daily supervisory population ......................................... $18,200,523
8910-0112 For the delivery of a medication-assisted treatment program in Hampshire
sheriff’s office facilities across Hampshire county; provided, that no funds
in this item shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided
further, that not later than November 2, 2026, the Hampshire sheriff’s
office shall submit a report to the executive office for administration and
finance and the house and senate committees on ways and means that
shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the number of participants in said
program; (ii) the breakdown of dosage and type of medications
administered; and (iii) the cost breakdown of said medications ............................ $222,721
8910-0113 For the costs of providing voice communication services, including phone
calls and other communication services free of charge to the person
initiating and the person receiving the communication pursuant to section

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
87A of chapter 127 of the General Laws; provided, that no funds in this
item shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided further,
that beginning November 2, 2026, the Hampshire sheriff’s office shall
submit quarterly reports to the executive office for administration and
finance and to the house and senate committees on ways and means on
documentation of communication services provided free of charge
including, but not limited to: (i) amounts expended for communication
services, delineated by facility; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of each call by
minute, delineated by facility; (iii) a breakdown of the cost of each other
communication service offered by minute, delineated by facility; (iv) the
number of phone calls, video communications, electronic communications
and other communications services, delineated by facility; and (v) any
changes in contracts for voice communication services, including any
progress in maximizing purchasing power and consolidating contracts
between the sheriffs and the department of correction; and provided
further, that the executive office for administration and finance may require
additional documentation as deemed necessary by the secretary ........................ $108,712
Berkshire Sheriff’s Office.
8910-0145 For the operation of the Berkshire sheriff’s office; provided, that not later
than December 15, 2026, the office shall provide a comprehensive
inventory of all current programs and practices, in a manner to be
determined by the executive office of public safety and security, to the
executive office for administration and finance, the executive office of
public safety and security and the house and senate committees on ways
and means; provided further, that the office shall provide relevant data to
the executive office of public safety and security to allow for the reporting
of recidivism rates for all pre-trial, county sentenced and state sentenced
incarcerated persons on a quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending
September 30, 2026 and which shall be due not later than 30 days after
the last day of each quarter; provided further, that no funds in this item
shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided further, that
not later than November 2, 2026, the Berkshire sheriff’s office shall submit
a report to the executive office for administration and finance and the
house and senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but
not be limited to: (i) a detailed breakdown of all programs and services
provided by the Berkshire sheriff’s office in and outside of the sheriff’s
office facilities; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of providing each program and
service; (iii) information on the participants or customers of the program,
including whether they are incarcerated persons, a public entity, a private
business or a nonprofit; (iv) comprehensive quantitative analysis of the
impact that the program has on said participants, including their
disciplinary record while in custody, their recidivism rate after release and
their employment rate after release when applicable; and (v) the
compensation rates for participants; provided further, that the office shall
provide relevant data to the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc. to
allow for the reporting of all requirements under item 8910-7110; and
provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall be expended for the
Berkshire county opioid education and awareness task force ............................ $2,614,088
8910-0146 For the AA and DD object class costs of the Berkshire sheriff’s office;
provided, that staffing costs shall not be projected to exceed the amount
appropriated in this item; provided further, that not later than November 2,
2026, the Berkshire sheriff’s office shall submit a report to the executive

Conference Committee Report
office for administration and finance and the house and senate committees
on ways and means on the current fiscal year payroll spending projections
including, but not limited to: (i) the number of full time equivalent
employees; (ii) the current salary of each employee; (iii) the bargaining
unit of each employee; (iv) the additional costs of implementing any
collective bargaining agreement for each employee over the next 12
months; (v) any plans to hire additional employees and the costs
associated with those employees; and (vi) the ratio of full time equivalent
employees to average daily supervisory population ......................................... $19,997,381
8910-0147 For the delivery of a medication-assisted treatment program in Berkshire
sheriff’s office facilities across Berkshire county; provided, that no funds in
this item shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided
further, that not later than November 2, 2026, the Berkshire sheriff’s office
shall submit a report to the executive office for administration and finance
and the house and senate committees on ways and means that shall
include, but not be limited to: (i) the number of participants in program; (ii)
the breakdown of dosage and type of medications administered; and (iii)
the cost breakdown of said medications ................................................................ $749,840
8910-0148 For the costs of providing voice communication services, including phone
calls and other communication services free of charge to the person
initiating and the person receiving the communication pursuant to section
87A of chapter 127 of the General Laws; provided, that no funds in this
item shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided further,
that beginning November 2, 2026, the Berkshire sheriff’s office shall
submit quarterly reports to the executive office for administration and
finance and to the house and senate committees on ways and means on
documentation of communication services provided free of charge
including, but not limited to: (i) amounts expended for communication
services, delineated by facility; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of each call by
minute, delineated by facility; (iii) a breakdown of the cost of each other
communication service offered by minute, delineated by facility; (iv) the
number of phone calls, video communications, electronic communications
and other communications services, delineated by facility; and (v) any
changes in contracts for voice communication services, including any
progress in maximizing purchasing power and consolidating contracts
between the sheriffs and the department of correction; and provided
further, that the executive office for administration and finance may require
additional documentation as deemed necessary by the secretary ........................ $429,193
8910-0155 For the operation of the Berkshire aquaponics program at the Berkshire
County house of correction .................................................................................... $150,000
8910-0445 For the Berkshire sheriff’s office, which may expend not more than
$100,000 in revenues generated from the operation of the Berkshire
county communication center’s 911 dispatch operations and other law
enforcement-related activities; provided, that notwithstanding any general
or special law to the contrary, for accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the
office may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment
amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent
revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system .............................. $100,000
8910-0760 For the Berkshire sheriff’s office, which may expend for the costs of private
police details, including administrative costs, an amount not more than

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
$1,500,000 from fees charged for such details; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or specific law to the contrary, for
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the
lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported
in the state accounting system ............................................................................ $1,500,000
Franklin Sheriff’s Office.
8910-0108 For the operation of the Franklin sheriff’s office; provided, that not later
than December 15, 2026, the office shall provide a comprehensive
inventory of all current programs and practices, in a manner to be
determined by the executive office of public safety and security, to the
executive office for administration and finance, the executive office of
public safety and security and the house and senate committees on ways
and means; provided further, that the office shall provide relevant data to
the executive office of public safety and security to allow for the reporting
of recidivism rates for all pre-trial, county sentenced and state sentenced
incarcerated persons on a quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending
September 30, 2026 and which shall be due not later than 30 days after
the last day of each quarter; provided further, that no funds in this item
shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided further, that
not later than November 2, 2026, the Franklin sheriff’s office shall submit
a report to executive office for administration and finance and the house
and senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be
limited to: (i) a detailed breakdown of all programs and services provided
by the Franklin sheriff’s office in and outside of the sheriff’s office facilities;
(ii) a breakdown of the cost of providing each program and service; (iii)
information on the participants or customers of the program, including
whether they are incarcerated persons, a public entity, a private business
or a nonprofit; (iv) comprehensive quantitative analysis of the impact that
the program has on said participants, including their disciplinary record
while in custody, their recidivism rate after release and their employment
rate after release when applicable; and (v) the compensation rates for
participants; provided further, that the office shall provide relevant data to
the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc. to allow for the reporting of
all requirements under item 8910-7110; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be provided for a pilot program for training active bystanders;
and provided further, that not less than $150,000 shall be expended for the
Franklin county opioid education and awareness task force ................................ $1,734,857
8910-1021 For the AA and DD object class costs of the Franklin sheriff’s office;
provided, that staffing costs shall not be projected to exceed the amount
appropriated in this item; provided further, that not later than November 2,
2026, the Franklin sheriff’s office shall submit a report to the executive
office for administration and finance and the house and senate committees
on ways and means on the current fiscal year payroll spending projections
including, but not limited to: (i) the number of full time equivalent
employees; (ii) the current salary of each employee; (iii) the bargaining
unit of each employee; (iv) the additional costs of implementing any
collective bargaining agreement for each employee over the next 12
months; (v) any plans to hire additional employees and the costs
associated with those employees; and (vi) the ratio of full time equivalent
employees to average daily supervisory population ......................................... $22,866,495

Conference Committee Report
8910-1022 For the delivery of a medication-assisted treatment program in Franklin
sheriff’s office facilities across Franklin county; provided, that no funds in
this item shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided
further, that not later than November 2, 2026, the Franklin sheriff’s office
shall submit a report to the executive office for administration and finance
and the house and senate committees on ways and means that shall
include, but not be limited to: (i) the number of participants in said program;
(ii) the breakdown of dosage and type of medications administered; and
(iii) the cost breakdown of said medications .......................................................... $105,932
8910-1023 For the costs of providing voice communication services, including phone
calls and other communication services free of charge to the person
initiating and the person receiving the communication pursuant to section
87A of chapter 127 of the General Laws; provided, that no funds in this
item shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided further,
that beginning November 2, 2026, the Franklin sheriff’s office shall submit
quarterly reports to the executive office for administration and finance and
to the house and senate committees on ways and means on
documentation of communication services provided free of charge
including, but not limited to: (i) amounts expended for communication
services, delineated by facility; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of each call by
minute, delineated by facility; (iii) a breakdown of the cost of each other
communication service offered by minute, delineated by facility; (iv) the
number of phone calls, video communications, electronic communications
and other communications services, delineated by facility; and (v) any
changes in contracts for voice communication services, including any
progress in maximizing purchasing power and consolidating contracts
between the sheriffs and the department of correction; and provided
further, that the executive office for administration and finance may require
additional documentation as deemed necessary by the secretary ........................ $392,076
Essex Sheriff’s Office.
8910-0618 For the Essex sheriff’s office, which may expend for the costs of private
police details, including administrative costs, an amount not more than
$1,850,000 from fees charged for those details; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the office may incur expenses and the
comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of
this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system ..................................................................................... $1,850,000
8910-0619 For the operation of the Essex sheriff’s office; provided, that not later than
December 15, 2026, the office shall provide a comprehensive inventory of
all current programs and practices, in a manner to be determined by the
executive office of public safety and security, to the executive office for
administration and finance, the executive office of public safety and
security and the house and senate committees on ways and means;
provided further, that the office shall provide relevant data to the executive
office of public safety and security to allow for the reporting of recidivism
rates for all pre-trial, county sentenced and state sentenced incarcerated
persons on a quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending September
30, 2026 and which shall be due not later than 30 days after the last day

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
of each quarter; provided further, that no funds in this item shall be
expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided further, that not later
than November 2, 2026, the Essex sheriff’s office shall submit a report to
the executive office for administration and finance and the house and
senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be
limited to: (i) a detailed breakdown of all programs and services provided
by the Essex sheriff’s office in and outside of the sheriff’s office facilities;
(ii) a breakdown of the cost of providing each program and service; (iii)
information on the participants or customers of the program, including
whether they are incarcerated persons, a public entity, a private business
or a nonprofit; (iv) comprehensive quantitative analysis of the impact that
the program has on said participants, including their disciplinary record
while in custody, their recidivism rate after release and their employment
rate after release when applicable; and (v) the compensation rates for
participants; and provided further, that the office shall provide relevant
data to the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc. to allow for the
reporting of all requirements under item 8910-7110 ......................................... $19,070,296
8910-0620 For the AA and DD object class costs of the Essex sheriff’s office;
provided, that staffing costs shall not be projected to exceed the amount
appropriated in this item; provided further, that not later than November 2,
2026, the Essex sheriffs’ office shall submit a report to the executive office
for administration and finance and the house and senate committees on
ways and means on the current fiscal year payroll spending projections
including, but not limited to: (i) the number of full time equivalent
employees; (ii) the current salary of each employee; (iii) the bargaining
unit of each employee; (iv) the additional costs of implementing any
collective bargaining agreement for each employee over the next 12
months; (v) any plans to hire additional employees and the costs
associated with those employees; and (vi) the ratio of full time equivalent
employees to average daily supervisory population ......................................... $68,990,765
8910-0621 For the delivery of a medication-assisted treatment program in Essex
sheriff’s office facilities across Essex county; provided, that no funds in this
item shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided further,
that not later than November 2, 2026, the Essex sheriff’s office shall submit
a report to the executive office for administration and finance and the
house and senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but
not be limited to: (i) the number of participants in said program; (ii) the
breakdown of dosage and type of medications administered; and (iii) the
cost breakdown of said medications ................................................................... $1,952,717
8910-0622 For the costs of providing voice communication services, including phone
calls and other communication services free of charge to the person
initiating and the person receiving the communication pursuant to section
87A of chapter 127 of the General Laws; provided, that no funds in this
item shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided further,
that beginning November 2, 2026, the Essex sheriff’s office shall submit
quarterly reports to the executive office for administration and finance and
to the house and senate committees on ways and means on
documentation of communication services provided free of charge
including, but not limited to: (i) amounts expended for communication
services, delineated by facility; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of each call by
minute, delineated by facility; (iii) a breakdown of the cost of each other
communication service offered by minute, delineated by facility; (iv) the
number of phone calls, video communications, electronic communications

Conference Committee Report
and other communications services, delineated by facility; and (v) any
changes in contracts for voice communication services, including any
progress in maximizing purchasing power and consolidating contracts
between the sheriffs and the department of correction; and provided
further, that the executive office for administration and finance may require
additional documentation as deemed necessary by the secretary…. ................ $1,552,291
Massachusetts Sheriffs Association.
8910-7110 For the operation of the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc.;
provided, that the sheriffs shall appoint persons to serve as executive
director, assistant executive director, research director and other staff
positions as necessary for the coordination and standardization of services
and programs, the collection and analysis of data related to incarceration,
recidivism and generation of reports, technical assistance and training to
ensure standardization in organization, operations and procedures;
provided further, that said staff shall not be subject to section 45 of chapter
30 of the General Laws or chapter 31 of the General Laws and shall serve
at the pleasure of a majority of the sheriffs; provided further, that not later
than January 29, 2027, the executive director of the association shall
submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and means
detailing the amounts of all grants awarded to each sheriff’s office in fiscal
year 2026; provided further, that the association shall post on its website
the average daily incarcerated persons population for the month by the
fifteenth day of the subsequent month; provided further, that not later than
August 17, 2026, the first such post shall be completed; provided further,
that each sheriff’s office, in conjunction with the association, shall provide
specific data to the executive office of public safety and security to allow
for the reporting of recidivism rates for all pre-trial, county sentenced and
state sentenced incarcerated persons on a quarterly basis beginning in
the quarter ending September 30, 2026 and shall be due not later than 30
days after the last day of each quarter; provided further, that each sheriff’s
office shall submit said report directly to the executive office for
administration and finance, the house and senate committees on ways and
means, the joint committee on public safety and homeland security, the
executive office of public safety and security, the association and the
department of correction; provided further, that not later than January 29,
2027, the association shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means detailing, for each sheriff’s office: (i) all
services and goods provided to incarcerated persons for which the
sheriff’s office receives revenue; (ii) all fees imposed on incarcerated
persons, delineated by services or goods provided; (iii) the mechanism
used to inform incarcerated persons of such fees and of their opportunities
to waive certain fees; and (iv) all commissary and trust funds administered,
including the total revenues and expenditures for fiscal year 2026, revenue
projections for fiscal years 2027 and 2028 and the current balances of
such funds; and provided further, that all expenditures made by the
sheriffs’ offices shall be subject to chapter 29 of the General Laws and
recorded on the state accounting system .............................................................. $919,337
Barnstable Sheriff’s Office.
8910-0201 For the AA and DD object class costs of the Barnstable sheriff’s office;
provided, that staffing costs shall not be projected to exceed the amount
appropriated in this item; provided further, that not later than November 2,

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
2026, the Barnstable sheriff’s office shall submit a report to the executive
office for administration and finance and the house and senate committees
on ways and means on the current fiscal year payroll spending projections
including, but not limited to: (i) the number of full time equivalent
employees; (ii) the current salary of each employee; (iii) the bargaining
unit of each employee; (iv) the additional costs of implementing any
collective bargaining agreement for each employee over the next 12
months; (v) any plans to hire additional employees and the costs
associated with those employees; and (vi) the ratio of full time equivalent
employees to average daily supervisory population ......................................... $31,462,659
8910-0202 For the delivery of a medication-assisted treatment program in Barnstable
sheriff’s office facilities across Barnstable county; provided, that no funds
in this item shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided
further, that not later than November 2, 2026, the Barnstable sheriff’s office
shall submit a report to the executive office for administration and finance
and the house and senate committees on ways and means that shall
include, but not be limited to: (i) the number of participants in said program;
(ii) the breakdown of dosage and type of medications administered; and
(iii) the cost breakdown of said medications……….. ............................................. $786,480
8910-0203 For the costs of providing voice communication services, including phone
calls and other communication services free of charge to the person
initiating and the person receiving the communication pursuant to section
87A of chapter 127 of the General Laws; provided, that no funds in this
item shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided further,
that starting on November 2, 2026, the Barnstable sheriff’s office shall
submit quarterly reports to the executive office for administration and
finance and to the house and senate committees on ways and means on
documentation of communication services provided free of charge
including, but not limited to: (i) amounts expended for communication
services, delineated by facility; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of each call by
minute, delineated by facility; (iii) a breakdown of the cost of each other
communication service offered by minute, delineated by facility; (iv) the
number of phone calls, video communications, electronic communications
and other communications services, delineated by facility; and (v) any
changes in contracts for voice communication services, including any
progress in maximizing purchasing power and consolidating contracts
between the sheriffs and the department of correction; and provided
further, that the executive office for administration and finance may require
additional documentation as deemed necessary by the secretary ........................ $567,296
8910-8200 For the operation of the Barnstable sheriff’s office; provided, that not later
than December 15, 2026, the office shall provide a comprehensive
inventory of all current programs and practices, in a manner to be
determined by the executive office of public safety and security, to the
executive office for administration and finance, the executive office of
public safety and security and the house and senate committees on ways
and means; provided further, that the office shall provide relevant data to
the executive office of public safety and security to allow for the reporting
of recidivism rates for all pre-trial, county sentenced and state sentenced
incarcerated persons on a quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending
September 30, 2026 which shall be due not later than 30 days after the
last day of each quarter; provided further, that no funds in this item shall
be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided further, that not
later than November 2, 2026 the Barnstable sheriff’s office shall submit a

Conference Committee Report
report to the executive office for administration and finance and the house
and senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be
limited to: (i) a detailed breakdown of all programs and services provided
by the Barnstable sheriff’s office in and outside of the sheriff’s office
facilities; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of providing each program and
service; (iii) information on the participants or customers of the program,
including whether they are incarcerated persons, a public entity, a private
business or a nonprofit; (iv) comprehensive quantitative analysis of the
impact that the program has on said participants, including their
disciplinary record while in custody, their recidivism rate after release and
their employment rate after release when applicable; and (v) the
compensation rates for participants; and provided further, that the office
shall provide relevant data to the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc.
to allow for the reporting of all requirements under item 8910-7110 .................. $4,801,100
8910-8213 For the Barnstable sheriff's office, which may expend not more than
$1,500,000 in revenues collected from municipalities and other entities for
regional emergency and public safety communication services to support
the operations, development, membership and maintenance of the office;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary,
for accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the office may incur expenses and the
comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of
this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system ..................................................................................... $1,500,000
Bristol Sheriff’s Office.
8910-8300 For the operation of the Bristol sheriff’s office; provided, that not later than
December 16, 2026, the office shall provide a comprehensive inventory of
all current programs and practices, in a manner to be determined by the
executive office of public safety and security, to the executive office for
administration and finance, the executive office of public safety and
security and the house and senate committees on ways and means;
provided further, that the office shall provide relevant data to the executive
office of public safety and security to allow for the reporting of recidivism
rates for all pre-trial, county sentenced and state sentenced incarcerated
persons on a quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending September
30, 2026 and which shall be due not later than 30 days after the last day
of each quarter; provided further, that no funds in this item shall be
expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided further, that not later
than November 2, 2026, the Bristol sheriff’s office shall submit a report to
the executive office for administration and finance and the house and
senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be
limited to: (i) a detailed breakdown of all programs and services provided
by the Bristol sheriff’s office in and outside of the sheriff’s office facilities;
(ii) a breakdown of the cost of providing each program and service; (iii)
information on the participants or customers of the program, including
whether they are incarcerated persons, a public entity, a private business
or a nonprofit; (iv) comprehensive quantitative analysis of the impact that
the program has on said participants, including their disciplinary record
while in custody, their recidivism rate after release and their employment
rate after release when applicable; and (v) the compensation rates for
participants; and provided further, that the office shall provide relevant

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
data to the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc. to allow for the
reporting of all requirements under item 8910-7110 ......................................... $14,186,576
8910-8301 For the AA and DD object class costs of the Bristol sheriff’s office;
provided, that staffing costs shall not be projected to exceed the amount
appropriated in this item; provided further, that not later than November 2,
2026, the Bristol sheriff’s office shall submit a report to the executive office
for administration and finance and the house and senate committees on
ways and means on the current fiscal year payroll spending projections
including, but not limited to: (i) the number of full time equivalent
employees; (ii) the current salary of each employee; (iii) the bargaining
unit of each employee; (iv) the additional costs of implementing any
collective bargaining agreement for each employee over the next 12
months; (v) any plans to hire additional employees and the costs
associated with those employees; and (vi) the ratio of full time equivalent
employees to average daily supervisory population ......................................... $47,097,864
8910-8302 For the delivery of a medication-assisted treatment program in Bristol
sheriff’s office facilities across Bristol county; provided, that no funds in
this item shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided
further, that not later than November 2, 2026, the Bristol sheriff’s office
shall submit a report to the executive office for administration and finance
and the house and senate committees on ways and means that shall
include, but not be limited to: (i) the number of participants in said program;
(ii) the breakdown of dosage and type of medications administered; and
(iii) the cost breakdown of said medications .......................................................... $549,587
8910-8303 For the costs of providing voice communication services, including phone
calls and other communication services free of charge to the person
initiating and the person receiving the communication pursuant to section
87A of chapter 127 of the General Laws; provided, that no funds in this
item shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided further,
that beginning November 2, 2026, the Bristol sheriff’s office shall submit
quarterly reports to the executive office for administration and finance and
to the house and senate committees on ways and means on
documentation of communication services provided free of charge
including, but not limited to: (i) amounts expended for communication
services, delineated by facility; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of each call by
minute, delineated by facility; (iii) a breakdown of the cost of each other
communication service offered by minute, delineated by facility; (iv) the
number of phone calls, video communications, electronic communications
and other communications services, delineated by facility; and (v) any
changes in contracts for voice communication services, including any
progress in maximizing purchasing power and consolidating contracts
between the sheriffs and the department of correction; and provided
further, that the executive office for administration and finance may require
additional documentation as deemed necessary by the secretary .................... .$1,653,987
Dukes County Sheriff’s Office.
8910-8400 For the operation of the Dukes county sheriff’s office; provided, that not
later than December 15, 2026, the office shall provide a comprehensive
inventory of all current programs and practices, in a manner to be
determined by the executive office of public safety and security, to the
executive office for administration and finance, the executive office of

Conference Committee Report
public safety and security and the house and senate committees on ways
and means; provided further, that the office shall provide relevant data to
the executive office of public safety and security to allow for the reporting
of recidivism rates for all pre-trial, county sentenced and state sentenced
incarcerated persons on a quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending
September 30, 2026 and which shall be due not later than 30 days after
the last day of each quarter; provided further, that no funds in this item
shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided further, that
not later than November 2, 2026, the Dukes county sheriff’s office shall
submit a report to the executive office for administration and finance and
the house and senate committees on ways and means that shall include,
but not be limited to: (i) a detailed breakdown of all programs and services
provided by the Dukes county sheriff’s office in and outside of the sheriff’s
office facilities; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of providing each program and
service; (iii) information on the participants or customers of the program,
including whether they are incarcerated persons, a public entity, a private
business or a nonprofit; (iv) comprehensive quantitative analysis of the
impact that the program has on said participants, including their
disciplinary record while in custody, their recidivism rate after release and
their employment rate after release when applicable; and (v) the
compensation rates for participants; and provided further, that the office
shall provide relevant data to the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc.
to allow for the reporting of all requirements under item 8910-7110 .................. $1,272,892
8910-8401 For the Dukes county sheriff's office, which may expend not more than
$300,000 in revenues collected from municipalities and other entities for
regional emergency and public safety communication services to support
the operations, development, membership and maintenance of the office;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary,
for accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the office may incur expenses and the
comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of
this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system ....................................................................................... $300,000
8910-8402 For the AA and DD object class costs of the Dukes county sheriff’s office;
provided, that staffing costs shall not be projected to exceed the amount
appropriated in this item; provided further, that not later than November 2,
2026, the Dukes county sheriff’s office shall submit a report to the
executive office for administration and finance and the house and senate
committees on ways and means on the current fiscal year payroll spending
projections including, but not limited to: (i) the number of full time
equivalent employees; (ii) the current salary of each employee; (iii) the
bargaining unit of each employee; (iv) the additional costs of implementing
any collective bargaining agreement for each employee over the next 12
months; (v) any plans to hire additional employees and the costs
associated with those employees; and (vi) the ratio of full time equivalent
employees to average daily supervisory population ........................................... $4,830,458
8910-8403 For the delivery of a medication-assisted treatment program in Dukes
county sheriff’s office facilities across Dukes county; provided, that no
funds in this item shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes;
provided further, that not later than November 2, 2026, the Dukes county
sheriff’s office shall submit a report to the executive office for
administration and finance and the house and senate committees on ways
and means that shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the number of

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
participants in said program; (ii) the breakdown of dosage and type of
medications administered; and (iii) the cost breakdown of said medications
................................................................................................................................. $50,179
8910-8404 For the costs of providing voice communication services, including phone
calls and other communication services free of charge to the person
initiating and the person receiving the communication pursuant to section
87A of chapter 127 of the General Laws; provided, that no funds in this
item shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided further,
that beginning November 2, 2026, the Dukes county sheriff’s office shall
submit quarterly reports to the executive office for administration and
finance and to the house and senate committees on ways and means on
documentation of communication services provided free of charge
including, but not limited to: (i) amounts expended for communication
services, delineated by facility; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of each call by
minute, delineated by facility; (iii) a breakdown of the cost of each other
communication service offered by minute, delineated by facility; (iv) the
number of phone calls, video communications, electronic communications
and other communications services, delineated by facility; and (v) any
changes in contracts for voice communication services, including any
progress in maximizing purchasing power and consolidating contracts
between the sheriffs and the department of correction; and provided
further, that the executive office for administration and finance may require
additional documentation as deemed necessary by the secretary .......................... $15,152
Nantucket Sheriff’s Office.
8910-8500 For the operation of the Nantucket sheriff’s office; provided, that not later
than December 15, 2026, the office shall provide a comprehensive
inventory of all current programs and practices, in a manner to be
determined by the executive office of public safety and security, to the
executive office for administration and finance, the executive office of
public safety and security and the house and senate committees on ways
and means; provided further, that the office shall provide relevant data to
the executive office of public safety and security to allow for the reporting
of recidivism rates for all pre-trial, county sentenced and state sentenced
incarcerated persons on a quarterly basis beginning the quarter ending
September 30, 2026 and shall be due not later than 30 days after the last
day of each quarter; provided further, that no funds in this item shall be
expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided further, that not later
than November 2, 2026, the Nantucket sheriff’s office shall submit a report
to the executive office for administration and finance and the house and
senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be
limited to: (i) a detailed breakdown of all programs and services provided
by the Nantucket sheriff’s office in and outside of the sheriff’s office
facilities; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of providing each program and
service; (iii) information on the participants or customers of the program,
including whether they are incarcerated persons, a public entity, a private
business or a nonprofit; (iv) comprehensive quantitative analysis of the
impact that the program has on said participants, including their
disciplinary record while in custody, their recidivism rate after release and
their employment rate after release when applicable; and (v) the
compensation rates for participants; and provided further, that the office
shall provide relevant data to the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc.
to allow for the reporting of all requirements under item 8910-7110 ..................... $442,789

Conference Committee Report
8910-8501 For the AA and DD object class costs of the Nantucket sheriff’s office;
provided, that staffing costs shall not be projected to exceed the amount
appropriated in this item; provided further, that not later than November 2,
2026, the Nantucket sheriff’s office shall submit a report to the executive
office for administration and finance and the house and senate committees
on ways and means on the current fiscal year payroll spending projections
including, but not limited to: (i) the number of full time equivalent
employees; (ii) the current salary of each employee; (iii) the bargaining
unit of each employee; (iv) the additional costs of implementing any
collective bargaining agreement for each employee over the next 12
months; (v) any plans to hire additional employees and the costs
associated with those employees; and (vi) the ratio of full time equivalent
employees to average daily supervisory population .............................................. $456,901
Norfolk Sheriff’s Office.
8910-0601 For the AA and DD object class costs of the Norfolk sheriff’s office;
provided, that staffing costs shall not be projected to exceed the amount
appropriated in this item; provided further, that not later than November 2,
2026, the Norfolk sheriffs’ office shall submit a report to the executive
office for administration and finance and the house and senate committees
on ways and means on the current fiscal year payroll spending projections
including, but not limited to: (i) the number of full time equivalent
employees; (ii) the current salary of each employee; (iii) the bargaining
unit of each employee; (iv) the additional costs of implementing any
collective bargaining agreement for each employee over the next 12
months; (v) any plans to hire additional employees and the costs
associated with those employees; and (vi) the ratio of full time equivalent
employees to average daily supervisory population ......................................... $34,407,310
8910-0602 For the delivery of a medication-assisted treatment program in Norfolk
sheriff’s office facilities across Norfolk county; provided, that no funds in
this item shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided
further, that not later than November 2, 2026, the Norfolk sheriff’s office
shall submit a report to the executive office for administration and finance
and the house and senate committees on ways and means that shall
include, but not be limited to: (i) the number of participants in said program;
(ii) the breakdown of dosage and type of medications administered; and
(iii) the cost breakdown of said medications .......................................................... $855,328
8910-0603 For the costs of providing voice communication services, including phone
calls and other communication services free of charge to the person
initiating and the person receiving the communication pursuant to section
87A of chapter 127 of the General Laws; provided, that no funds in this
item shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided further,
that beginning November 2, 2026, the Norfolk sheriff’s office shall submit
quarterly reports to the executive office for administration and finance and
to the house and senate committees on ways and means on
documentation of communication services provided free of charge
including, but not limited to: (i) amounts expended for communication
services, delineated by facility; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of each call by
minute, delineated by facility; (iii) a breakdown of the cost of each other
communication service offered by minute, delineated by facility; (iv) the
number of phone calls, video communications, electronic communications

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
and other communications services, delineated by facility; and (v) any
changes in contracts for voice communication services, including any
progress in maximizing purchasing power and consolidating contracts
between the sheriffs and the department of correction; and provided
further, that the executive office for administration and finance may require
additional documentation as deemed necessary by the secretary ........................ $784,043
8910-8600 For the operation of the Norfolk sheriff’s office; provided, that not later than
December 15, 2026, the office shall provide a comprehensive inventory of
all current programs and practices, in a manner to be determined by the
executive office of public safety and security, to the executive office for
administration and finance, the executive office of public safety and
security and the house and senate committees on ways and means;
provided further, that the office shall provide relevant data to the executive
office of public safety and security to allow for the reporting of recidivism
rates for all pre-trial, county sentenced and state sentenced incarcerated
persons on a quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending September
30, 2026 and which shall be due not later than 30 days after the last day
of each quarter; provided further, that no funds in this item shall be
expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided further, that not later
than November 2, 2026, the Norfolk sheriff’s office shall submit a report to
executive office for administration and finance and the house and senate
committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to: (i)
a detailed breakdown of all programs and services provided by the Norfolk
sheriff’s office in and outside of the sheriff’s office facilities; (ii) a
breakdown of the cost of providing each program and service; (iii)
information on the participants or customers of the program, including
whether they are incarcerated persons, a public entity, a private business
or a nonprofit; (iv) comprehensive quantitative analysis of the impact that
the program has on said participants, including their disciplinary record
while in custody, their recidivism rate after release and their employment
rate after release when applicable; and (v) the compensation rates for
participants; and provided further, that the office shall provide relevant
data to the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc. to allow for the
reporting of all requirements under item 8910-7110 ........................................... $6,720,762
8910-8629 For the Norfolk sheriff's office, which may expend not more than $55,430
in revenues collected from municipalities and other entities for regional
emergency and public safety communication services to support the
operations, development, membership and maintenance of the office;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary,
for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the
receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the office may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system ............................................................. $55,430
8910-8630 For the Norfolk sheriff's office, which may expend not more than $160,000
in revenues collected from public or private entities or persons for
community programs; provided, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, for accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the
office may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment
amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent
revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system .............................. $160,000

Conference Committee Report
Plymouth Sheriff’s Office.
8910-0701 For the AA and DD object class costs of the Plymouth sheriff’s office;
provided, that staffing costs shall not be projected to exceed the amount
appropriated in this item; provided further, that not later than November 2,
2026, the Plymouth sheriff’s office shall submit a report to the executive
office for administration and finance and the house and senate committees
on ways and means on the current fiscal year payroll spending projections
including, but not limited to: (i) the number of full time equivalent
employees; (ii) the current salary of each employee; (iii) the bargaining
unit of each employee; (iv) the additional costs of implementing any
collective bargaining agreement for each employee over the next 12
months; (v) any plans to hire additional employees and the costs
associated with those employees; and (vi) the ratio of full time equivalent
employees to average daily supervisory population ......................................... $77,163,818
8910-8702 For the delivery of a medication-assisted treatment program in Plymouth
sheriff’s office facilities across Plymouth county; provided, that no funds in
this item shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided
further, that not later than November 2, 2026, the Plymouth sheriff’s office
shall submit a report to the executive office for administration and finance
and the house and senate committees on ways and means that shall
include, but not be limited to: (i) the number of participants in said program;
(ii) the breakdown of dosage and type of medications administered; and
(iii) the cost breakdown of said medications ....................................................... $1,493,412
8910-0703 For the costs of providing voice communication services, including phone
calls and other communication services free of charge to the person
initiating and the person receiving the communication pursuant to section
87A of chapter 127 of the General Laws; provided, that no funds in this
item shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided further,
that beginning November 2, 2026, the Plymouth sheriff’s office shall
submit quarterly reports to the executive office for administration and
finance and to the house and senate committees on ways and means on
documentation of communication services provided free of charge
including, but not limited to: (i) amounts expended for communication
services, delineated by facility; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of each call by
minute, delineated by facility; (iii) a breakdown of the cost of each other
communication service offered by minute, delineated by facility; (iv) the
number of phone calls, video communications, electronic communications
and other communications services, delineated by facility; and (v) any
changes in contracts for voice communication services, including any
progress in maximizing purchasing power and consolidating contracts
between the sheriffs and the department of correction; and provided
further, that the executive office for administration and finance may require
additional documentation as deemed necessary by the secretary ..................... $1,199,999
8910-8700 For the operation of the Plymouth sheriff’s office; provided, that not later
than December 15, 2026, the office shall provide a comprehensive
inventory of all current programs and practices, in a manner to be
determined by the executive office of public safety and security, to the
executive office for administration and finance, the executive office of
public safety and security and the house and senate committees on ways
and means; provided further, that the office shall provide relevant data to
the executive office of public safety and security to allow for the reporting

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
of recidivism rates for all pre-trial, county sentenced and state sentenced
incarcerated persons on a quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending
September 30, 2026 and which shall be due not later than 30 days after
the last day of each quarter; provided further, that no funds in this item
shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided further, that
not later than November 2, 2026, the Plymouth sheriff’s office shall submit
a report to the executive office for administration and finance and the
house and senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but
not be limited to: (i) a detailed breakdown of all programs and services
provided by the Plymouth sheriff’s office in and outside of the sheriff’s
office facilities; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of providing each program and
service; (iii) information on the participants or customers of the program,
including whether they are incarcerated persons, a public entity, a private
business or a nonprofit; (iv) comprehensive quantitative analysis of the
impact that the program has on said participants, including their
disciplinary record while in custody, their recidivism rate after release and
their employment rate after release when applicable; and (v) the
compensation rates for participants; and provided further, that the office
shall provide relevant data to the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc.
to allow for the reporting of all requirements under item 8910-7110 .................. $2,727,801
8910-8718 For the Plymouth sheriff's office, which may expend not more than
$300,000 in revenues collected from municipalities and other entities for
regional emergency and public safety communication services to support
the operations, development, membership and maintenance of the office;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary,
for accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the office may incur expenses and the
comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of
this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system ........................................................................................ $300,000
Suffolk Sheriff’s Office.
8910-8800 For the operation of the Suffolk sheriff’s office; provided, that not later than
December 15, 2026, the office shall provide a comprehensive inventory of
all current programs and practices, in a manner to be determined by the
executive office of public safety and security, to the executive office for
administration and finance, the executive office of public safety and
security and the house and senate committees on ways and means;
provided further, that the office shall provide relevant data to the executive
office of public safety and security to allow for the reporting of recidivism
rates for all pre-trial, county sentenced and state sentenced incarcerated
persons on a quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending September
30, 2026 and shall be due not later than 30 days after the last day of each
quarter; provided further, that no funds in this item shall be expended from
the AA or DD object classes; provided further, that not later than
November 2, 2026, the Suffolk sheriff’s office shall submit a report to the
executive office for administration and finance and the house and senate
committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to: (i)
a detailed breakdown of all programs and services provided by the Suffolk
sheriff’s office in and outside of the sheriff’s office facilities; (ii) a
breakdown of the cost of providing each program and service; (iii)
information on the participants or customers of the program, including
whether they are incarcerated persons, a public entity, a private business

Conference Committee Report
or a nonprofit; (iv) comprehensive quantitative analysis of the impact that
the program has on said participants, including their disciplinary record
while in custody, their recidivism rate after release and their employment
rate after release when applicable; and (v) the compensation rates for
participants; and provided further, that the office shall provide relevant
data to the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc. to allow for the
reporting of all requirements under item 8910-7110 ......................................... $14,827,915
8910-8801 For a 3-year pilot program in the Suffolk sheriff’s office to enhance current
employee assistance programs for correctional officers to promote a work
culture focused on vocational, mental and physical wellness; provided,
that the pilot program shall include, but not be limited to; (i) robust training
for employee assistance programs and peer support teams; (ii) increasing
administrative support and supervision for employee assistance
programs; (iii) strengthening referral pathways to professional behavioral
health programs; and (iv) promoting greater services available for
correction officers; and provided further, that not later than March 15,
2027, the office shall submit a report to the house and senate committees
on ways and means on the program’s impact on correctional officers’
mental health, wellness and engagement in services, as well as work-
related outcomes, including the impacts on the incarcerated ............................. $2,000,000
8910-8802 For the AA and DD object class costs of the Suffolk sheriff’s office;
provided, that staffing costs shall not be projected to exceed the amount
appropriated in this item; provided further, that not later than November 2,
2026, the Suffolk sheriff’s office shall submit a report to the executive office
for administration and finance and the house and senate committees on
ways and means on the current fiscal year payroll spending projections
including, but not limited to: (i) the number of full time equivalent
employees; (ii) the current salary of each employee; (iii) the bargaining
unit of each employee; (iv) the additional costs of implementing any
collective bargaining agreement for each employee over the next 12
months; (v) any plans to hire additional employees and the costs
associated with those employees; and (vi) the ratio of full time equivalent
employees to average daily supervisory population ....................................... $115,043,090
8910-8803 For the delivery of a medication-assisted treatment program in Suffolk
sheriff’s office facilities across Suffolk county; provided, that no funds in
this item shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided
further, that not later than November 2, 2026, the Suffolk sheriff’s office
shall submit a report to the executive office for administration and finance
and the house and senate committees on ways and means that shall
include, but not be limited to: (i) the number of participants in said program;
(ii) the breakdown of dosage and type of medications administered; and
(iii) the cost breakdown of said medications ....................................................... $2,904,064
8910-8804 For the costs of providing voice communication services, including phone
calls and other communication services free of charge to the person
initiating and the person receiving the communication pursuant to section
87A of chapter 127 of the General Laws; provided, that no funds in this
item shall be expended from the AA or DD object classes; provided further,
that beginning November 2, 2026, the Suffolk sheriff’s office shall submit
quarterly reports to the executive office for administration and finance and
to the house and senate committees on ways and means on
documentation of communication services provided free of charge
including, but not limited to: (i) amounts expended for communication

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
services, delineated by facility; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of each call by
minute, delineated by facility; (iii) a breakdown of the cost of each other
communication service offered by minute, delineated by facility; (iv) the
number of phone calls, video communications, electronic communications
and other communications services, delineated by facility; and (v) any
changes in contracts for voice communication services, including any
progress in maximizing purchasing power and consolidating contracts
between the sheriffs and the department of correction; and provided
further, that the executive office for administration and finance may require
additional documentation as deemed necessary by the secretary….. ............... $2,191,927
8910-8900 For the Suffolk sheriff's office, which may expend for the operation of the
Suffolk county regional lockup not more than $1,800,000 in revenues
collected; provided, that the office shall enter into agreements to provide
detention services to various law enforcement agencies and municipalities
and shall determine and collect fees for such detentions from the law
enforcement agencies and municipalities; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the office may incur expenses and the
comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of
this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system ..................................................................................... $1,800,000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF AGING AND INDEPENDENCE.
Office of the Secretary.
9110-0100 For the operation of the executive office of aging and independence and
the regulation of assisted living facilities; provided, that the secretary of
aging and independence may transfer funds between items 9110-1630
and 9110-0600; provided further, that not less than $500,000 shall be
expended for the implementation of recommendations of the assisted
living residences commission established in section 32 of chapter 197 of
the acts of 2024 and to improve safety standards, emergency
preparedness and oversight of assisted living residences across the
commonwealth; and provided further, that not less than $120,000 shall be
expended to Fenway Health for staffing and operations for the
Massachusetts Commission on LGBTQ Aging established under section
71 of chapter 3 of the General Laws ................................................................. $19,627,751
9110-0600 For health care services provided to MassHealth members who are older
adults eligible for community-based waiver services; provided, that funds
may be expended from this item for health care services provided to
recipients in prior fiscal years; provided further, that subject to the assessed
needs of consumers or the terms of the waiver, the funding for benefits of
community-based waiver services shall not be reduced below the level of
services provided in fiscal year 2026; provided further, that the eligibility
requirements for this program shall not be more restrictive than those
established in fiscal year 2026; and provided further, that funds from this
item may be expended for the clinical assessment and eligibility program
and the comprehensive service and screening model program ....................... $505,421,502
9110-1455 For the costs of the subsidized catastrophic prescription drug insurance
program under section 39 of chapter 19A of the General Laws and for the

Conference Committee Report
operation of the prescription advantage program; provided, that funds shall
be expended for the operation of the pharmacy outreach program under
section 4C of said chapter 19A; provided further, that the executive office
of aging and independence shall allow those who meet the program
eligibility criteria to enroll in the program at any time during the year;
provided further, that the executive office shall take steps for the
coordination of benefits with the Medicare prescription drug benefit
created under the Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and
Modernization Act of 2003, Public Law 108-173, as amended, to ensure
that residents of the commonwealth take advantage of this benefit;
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary or unless otherwise prohibited by state or federal law, prescription
drug coverage or benefits payable by the executive office and the entities
with which it has contracted for administration of the subsidized
catastrophic prescription drug insurance program under said section 39 of
said chapter 19A shall be the payer of last resort for this program for
eligible persons with regard to any other third-party prescription drug
coverage or benefits available to eligible persons; provided further, that
amounts received by the executive office’s vendor as premium revenue
for this program may be retained and expended by the vendor for the
program; provided further, that the executive office shall seek to obtain
maximum federal funding for discounts on prescription drugs available to
the executive office and to prescription advantage enrollees; provided
further, that not less than 90 days before any action to limit or cap the
number of enrollees in the program, the executive office shall notify the
house and senate committees on ways and means; provided further, that
not less than 30 days before any coverage or benefits expansions, the
executive office shall notify the house and senate committees on ways and
means; provided further, that funds shall be expended from this item to
implement the pre-admission counseling and assessment program
established in the fourth paragraph of section 9 of chapter 118E of the
General Laws, which shall be implemented on a statewide basis through
the Aging and Disability Resource Consortia; and provided further, that not
less than $2,000,000 shall be expended for the Serving the Health
Insurance Needs of Everyone, or SHINE, program, administered by the
executive office in partnership with local community-based organizations
including, but not limited to, councils on aging, aging service access points
and others, in order to support the operational costs incurred by these
programs ............................................................................................................. $6,630,889
9110-1604 For the operation of the supportive senior housing program at state or
federally-assisted housing sites; provided, that for fiscal year 2027 the
executive office shall maintain the same number of sites as in fiscal year
2026; provided further, that the secretary of aging and independence may
transfer funds from 9110-1660 to this item; and provided further, that not
less than $200,000 shall be expended to Hearth, Inc. for facility upgrades
and other improvements ................................................................................... $12,582,272
9110-1630 For the operation of the elder home care program, including contracts with
aging service access points or other qualified entities for the home care
program, home care, health aides, homemaker, personal care, supportive
home care aides, home health and respite services, geriatric behavioral
health services and other services provided to older adults; provided, that
sliding-scale fees shall be charged to qualified older adults; provided
further, that the secretary of aging and independence may waive collection
of sliding-scale fees in cases of extreme financial hardship; provided

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
further, that not more than $16,000,000 in revenues accrued from sliding-
scale fees shall be retained by the individual home care organizations
without reallocation by the executive office of aging and independence and
shall be expended for the home care program, consistent with guidelines
to be issued by the executive office; provided further, that no rate increase
shall be awarded in fiscal year 2027 that would cause a reduction in client
services or the number of clients served; provided further, that no funds
shall be expended from this item to pay for salary increases for direct
service workers who provide state-funded homemaker and home health
aide services that would cause a reduction in client services; provided
further, that funding shall be expended for a contract with the LGBTQIA+
Aging Project for provider training including, but not limited to, home care
and home health providers, councils on aging, skilled nursing facilities and
adult day health programs and outreach to gay, lesbian, bisexual,
transgender, queer and questioning older adults and to caregivers;
provided further, that funds shall be expended for the Community
Transition Liaison Program; provided further, that the secretary may
transfer not more than 3 per cent of the funds appropriated in this item to
item 9110-1633 for case management services and the administration of
the home care program; provided further, that the secretary shall expend
not less than $1,400,000 between this item and item 9110-1633 on
recipients of the home care over-income cost-sharing program; and
provided further, that not less than $300,000 shall be expended for the
Alzheimer's Disease and Related Disorders Association,
Massachusetts/New Hampshire Chapter Inc. to administer an evidence-
based dementia care coordination program in order to reduce
hospitalizations and emergency department visits and to delay long-term
care placements .............................................................................................. $299,288,931
9110-1633 For the operation of the elder home care case management program,
including contracts with aging service access points or other qualified
entities for home care case management services and the administration
of the home care organizations funded through item 9110-1630; provided,
that the contracts shall include the costs of administrative personnel, home
care case managers, travel, rent and other costs deemed appropriate by
the executive office of aging and independence; and provided further, that
the secretary of aging and independence may transfer an amount not
more than 3 per cent of the funds appropriated in this item to said item
9110-1630 ....................................................................................................... $113,325,426
9110-1636 For the elder protective services program including, but not limited to,
protective services case management, guardianship services, the
statewide elder abuse hotline, money management services and the elder-
at-risk program .................................................................................................. $51,596,156
9110-1637 For a grant program administered by the secretary of aging and
independence that focuses on advanced skill training for the home care
aide workforce that serves consumers of the elder home care program
administered by the executive office of aging and independence; provided,
that not later than March 3, 2027, the executive office of aging and
independence shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means detailing: (i) the number of students currently enrolled in
the online training program, outreach measures to encourage enrollment;
(ii) the cost of the course to students, the number of students who have
completed the course; and (iii) the number of former students currently
working as home care aides in the commonwealth ......................................... $1,183,570

Conference Committee Report
9110-1640 For the geriatric mental health program, including outreach, counseling,
resource management and system navigation for community-dwelling
older adults with mental health needs................................................................. $2,455,303
9110-1660 For congregate and shared housing services, including naturally occurring
retirement communities for older adults and the long-term care
ombudsman program to include assisted living residences; provided, that
not less than $856,000 shall be expended for providers of naturally
occurring retirement communities with whom the executive office of aging
and independence entered into service agreements in fiscal year 2026 and
shall maintain at proportions of total available funding equal to those
provided in fiscal year 2026 ................................................................................ $2,575,158
9110-1700 For assessment, placement and homelessness prevention services for
homeless and at-risk older adults .......................................................................... $286,000
9110-1900 For the elder nutrition program; provided, that not less than $750,000 shall
be expended for the Meals on Wheels Program for older adults; and
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended for the
senior farm share program ................................................................................ $14,010,963
9110-9002 For grants to the councils on aging and for grants to or contracts with
nonpublic entities that are consortia or associations of councils on aging;
provided, that the formula grant portion of this item shall be $16 per elder;
provided further, that notwithstanding the preceding proviso, all funds
appropriated in this item shall be expended under the distribution
schedules for formula and incentive grants established by the secretary of
aging and independence; provided further, that not later than February 5,
2027, the distribution schedules shall be submitted to the house and
senate committees on ways and means; provided further, that not less
than $5,000 shall be expended to the Fall River council on aging for
community-based activities; provided further, that not less than $25,000
shall be expended to the Wenham senior center for renovations and
upgrades; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
to the Chelsea senior center for their food delivery service; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Milano Senior
Center for exterior improvements; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to Island Elderly Housing, Inc. for emergency
preparedness; provided further, that not less than $60,000 shall be
expended to the Yarmouth senior center for a roof replacement and HVAC
stabilization; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the Methuen senior activity center for operational costs and
event planning; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be
expended to Parkway in Motion, Inc. for programming in Boston’s
southwest neighborhoods; provided further, that not less than $20,000
shall be expended to the Pepperell council on aging for new furniture in
the Albert Harris Center meeting spaces; provided further, that not less
than $10,000 shall be expended to the Williamstown council on aging;
provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to the
Cheshire council on aging; provided further, that not less than $7,500 shall
be expended to the Florida council on aging; provided further, that not less
than $10,000 shall be expended to the Adams council on aging; provided
further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the Whipple
Senior Center for costs associated with care, services, programs and
facilities; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to
the Westford council on aging to support van service costs; provided

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Chelmsford
council on aging for nutrition services; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be expended to OutstandingLife, Inc. for the operation of a
statewide virtual senior center for LGBTQIA+ older adults; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the city of Gardner
for upgrades at the senior center; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the town of Rutland for upgrades at the
senior center; provided further, that not less than $45,000 shall be
expended to the council on aging in the town of Abington for purposes
including, but not limited to, programming and services; provided further,
that not less than $30,000 shall be expended to the council on aging in the
town of Hanover for purposes including, but not limited to, food
programming and services; provided further, that not less than $10,000
shall be expended to the council on aging in the town of Holbrook for
purposes including, but not limited to, programming and services; provided
further, that not less than $54,000 shall be expended to the department of
elder services in the city of Quincy for purposes including, but not limited
to, programming and services; provided further, that not less than $20,000
shall be expended to the town of Rockland for purposes including, but not
limited to, restoration of the pickleball court at the Rockland council on
aging; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to
the city known as the town of Bridgewater for renovations and replacement
of the parking lot at the Cole-Yeaton senior center; provided further, that
not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Reading council on aging
for the purchase of a van that complies with the federal Americans with
Disabilities Act; provided further, that not less than $80,000 shall be
expended to the department of elder affairs in the city known as the town
of Braintree; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to the Halifax council on aging for staffing and general
operations; provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended
to the East Bridgewater council on aging for its grab and go program;
provided further, that not less than $30,000 shall be expended to the
council on aging in the town of Whitman for general operations; provided
further, that not less than $48,000 shall be expended to the Holliston
council on aging for accessibility upgrades to comply with the federal
Americans with Disabilities Act; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the Holliston council on aging to support
counseling costs; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to the Hopkinton senior center for the replacement of kitchen
appliances; and provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to the Hopkinton senior center for the installation of an exterior
door in the dining room .................................................................................... $31,042,092
LEGISLATURE.
Senate.
9500-0000 For the operation of the senate; provided, that not less than $100,000 shall
be expended for a fellowship pipeline program in the senate, which shall
seek to promote inclusive and diverse participation and exposure to long-
term employment opportunities in the public service sector for traditionally
underserved populations; and provided further, that not less than
$200,000 shall be expended for the purposes of the Senate Artistic
Upgrade and Representation Fund established in section 65 of chapter 3
of the General Laws .......................................................................................... $33,034,830

Conference Committee Report
House of Representatives.
9600-0000 For the operation of the house of representatives ............................................ $61,200,000
9610-0000 For expenses incurred by the house of representatives related to
redistricting ............................................................................................................. $750,000
Joint Legislative Expenses.
9700-0000 For the joint operations of the legislature .......................................................... $10,724,566
SECTION 2B.
SECTION 2B. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the agencies listed in this section
may expend the amounts listed in this section for the provision of services to agencies listed in section 2.
All expenditures made under this section shall be accompanied by a corresponding transfer of funds from
an account listed in said section 2 to the Intragovernmental Service Fund established in section 2Q of
chapter 29 of the General Laws. All revenues and other inflows shall be based on rates published by the
seller agency that are developed in accordance with cost principles established by the United States Office
of Management and Budget Circular A-87, Cost Principles for State, Local and Indian Tribal Governments.
All rates shall be published within 30 days after the effective date of this section. No expenditures shall be
made from the Intragovernmental Service Fund which would cause that fund to be in deficit at the close of
fiscal year 2027. All authorizations in this section shall be charged to the Intragovernmental Service Fund
and shall not be subject to section 5D of said chapter 29. Any balance remaining in that fund at the close
of fiscal year 2027 shall be transferred to the General Fund.
SECRETARY OF THE COMMONWEALTH.
0511-0003 For the costs of providing electronic and other publications purchased from
the state bookstore, for commission fees, notary fees and for direct access
to the secretary’s computer library ........................................................................... $16,000
TREASURER AND RECEIVER GENERAL.
0699-0018 For the cost of debt service for the clean energy investment program and
other projects or programs for which an agency has committed to fund the
associated debt service; provided, that the state treasurer may charge
other appropriations and federal grants for the cost of the debt service .......... $32,853,995
OFFICE OF THE COMPTROLLER.
1000-0005 For the cost of the single state audit for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2027; provided, that the comptroller may charge other appropriations and
federal grants for the cost of the audit ................................................................ $2,000,000
1000-0008 For the costs of operating and managing the statewide enterprise
accounting and financial reporting system for fiscal year 2027; provided,
that any unspent balance at the close of fiscal year 2027 in an amount not
to exceed 5 per cent of the amount authorized shall remain in the
Intergovernmental Service Fund and is hereby re-authorized for
expenditures for such item in fiscal year 2028 .................................................. $10,834,246

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
1000-0601 For the office of the comptroller which may, on behalf of the office, the
human resources division and the executive office of technology services
and security, charge and collect from participating state agencies a fee
sufficient to cover administrative costs and expend such fees for goods
and services rendered in the administration of the human resources
compensation management program ................................................................. $2,442,905
EXECUTIVE OFFICE FOR ADMINISTRATION AND FINANCE.
Office of the Secretary.
1100-1701 For the cost of information technology services provided to agencies of the
executive office for administration and finance ................................................. $34,584,188
Division of Capital Asset Management and Maintenance.
1102-3224 For the costs for the Leverett Saltonstall building lease and occupancy
payments, as provided in chapter 237 of the acts of 2000 ............................... $16,203,972
1102-3226 For the operation and maintenance of state buildings; provided, that the
division of capital asset management and maintenance may also charge
for reimbursement for overtime expenses, materials and contract services
purchased in performing renovations, mail and related services for
agencies occupying state buildings or for services rendered to approved
entities using state facilities ................................................................................ $9,425,000
Reserves.
1599-2040 For the payment of prior year deficiencies based upon schedules provided
to the executive office for administration and finance and the house and
senate committees on ways and means; provided, that notwithstanding
any general or special law to the contrary, the comptroller may certify
payments on behalf of departments for certain contracted goods or
services rendered in prior fiscal years for which certain laws, regulations
or procedures were not properly followed; provided further, that the
department that was a party to the transaction shall certify in writing that
the services were performed or goods delivered and shall provide
additional information that the comptroller may require; provided further,
that the comptroller may charge departments’ current fiscal year
appropriations and transfer to this item amounts equivalent to the amounts
of any prior year deficiency, subject to the conditions stated in this item;
provided further, that the comptroller shall assess a chargeback to that
current fiscal year appropriation that is for the same purpose as that to
which the prior year deficiency pertains or, if there is no appropriation for
that purpose, to that current fiscal year appropriation which is most similar
in purpose to the appropriation to which the prior year deficiency pertains
or is for the general administration of the department that administered the
appropriation to which the prior year deficiency pertains; provided further,
that no chargeback shall be made which would cause a deficiency in any
current fiscal year item; provided further, that the comptroller shall report
with such schedule a detailed reason for the prior year deficiency on all
chargebacks assessed that exceed $10,000 including the amount of the
chargeback, the item and object class charged; provided further, that the
comptroller shall report on a quarterly basis on all chargebacks assessed,

Conference Committee Report
including the amount of the chargeback, the item, object class charged
and the reason for the prior year deficiency; and provided further, that the
comptroller shall include in the schedules the amount of each prior year
deficiency paid, the fiscal year and appropriation to which it pertained, the
current fiscal year appropriation and object class to which it was charged
and the department's explanation for the failure to make payment in a
timely manner…….. .......................................................................................... $50,000,000
1599-3100 For the cost of the commonwealth’s employer contributions to the
Unemployment Compensation Fund and the Medical Security Trust Fund
established in section 48 of chapter 151A of the General Laws; provided,
that the secretary of administration and finance shall authorize the
collection, accounting and payment of these contributions; and provided
further, that in executing these responsibilities, the comptroller may
charge, in addition to individual appropriation accounts, certain non-
appropriated funds in amounts that are computed based on rates
developed in accordance with the Office of Management and Budget
circular A-87, including expenses, interest expense or related charges .......... $38,000,000
1599-3101 For the cost of the commonwealth's employer contributions to the Family
and Employment Security Trust Fund established in section 7 of chapter
175M of the General Laws; provided, that the secretary of administration
and finance shall authorize the collection, accounting and payment of
these contributions; and provided further, that in executing these
responsibilities the comptroller may charge, in addition to individual
appropriation accounts, certain non-appropriated funds in amounts that
are computed based on rates developed in accordance with the Office of
Management and Budget circular A-87, including expenses, interest
expense and related charges ............................................................................ $50,000,000
Human Resources Division.
1750-0101 For the cost of goods and services rendered in administering training
programs, including the cost of training unit staff; provided, that the human
resources division shall charge to other items for the cost of participants
enrolled in programs sponsored by the division or to state agencies
employing such participants; provided further, that the division may collect
from participating state agencies a fee sufficient to cover administrative
costs of the commonwealth’s performance recognition programs and to
expend such fees for goods and services rendered in the administration
of these programs; provided further, that the division may charge and
collect from participating state agencies a fee sufficient to cover
administrative costs and expend such fees for goods and services
rendered in the administration of information technology services related
to the human resources compensation management system program; and
provided further, that the division may charge and collect from participating
state agencies fees sufficient to cover the costs of shared services ..................... $367,343
1750-0105 For the cost of the commonwealth's workers’ compensation program,
including the workers' compensation litigation unit; provided, that the
secretary of administration and finance shall charge state agencies for
workers’ compensation costs, including related administrative expenses,
incurred on behalf of the employees of those agencies; provided further,
that the personnel administrator shall administer those charges on behalf
of the secretary and may establish regulations considered necessary to

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
implement this item; provided further, that the personnel administrator
shall notify agencies regarding the chargeback methodology to be used in
fiscal year 2027 and the amount of their estimated workers’ compensation
charges and shall require agencies to encumber sufficient funds to meet
the estimated charges, including any additional amounts as necessary
under the regulations; provided further, that for any agency that fails within
60 days of the effective date of this act to encumber funds sufficient to
meet the estimated charges, the comptroller shall encumber funds on
behalf of that agency; provided further, that the personnel administrator
shall: (i) determine the amount of the actual workers’ compensation costs
incurred by each agency in the preceding month, including related
administrative expenses; (ii) notify each agency of those amounts; (iii)
charge those amounts to each agency's accounts as estimates of the
costs to be incurred in the current month; and (iv) transfer those amounts
to this item; provided further, that any unspent balance in this item at the
close of fiscal year 2027 shall be re-authorized for expenditure in fiscal
year 2028; and provided further, that prior year costs for hospital,
physician, benefit and other costs may be funded from this item. .................... $66,137,011
1750-0106 For the workers’ compensation litigation unit, including the costs of
personnel ............................................................................................................ $1,066,574
1750-0600 For the cost of core human resources administrative processing functions
for all executive departments including, but not limited to, time and
attendance and benefits ...................................................................................... $3,476,919
Operational Services Division.
1775-0800 For the purchase, operation and repair of vehicles and for the cost of
operating and maintaining all vehicles that are leased by other agencies,
including the costs of personnel; provided, that any unspent balance at the
close of fiscal year 2027 shall remain in the Intragovernmental Service
Fund and may be expended for that item in fiscal year 2028 ............................. $8,201,002
1775-1000 For the provision of printing, photocopying, mailing and related graphic art
or design work, including all necessary incidental expenses and
liabilities….. ....................................................................................................... $11,281,431
EXECUTIVE OFFICE FOR VETERANS’ SERVICES.
Office of the Secretary.
1410-0110 For the cost of central services provided to agencies of the executive office
of veterans’ services ........................................................................................... $5,000,000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF TECHNOLOGY SERVICES AND SECURITY.
1790-0200 For the cost of computer resources and services provided by the executive
office of technology services and security; provided, that any unspent
balance at the close of fiscal year 2027 shall remain in the
Intragovernmental Service Fund and may be expended for the item in
fiscal year 2028 ............................................................................................... $210,624,447

Conference Committee Report
1790-0201 For the costs of any information technology or telecommunications
product, service or equipment incurred by the executive office of
technology services and security in delivering necessary information
technology and telecommunications services and products to its
customers, but not including any administrative costs; provided, that any
unspent balance at the close of fiscal year 2027 shall remain in the
Intragovernmental Service Fund and may be expended for the item in
fiscal year 2028 ................................................................................................. $40,000,000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENTAL AFFAIRS.
Office of the Secretary.
2000-1701 For the cost of information technology services provided to agencies of the
executive office of energy and environmental affairs .......................................... $6,620,837
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES.
Office of the Secretary.
4000-0102 For the cost of transportation services for health and human services
clients and the operation of the health and human services transportation
office .................................................................................................................. $20,334,806
4000-0103 For the costs of core administrative functions performed within the
executive office of health and human services; provided, that the secretary
of health and human services, notwithstanding any general or special law
to the contrary, may identify administrative activities and functions
common to the separate agencies, departments, offices, divisions and
commissions within the executive office and may designate those
functions as core administrative functions in order to improve
administrative efficiency and preserve fiscal resources; provided further,
that common functions may be designated core administrative functions
including, but not limited to, human resources, financial management,
leasing and facility management; provided further, that all employees
performing functions so designated may be employed by the executive
office; provided further, that upon the designation of a function as a core
administrative function, the employees of each agency, department, office
or commission who perform these core administrative functions may be
transferred to the executive office of health and human services; provided
further, that the executive office shall charge the agencies, departments,
offices, divisions and commissions for the services under this item; provided
further, that the reorganization shall not impair the civil service status of
any transferred employee who immediately before the effective date of this
act either holds a permanent appointment in a position classified under
chapter 31 of the General Laws or has tenure in a position by reason of
section 9A of chapter 30 of the General Laws; and provided further, that
nothing in this item shall impair or change an employee’s status, rights or
benefits under chapter 150E of the General Laws ........................................... $49,496,475
4000-1701 For the cost of information technology services provided to agencies of the
executive office of health and human services ................................................. $73,868,754

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
Massachusetts Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing.
4125-0122 For the costs of interpreter services provided by commission staff;
provided, that the costs of personnel may be charged to this item; and
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between
the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the commission
may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts
not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system… ......................................... $450,000
4125-0124 For the costs of contracted communication access services incurred by
the commission for the deaf and hard of hearing to deliver necessary
communication access services to commonwealth agencies, but not
including any administrative costs; provided, that any unspent balance at
the close of fiscal year 2027 shall remain in the Intragovernmental Service
Fund and may be expended for the item in fiscal year 2028 .............................. $6,000,000
Department of Public Health.
4510-0108 For the costs of pharmaceutical drugs and services provided by the state
office for pharmacy services; provided, that the state office shall notify all
agencies listed below of their obligations under this item by December 30,
2026; provided further, that the state office shall continue to be the sole
provider of pharmacy services for the following agencies currently under
the state office: (i) the department of public health; (ii) the department of
mental health; (iii) the department of developmental services; (iv) the
department of correction; (v) the sheriffs’ offices of Barnstable, Berkshire,
Bristol, Essex, Franklin, Hampden, Hampshire, Middlesex, Norfolk and
Plymouth; and (vi) the Soldiers’ Homes in the cities of Holyoke and
Chelsea; provided further, that the state office shall be the sole provider of
pharmacy services for all said agencies and all costs for pharmacy
services shall be charged by this item; provided further, that the state office
shall become the sole provider of pharmacy services to the sheriffs’ offices
of Worcester and Suffolk; provided further, that these agencies shall not
charge or contract with any other alternative vendor for pharmacy services
other than the state office; provided further, that the state office shall
validate previously-submitted pharmacy expenditures including HIV Drug
Assistance Program drug reimbursements during fiscal year 2027;
provided further, that the state office shall continue to work to reduce
medication costs, provide standardized policies and procedures in a
clinically responsible manner, provide comprehensive data analysis and
improve the quality of clinical services; and provided further, that not later
than April 16, 2027, the state office shall submit a report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means detailing recommendations for the
inclusion of other entities that may realize cost savings by joining the state
office .................................................................................................................. $75,955,529
4590-0901 For the costs of medical services provided at department of public health
hospitals and charged to other state agencies ...................................................... $163,909
4590-0903 For the costs of medical services provided at the department of public
health Lemuel Shattuck hospital to incarcerated persons in the care of
houses of correction; provided, that the costs shall be charged to items
8910-0102, 8910-0105, 8910-0107, 8910-0108, 8910-0110, 8910-0145,

Conference Committee Report
8910-0619, 8910-8200, 8910-8300, 8910-8400, 8910-8500, 8910-8600,
8910-8700 and 8910-8800 of section 2 .............................................................. $3,180,269
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.
Office of the Secretary.
7002-0018 For the cost of information technology services provided to agencies of the
executive office of economic development ......................................................... $3,091,734
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF EDUCATION.
Office of the Secretary.
7009-1701 For the cost of information technology services provided to agencies of the
executive office of education ............................................................................... $3,000,000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND SECURITY.
Office of the Secretary.
8000-1701 For the cost of information technology services provided to agencies of the
executive office of public safety and security ...................................................... $6,661,730
Department of State Police.
8100-0002 For the costs associated with department of state police personnel
assigned to roadways of the Massachusetts Department of
Transportation, the district attorneys’ offices, the attorney general, the
Massachusetts gaming commission and other state agencies; provided,
that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the
purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of
retained revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system ...................................................... $45,000,000
8100-0003 For the costs associated with the use and maintenance of the statewide
telecommunications system ................................................................................... $156,375
Military Division.
8700-1145 For the costs of utilities and maintenance associated with state armory
rentals and related services and for the implementation of energy
conservation measures with regard to the state armories ..................................... $100,000
Department of Correction.
8900-0021 For costs related to the production and distribution of products produced
by prison industries and for the costs of services provided by incarcerated
persons; provided, that the commissioner of correction may allocate year-

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
end net profits to the cost of drug, substance abuse and rehabilitative
programming ..................................................................................................... $14,650,000
SECTION 2D.
SECTION 2D. The amounts set forth in this section are hereby appropriated from the General Federal
Grants Fund. Federal funds received in excess of the amount appropriated in this section shall be expended
only in accordance with section 6B of chapter 29 of the General Laws. The amount of any unexpended
balance of federal grant funds received before June 30, 2026 and not included as part of an appropriation
item in this section is hereby made available for expenditure during fiscal year 2027 and shall be in addition
to any amount appropriated in this section.
JUDICIARY.
Supreme Judicial Court.
0320-1710 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Court
Improvement Basic Grant ...................................................................................... $580,976
Committee for Public Counsel Services.
0320-1809 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY24 BJA
Postconviction Testing of DNA Evidence .............................................................. $574,845
0320-1810 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY24 BJA Preventing
Wrongful Convictions Program Expansion ............................................................ $265,994
Trial Court.
0332-3201 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Chicopee and
Holyoke Access to Treatment and Services .......................................................... $316,500
0332-3501 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Maintain
Independence and Sobriety Through Systems Integration ..................................... $32,500
0333-0123 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Guardianship:
Helping Vulnerable Adults Explore Alternatives to Traditional
Guardianship ............................................................................................................ $94,771
0337-0005 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, OJJDP FY 2021
Family Drug Program ............................................................................................. $125,000
0339-0612 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Project North ..................... $427,566
0339-1015 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Improving Reentry
High-Tech Career Reentry Path Project ................................................................ $300,000
DISTRICT ATTORNEYS.
Suffolk District Attorney.
0340-0109 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY24 Enhancing
Prosecution ............................................................................................................ $140,000

Conference Committee Report
0840-0111 For the purpose of a federally funded grant entitled, for services to victims
and survivors of crime ............................................................................................ $179,100
8100-4646 For the purpose of a federally funded grant entitled, for services to victims
and survivors of crime .............................................................................................. $74,602
Worcester District Attorney.
0340-0471 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Worcester County
Division and Drug Endangered Children ................................................................. $10,468
0340-0472 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Peer Recovery
Support Center ....................................................................................................... $530,000
Plymouth District Attorney.
0340-0837 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, BJA FY21 Sexual
Assault Kit Initiative (SAKI) .................................................................................... $497,578
0340-0842 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Plymouth County
First Response to Substance Use & Recovery ...................................................... $431,003
0340-0843 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Human Trafficking
2nd Round ................................................................................................................ $38,205
0340-0844 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, BJA FY24 National
Community Courts Initiative ................................................................................... $288,758
0340-0845 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, BJAFY24
Comprehensive Opioid Stimulant Substance Use Site Base Program ................. $507,756
SECRETARY OF THE COMMONWEALTH.
0526-0113 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Historic Preservation
Survey and Planning ........................................................................................... $1,109,158
0526-0118 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, National Maritime
Heritage Grant Program ......................................................................................... $250,000
0526-0112 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Underrepresented
Communities Grant .................................................................................................. $29,950
0526-0119 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, American Battlefield
Grant ........................................................................................................................ $83,656
TREASURER AND RECEIVER GENERAL.
Massachusetts Cultural Council.
0640-9716 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Folk and Traditional
Arts Initiatives ........................................................................................................... $35,000

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
0640-9717 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Basic State Grant .............. $934,238
0640-9718 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Artists in Education..
................................................................................................................................. $62,900
0640-9724 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Youth Reach State
and Regional Programs ......................................................................................... $278,800
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
0810-0023 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY21 COPS Anti-
Heroin Task Force Grant Program ...................................................................... $3,889,492
0810-0051 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY22 OVC Task
Force to Combat Human Trafficking ...................................................................... $750,000
0810-0052 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY22 OVC Task
Force to Combat Human Trafficking ...................................................................... $749,999
0810-0297 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY22 OVC Victim
Compensation Formula .......................................................................................... $997,672
VICTIM AND WINTESS ASSISTANCE BOARD.
0840-0111 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Office of Victims of
Crimes – Victim Assistance Formula ................................................................ $29,799,343
MASSACHUSETTS DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES COUNCIL.
1100-1702 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Developmental
Disability Act; provided, that in order to qualify for said grant, this account
shall be exempt from the first $314,698 of fringe benefit and indirect cost
charges pursuant to section 6B of chapter 29 of the General Laws ................... $1,647,070
1100-1713 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Expanding the Public
Health Workforce within the Disability Networks: State Councils on
Developmental Disabilities; provided, that in order to qualify for said grant,
this account shall be exempt from the first $32,400 of fringe benefit and
indirect cost charges pursuant to section 6B of chapter 29 of the General
Laws ......................................................................................................................... $74,929
EXECUTIVE OFFICE FOR ADMINISTRATION AND FINANCE.
Massachusetts Office on Disability.
1107-2450 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Rehabilitation Client
Assistance Program ............................................................................................... $231,000
Department of Revenue.
1201-0109 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Access and
Visitation Program .................................................................................................. $179,442

Conference Committee Report
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENTAL AFFAIRS.
Office of the Secretary.
2000-0141 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Massachusetts
Coastal Zone Management Program Implementation ........................................ $3,350,000
2000-0143 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, CZM IIJA Capacity ......... $7,500,000
2000-9702 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, National Parks
Service Land and Water Conservation Fund ...................................................... $6,644,878
2000-9735 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Buzzards Bay
Estuary Program ................................................................................................. $3,600,000
2030-0013 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Joint Enforcement
Agreement Between NOAA-OLE-Fisheries ........................................................... $944,401
2030-9701 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Recreational Boating
Safety Program ................................................................................................... $2,430,600
Department of Environmental Protection.
2200-9706 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Water Quality
Management Planning ........................................................................................... $544,500
2200-9712 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Leaking
Underground Storage Tank Cooperative Agreement ............................................ $659,282
2200-9717 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Department of
Defense State Memorandum of Agreement .......................................................... $994,083
2200-9724 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Superfund Block
Grant ...................................................................................................................... $642,670
2200-9728 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Brownfields
Assessment Program ............................................................................................. $478,394
2230-9734 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, CERCLA
128(a)Response Program Cooperative Agreement for MADE ........................... $2,645,000
2230-9735 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Brownfield
Multipurpose CERCLA ........................................................................................... $400,000
2230-9702 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Performance
Partnership Grant .............................................................................................. $14,536,721
2240-9791 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Long Island Sound
Project (IIJA) ....................................................................................................... $3,516,667
2240-9793 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MASSDEP Emerging
Contaminants SDC Grant ................................................................................... $6,367,333

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
2240-9796 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, DEP 319 PPG
NPS/PPG ............................................................................................................... $786,159
2240-9797 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, ENV Inf Exchange
Network .................................................................................................................... $85,910
2240-9798 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MassDEP EC-SDC
Grant Program #2 ............................................................................................... $8,071,250
2250-9712 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Clean Air Act Section
103 ......................................................................................................................... $734,633
2250-9716 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Massachusetts
National Air Toxics Trend Station Program ........................................................... $149,000
2250-9726 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Homeland Security
Co-Op Agreement .................................................................................................. $976,512
2250-9749 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Clean Air Act/Air
Sensor Program ......................................................................................................... $4,349
2250-9750 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Clean Air Act (IRA)............ $234,094
Department of Fish and Game.
2300-0179 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, National Coastal
Wetlands Conservation Grant Program ................................................................. $228,490
2310-0122 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, DFW Land
Acquisition ........................................................................................................... $2,250,000
2310-0124 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Windsor Brook
Wetland Restoration .................................................................................................... $400,000
2310-0125 For the purpose of a federally funded grant entitled, NEC Cottontail
Population Assessment ............................................................................................ $89,601
2310-0126 For the purpose of a federally funded grant entitled, CWD (Wildlife
Disease) Management ............................................................................................. $15,000
2330-9222 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Clean Vessel .................. $1,200,000
2330-9712 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Commercial
Fisheries Statistics ................................................................................................. $250,000
2330-9725 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Boating Infrastructure
............................................................................................................................... $720,000
2330-9730 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Interstate Fisheries
Management Support............................................................................................. $400,000
2330-9732 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, ACCSP
Implementation Strategic Plan ............................................................................... $102,000

Conference Committee Report
2330-9733 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Program to Test Cod
Avoidance of Trawl Nets .......................................................................................... $60,000
2330-9739 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Turtle
Disengagement ..................................................................................................... .$700,000
2330-9742 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Age and Growth
Project Segment One ............................................................................................. $450,000
2330-9743 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Sport Fish
Restoration Coordination ....................................................................................... $175,000
Department of Agricultural Resources.
2511-0004 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FDA Food Safety ............. $500,000
2511-0310 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Massachusetts
Pesticide Enforcement Grant ................................................................................. $450,000
2511-0400 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Cooperative
Agricultural Pest Survey ......................................................................................... $350,000
2511-0972 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Farm and Ranch
Lands Protection Program .................................................................................. $5,000,000
2511-1025 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Country of Origin
Labeling - Retail Surveillance .................................................................................. $35,000
2516-9002 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Development of
Institutional Marketing ............................................................................................ $460,000
2516-9003 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Farmers Market
Coupon Program .................................................................................................... $450,000
2516-9004 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Senior Farmers
Market Nutrition Program ...................................................................................... $520,000
2516-9007 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Organic Certification
Cost-Share Program ................................................................................................ $20,000
2516-9008 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Massachusetts
Resilient Food Systems Infrastructure ................................................................ $1,500,000
Department of Conservation and Recreation.
2820-9770 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FEMA National Dam
Safety Program ................................................................................................... $4,898,673
2820-9705 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Identifying and
Eradicating the Asian Longhorned Beetle .......................................................... $2,300,000
2820-9708 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, NRCS Dam
Rehabilitation Funding for Watershed Restoration ............................................. $4,097,240

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
2820-9903 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Volunteer Fire
Assistance Program Grant cfda 16.698 ................................................................. $274,084
2820-9919 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, National Park
Service’s Historic Preservation Fund ..................................................................... $304,668
2821-9110 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Inflation Reduction
Act Funding for Urban & Community Forestry Programs ...................................... $382,315
2821-9905 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Urban and
Community Forestry Grant ..................................................................................... $407,865
2821-9909 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Forest Stewardship
Conservation and Education Grant ........................................................................ $225,224
2821-9911 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Fire Assistance
Grant… ................................................................................................................... $423,696
2821-9912 For the purposes of a federally funded Bipartisan Infrastructure Law grant
entitled, Community Wildfire Defense Grant ............................................................ $26,343
2821-9913 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Hazard Fuels
Management and Wildfire Risk Reduction Grant ................................................... $485,692
2821-9917 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Forest Legacy
Administration Grant ........................................................................................... $1,008,726
2821-9918 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, 2024 IRA Forest
Legacy Admin Grant ........................................................................................... $2,215,562
2821-9919 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, 2024 USFSM-
Underserved Forest Landowner Capacity IRA Grant ......................................... $1,117,708
2821-9926 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Forest Health
Program Grant. ...................................................................................................... $253,738
2821-9927 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Hemlock Woolly
Adelgid Suppression Grant ...................................................................................... $65,520
2821-9929 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, 2023 IIJA Temporary
Bridge Funding ....................................................................................................... $302,900
2830-9733 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, USFWS Aquatic
Invasive Species Management Grant .................................................................... $145,591
2840-9708 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, IIJA NOAA Capacity
Building Habitat Coop Agreement .......................................................................... $475,000
2840-9709 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Waquoit Bay National
Estuarine Research............................................................................................. $1,201,696
2850-9701 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Recreational Trails
Grant Program ....................................................................................................... $924,299
Department of Public Utilities.

Conference Committee Report
2100-9013 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Rail Fixed Guideway
Public Transportation System Safety Oversight ................................................. $3,646,768
7006-9002 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Pipeline Security ............ $4,869,021
Department of Energy Resources.
7006-9313 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, BIL - EECBG
Program (IIJA) .......................................................................................................... $49,492
7006-9314 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Ira-50121 HER ............. $13,655,713
7006-9315 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Ira-50122 Hear ............. $16,119,988
7006-9324 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, CHDV - Clean
Heavy-Duty Vehicles Program ............................................................................... $675,374
7006-9734 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Energy Plan -
SEP ..................................................................................................................... $1,299,240
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES.
Office of the Secretary.
4000-0028 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, School Based
Services .............................................................................................................. $1,000,000
4000-0826 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Money Follows the
Person Rebalancing Demonstration Grant ............................................................ $887,567
4000-1826 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Money Follows the
Person Y4 .............................................................................................................. $914,195
Office for Refugees and Immigrants.
4003-0808 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Youth Mentoring ................ $275,285
4003-0818 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Elderly Refugee
Services ................................................................................................................. $143,303
4003-0821 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Refugee School
Impact ................................................................................................................. $1,370,688
4003-0826 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Refugee Cash and
Medical Assistance Program ............................................................................ $28,599,370
4003-0854 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Refugee Health
Promotion ............................................................................................................ $1,216,380
4003-0855 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Refugee Social
Services Program ................................................................................................ $5,211,360
Massachusetts Commission for the Blind.

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
4110-3021 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Vocational
Rehabilitation; provided, that no funds shall be deducted for pensions,
group health and life insurance or any other such indirect cost of federally
reimbursed state employees… ........................................................................... $8,750,000
4110-3026 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Independent Living
–Services to Older Blind Americans ...................................................................... $680,000
4110-3028 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Supported
Employment ............................................................................................................. $10,500
4110-3029 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Fort Devens Vending
Stand Award ........................................................................................................ $2,296,500
MassAbility.
4120-0020 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Vocational
Rehabilitation; provided, that no funds shall be deducted for pensions,
group health and life insurance or any other such indirect cost of federally
reimbursed state employees… ......................................................................... $50,180,656
4120-0187 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Supported
Employment Services Grant .................................................................................. $396,031
4120-0191 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Informed Members
Planning and Assessing Choices Together ........................................................... $235,100
4120-0511 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Social Security
Disability Insurance ........................................................................................... $55,731,678
4120-0751 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Assistive Technology
Grant ...................................................................................................................... $600,237
4120-0752 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Independent Living
Federal Grant (Part C) ........................................................................................ $1,722,883
4120-0753 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Independent Living
State Grants (Part B).............................................................................................. $348,595
4120-0758 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Beyond Bridges: The
Intersection of Behavioral Health & Traumatic Brain Injury ................................... $200,179
Department of Transitional Assistance.
4400-3064 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, SNAP Nutrition
Education and Obesity Prevention ..................................................................... $2,491,188
4400-3067 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program Employment and Training ................................... $3,180,708
4400-3073 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Summer Electronic
Benefit Transfer Program for Children ................................................................ $2,830,615
4400-3076 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, TANF Data Equity ............. $110,000

Conference Committee Report
4400-3077 For the purpose of a federally funded grant entitled, Summer EBT
Technology Grant ................................................................................................ $1,100,000
4400-3078 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, SUN Bucks
Benefit…. .......................................................................................................... $70,668,000
Department of Public Health.
4500-1002 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Preventive Health
and Health Services Block Grant 2018 ............................................................... $4,845,171
4500-1056 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MA Rape Prevention
and Education Program ......................................................................................... $862,158
4500-1057 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Massachusetts
Sexual Assault Service Program ........................................................................... $978,490
4500-1064 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Loan
Repayment Program .............................................................................................. $839,800
4500-2000 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Maternal and Child
Health Services ................................................................................................. $11,526,730
4502-1012 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Cooperative Health
Statistics System .................................................................................................... $785,000
4510-0114 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Primary Care
Offices… ................................................................................................................ $349,580
4510-0117 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Office of Rural
Health.. ................................................................................................................... $223,410
4510-0120 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Rural Hospital
Flexibility Program .................................................................................................. $364,663
4510-0223 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Oral Health
Workforce Activities................................................................................................ $400,000
4510-0224 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Small Rural Hospital
Improvement Grant Program ................................................................................... $81,168
4510-0401 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Medicare and
Medicaid Survey and Certification .................................................................... $12,532,386
4510-0404 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Hospital
Preparedness Programs ..................................................................................... $6,000,000
4510-0501 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Clinical Laboratory
Improvement Amendment ...................................................................................... $806,680
4510-0507 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Impact Act for
Hospice Recertification Surveys .............................................................................. $85,671

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
4510-0619 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FDA Inspection of
Food Establishments................................................................................................ $82,248
4510-0645 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Harold Rogers
Prescription Drug Monitoring Program................................................................... $842,185
4510-9014 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Mammography
Quality Standards Act ............................................................................................ $498,957
4510-0932 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Childhood Asthma
Hazardous Substances Applied R D...................................................................... $833,000
4510-9041 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, ATSDR’s Partnership
to Promote Local Efforts to Reduce Environmental Exposure .............................. $489,275
4510-9048 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Indoor Radon
Development Program ........................................................................................... $195,000
4510-9053 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Beach Monitoring .............. $258,000
4510-9054 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Strengthening
Statewide Environmental Health Capacity ............................................................... $90,000
4510-9068 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Maintenance and
Enhancement of the State and National Environment ........................................... $615,000
4510-9071 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MA Childhood Lead
Poisoning Prevention Program .............................................................................. $518,678
4512-0100 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Sexually Transmitted
Disease Control ................................................................................................... $2,091,000
4512-0108 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Mass Applications
for STD Surveillance Parts A and B ....................................................................... $441,480
4512-0150 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Immunization and
Vaccines for Children ........................................................................................ $11,911,392
4512-0193 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Building and
Enhancing Epidemiology, Laboratory and Health Information Systems
Capacity ............................................................................................................ $18,000,000
4512-0194 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Epidemiology and
Laboratory Capacity for Infectious Diseases .................................................... $15,000,000
4512-0195 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Build Epidemiology
and Laboratory Capacity ..................................................................................... $6,596,528
4512-0197 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, New England
Pathogen Genomics Center of Excellence ......................................................... $6,586,209
4512-0198 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, New England
Pathogen Genomics Center of Excellence ......................................................... $3,357,557
4512-9055 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Promoting Integration
of Primary and Behavioral Health Care .............................................................. $3,228,960

Conference Committee Report
4512-9069 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Substance Abuse
Prevention and Treatment Block Grant............................................................. $52,919,376
4512-9085 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Strategic Prevention
Framework ............................................................................................................. $517,466
4512-9089 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Prevent Prescription
Drug Overuse Misuse ......................................................................................... $9,883,363
4512-9092 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Amy Sorensen-
Alawad MPA ........................................................................................................ $1,643,070
4512-9093 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Massachusetts State
Opioid Response SOR ...................................................................................... $72,621,523
4512-9426 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Uniform Alcohol and
Drug Abuse Data .................................................................................................... $300,000
4513-0111 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Housing Opportunity
for Persons with AIDS Program ............................................................................. $700,758
4513-9007 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Women Infants and
Children. .......................................................................................................... $136,000,000
4513-9009 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, ARPA Technology
for a Better WIC Experience .................................................................................. $288,500
4513-9014 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Enhancing Reviews
& Surveillance to Eliminate Maternal Mortality ERASE ......................................... $495,000
4513-9021 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Infants and Toddlers
with Disabilities .................................................................................................... $9,355,295
4513-9031 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Systems
Development Initiative for MA ................................................................................ $100,000
4513-9037 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Ryan White Care Act
Title II ................................................................................................................ $23,401,181
4513-9047 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Comprehensive HIV
Prevention Project for Health Departments ........................................................ $9,231,181
4513-9056 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, National HIV
Behavioral Surveillance ......................................................................................... $522,425
4513-9063 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Sexual Risk
Avoidance Education FY 2018 ............................................................................... $848,591
4513-9070 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Emergency Medical
Services for Children .............................................................................................. $200,000
4513-9104 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Universal Newborn
Hearing Screening ................................................................................................. $235,000

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
4513-9106 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MA Comprehensive
Asthma Control Program ....................................................................................... $567,229
4513-9109 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Massachusetts
Perinatal Quality Collaborative ............................................................................... $325,000
4513-9110 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, B Existing PRAMS…
............................................................................................................................... $175,000
4513-9112 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MA EHDI Project…..
............................................................................................................................... $160,000
4513-9113 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Maternal Infant Early
Childhood Home Visiting Grant Program .......................................................... $10,441,379
4513-9117 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Birth Defects Study
to Evaluate Pregnancy Exposures ......................................................................... $855,000
4513-9121 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Pediatric Mental
Healthcare Access New Area Expansion – ARPA ................................................ $175,000
4513-9127 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Ryan White Title IV
Program ................................................................................................................. $532,810
4513-9130 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Maternal
Health Innovation Program ................................................................................. $1,000,000
4513-9131 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Transforming
Massachusetts Pediatrics for Early Childhood ................................................... $1,000,000
4513-9132 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Pediatric Mental
Health Care Access Expansion ............................................................................... $81,683
4513-9133 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Childhood Essentials
Preventing Adverse Experiences ........................................................................... $465,000
4513-9134 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MA Population-
Based Neonatal Abstinence Syndrome Surveillance ............................................ $527,991
4514-1013 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY2015 WIC Special
Project Grants .......................................................................................................... $45,300
4515-0116 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Tuberculosis
Elimination and Lab Control Co-op Agreement .................................................. $1,649,717
4515-0211 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, HIV/AIDS, Viral
Hepatitis, STD and TB Prevention ...................................................................... $1,080,585
4515-0215 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, New England
Pathogen Genomics Center of Excellence ............................................................ $500,000
4515-1125 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Viral Hepatitis
Prevention and Surveillance .................................................................................. $700,366
4513-1008 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, CDC Cooperative
Agreement for Emergency Response: Public Health Crisis Response

Conference Committee Report
Influenza A/H5N1 and Pandemic Preparedness and Response Funding
for state, tribal, local, and territorial (STLT)
Jurisdictions ........................................................................................................... $669,777
4516-1013 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Biomonitoring
Program to Assess Environment Chemical Exposure ........................................... $750,000
4516-1021 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Hospital
Preparedness and Public Health Emergency Preparedness ........................... $15,500,000
4516-1036 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MDPH HSLI
Laboratory Accreditation ........................................................................................ $150,000
4516-1042 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MASPHL-NARMS
Cooperative Agreement ......................................................................................... $185,000
4518-0520 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MA Violent Death
Reporting System ................................................................................................... $257,816
4518-0535 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Expanded
Occupational Health Surveillance in MA ................................................................ $641,054
4518-1000 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Procurement of
Information for the National Death Index ................................................................. $75,000
4518-1002 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Massachusetts
Death File – Social Security Administration ........................................................... $627,000
4518-1003 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Birth Records for the
Social Security Administration ............................................................................... $586,000
4518-9023 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Census of Fatal
Occupational Injuries................................................................................................ $58,750
4518-9052 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Behavioral Risk
Factor Surveillance System ................................................................................... $750,000
4570-1010 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Strengthening PH
Infrastructure, Workforce, and Data Systems ..................................................... $3,240,000
4570-1011 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, PH Infrastructure,
Workforce, and Data System ARPA ................................................................... $5,000,000
4570-1527 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Personal
Responsibility Education Program 2010 ................................................................ $848,026
4570-1534 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Federal Drug
Administration Tobacco 2011 ................................................................................ $741,537
4570-1548 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Paul Coverdell
National Acute Stroke Prevention .......................................................................... $672,000
4570-1549 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Massachusetts
Health and Disability Program ............................................................................... $672,000

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
4570-1554 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY14 Family
Planning Services FOA ....................................................................................... $7,348,447
4570-1557 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MA Organized
Approaches to Increase Colorectal Cancer Screen ............................................... $652,871
4570-1561 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Massachusetts Core
Violence Injury Prevention Program ...................................................................... $275,000
4570-1562 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, The Family Violence
Service State Grants ........................................................................................... $3,130,048
4570-1564 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MA Diabetes and
Heart Disease Stroke Prevention Program ......................................................... $2,354,008
4570-1568 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, National and State
Tobacco Control Program ................................................................................... $3,805,308
4570-1571 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MA Cancer
Prevention and Control Program ........................................................................ $2,822,325
4570-1573 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State and Community
Based Injury Prevention and Control .................................................................. $1,102,512
4570-1575 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Massachusetts
Suicide Prevention .............................................................................................. $7,051,031
4570-1577 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Family Violence
Prevention and Domestic Violence and Support Service ARPA ........................ $9,257,424
4570-1581 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Health Equity for
Priority Population with Risk for Diabetes ........................................................... $1,000,000
Department of Children and Families.
4800-0006 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Children’s Justice
Act .......................................................................................................................... $309,459
4800-0009 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Independent Living
Program - Title IV-E ........................................................................................... $3,249,888
4800-0013 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Promoting Safe &
Stable Families Program Title IV-B Subpart 2 .................................................... $6,271,704
4800-0084 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Education and
Training Voucher ................................................................................................. $1,043,671
4800-0089 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Adoption Incentives
Payments ............................................................................................................ $1,394,000
4899-0001 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Child Welfare
Services - Title IV-B Subpart 1 ............................................................................ $3,393,806
4899-0021 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, National Center for
Child Abuse and Neglect .................................................................................... $1,889,650

Conference Committee Report
Department of Mental Health.
5012-9182 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, BSCA Center for
Mental Health Block Grants ................................................................................... $576,400
5012-9401 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Block Grants for
Community Mental Health Services .................................................................. $20,073,212
5012-9406 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, System of Care
Expansion and Sustainability Grants ..................................................................... $784,083
5046-9100 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Shelter Plus Care .............. $377,577
BOARD OF LIBRARY COMMISSIONERS.
7000-9702 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Library Services
Technology Act ................................................................................................... $3,661,196
9000-9700 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Federal Reserve Title
I .............................................................................................................................. $157,544
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.
Office of the Secretary.
7002-1002 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Travel and Tourism
Season Extension Grant ...................................................................................... $2,730,091
7002-1003 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, EDA Statewide
Tourism Grant ARPA ......................................................................................... $58,348,810
7002-1005 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Broadband Equity,
Access and Deployment ...................................................................................... $1,433,096
7002-1007 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Broadband Equity,
Access and Deployment ................................................................................. $142,230,168
7002-2025 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Capital Projects Fund
........................................................................................................................ $170,918,503
Division of Insurance.
7006-6007 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Expanding Access
to Women's Health Grant ....................................................................................... $619,275
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF LABOR AND WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT.
Office of the Secretary.
7003-4206 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Lead License
Enforcement ............................................................................................................. $75,735

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
7003-6628 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, OSHA 23G
Operational Program ........................................................................................... $1,437,932
Department of Career Services.
7002-6623 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, the Work Opportunity
Tax Credit ............................................................................................................... $576,827
7002-6625 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Labor Certification ............. $429,651
7002-6626 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Employment
Services State Allotment ................................................................................... $15,255,423
7002-6628 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Disabled Veterans
Outreach Program............................................................................................... $3,190,147
7003-1010 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Trade Adjustment
Assistance .............................................................................................................. $874,165
7003-1630 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Workforce
Investment Act Adult Activities .......................................................................... $17,281,839
7003-1631 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Workforce
Investment Act Youth Formula Grants .............................................................. $19,110,434
7003-1777 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Workforce
Investment Act National Emergency Grants .......................................................... $551,195
7003-1778 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Workforce
Investment Act Dislocated Worker Formula Grant ........................................... $22,092,181
7003-1785 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Apprenticeships USA
State Accelerator Grant ...................................................................................... $2,118,461
Department of Unemployment Assistance.
7002-6624 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Unemployment
Insurance Administration ................................................................................ $103,400,000
7002-9701 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Federal Bureau of
Labor Statistics .................................................................................................... $1,941,381
Department of Labor Standards.
7002-2013 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Mine Safety and
Health Training ....................................................................................................... $111,862
7003-4203 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Bureau of Labor
Statistics Statistical Survey ...................................................................................... $75,000
7003-4212 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Asbestos Licensing
and Monitoring ......................................................................................................... $78,608

Conference Committee Report
7003-4213 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Lead Licensing and
Monitoring .............................................................................................................. $409,962
7003-6627 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, OHSA Onsite
Consultation Program ......................................................................................... $1,350,339
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HOUSING AND LIVABLE COMMUNITIES.
Office of the Secretary.
4400-0705 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, McKinney
Emergency Shelter Grants Program ................................................................... $5,020,575
4400-0707 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Continuum of Care
Supplemental Housing ...................................................................................... $34,000,000
7004-2030 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Weatherization
Assistance for Low Income Persons ................................................................. $10,500,000
7004-2033 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Low Income Home
Energy Assistance Program ........................................................................... $166,000,000
7004-2034 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Community Service
Block Grant ....................................................................................................... $20,000,000
7004-2041 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Low Income Home
Energy Assistance Program (LIHEAP) (IIJA) ..................................................... $7,000,000
7004-2043 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, BIL Weatherization
Assistance Program (IIJA) .................................................................................. $8,000,000
7004-3037 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Small Cities
Community Development Block Grant .............................................................. $44,000,000
7004-9001 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Youth Homelessness
System Improvement ............................................................................................. $400,000
7004-9010 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Stability Voucher ............ $2,530,000
7004-9012 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Recovery Housing
Program ................................................................................................................... $42,000
7004-9013 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Foster Youth to
Independence ..................................................................................................... $1,500,000
7004-9014 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Federal Housing
Voucher Program .............................................................................................. $11,500,000
7004-9015 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Housing Choice
Voucher and Moving to Work Program ........................................................... $588,000,000
7004-9016 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Family Unification
Program .............................................................................................................. $6,000,000

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
7004-9017 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Supportive Housing
for Persons with Disabilities ................................................................................ $6,000,000
7004-9018 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Section 811 Project
Rental Assistance ............................................................................................... $4,000,000
7004-9019 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Section 8 Moderate
Rehabilitation Program ..................................................................................... $10,200,000
7004-9021 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, the Family Self-
Sufficiency Program ............................................................................................ $1,400,000
7004-9022 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Emergency Housing
Vouchers (ARPA) ................................................................................................ $9,750,000
7004-9028 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Home Investment
Partnerships ...................................................................................................... $22,000,000
7004-9029 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, National Housing
Trust Fund ......................................................................................................... $11,000,000
7004-9038 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Home Investment
Partnerships – American Rescue Plan 2021 .................................................... $20,000,000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF EDUCATION.
Department of Early Education and Care.
3000-0707 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Head Start
Collaboration .......................................................................................................... $175,000
3000-9003 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Child Abuse
Prevention ................................................................................................................... $974,453
3000-9006 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Preschool
Development Grant Birth Through Five .............................................................. $5,985,665
Department of Elementary and Secondary Education.
7010-9706 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Common Core Data
Project ......................................................................................................... ………$210,569
7038-0108 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Adult Education and
Family Literacy Act State Grant ........................................................................ $13,643,877
7043-1001 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title I Basic Program
..........................................................................................................…………$302,605,579
7043-1004 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title I Migrant
Children…… ........................................................................................................ $1,330,434
7043-1005 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title I Neglected
Children and Orphans ............................................................................................ $900,459

Conference Committee Report
7043-2001 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title II Teacher
Quality State Grants .......................................................................................... $31,887,869
7043-3001 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title III Language
Instruction and LEP Grants ............................................................................... $19,714,919
7043-4002 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title IV 21st Century
Community Learning Centers ........................................................................... $20,050,205
7043-4004 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Student Support and
Academic Enrichment Grants ........................................................................... $20,924,026
7043-4005 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Stronger
Connections Grant (SCG) Program .................................................................... $1,383,409
7043-6001 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title IV State
Assessment Grants ............................................................................................. $6,835,720
7043-6501 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title X Homeless
Children and Youth ............................................................................................. $2,129,376
7043-7001 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Special Education
Grants…… ...................................................................................................... $339,339,359
7043-7002 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Preschool Grants….
.......................................................................................................................... $10,888,209
7043-8000 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Formula Grant
Funds Under Title I Perkins V ........................................................................... $23,338,413
7048-2004 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, CLSD Equitable
Literacy Experience ............................................................................................ $8,160,534
7048-2005 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Academic
Assessment for Science Grant ............................................................................ $2,081,570
7048-2321 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, CDC Funding to
Promote Adolescent Health ................................................................................... $107,500
7048-9144 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Migrant Education
Program Consortium Incentive Grants..................................................................... $58,794
7053-2008 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Fresh Fruits and
Vegetables Nutrition ............................................................................................ $4,896,238
7053-2103 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, CNP Training and
Tech Assistance ..................................................................................................... $373,143
7053-2112 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Special Assistance
Funds .............................................................................................................. $600,378,386
7053-2117 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Child Care
Program….. ......................................................................................................... $6,816,819
7053-2125 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Commodity
Supplemental Food Program ................................................................................. $272,980

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
7053-2126 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Temporary
Emergency Food Assistance .............................................................................. $2,708,762
7053-2266 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Team Nutrition
Competitive Training Grant .................................................................................... $375,897
7053-3272 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Direct Certification
Performance Award ............................................................................................... $439,163
7057-2127 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FARM TO SCHOOL
GRANTS ARPA ....................................................................................................... $63,119
7062-0008 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Office of School
Lunch Programs – Child Care Program Admin .................................................. $9,222,797
7062-0017 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Charter School
Assistance and Distributions ............................................................................... $2,290,807
Department of Higher Education.
7066-6032 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Gear Up V ...................... $5,000,000
7066-6033 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Gear Up IV ..................... $3,200,000
Community Colleges.
7503-9711 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled – Student Support
Services Program .................................................................................................. $224,165
7503-9714 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Bristol CC – Upward
Bound Program ..................................................................................................... $265,821
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND SECURITY.
Office of the Secretary.
8000-0402 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Bipartisan
Infrastructure Law Funds I .................................................................................. $6,087,600
8000-0405 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Bipartisan
Infrastructure Law Funds II ................................................................................. $8,000,000
8000-4692 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Homeland
Security Program ................................................................................................ $2,806,252
8000-4707 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Nonprofit Security
Grant Program .................................................................................................... $6,662,588
8000-4727 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State and Local
Cybersecurity Grant Program ............................................................................. $2,920,439
8000-4794 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Urban Areas Initiative
Grant ............................................................................................................ ….$13,249,346

Conference Committee Report
8100-4600 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Juvenile Justice
Delinquency Prevention ......................................................................................... $715,863
8100-4610 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY2022 State
Justice Statistics Program ........................................................................................ $75,000
8100-4611 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Byrne Justice
Assistance Programs .......................................................................................... $4,360,620
8100-4622 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Residential
Substance Abuse Treatment – Admin Grant ......................................................... $332,138
8100-4627 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Sex Offender
Registration - Grants .............................................................................................. $326,269
8100-4628 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, NCHP – Admin
Grants ................................................................................................................. $3,500,396
8100-4639 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, John R. Justice Grant
............................................................................................................................... $109,241
8100-4645 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Support for Adam
Walsh Act Implementation Grant Program .............................................................. $71,735
8100-4646 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY2020 Violence
Against Women Act............................................................................................. $3,562,889
8100-4669 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Byrne State Crisis
Intervention Program SCIP ................................................................................. $4,053,344
8100-4670 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Opioid, Stimulant,
and Other Substance Use Grant Program ............................................................. $533,267
8100-4671 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Second Chance Act
Reentry Initiative Grant ............................................................................................ $20,364
8100-4692 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Homeland Security Grant
......................................................................................................................................... $6,799,138
8100-4693 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Project Safe
Neighborhood – Admin Grant ................................................................................ $374,127
8100-4707 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Non-Profit Security
Grant Program .................................................................................................... $3,673,887
8100-4708 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Nonprofit Security
Grant National Security Supplement................................................................... $2,012,863
8100-4727 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State and Local
Cybersecurity Grant Program ............................................................................. $1,598,264
8100-4794 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Urban Areas Security
Initiative ............................................................................................................. $16,838,838

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
Department of State Police.
8100-1426 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY2024 Law
Enforcement Mental Health and Wellness Act ..................................................... $100,000
8100-2014 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Federal Motor Carrier
Safety Administration FFY2024 ............................................................................ $400,000
8100-2015 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Federal Motor Carrier
Safety Administration FFY2025 ......................................................................... $3,000,000
8100-2408 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY2024
Prosecuting Cold Cases Using DNA ...................................................................... $189,793
8100-2541 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY2024 Cops
Microgrant to Prevent Hate Crimes .......................................................................... $79,961
8100-3003 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY23 COPS Anti
Heroin Task Force Grant .................................................................................... $1,109,763
8100-3004 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY24 COPS AHTF
............................................................................................................................... $800,000
8100-5459 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FF24 Port Security .............. $50,000
8100-9776 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY23 Coverdell
Formula ...................................................................................................................... $2,506
8100-9777 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY24 Coverdell
Formula…. ............................................................................................................... $60,000
8100-9782 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY23 DNA CEBR…
................................................................................................................................. $17,331
8100-9783 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY24 DNA CEBR ................ $50,000
Military Division.
8700-0014 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Army National Guard
Administrative Services .......................................................................................... $324,200
8700-1001 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Army National Guard
Facilities Program ............................................................................................. $31,134,400
8700-1002 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Army National Guard
Environmental Program ...................................................................................... $3,744,600
8700-1003 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Army National Guard
Security ............................................................................................................... $1,642,050
8700-1004 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Army National Guard
Electronic Security ................................................................................................. $275,400
8700-1005 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Army National Guard
Command Control, Communications and Information Management ..................... $576,000

Conference Committee Report
8700-1007 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Army National Guard
Sustainable Ranges ............................................................................................... $724,295
8700-1010 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Army National Guard
Anti-Terrorism .......................................................................................................... $99,600
8700-1021 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Air National Guard
Facilities Operations and Maintenance ............................................................. $11,175,000
8700-1022 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Air National Guard
Environmental ........................................................................................................ $107,084
8700-1023 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Air National Guard
Security.. ............................................................................................................. $2,400,000
8700-1024 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Air National Guard
Fire Protection ..................................................................................................... $4,300,000
8700-1031 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Air National Guard
SRM Projects ...................................................................................................... $2,100,000
8700-1040 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Air National Guard
Distributed Learning Program ................................................................................ $697,000
8700-2301 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Camp Edwards
Readiness Center ............................................................................................. $48,550,000
Massachusetts Emergency Management Agency.
8800-0005 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY24 Emergency
Management Performance EOC Grant............................................................... $7,000,000
8800-0006 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY24 EOC Grant ............ $700,000
8800-0040 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY23 Regional
Catastrophic Preparedness Grant ......................................................................... $800,000
8800-0042 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Hazardous Materials
Transportation Act .................................................................................................. $600,000
8800-0050 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY23 Emergency
Operations Center Grant ..................................................................................... $1,500,000
8800-0051 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY2022 1/30
Snowstorm HAZ Mitigation Program Project Cost ................................................. $100,000
8800-0096 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, COVID-19
Presidential Declaration Mitigation Grant Program ............................................. $1,000,000
8800-1544 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY2022 Pre-Disaster
Mitigation Program Management Costs................................................................. $250,000
8800-1545 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY2023 Pre-Disaster
Mitigation Program Project ..................................................................................... $250,000

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
8800-1644 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY11 Pre-Disaster
Mitigation Competitive Projects ......................................................................... $11,900,000
8800-1744 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Building Resilient
Infrastructure and Communities 2020 Grant Program Management Cost ............ $500,000
8800-1844 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Building Resilient
Infrastructure and Communities 2021 Grant Program Management Cost ............ $100,000
8800-1944 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY22 Building
Resilient Infrastructure & Communities BRIC Management Cost ...................... $1,000,000
8800-4097 For the purpose of a federally funded grant entitled, October 2012
Hurricane Sandy .................................................................................................... $700,000
8800-4110 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, February 8-9, 2013
Severe Winter Storm ........................................................................................... $5,000,000
8800-4372 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, March 2-3, 2018
Severe Winter Storm and Flooding ........................................................................ $200,000
8800-4496 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, COVID-19 Pandemic
............................................................................................................................ $5,000,000
8810-0051 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, January 30 2022
Snowstorm Haz Mitigation Program Project Cost .................................................. $500,000
8810-0096 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, HMPG COVID-19
Pandemic PRJ .................................................................................................. $30,000,000
8810-1544 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY2022 Pre-Disaster
Mitigation Program Project Cost ......................................................................... $5,000,000
8810-1545 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY2023 Pre-Disaster
Mitigation Program Project Cost ....................................................................... $15,000,000
8810-1744 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Building Resilient
Infrastructure & Communities BRIC20 Project ................................................... $4,000,000
8810-1844 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Building Resilient
Infrastructure & Communities Project Cost ............................................................ $100,000
8810-1944 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY2022 Building
Resilient Infrastructure and Communities ............................................................ $12,000,000
8810-2044 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY 2023 Building
Resilient Infrastructure and Communities .............................................................. $397,500
8810-2446 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY 2024 Pre-Disaster
Mitigation Grant Program .................................................................................... $4,200,000
8810-4214 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, January 26-28
Severe Winter Storm ......................................................................................... $10,000,000

Conference Committee Report
8810-4372 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, March 2-3 2018
Severe Winter Storm Flooding ............................................................................ $8,000,000
8810-4496 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, COVID-19 Pandemic
OG 2020 .............................................................................................................. $2,000,000
Chief Medical Examiner.
4512-9089 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Mass-PPDOMA&O ............. $47,044
4518-0520 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MAVDRS ............................... $4,000
8100-9777 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Coverdell ............................. $32,185
Parole Board.
0840-0111 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, COVID-19&SASS ............. $310,083
4510-1357 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, VOCA ............................. $1,357,263
SHERIFFS.
Middlesex Sheriff’s Office.
8910-0174 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, BJA FY22
Comprehensive Opioid Stimulant & Substance Abuse Site Based ....................... $203,452
Franklin Sheriff’s Office.
8910-0820 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, SAMHSA - PDOA ............... $149,770
8910-0822 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, COSSAP COAP .................... $81,249
8910-0823 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, BJA FY23 Justice
and Mental Health Collaboration Program ............................................................. $150,000
8910-0824 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, TAPOTF .............................. $50,000
Hampden Sheriff’s Office.
8100-4611 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Byrne Justice
Assistance ..................................................................................................................... $606
8100-4646 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Violence Against
Women Act ............................................................................................................... $23,140
Worcester Sheriff’s Office.
8000-4622 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Residential
Substance Abuse Treatment ................................................................................... $29,120
4512-9069 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Substance Abuse
Prevention and Treatment Block Grant.................................................................. $139,050

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
Barnstable Sheriff’s Office.
8910-8223 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, SAMHSA VIPS
(Vivitrol Increased Participation Services............................................................... $147,280
Bristol Sheriff’s Office.
8100-4622 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Residential
Substance Abuse Treatment-Jail Based Treatment ................................................ $30,000
8910-4623 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Second Chance Act .......... $450,000
Suffolk Sheriff’s Office.
8910-4004 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Byrne Discretionary
Community Project .............................................................................................. $1,031,000
TRANSPORTATION.
6440-0089 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Commercial Vehicle
Information Systems and Networks ....................................................................... $390,934
6440-0090 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Commercial Driver
License Information System Enhancement ........................................................... $667,366
6440-0091 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Fatality Analysis
Reporting 22-23 ..................................................................................................... $123,066
6642-0018 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Non-Urbanized Area
Formula Program ................................................................................................ $5,791,534
6642-0023 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Metropolitan
Transportation Planning ........................................................................................... $97,917
6642-0030 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Transit Grant Bus
and Bus Facilities .............................................................................................. $10,570,275
6642-0049 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Special Needs for
Elderly Individuals and Individuals with Disabilities ............................................ $1,300,264
6643-0018 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Springfield Area
Track Reconfiguration Project .................................................................................. $72,000
6643-0020 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Boston & Albany
Corridor Admin .................................................................................................... $2,058,855
6643-0021 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, CFDPE / NEPA PA
M……… ............................................................................................................ $16,447,134
6644-0009 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Pollution Reduction
Admin 09 .................................................................................................................. $50,000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF AGING AND INDEPENDENCE.

Conference Committee Report
Office of the Secretary.
9110-1060 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Medicare
Improvements for Priority 1 for SHIPs 25 .............................................................. $281,283
9110-1061 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Medicare
Improvements for Patients and Providers for AAAs .............................................. $226,513
9110-1062 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Medicare
Improvements for Patients and Providers for ADRCs ............................................. $83,951
9110-1063 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title VI OAA MA to
Support Family Caregivers 25 ............................................................................... $490,000
9110-1074 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Older Americans Act
............................................................................................................................... $136,703
9110-1075 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title VII Ombudsman
............................................................................................................................... $570,000
9110-1076 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title IIIB Supportive
Service .............................................................................................................. $13,650,175
9110-1077 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, National Family
Caregiver Support Program ................................................................................ $5,031,670
9110-1079 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, IIID Preventative
Health…… .............................................................................................................. $682,679
9110-1089 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, APC6 ARP for
APS………… ....................................................................................................... $4,589,811
9110-1094 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Health
Insurance Assistance Program ........................................................................... $1,509,857
9110-1099 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Elder Justice Adult
Protective 23 ............................................................................................................ $58,162
9110-1173 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Older Americans Act
.......................................................................................................................... $21,271,490
9110-1174 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Nutrition Services
Incentive Program ............................................................................................... $6,000,000
9110-1178 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Community Service
Employment Program ......................................................................................... $1,185,466
9110-1199 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Elder Justice Adult
Protective 24 .......................................................................................................... $114,345
9110-2025 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Massachusetts No
Wrong Door Project 2025 ...................................................................................... $450,000
SECTION 2E.

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
SECTION 2E. The sums set forth in this section are hereby appropriated for transfer from the General Fund
to the trust funds named within each item unless specifically designated otherwise in this section, for the
purposes and subject to the conditions specified in this section and subject to the laws regulating the
disbursement of public funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. Items in this section shall not be
subject to allotment under section 9B of chapter 29 of the General Laws or reduction under section 9C of
said chapter 29 without express authorization from the general court. Notwithstanding section 19A of said
chapter 29, any transfer under this section shall be made by the comptroller in accordance with a transfer
schedule to be developed for each item by the comptroller after consulting with the appropriate agency
secretary, the secretary of administration and finance and the state treasurer. The schedule for each
appropriation shall provide for transfers in increments considered appropriate to meet the cash flow needs
of each fund; provided, however, that the sum of the incremental transfers shall equal the sum set forth in
this section and all transfers under the schedule shall be completed not later than June 30, 2027. Not later
than 7 days after the schedules receive final approval by the comptroller, they shall be reported to the house
and senate committees on ways and means.
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF LABOR AND WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT.
Office of the Secretary.
1595-1075 For an operating transfer to the Workforce Competitiveness Trust Fund
established in section 2WWW of chapter 29 of the General Laws ..................... $8,000,000
Gaming Economic Development Fund .................... 100%
EXECUTIVE OFFICE FOR ADMINISTRATION AND FINANCE.
1599-6152 For an operating transfer to the State Retiree Benefits Trust Fund
established in section 24 of chapter 32A of the General Laws ....................... $400,000,000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENTAL AFFAIRS.
1595-6232 For the Climatetech Investment Fund established in section 15 of chapter
23J of the General Laws; provided, that funds shall be appropriated for
clean energy workforce development initiatives and investments to
support emissions reductions in the energy, transportation and buildings
sectors, as directed by the Massachusetts clean energy and climate plan
for 2050; provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be expended
for entrepreneurial fellowships providing direct, multi-year funding
enabling the translation of research into businesses, products, and jobs in
the energy, transportation, and buildings sectors, as directed by the 2050
Clean Energy and Climate Plan; and provided further, that not later than
March 2, 2027, the executive office of energy and environmental affairs,
in consultation with the Massachusetts clean energy center, shall submit
a report to the joint committee on telecommunications, utilities and energy
and the house and senate committees on ways and means, which shall
include, but not be limited to: (i) summaries of the investments made from
or expected to be made from the transfer; (ii) the workforce training
programs supported or developed with funds from the transfer, including
the number of workers served by each program; and (iii) the estimated
impacts of the transfer towards the clean energy climate plan for 2050’s
outlined goals, including details by sector........................................................... $8,000,000

Conference Committee Report
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES.
Office of the Secretary.
1595-1068 For an operating transfer to the MassHealth provider payment account
under the Medical Assistance Trust Fund established in section 2QQQ of
chapter 29 of the General Laws; provided, that these funds shall be
expended for: (i) services provided; (ii) public hospital transformation and
incentive initiative payments; (iii) health equity incentive payments; or (iv)
Medicaid care organization payments under 42 CFR 438.6(c); provided
further, that all payments from the Medical Assistance Trust Fund shall be:
(a) subject to the availability of federal financial participation; (b) made only
under federally-approved payment methods; (c) consistent with federal
funding requirements and all federal payment limits as determined by the
secretary of health and human services; and (d) subject to the terms and
conditions of an agreement with the executive office of health and human
services; provided further, that the secretary of health and human services
shall notify the house and senate committees on ways and means and the
joint committee on health care financing of increases or decreases in any
payments made within the term of the current 1115 waiver or other state
plan amendments within 15 days of said payments; and provided further,
that the secretary of health and human services shall utilize funds from the
Medical Assistance Trust Fund to make payments of up to $494,800,000
to the Cambridge public health commission or to Medicaid care
organizations for payment to the Cambridge public health commission if
the Cambridge public health commission, in anticipation of receiving such
payments, first voluntarily transfers an amount equal to the non-federal
share of such payments to the Medical Assistance Trust Fund using a
federally-permissible source of funds ............................................................. $548,032,400
1595-1069 For an operating transfer to the Health Information Technology Trust Fund
established in section 35RR of chapter 10 of the General Laws; provided,
that these funds shall be expended for operating costs for the statewide
health information exchange and integrated eligibility system; and
provided further, that not later than December 18, 2026, the executive
office of health and human services shall submit a report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means and the joint committee on health
care financing detailing utilization in fiscal year 2026 of the Health
Information Technology Trust Fund established in said section 35RR of
said chapter 10, including the: (i) total dollar amount billed to the Health
Information Technology Trust Fund; (ii) total dollar amount of federal
reimbursement; (iii) initiatives and programs paid for out of the Health
Information Technology Trust Fund; and (iv) amount disbursed from the
Health Information Technology Trust Fund to each program and initiative
outlined in the enabling statute ......................................................................... $14,177,900
1595-1071 For an operating transfer to the Community Behavioral Health Promotion
and Prevention Trust Fund established in section 35GGG of chapter 10 of
the General Laws, inserted by section 7 of chapter 208 of the acts of 2018
............................................................................................................................... $200,000
Department of Public Health.

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
1595-4506 For an operating transfer to the Childhood Lead Poisoning Prevention
Trust Fund established in section 35MMM of chapter 10 of the General
Laws .................................................................................................................... $2,700,000
TRANSPORTATION.
Massachusetts Department of Transportation.
1595-6368 For an operating transfer to the Massachusetts Transportation Trust Fund
established in section 4 of chapter 6C of the General Laws; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the registrar of
motor vehicles shall provide quarterly reports to the commissioner of
correction detailing the number of identity cards processed pursuant to the
enhanced state identity card program for citizens released from the
department of correction facilities; provided further, that the report shall
also provide a summary and detail of the registry of motor vehicles fees
associated with the transactions and that, upon receipt and verification by
the department of correction of the accuracy of the transactions reported
in each quarterly report, the commissioner of correction shall submit a
request to the comptroller for an operating transfer of the full amount of
said registry of motor vehicles fees to the Commonwealth Transportation
Fund established in section 2ZZZ of chapter 29 of the General Laws;
provided further, that the transfer request shall include the department of
correction account from which the transfer shall be made the quarterly
report from the registrar of motor vehicles as supporting documentation;
provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to the city
of Somerville for their crossing guard program and other pedestrian
enhancements in the vicinity of the East Somerville section of the city of
Somerville; and provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be
expended to the town of Bolton for rural infrastructure improvements ........... $605,046,384
Commonwealth Transportation Fund.................... 88.40%
Education and Transportation Fund ..................... 11.60%
1595-6369 For an operating transfer to the Massachusetts Bay Transportation
Authority under clause (1) of subsection (d) of section 2ZZZ of chapter 29
of the General Laws; provided, that the Massachusetts Bay Transportation
Authority shall submit quarterly reports to the executive office for
administration and finance and the house and senate committees on ways
and means which shall include an accounting of the funds provided for in
this item, including: (i) the amount of money received under this transfer;
(ii) the amount of money expended under this transfer; (iii) a description of
items and services for which funds have been expended; and (iv) the
status of ongoing and planned capital projects under the purview of the
authority; provided further, that the authority shall submit these reports on
a quarterly basis not later than 30 days following the last day of the quarter;
provided further, that not less than $35,000,000 shall be expended for the
Massachusetts Bay Transit Authority academy program to establish a
pipeline for a skilled workforce; provided further, that funds included in this
item may be used for an income eligible, reduced fares program under the
Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority for riders of all modes with
low-incomes; provided further, that funds included in this item over the
total amount of funds made available in this item in the prior fiscal year
shall not be used for capital spending; provided further, that not less than

Conference Committee Report
$50,000 shall be expended to the Massachusetts Bay Transportation
Authority to study the financial feasibility and department capability of
either extending the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority red line
and/or creating a Bus Rapid Transit (BRT) line from Alewife down Route
2 to the Concord Rotary; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall
be expended to the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority for the
repair and restoration of the Gift of the Wind sculpture at Porter station;
and provided further, that ferry services operated by or under contract with
the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority including, but not limited
to, services operated in fiscal year 2026 seasonally in the East Boston
section of the city of Boston, the cities of Lynn and Quincy and the town of
Winthrop, shall continue to run year-round through the end of fiscal year
2027 ................................................................................................................ $465,150,000
Commonwealth Transportation Fund.................... 53.75%
Education and Transportation Fund ..................... 46.25%
1595-6370 For an operating transfer to the regional transit authorities organized under
chapter 161B of the General Laws, or any prior laws, under clause (2) of
subsection (d) of section 2ZZZ of chapter 29 of the General Laws;
provided, that each regional transit authority receiving assistance under
this item shall deliver not later than January 6, 2027, a copy of its most
recent audited financial statement to the chief financial officer of the
Massachusetts Department of Transportation, the secretary of
administration and finance, the treasurer of the commonwealth, the
comptroller of the commonwealth, the house and senate committees on
ways and means and the joint committee on transportation; provided, that
not less than $66,000,000 shall be expended for regional transit authorities
to support operational enhancements and improvements, which may
include, but shall not be limited to, expanded service hours, weekend
services and route expansions; provided further, that funds provided under
this item in fiscal year 2026 to provide more equitable distribution of
contract assistance to regional transit authorities under section 23 of
chapter 161B of the General Laws shall be incorporated into each
recipient's baseline funding calculation for fiscal year 2027; provided
further, that funds may be expended to regional transit authorities whose
contract assistance under section 23 of chapter 161B of the General Laws
is proportionately low in comparison to the net cost of service of the
regional transit authority as compared to other regional transit authorities
in order to provide more equitable fund distribution; provided further, that
said funds shall be included in each recipient’s baseline funding
calculation in future fiscal years; provided further, that funds not allocated
under the preceding 3 provisos shall subsequently be expended for
operating assistance to regional transit authorities based on the following
formula: (i) 60 per cent based on total transit ridership as reported on the
most recent certified national transit data base report; (ii) 30 per cent
based on population of its member communities from the most recent
census; and (iii) 10 per cent based on service coverage area determined
by the total square miles of its member communities; provided further, that
not less than $40,000,000 shall be expended for the regional transit
authorities to maintain year-round fare-free service pursuant to section 6A
of chapter 161B of the General Laws; provided further, that the
Massachusetts Department of Transportation shall oversee the
distribution of said funds; provided further, that not later than April 1, 2027,
the department shall submit a report to the joint committee on
transportation and the house and senate committees on ways and means

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
which shall include, but not be limited to: (a) a list of transit routes and
services that regional transit authorities are operating without charging
passenger fares; (b) summaries of such routes and services; (c) ridership
data for such routes and services; (d) details on the mechanisms being
utilized to track ridership; (e) the reimbursements, broken down by month
and regional transit authority, that the department has provided or
anticipates providing to regional transit authorities in fiscal year 2027
pursuant to section 6A of chapter 161B of the General Laws; and (f) the
methodology used to determine the distribution of such reimbursements;
provided further, that not less than $10,000,000 shall be expended on
grants to regional transit authorities for the creation or altering of routes
that advance connectivity between existing public transportation routes
including, but not limited to: (1) regional transit authority bus routes; (2)
Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority routes; and (3) local
economic hubs; provided further, that the Massachusetts Department of
Transportation shall oversee the distribution of said grants to the
authorities and shall establish grant criteria including, but not limited to,
the prioritization of: (A) opportunities for increased ridership; (B)
opportunities for increased total mileage covered in a single trip; (C)
opportunities to reach low income individuals; and (D) geographic equity;
and provided further, that not less than $4,000,000 shall be expended for
grants to transit providers to support expanded mobility options for older
adults, persons with disabilities and low-income individuals through the
Community Transit Grant Program ................................................................. $217,450,000
Commonwealth Transportation Fund.................... 37.99%
Education and Transportation Fund ..................... 62.01%
1595-6379 For the operation of the motor vehicle insurance merit rating board,
including the rent, related parking and utility expenses of the board;
provided, that the amount appropriated in this item and the associated
fringe benefit costs shall be borne by insurance companies doing motor
vehicle insurance business within the commonwealth under section 57A
of chapter 6C of the General Laws; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, no safe driver
insurance plan shall require the payment of an unsafe driver point
surcharge for the first offense for a non-criminal motor vehicle traffic
violation as described in chapter 90C of the General Laws ............................. $11,671,807
Commonwealth Transportation Fund....................... 100%
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF EDUCATION.
Department of Elementary and Secondary Education.
1595-0035 For an operating transfer to the Twenty-First Century Education Trust
Fund established in section 35NNN of chapter 10 of the General Laws;
provided, that funds may be used for effective and sustainable
improvement initiatives in public schools designated as in need of
assistance pursuant to the school accountability system established by the
board of elementary and secondary education, and for the purpose of
addressing persistent disparities in achievement among student
subgroups, improving educational opportunities for all students, sharing

Conference Committee Report
best practices for improving classroom learning and supporting
efficiencies within and across school districts ..................................................... $1,000,000
1595-0115 For the Civics Project Trust Fund established in section 2CCCCC of
chapter 29 of the General Laws to promote civics education ............................. $2,500,000
1595-0116 For the Genocide Education Trust Fund, established in section 2MMMMM
of chapter 29 of the General Laws; provided, that said funds shall be
distributed by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education
for purposes related to the instruction of middle and high school students
on the history of genocide, including, but not limited to: (i) development of
curricular materials detailing the underlying causes, international reaction,
progression and aftermath of genocide; and (ii) professional development
training, including, but not limited to, the provision of trainings, seminars,
conferences and materials, for educators to use in the teaching of
genocide .............................................................................................................. $3,000,000
Department of Higher Education.
1595-7066 For the support of the Massachusetts Science, Technology, Engineering,
and Mathematics Grant Fund, referred to as the Pipeline Fund,
established in section 2MMM of chapter 29 of the General Laws ...................... $1,000,000
SECTION 2F.
SECTION 2F. Pursuant to section 6D of chapter 29 of the General Laws, as amended by section 21, the
following table summarizes appropriations made in other sections funded by receipts from the income
surtax pursuant to subsection (d) of section 4 of chapter 62.
Funded through
Funded through Education & Commonwealth Transportation
Transportation Fund Fund Dedication
Item Item Name Total Appropriation Per Cent Amount Per Cent Amount
1595-6368 Massachusetts $605,046,384 11.60% $70,177,859 24.79% $150,000,000
Transportation Trust Fund
1595-6369 Massachusetts Bay $465,150,000 46.25% $215,150,000 53.75% $250,000,000
Transportation Authority
1595-6370 Regional Transit $217,450,000 62.01% $134,832,000 22.99% $50,000,000
Authorities
1596-2414 MASSGrant Plus $85,000,000 100.00% $85,000,000 - -
1596-2422 School Meals $180,000,000 100.00% $180,000,000 - -
1596-2423 Targeted Scholarships $5,000,000 100.00% $5,000,000
1596-2424 Green Schoolworks $2,000,000 100.00% $2,000,000
1596-2436 Mental Health Supports $2,000,000 100.00% $2,000,000 - -
and Wraparounds
1596-2439 State University SUCCESS $14,000,000 100.00% $14,000,000 - -

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
1596-2451 School Transportation $58,415,894 100.00% $58,415,894
Reimbursements
1596-2501 Free Community College $137,048,000 100.00% $137,048,000 - -
3000-1045 C3 Stabilization Grants $475,000,000 78.95% $375,000,000 - -
3000-3060 DTA and DCF Related $597,233,977 20.00% $119,446,795 - -
Childcare
3000-4060 Income-Eligible Childcare $623,593,845 20.00% $124,718,769 - -
3000-6025 Commonwealth Preschool $15,500,000 100.00% $15,500,000 - -
Partnership Initiative
4000-0000 Human Services $449,596,838 - - 22.24% $100,000,000
Transportation
7035-0035 Advanced Placement $2,250,320 100.00% $2,250,320 - -
Math and Science
Programs
7061-0008 Chapter 70 $7,658,399,506 7.64% $585,460,363 - -
7100-0200 University of $866,770,000 1.15% $10,000,000 - -
Massachusetts
7100-4002 Community College $14,000,000 100.00% $14,000,000 - -
SUCCESS Fund
Total $2,150,000,000 $550,000,000
SECTION 3 LOCAL AID DISTRIBUTIONS.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2027 the distribution of unrestricted general government aid to cities and towns of the balance of
the State Lottery and Gaming Fund, as paid from the General Fund in accordance with clause (c) of the
second paragraph of section 35 of chapter 10 of the General Laws, and additional funds from the General
Fund and the Gaming Local Aid Fund, shall be $1,363,109,516 and shall be apportioned to cities and towns
in accordance with this section.
For fiscal year 2027 the total amounts to be distributed and paid to each city, town and regional
school district from item 7061-0008 of section 2, shall be as set forth in the following lists. If there is conflict
between the language of this section and the distribution listed below, the distribution below shall control.
The specified amounts distributed from said item 7061-0008 of said section 2 shall be deemed in full
satisfaction of the amounts due under chapter 70 of the General Laws.
For fiscal year 2027, a district’s school aid shall be calculated according to the provisions of said
chapter 70 of the General Laws. The foundation budget category of “low-income enrollment” for the purpose
of calculating foundation enrollment shall be determined by financial eligibility for certain federal programs,
as defined by the provisions of section 2 of said chapter 70, and including a number of students identified
and approved as low income through the supplemental claiming system established and posted by the
department for that purpose, as well as students identified and approved as homeless for purposes of
calculating the McKinney-Vento homelessness grant program administered by the department, consistent
with the conditions provided for in said section 2 of said chapter 70. Provided further, that the assumed

Conference Committee Report
special education enrollment percentage for vocational school students shall be set at 5.00 per cent and
the assumed special education enrollment percentage for non-vocational school students shall be set at
4.00 per cent.
The per-pupil rates for the employee benefits and fixed charges allotments shall be adjusted by the
foundation employee benefits inflation rate and the per-pupil rates for all other foundation allotments shall
be adjusted by the foundation inflation index. Foundation increments shall be the additional resources
provided for the education of students designated as English learners or low-income; provided, however,
that for low-income students the amount of the foundation increment shall be determined by the low-income
group into which each district is assigned. Foundation budget rates for employee benefits and fixed
charges, guidance and psychological services, special education out-of-district tuition, English learners and
low-income students shall be increased to close the gap between the rates used in fiscal year 2021 and
the rates established in tables 1 and 2 of section 3 of said chapter 70 of the General Laws, consistent with
adjustments prescribed in said section 3 of said chapter 70 and set at the rates identified in the table below.
Required local contributions shall be calculated pursuant to said chapter 70; provided, that municipal
revenue growth factors shall be calculated in a manner consistent with calculations made in fiscal year
2026; provided further, that the total statewide target local contribution shall be 59 per cent and the effort
reduction percentage shall be 100 per cent; and provided further that the minimum aid per pupil dollar
amount shall be $160. Said chapter 70 aid for fiscal year 2027 shall be the greater of: (i) foundation aid; or
(ii) the sum of base aid and minimum aid. No non-operating district shall receive said chapter 70 aid in an
amount greater than the district’s foundation budget.
No payments to cities, towns or counties maintaining an agricultural school under this section shall
be made after November 30 of the fiscal year until the commissioner of revenue certifies acceptance of the
prior fiscal year’s annual financial reports submitted under section 43 of chapter 44 of the General Laws.
Advance payments shall be made for some or all of periodic local reimbursement or assistance programs
to any city, town, regional school district or independent agricultural school that demonstrates an
emergency cash shortfall, as certified by the commissioner of revenue and approved by the secretary of
administration and finance, under guidelines established by the secretary.
Base Rates
Instructional Employee
Classroom & Other Guidance & Special
Instructional Professional Materials, Pupil Operations & Benefits/ Total, All
Administration Specialist Teaching Psychological Education
Leadership Development Equipment & Services Maintenance Fixed Categories
Teachers Services Services Tuition
Technology Charges
Pre-school 234.97 424.36 1,945.84 499.05 76.96 281.62 226.58 56.31 540.34 1,036.80 0.00 5,322.83
Kindergarten
234.97 424.36 1,945.84 499.05 76.96 281.62 226.58 56.31 540.34 1,036.80 0.00 5,322.83
half-day
Kindergarten
469.93 848.74 3,891.69 998.14 154.00 563.28 453.16 112.67 1,080.67 2,073.56 0.00 10,645.84
full-day
Elementary 469.93 848.74 3,891.63 998.14 154.02 563.28 453.16 168.97 1,080.67 2,073.56 0.00 10,702.10
Junior/Middle 469.93 848.74 3,424.65 718.52 166.94 563.28 453.16 276.02 1,171.58 2,239.93 0.00 10,332.75
High School 469.93 848.74 5,036.23 598.16 161.88 901.24 472.52 636.49 1,135.97 1,977.51 0.00 12,238.67
Vocational 469.93 848.74 8,561.64 598.16 267.63 1,577.15 472.52 636.49 2,126.02 2,488.68 0.00 18,046.96
Special Education & Incremental Rates
Instructional Employee
Classroom & Other Guidance & Operations Special
Instructional Professional Materials, Pupil Benefits/ Total, All
Administration Specialist Teaching Psychological & Education
Leadership Development Equipment & Services Fixed Categories
Teachers Services Services Maintenance Tuition
Technology Charges
Special Ed-in
3,243.28 0.00 10,702.02 9,992.32 516.26 450.60 0.00 0.00 3,622.90 4,718.22 0.00 33,245.60
district

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
Special Ed-
4,137.24 0.00 0.00 63.20 0.00 0.00 0.00 0.00 0.00 0.00 39,280.88 43,481.32
tuitioned out
English
learners PK- 120.50 210.87 1,476.04 210.87 60.24 150.61 90.37 30.13 361.48 384.32 0.00 3,095.43
5
English
129.25 226.15 1,583.04 226.15 64.61 161.53 96.93 32.32 387.68 412.17 0.00 3,319.83
learners 6-8
English
learners high 155.07 271.39 1,899.66 271.39 77.53 193.83 116.30 38.77 465.22 494.61 0.00 3,983.77
school/voc
Low-income
57.28 271.38 2,649.26 0.00 128.53 19.70 107.27 557.44 0.00 497.03 0.00 4,287.89
group 1
Low-income
60.86 288.35 2,814.85 0.00 136.57 20.94 113.98 592.28 0.00 528.10 0.00 4,555.93
group 2
Low-income
64.44 305.32 2,980.43 0.00 144.60 22.17 120.69 627.13 0.00 559.16 0.00 4,823.94
group 3
Low-income
68.02 322.27 3,146.00 0.00 152.63 23.39 127.39 661.96 0.00 590.23 0.00 5,091.89
group 4
Low-income
71.59 339.23 3,311.58 0.00 160.67 24.63 134.10 696.80 0.00 621.29 0.00 5,359.89
group 5
Low-income
80.19 379.95 3,708.98 0.00 179.94 27.59 150.18 780.42 0.00 695.85 0.00 6,003.10
group 6
Low-income
88.78 420.64 4,106.36 0.00 199.22 30.54 166.28 864.04 0.00 770.39 0.00 6,646.25
group 7
Low-income
97.38 461.36 4,503.75 0.00 218.50 33.50 182.37 947.65 0.00 844.95 0.00 7,289.46
group 8
Low-income
105.97 502.07 4,901.14 0.00 237.78 36.44 198.45 1,031.27 0.00 919.51 0.00 7,932.63
group 9
Low-income
114.55 542.78 5,298.53 0.00 257.06 39.41 214.55 1,114.88 0.00 994.08 0.00 8,575.84
group 10
Low-income
128.88 610.61 5,960.85 0.00 289.19 44.33 241.38 1,254.25 0.00 1,118.32 0.00 9,647.81
group 11
Low-income
143.20 678.47 6,623.17 0.00 321.32 49.26 268.19 1,393.60 0.00 1,242.58 0.00 10,719.79
group 12
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
ABINGTON $15,164,118 $2,543,535
ACTON $0 $1,863,871
ACUSHNET $7,640,852 $1,949,437
ADAMS $12,393 $2,972,046
AGAWAM $27,760,200 $4,748,876
ALFORD $0 $19,755
AMESBURY $10,270,009 $2,518,604
AMHERST $6,703,939 $10,742,250
ANDOVER $16,197,960 $2,405,773

Conference Committee Report
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
AQUINNAH $0 $4,942
ARLINGTON $21,226,373 $9,725,663
ASHBURNHAM $0 $1,026,326
ASHBY $0 $563,777
ASHFIELD $93,683 $240,366
ASHLAND $12,447,058 $1,782,579
ATHOL $0 $3,374,596
ATTLEBORO $63,226,636 $7,365,329
AUBURN $16,115,849 $2,225,253
AVON $4,488,051 $890,728
AYER $0 $989,670
BARNSTABLE $26,894,457 $2,860,364
BARRE $0 $1,153,149
BECKET $76,923 $122,470
BEDFORD $7,054,469 $1,506,457
BELCHERTOWN $15,052,600 $2,202,637
BELLINGHAM $10,967,237 $2,208,493
BELMONT $13,660,219 $2,954,341
BERKLEY $4,414,688 $793,873
BERLIN $0 $268,381
BERNARDSTON $0 $374,201
BEVERLY $16,388,255 $7,517,287
BILLERICA $22,129,264 $7,495,264
BLACKSTONE $162,423 $1,758,565

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
BLANDFORD $77,586 $164,650
BOLTON $3,547 $273,529
BOSTON $254,265,561 $238,832,800
BOURNE $6,146,375 $1,930,058
BOXBOROUGH $32,909 $341,189
BOXFORD $2,161,403 $646,869
BOYLSTON $54,141 $452,196
BRAINTREE $22,754,750 $7,351,732
BREWSTER $1,547,125 $541,797
BRIDGEWATER $190,196 $4,698,296
BRIMFIELD $1,831,387 $505,652
BROCKTON $288,027,232 $26,733,675
BROOKFIELD $2,002,366 $634,889
BROOKLINE $18,876,413 $8,248,159
BUCKLAND $7,677 $392,157
BURLINGTON $11,059,876 $3,404,965
CAMBRIDGE $23,847,887 $27,485,600
CANTON $10,034,440 $2,801,859
CARLISLE $1,625,134 $298,842
CARVER $11,067,283 $1,884,965
CHARLEMONT $120,531 $224,499
CHARLTON $0 $1,877,795
CHATHAM $0 $218,671
CHELMSFORD $16,278,424 $6,530,816

Conference Committee Report
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
CHELSEA $131,827,785 $10,480,663
CHESHIRE $0 $784,729
CHESTER $115,723 $231,256
CHESTERFIELD $108,282 $178,402
CHICOPEE $101,370,278 $14,690,104
CHILMARK $0 $10,271
CLARKSBURG $2,235,621 $463,576
CLINTON $22,950,682 $3,022,739
COHASSET $3,556,395 $683,328
COLRAIN $8,760 $369,316
CONCORD $4,818,025 $1,535,715
CONWAY $669,446 $231,978
CUMMINGTON $59,811 $108,284
DALTON $337,786 $1,454,668
DANVERS $10,648,870 $3,699,772
DARTMOUTH $11,780,277 $3,313,971
DEDHAM $10,556,123 $4,215,220
DEERFIELD $1,265,859 $625,499
DENNIS $0 $749,316
DEVENS $308,558 $0
DIGHTON $0 $1,006,728
DOUGLAS $9,358,683 $957,448
DOVER $1,227,551 $268,267
DRACUT $28,733,489 $4,541,548

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
DUDLEY $11,040 $2,294,423
DUNSTABLE $0 $324,094
DUXBURY $7,763,410 $1,184,780
EAST BRIDGEWATER $13,677,749 $1,942,155
EAST BROOKFIELD $221,080 $373,731
EAST LONGMEADOW $16,046,736 $1,889,133
EASTHAM $588,199 $212,821
EASTHAMPTON $9,308,822 $3,596,880
EASTON $12,037,547 $2,860,639
EDGARTOWN $1,331,177 $107,292
EGREMONT $0 $85,265
ERVING $629,866 $91,704
ESSEX $0 $323,850
EVERETT $128,092,523 $8,896,291
FAIRHAVEN $10,285,363 $2,899,688
FALL RIVER $250,598,336 $30,311,887
FALMOUTH $10,478,249 $1,886,971
FITCHBURG $92,786,527 $10,891,647
FLORIDA $579,687 $65,428
FOXBOROUGH $10,485,512 $1,951,989
FRAMINGHAM $93,930,862 $12,805,692
FRANKLIN $31,218,083 $3,249,613
FREETOWN $16,860 $1,232,817
GARDNER $33,019,774 $5,410,325

Conference Committee Report
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
GEORGETOWN $6,189,672 $936,657
GILL $0 $312,007
GLOUCESTER $12,634,061 $5,145,300
GOSHEN $111,470 $104,540
GOSNOLD $0 $2,906
GRAFTON $14,015,088 $2,051,844
GRANBY $5,029,860 $1,134,491
GRANVILLE $139,520 $207,959
GREAT BARRINGTON $0 $984,179
GREENFIELD $17,009,024 $4,060,650
GROTON $0 $1,023,199
GROVELAND $65,470 $943,533
HADLEY $1,528,446 $592,804
HALIFAX $3,735,263 $1,173,275
HAMILTON $0 $876,877
HAMPDEN $0 $885,063
HANCOCK $475,796 $74,114
HANOVER $8,471,971 $2,723,346
HANSON $40,519 $1,653,958
HARDWICK $10,500 $596,051
HARVARD $2,555,491 $1,888,710
HARWICH $0 $600,968
HATFIELD $1,012,456 $406,165
HAVERHILL $96,427,042 $12,631,775

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
HAWLEY $32,248 $55,848
HEATH $0 $108,138
HINGHAM $9,996,377 $2,088,302
HINSDALE $104,923 $287,694
HOLBROOK $13,156,698 $1,901,826
HOLDEN $14,521 $2,488,649
HOLLAND $1,080,634 $264,664
HOLLISTON $9,981,860 $2,010,745
HOLYOKE $110,598,472 $12,907,079
HOPEDALE $6,585,260 $844,902
HOPKINTON $11,540,499 $1,074,296
HUBBARDSTON $0 $584,753
HUDSON $14,243,100 $2,591,902
HULL $4,288,024 $2,703,927
HUNTINGTON $436,448 $441,506
IPSWICH $4,776,506 $2,076,268
KINGSTON $6,227,857 $1,268,350
LAKEVILLE $119,449 $1,080,918
LANCASTER $0 $1,239,018
LANESBOROUGH $7,201 $446,050
LAWRENCE $332,192,248 $25,025,399
LEE $2,392,845 $806,456
LEICESTER $11,665,327 $2,227,817
LENOX $1,533,843 $691,157

Conference Committee Report
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
LEOMINSTER $76,157,655 $7,375,535
LEVERETT $437,488 $232,185
LEXINGTON $20,399,075 $2,077,091
LEYDEN $0 $106,546
LINCOLN $1,535,658 $885,065
LITTLETON $5,511,890 $938,351
LONGMEADOW $8,220,391 $1,822,393
LOWELL $275,966,413 $32,129,298
LUDLOW $15,369,913 $3,925,759
LUNENBURG $9,485,250 $1,379,895
LYNN $327,335,160 $28,543,765
LYNNFIELD $6,850,530 $1,363,434
MALDEN $70,838,845 $16,033,345
MANCHESTER $0 $303,296
MANSFIELD $20,854,717 $2,905,080
MARBLEHEAD $7,390,439 $1,519,992
MARION $1,305,942 $306,812
MARLBOROUGH $52,707,503 $7,015,713
MARSHFIELD $16,701,173 $2,833,228
MASHPEE $5,435,000 $530,463
MATTAPOISETT $1,154,853 $538,494
MAYNARD $6,186,200 $2,018,737
MEDFIELD $7,630,178 $1,877,600
MEDFORD $19,272,206 $15,481,152

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
MEDWAY $11,703,987 $1,591,897
MELROSE $13,911,036 $6,565,933
MENDON $38,052 $541,272
MERRIMAC $36,094 $1,085,679
METHUEN $72,676,678 $7,061,567
MIDDLEBOROUGH $23,585,325 $3,203,133
MIDDLEFIELD $13,290 $68,447
MIDDLETON $2,046,759 $730,663
MILFORD $55,270,258 $3,967,606
MILLBURY $9,513,233 $2,284,226
MILLIS $5,441,676 $1,354,807
MILLVILLE $73,662 $525,106
MILTON $13,473,284 $4,158,597
MONROE $170,066 $23,574
MONSON $7,992,519 $1,673,688
MONTAGUE $0 $1,835,167
MONTEREY $0 $62,827
MONTGOMERY $32,160 $112,580
MOUNT WASHINGTON $13,818 $38,298
NAHANT $663,225 $488,793
NANTUCKET $5,099,197 $164,754
NATICK $15,344,137 $4,945,886
NEEDHAM $15,595,834 $2,336,345
NEW ASHFORD $123,072 $26,586

Conference Committee Report
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
NEW BEDFORD $271,241,737 $29,304,918
NEW BRAINTREE $0 $170,079
NEW MARLBOROUGH $0 $80,154
NEW SALEM $0 $134,698
NEWBURY $16,934 $680,239
NEWBURYPORT $6,510,535 $3,284,344
NEWTON $32,235,914 $7,775,197
NORFOLK $4,034,619 $1,256,145
NORTH ADAMS $16,898,002 $5,620,292
NORTH ANDOVER $13,775,969 $2,713,690
NORTH ATTLEBOROUGH $22,877,567 $3,747,647
NORTH BROOKFIELD $5,136,726 $1,020,822
NORTH READING $8,429,947 $2,300,058
NORTHAMPTON $9,019,229 $5,652,463
NORTHBOROUGH $4,904,088 $1,469,794
NORTHBRIDGE $16,692,113 $2,722,108
NORTHFIELD $0 $466,004
NORTON $14,044,622 $2,693,320
NORWELL $5,882,618 $1,395,727
NORWOOD $19,086,531 $5,975,737
OAK BLUFFS $2,115,129 $115,314
OAKHAM $0 $249,172
ORANGE $7,131,555 $2,060,834
ORLEANS $516,774 $244,347

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
OTIS $0 $52,837
OXFORD $12,686,783 $2,639,303
PALMER $12,360,019 $2,570,647
PAXTON $0 $701,204
PEABODY $39,044,161 $9,301,050
PELHAM $358,213 $205,641
PEMBROKE $15,014,594 $2,190,549
PEPPERELL $0 $1,924,965
PERU $91,030 $146,801
PETERSHAM $727,308 $149,346
PHILLIPSTON $0 $239,206
PITTSFIELD $69,313,721 $11,021,593
PLAINFIELD $83,804 $65,819
PLAINVILLE $3,291,813 $996,428
PLYMOUTH $31,322,417 $5,211,885
PLYMPTON $1,239,805 $310,775
PRINCETON $0 $387,398
PROVINCETOWN $341,239 $190,112
QUINCY $49,152,393 $24,411,163
RANDOLPH $32,003,795 $6,676,064
RAYNHAM $0 $1,496,959
READING $12,931,313 $4,182,317
REHOBOTH $0 $1,367,802
REVERE $108,436,838 $13,173,039

Conference Committee Report
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
RICHMOND $573,273 $141,962
ROCHESTER $2,609,552 $559,178
ROCKLAND $20,241,858 $3,394,721
ROCKPORT $1,809,026 $580,439
ROWE $163,075 $6,808
ROWLEY $18,508 $705,581
ROYALSTON $0 $231,251
RUSSELL $255,579 $317,089
RUTLAND $0 $1,203,237
SALEM $32,898,737 $8,855,991
SALISBURY $15,791 $834,470
SANDISFIELD $0 $47,849
SANDWICH $8,403,816 $1,505,108
SAUGUS $16,641,482 $4,731,013
SAVOY $537,259 $148,251
SCITUATE $7,665,955 $2,610,570
SEEKONK $8,599,658 $1,614,375
SHARON $11,913,046 $1,839,438
SHEFFIELD $17,905 $320,385
SHELBURNE $0 $336,365
SHERBORN $1,011,345 $291,675
SHIRLEY $0 $1,677,021
SHREWSBURY $23,420,930 $3,670,563
SHUTESBURY $688,342 $220,354

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
SOMERSET $11,280,197 $2,005,670
SOMERVILLE $23,366,282 $31,969,231
SOUTH HADLEY $11,417,059 $3,356,200
SOUTHAMPTON $2,819,438 $826,761
SOUTHBOROUGH $3,671,623 $595,699
SOUTHBRIDGE $36,441,720 $4,493,349
SOUTHWICK $220,059 $1,623,513
SPENCER $34,709 $2,890,852
SPRINGFIELD $583,158,575 $48,173,698
STERLING $0 $906,609
STOCKBRIDGE $0 $133,878
STONEHAM $8,291,383 $4,770,974
STOUGHTON $31,998,924 $4,147,850
STOW $0 $560,707
STURBRIDGE $5,431,034 $1,016,754
SUDBURY $6,593,364 $1,844,049
SUNDERLAND $954,756 $650,137
SUTTON $6,197,181 $1,021,896
SWAMPSCOTT $6,109,390 $1,693,333
SWANSEA $11,637,498 $2,433,954
TAUNTON $109,617,416 $10,825,630
TEMPLETON $11,493 $1,786,443
TEWKSBURY $15,173,007 $3,632,693
TISBURY $1,794,439 $144,948

Conference Committee Report
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
TOLLAND $0 $25,295
TOPSFIELD $1,720,627 $798,842
TOWNSEND $0 $1,689,527
TRURO $493,226 $48,806
TYNGSBOROUGH $8,308,620 $1,269,103
TYRINGHAM $72,676 $17,792
UPTON $39,979 $705,562
UXBRIDGE $10,361,060 $1,791,384
WAKEFIELD $9,949,023 $4,355,758
WALES $1,221,948 $304,407
WALPOLE $11,377,480 $3,314,307
WALTHAM $27,305,086 $12,338,203
WARE $14,934,620 $2,210,665
WAREHAM $17,155,112 $2,586,488
WARREN $12,223 $1,157,477
WARWICK $401,664 $162,970
WASHINGTON $37,233 $120,686
WATERTOWN $8,964,426 $8,526,784
WAYLAND $8,378,020 $1,196,422
WEBSTER $24,259,540 $3,184,965
WELLESLEY $11,568,736 $1,764,077
WELLFLEET $342,443 $89,557
WENDELL $0 $222,676
WENHAM $0 $559,309

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
WEST BOYLSTON $3,503,475 $1,034,739
WEST BRIDGEWATER $7,286,583 $854,844
WEST BROOKFIELD $328,719 $628,377
WEST NEWBURY $13,151 $392,506
WEST SPRINGFIELD $47,772,002 $4,624,697
WEST STOCKBRIDGE $0 $127,852
WEST TISBURY $0 $249,185
WESTBOROUGH $13,452,856 $1,554,403
WESTFIELD $46,092,037 $8,076,169
WESTFORD $19,692,829 $2,777,115
WESTHAMPTON $527,648 $189,015
WESTMINSTER $0 $859,011
WESTON $5,291,459 $521,886
WESTPORT $6,077,452 $1,600,442
WESTWOOD $8,250,386 $988,753
WEYMOUTH $31,745,663 $11,205,022
WHATELY $367,983 $175,574
WHITMAN $174,351 $3,106,130
WILBRAHAM $0 $1,901,052
WILLIAMSBURG $892,871 $390,769
WILLIAMSTOWN $0 $1,238,478
WILMINGTON $13,051,370 $3,224,984
WINCHENDON $14,590,171 $2,157,341
WINCHESTER $12,084,323 $1,962,563

Conference Committee Report
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
WINDSOR $28,984 $133,896
WINTHROP $10,768,036 $5,371,254
WOBURN $16,125,949 $7,704,762
WORCESTER $437,762,216 $53,065,990
WORTHINGTON $514,362 $162,814
WRENTHAM $4,317,997 $1,225,180
YARMOUTH $0 $1,695,986
TOTAL MUNICIPAL AID $6,695,466,289 $1,363,109,516
Regional School District
ACTON BOXBOROUGH $17,981,291 $0
AMHERST PELHAM $10,276,651 $0
ASHBURNHAM WESTMINSTER $16,612,077 $0
ASSABET VALLEY $11,659,434 $0
ATHOL ROYALSTON $26,295,109 $0
AYER SHIRLEY $9,264,373 $0
BERKSHIRE HILLS $3,675,288 $0
BERLIN BOYLSTON $3,320,001 $0
BLACKSTONE MILLVILLE $12,330,088 $0
BLACKSTONE VALLEY $9,795,822 $0
BLUE HILLS $7,947,314 $0
BRIDGEWATER RAYNHAM $35,105,190 $0
BRISTOL COUNTY $5,343,254 $0

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
BRISTOL PLYMOUTH $14,884,729 $0
CAPE COD $3,692,990 $0
CENTRAL BERKSHIRE $10,311,337 $0
CHESTERFIELD GOSHEN $814,702 $0
CONCORD CARLISLE $3,799,593 $0
DENNIS YARMOUTH $14,475,005 $0
DIGHTON REHOBOTH $14,411,508 $0
DOVER SHERBORN $3,121,252 $0
DUDLEY CHARLTON $26,343,197 $0
ESSEX NORTH SHORE $9,368,948 $0
FARMINGTON RIVER $799,554 $0
FRANKLIN COUNTY $6,291,558 $0
FREETOWN LAKEVILLE $12,750,459 $0
FRONTIER $3,128,227 $0
GATEWAY $6,461,790 $0
GILL MONTAGUE $8,209,343 $0
GREATER FALL RIVER $25,119,750 $0
GREATER LAWRENCE $42,612,739 $0
GREATER LOWELL $38,740,488 $0
GREATER NEW BEDFORD $39,925,494 $0
GROTON DUNSTABLE $12,183,943 $0
HAMILTON WENHAM $4,778,969 $0
HAMPDEN WILBRAHAM $13,479,210 $0
HAMPSHIRE $3,603,057 $0

Conference Committee Report
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
HAWLEMONT $682,610 $0
HOOSAC VALLEY $12,635,071 $0
KING PHILIP $8,675,978 $0
LINCOLN SUDBURY $4,450,937 $0
MANCHESTER ESSEX $3,684,266 $0
MARTHAS VINEYARD $3,869,228 $0
MASCONOMET $6,085,593 $0
MENDON UPTON $13,557,074 $0
MINUTEMAN $3,241,069 $0
MOHAWK TRAIL $6,489,734 $0
MONOMOY $4,866,955 $0
MONTACHUSETT $18,997,205 $0
MOUNT GREYLOCK $5,302,346 $0
NARRAGANSETT $13,247,157 $0
NASHOBA $11,025,818 $0
NASHOBA VALLEY $5,124,864 $0
NAUSET $4,176,089 $0
NEW SALEM WENDELL $953,720 $0
NORFOLK COUNTY $1,574,815 $0
NORTH MIDDLESEX $22,082,919 $0
NORTHAMPTON SMITH $983,931 $0
NORTHBORO SOUTHBORO $3,871,056 $0
NORTHEAST METROPOLITAN $16,719,585 $0
NORTHERN BERKSHIRE $7,181,352 $0

Fiscal Year 2027 Conference Report
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
OLD COLONY $4,401,625 $0
OLD ROCHESTER $3,861,601 $0
PATHFINDER $7,988,454 $0
PENTUCKET $14,470,950 $0
PIONEER $4,235,099 $0
QUABBIN $17,724,542 $0
QUABOAG $10,763,375 $0
RALPH C MAHAR $7,293,658 $0
SHAWSHEEN VALLEY $7,202,253 $0
SILVER LAKE $11,068,178 $0
SOMERSET BERKLEY $7,346,821 $0
SOUTH MIDDLESEX $10,058,369 $0
SOUTH SHORE $6,073,177 $0
SOUTHEASTERN $26,183,132 $0
SOUTHERN BERKSHIRE $2,340,395 $0
SOUTHERN WORCESTER $14,902,363 $0
SOUTHWICK TOLLAND GRANVILLE $10,358,346 $0
SPENCER EAST BROOKFIELD $14,547,460 $0
TANTASQUA $11,921,949 $0
TRI COUNTY $6,259,646 $0
TRITON $9,977,405 $0
UPISLAND $1,126,972 $0
UPPER CAPE COD $4,862,780 $0
WACHUSETT $38,607,953 $0

Conference Committee Report
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
WHITMAN HANSON $26,731,986 $0
WHITTIER $14,231,622 $0
TOTAL REGIONAL AID $962,933,217 $0
TOTAL MUNICIPAL AND REGIONAL AID $7,658,399,506 $1,363,109,516

1 SECTION 4. Section 178C of chapter 6 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
2 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the figure “265”, in line 73, the following
3 words:- ; rape of a child who has attained the age of 16 but is under the age of 18 or indecent
4 assault and battery on a child who has attained the age of 14 but is under the age of 18 by a
5 mandated reporter under section 23A1/2 of said chapter 265.
6 SECTION 5. Section 2 of chapter 6C of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
7 amended by striking out, in line 13, the figure “11” and inserting in place thereof the following
8 figure:- 13.
9 SECTION 6. Said section 2 of said chapter 6C, as so appearing, is hereby further
10 amended by striking out, in line 38, the figure “6” and inserting in place thereof the following
11 figure:- 7.
12 SECTION 7. Section 25 of chapter 10 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
13 amended by inserting after the word “appropriation”, in line 13, the following words:- ;
14 provided, however, that the commission may enter into contracts or group agreements for lottery
15 games not currently or previously authorized by the commission, resulting in a contractor or
16 licensor to be paid a specified percentage of net or gross revenues of such game, and such
17 payments shall not be subject to appropriation; provided further, that prizes to the holders of
18 winning tickets or shares shall not be less than 45 per cent of the total revenue accruing from the
19 sale of lottery tickets.
20 SECTION 8. Chapter 12A of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out section
21 6, as so appearing, and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
22 Section 6. The office shall promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to chapter 30A
23 which shall govern its proceedings.
1

24 Regulations adopted by the office and a summary thereof shall be submitted to the
25 general court and referred to an appropriate joint committee as determined by the clerks of the
26 senate and house of representatives not later than 5 days after such submission. The joint
27 committee may vote to approve or disapprove the regulations. The regulations shall be deemed
28 approved if a majority of the members of either branch on the committee do not disapprove of
29 the regulations within 45 days after the filing.
30 Upon the approval of the joint committee or upon no action being taken by 1 either
31 branch of the committee after the time for consideration has expired, the office shall forward the
32 regulations to the state secretary who shall publish the same in accordance with section 5 of
33 chapter 30A.
34 SECTION 9. Section 10 of said chapter 12A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
35 striking out, in lines 7 and 8, the words “When authorized by a majority vote of the inspector
36 general council, the inspector general shall” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
37 The inspector general may.
38 SECTION 10. Said section 10 of said chapter 12A, as so appearing, is hereby further
39 amended by inserting after the word “Any”, in line 11, the following words:- reports or.
40 SECTION 11. Section 15 of said chapter 12A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
41 striking out the sixth paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
42 A person summonsed to attend and testify under oath shall appear and testify under oath
43 before not less than 2 persons designated by the inspector general, 1 of whom shall be the
44 inspector general or an employee of the office who is an attorney admitted to practice in the
45 commonwealth. Upon majority vote by the inspector general council, a representative of the
2

46 inspector general council may attend the testimony. The inspector general may report on the
47 testimony to the inspector general council in executive session.
48 SECTION 12. Chapter 23N of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out
49 section 17, as so appearing, and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
50 Section 17. There shall be a Sports Wagering Fund which shall receive revenues collected
51 pursuant to sections 6 and 14. The fund shall not be subject to appropriation. The commission
52 shall be the trustee of the fund and shall transfer monies from the fund as follows:
53 (i) 45 per cent to the General Fund;
54 (ii) 10 per cent to the Workforce Investment Trust Fund established in section 18;
55 (iii) 2 per cent to the Economic Development Trust Fund established in section 16I of
56 chapter 6A;
57 (iv) 27.5 per cent to the Gaming Local Aid Fund established in section 63 of chapter 23K;
58 (v) 1 per cent to the Youth Development and Achievement Fund established in section 19;
59 (vi) 9 per cent to the Public Health Trust Fund established in section 58 of chapter 23K;
60 and
61 (vii) 5.5 per cent to the Sports and Entertainment Events Fund established in section 13W
62 of chapter 23A.
63 SECTION 13. Section 18 of said chapter 23N, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
64 striking out, in line 5, the figure “16” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 17.
65 SECTION 14. Said section 18 of said chapter 23N, as so appearing, is hereby further
66 amended by striking out subsection (b) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:-
67 (b) The fund shall be administered by the secretary of economic development in
68 consultation with the secretary of labor and workforce development. Money in the fund may be:
3

69 (i) expended to support existing workforce development programs administered by state agencies
70 or quasi-public agencies that develop and strengthen workforce opportunities for low-income
71 communities or unemployed or underemployed individuals or vulnerable youth and young
72 adults; (ii) expended to support internships, apprenticeships or other work-based learning
73 programs or programs that provide vocational or professional training to address workforce skills
74 gaps or workforce readiness in priority economic sectors; and (iii) competitively granted to
75 eligible recipients described in subsection (c).
76 SECTION 15. Said section 18 of said chapter 23N, as so appearing, is hereby further
77 amended by striking out, in line 25, the word “and” and inserting in place thereof the following
78 word:- or.
79 SECTION 16. Said section 18 of said chapter 23N, as so appearing, is hereby further
80 amended by inserting after the word “permits”, in line 31, the following word:- , apprenticeships.
81 SECTION 17. Said section 18 of said chapter 23N, as so appearing, is hereby further
82 amended by striking out, in line 50, the words “housing and”.
83 SECTION 18. Section 5G of chapter 29 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
84 amended by striking out, in lines 16 to 18, inclusive, the words “the average annual rate of
85 growth in United States gross domestic product over the preceding 5 years based on the most
86 recently available ” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- 95 per cent of the
87 average of final certified capital gains tax revenues for the prior 10 fiscal years, including the
88 most recently ended fiscal year, adjusted for inflation based on the most recently available
89 national gross domestic product price index.
90 SECTION 19. Said chapter 29 is hereby further amended by inserting after section 5G
91 the following 2 sections:-
4

92 Section 5G1/4. There shall be a standing stabilization fund and long-term liability
93 financing task force to review and make recommendations relative to: (i) the appropriate long-
94 term level of funding for the Commonwealth Stabilization Fund established pursuant to section
95 2H; (ii) the appropriate level and means of funding for long-term financial liabilities of the
96 commonwealth; and (iii) amendments to the mechanisms that provide funding for the
97 Commonwealth Stabilization Fund and other long-term financial liabilities, including the
98 provisions of section 5G.
99 The task force shall review: (i) the statutory threshold for excess capital gains collections
100 established in said section 5G in consideration of historical and estimated future capital gains
101 collections; (ii) the disbursement percentages required under said section 5G; (iii) best practices
102 related to the funding of long-term financial liabilities among states; (iv) best practices related to
103 the funding and size of stabilization and disaster relief funds among states; (v) the impacts of
104 relevant fiscal policies on the commonwealth’s credit ratings; (vi) an assessment of potential
105 fiscal impacts to the commonwealth resulting from natural disasters, with consideration for
106 historical experience and trends; and (vii) any other relevant fiscal factors to ensure the most
107 prudent use of state revenues. The task force shall consider said disbursement percentages in
108 consideration of the relative size or funding level of the Commonwealth Stabilization Fund, the
109 State Retiree Benefits Trust Fund established pursuant to section 24 of chapter 32A, the
110 Commonwealth’s Pension Liability Fund established pursuant to subsection (e) of subdivision 8
111 of section 22 of chapter 32 and other long-term financial liabilities of the commonwealth.
112 The task force shall consist of: the secretary of administration and finance who shall
113 serve as chair; the state treasurer or a designee; the comptroller or a designee; the commissioner
114 of revenue or a designee; 1 person to be appointed by the governor who shall be an expert in
5

115 public finance and who shall be a resident of the commonwealth; and 1 person to be appointed
116 by the state treasurer who shall be an expert in state public finance.
117 The task force shall report on its analysis and issue recommendations to the clerks of the
118 senate and house of representatives not later than June 1, 2030 and every 5 years thereafter.
119 Section 5G1/2. The executive office for administration and finance, in consultation with
120 the department of revenue, shall annually conduct a multi-year budget forecast and evaluate the
121 potential prospective stress impacts of economic scenarios, to be determined by the secretary of
122 administration and finance, for at least the next 3 fiscal years including, but not limited to: (i)
123 notable causes of potential deficiencies and key risk factors impacting the state budget; (ii)
124 potential effects of economic changes on tax revenue collections and spending pressures; and
125 (iii) sufficiency of the Commonwealth Stabilization Fund established in section 2H and other
126 reserve balances, as identified by the secretary, in offsetting potential revenue declines and
127 spending pressures. The executive office shall submit a report to the senate and house
128 committees on ways and means annually, not later than October 31, with the results of the multi-
129 year forecast and stress impact evaluation.
130 SECTION 20. Said chapter 29 is hereby further amended by inserting after section
131 2OOOOOO the following section:-
132 Section 2PPPPPP. (a) There shall be a separate, non-budgeted special revenue fund
133 known as the Retired Police Dog Care Fund, which shall be administered by the secretary of
134 public safety and security. The fund shall be credited with: (i) appropriations or other money
135 authorized or transferred by the general court and specifically designated to be credited to the
136 fund; (ii) funds from public and private sources including, but not limited to, gifts, grants and
137 donations; and (iii) interest earned on money in the fund. The unexpended balance in the fund at
6

138 the end of a fiscal year shall remain available for expenditure in subsequent fiscal years. No
139 expenditure made from the fund shall cause the fund to be in deficit.
140 (b) Amounts credited to the fund shall be expended, without further appropriation, to
141 make grants to nonprofit institutions to provide care and medical services to retired police dogs.
142 The secretary of public safety and security shall be responsible for ensuring that funds are
143 properly allocated to organizations for the care and medical needs of retired police dogs. For the
144 purposes of this section, “retired police dog” shall mean a dog that was owned by a police
145 department or police agency of the commonwealth, or any political subdivision thereof, and used
146 by the department or agency for official duties; provided, however, that “retired police dog” shall
147 include a police dog used by and retired from a federal agency operating in the commonwealth to
148 perform services within the commonwealth.
149 (c) Annually, not later than March 1, the secretary of public safety and security shall issue
150 a report to the clerks of the senate and house of representatives, the joint committee on public
151 safety and homeland security and the senate and house committees on ways and means on the
152 fund’s activities including, but not limited to, amounts credited to the fund, amounts expended
153 from the fund and any unexpended balance.
154 SECTION 21. Section 6D of said chapter 29, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is
155 hereby amended by striking out, in lines 24 to 26, inclusive, the words “set forth appropriations
156 funded from the Education and Transportation Fund and Education and Transportation
157 Innovation and Capital Fund” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- be a summary
158 table of appropriations made in other sections funded by receipts from the income surtax
159 pursuant to subsection (d) of section 4 of chapter 62.
7

160 SECTION 22. Section 1 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as most recently amended by
161 section 21 of chapter 73 of the acts of 2025, is hereby further amended by inserting after the
162 definition of “Constitutional officers” the following definition:-
163 “Cost of Living Reserve Fund”, a fund established in subdivision (6B) of section 22 to
164 provide for the reservation of money for future cost of living liabilities of the retirement system;
165 provided, however, that there shall be 1 fund for the state employees’ and teachers’ retirement
166 systems and 1 fund each for any retirement system that opts in pursuant to said subdivision (6B)
167 of said section 22.
168 SECTION 23. Said section 1 of said chapter 32, as so amended, is hereby further
169 amended by inserting after the definition of “Employer” the following definition:-
170 “Excess investment income”, the amount in any calendar year where all gains from
171 invested funds of a retirement system results in earnings in excess of the investment return
172 assumption set in the system’s most recent actuarial valuation. Such amount, in excess of said
173 investment return assumption, shall be based on the market rate of return during a calendar year
174 on the balance of total assets of the system at the close of business on December 31 of the prior
175 calendar year, less the amount required to be derived by the investment return assumption set in
176 said valuation. Not later than 90 days after the end of said calendar year, the relevant actuary of a
177 system shall certify the total excess investment income of the system.
178 SECTION 24. Section 22 of said chapter 32, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is
179 hereby amended by striking out, in line 6, the word “seven”.
180 SECTION 25. Said section 22 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further
181 amended by striking out, in lines 9 and 10, the words “and the Commonwealth’s Pension
8

182 Liability Fund” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- the Commonwealth’s
183 Pension Liability Fund and the Cost of Living Reserve Fund.
184 SECTION 26. Paragraph (a) of subdivision (6) of said section 22 of said chapter 32, as so
185 appearing, is hereby amended by adding the following clause:-
186 (vi) In any calendar year, prior to making the transfers required by clause (iii), an amount
187 equal to 7.5 per cent of the excess investment income shall be transferred to the Cost of Living
188 Reserve Fund for the state employees’ and teachers’ retirement systems. For a system other than
189 the state employees’ and teachers’ retirement systems that has accepted subdivision (6B), an
190 amount equal to 7.5 per cent of the excess investment income shall be transferred to said
191 system’s Cost of Living Reserve Fund; provided, however, that no further transfers shall be made
192 pursuant to this clause to a system other than the state employees’ and teachers’ retirement
193 systems after completion of the transfer required by paragraph (d) of subdivision (6B).
194 SECTION 27. Said section 22 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further
195 amended by inserting after subdivision (6A) the following subdivision:-
196 (6B)(a) There shall be: (i) a Cost of Living Reserve Fund for the state employees’ and
197 teachers’ retirement system; and (ii) a Cost of Living Reserve Fund for each retirement system
198 other than the state employees’ and teachers’ retirement systems that accepts this subdivision
199 pursuant to paragraph (b). The Cost of Living Reserve Funds shall be credited all amounts set
200 aside pursuant to clause (vi) of paragraph (a) of subdivision (6) for the purpose of establishing a
201 reserve to meet future cost of living liabilities as provided in paragraph (h) of section 102 or
202 paragraphs (k), (l) or (m) of section 103, and increases to the maximum base amount as provided
203 in paragraph (i) of said section 102. Assets held in the Cost of Living Reserve Funds shall be
204 invested with all other assets of the system, but shall not be included in a system’s assets for
9

205 purposes of actuarial valuations until transferred to provide for increased liabilities as contained
206 in said paragraph (h) and (i) of said section 102 and said paragraphs (k), (l) and (m) of said
207 section 103.
208 (b) This subdivision shall take effect for systems, other than the state employees’ and
209 teachers’ retirement systems, upon its acceptance by a majority vote of the board of such system,
210 subject to approval of the legislative body. For the purposes of this subdivision, “legislative
211 body” shall mean: (i) in the case of a city, the city council in accordance with its charter; (ii) in
212 the case of a town, the town meeting; (iii) in the case of a district, the district members; and (iv)
213 in the case of an authority, the governing body. In the case of a county or regional retirement
214 system, this subdivision shall take effect upon its acceptance by the county or regional retirement
215 board advisory council at a meeting called for that purpose by the county or regional retirement
216 board. Acceptance of this subdivision shall be deemed to have occurred upon the filing of the
217 certification of such vote with the commission. A decision to accept this subdivision shall not be
218 revoked.
219 (c) This subdivision shall take effect automatically for the state employees’ and teachers’
220 retirement systems.
221 (d) Until the transfer required by this paragraph has occurred, the actuary shall annually
222 determine and certify the actuarial present value of the total increase in the liabilities of a system
223 attributable to the additional benefits provided in paragraph (h) of section 102 or paragraphs (k),
224 (l) or (m) of section 103. Upon certification that the balance of a system’s Cost of Living Reserve
225 Fund is not less than the amount so determined: (i) an amount equal to the amount certified for
226 the state employees’ and teachers’ retirement systems shall be transferred from the Cost of
227 Living Reserve Fund to the applicable Pension Reserve Fund established under subdivision (6A);
10

228 and (ii) the entire balance of the Cost of Living Reserve Fund of any system other than the state
229 employees’ and teachers’ retirement systems shall be transferred to the Pension Reserve Fund of
230 that system. The transfer required by this paragraph shall occur only once with respect to each
231 Cost of Living Reserve Fund.
232 SECTION 28. Subdivision (1) of section 22C of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is
233 hereby amended by striking out the third paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following
234 paragraph:-
235 Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, appropriations or transfers
236 made to the Commonwealth’s Pension Liability Fund in fiscal years 2027 to 2029, inclusive,
237 shall be made in accordance with the following funding schedule: (i) $5,130,518,640 in fiscal
238 year 2027; (ii) $5,335,739,386 in fiscal year 2028; and (iii) $5,549,168,961 in fiscal year 2029.
239 Notwithstanding any provision of this subdivision to the contrary, any adjustments to these
240 amounts shall be limited to increases in the schedule amounts for each of the specified years.
241 SECTION 29. Said chapter 32 is hereby further amended by inserting after section 65J
242 the following section:-
243 Section 65K. Notwithstanding sections 65A to 65J, inclusive, or any other general or
244 special law, rule or regulation to the contrary, a judge or justice who is eligible for retirement
245 benefits pursuant to said sections 65A to 65J, inclusive, shall be provided written notice by the
246 retirement board upon entry into service that if they qualify as a veteran who served in the armed
247 forces of the United States, they shall be entitled to credit for active service in the armed services
248 of the United States for purposes of calculating the minimum number of years a judge or justice
249 must serve before eligibility for receipt of a pension, which credited service shall be considered
250 to have run continuously with judicial service for purposes of said sections 65A to 65J, inclusive;
11

251 provided, however, that such active service shall not be credited until such member, prior to or
252 within 1 year of vesting pursuant to this chapter, has paid into the annuity savings fund of such
253 system, in 1 sum or in installments, upon such terms and conditions as the board may prescribe,
254 makeup payments, for each year of creditable service sought, of an amount equal to 10 per cent
255 of the regular annual compensation of the member when said member entered the retirement
256 system; provided further, that such creditable service shall not be construed to include service for
257 more than 4 years; and provided further, that such creditable service shall not be allowed for any
258 period of active service for which said veteran has received credit in any retirement system
259 governed by this chapter, including, but not limited to, non-judicial membership in the state
260 employees’ retirement system. This section shall apply to national guard and active reserve
261 personnel, both former and present. Creditable service time, both enlisted and commissioned,
262 may be applied toward retirement on a ratio of 5 years of national guard service or 5 years of
263 active reserve service substitutable for each year of active service. National guard and active
264 reserve personnel shall not be precluded from making said purchase if they qualify as a veteran
265 after vesting or if they reach the maximum of 4 years of eligible service purchase after vesting
266 and qualifying as a veteran; provided, however, that they enter into a purchase agreement within
267 5 years of the last occurring event.
268 SECTION 30. Section 91 of said chapter 32, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is
269 hereby amended by striking out, in line 101, the figure “$15,000” and inserting in place thereof
270 the following figure:- $25,000.
271 SECTION 31. Section 91A of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
272 striking out, in line 27, the figure “$15,000” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:-
273 $25,000.
12

274 SECTION 32. Section 102 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
275 striking out, in line 34, the words “which is $13,000 or more” and inserting in place thereof the
276 following words:- which is equal to or greater than the maximum base amount established
277 pursuant to paragraph (i).
278 SECTION 33. Said section 102 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further
279 amended by striking out, in line 38, the words “to the sum of $13,000” and inserting in place
280 thereof the following words:- to said maximum base amount.
281 SECTION 34. Said section 102 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further
282 amended by striking out, in line 46, the figure “$13,000” and inserting in place thereof the
283 following words:- said maximum base amount.
284 SECTION 35. Said section 102 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further
285 amended by inserting after the word “years”, in line 48, the following words:- and any additional
286 benefit paid in accordance with paragraph (h).
287 SECTION 36. Said section 102 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further
288 amended by adding the following 2 paragraphs:-
289 (h)(1) Upon the transfer of funds from the Cost of Living Reserve Fund to the Pension
290 Reserve Fund, as provided by paragraph (d) of subdivision (6B) of section 22, every member of
291 the state employees’ retirement system and the teachers’ retirement system who has attained at
292 least 10 full years of retirement but less than 15 full years of retirement as of June 30 of the prior
293 fiscal year and receives a cost of living increase shall receive annually an additional $100 benefit
294 to said increase. Said $100 benefit shall be granted only to members of the state employees’
295 retirement system and the teachers’ retirement system who retired before July 1, 2020 with 20 or
296 more years of creditable service and whose total annual retirement benefit is less than 80 per cent
13

297 of the average annual salary as determined by the retirement system’s most recent actuarial
298 valuation; provided, however, that those members who retired with a disability benefit under
299 section 6, 7 or 26 shall be eligible with less than 20 years of creditable service. Any surviving
300 beneficiary of a deceased member who would otherwise be eligible for the aforesaid additional
301 benefit under this paragraph, including those beneficiaries receiving a benefit under section 9,
302 12, 100 or 101, shall receive said additional benefit if it is determined that they are eligible by the
303 retirement board in which they are a participant.
304 (2) Upon the transfer of funds from the Cost of Living Reserve Fund to the Pension
305 Reserve Fund, as provided by paragraph (d) of subdivision (6B) of section 22, every member of
306 the state employees’ retirement system and the teachers’ retirement system who has attained at
307 least 15 full years of retirement but less than 20 full years of retirement as of June 30 of the prior
308 fiscal year and receives a cost of living increase shall receive annually an additional $200 benefit
309 to said increase. Said $200 benefit shall be granted only to members of the state employees’
310 retirement system and the teachers’ retirement system who retired before July 1, 2020 with 20 or
311 more years of creditable service and whose total annual retirement benefit is less than 80 per cent
312 of the average annual salary as determined by the retirement system’s most recent actuarial
313 valuation; provided, however, that those members who retired with a disability benefit under
314 section 6, 7 or 26 shall be eligible with less than 20 years of creditable service. Any surviving
315 beneficiary of a deceased member who would otherwise be eligible for the aforesaid additional
316 benefit under this paragraph, including those beneficiaries receiving a benefit under section 9,
317 12, 100 or 101, shall receive said additional benefit if it is determined that they are eligible by the
318 retirement board in which they are a participant.
14

319 (3) Upon the transfer of funds from the Cost of Living Reserve Fund to the Pension
320 Reserve Fund, as provided by paragraph (d) of subdivision (6B) of section 22, every member of
321 the state employees’ retirement system and the teachers’ retirement system who has attained at
322 least 20 full years of retirement as of June 30 of the prior fiscal year and receives a cost of living
323 increase shall receive annually an additional $300 benefit to said increase. Said $300 benefit
324 shall be granted only to members of the state employees’ retirement system and the teachers’
325 retirement system who retired before July 1, 2020 with 20 or more years of creditable service
326 and whose total annual retirement benefit is less than 80 per cent of the average annual salary as
327 determined by the retirement system’s most recent actuarial valuation; provided, however, that
328 those members who retired with a disability benefit under section 6, 7 or 26 shall be eligible with
329 less than 20 years of creditable service. Any surviving beneficiary of a deceased member who
330 would otherwise be eligible for the aforesaid additional benefit under this paragraph, including
331 those beneficiaries receiving a benefit under section 9, 12, 100 or 101, shall receive said
332 additional benefit if it is determined that they are eligible by the retirement board in which they
333 are a participant.
334 (i) For the purposes of this section, the maximum base amount shall initially be $13,000.
335 Following the completion of the transfer required by paragraph (d) of subdivision (6B) of section
336 22, if in any calendar year in which the actuary certifies that the balance of the Cost of Living
337 Reserve Fund, including the amount required to be credited to the fund for that calendar year, is
338 not less than the actuarial present value of the total increase in system liabilities attributable to an
339 increase of $1,000 in the maximum base amount, the maximum base amount shall be increased
340 by $1,000, effective July 1 of the next fiscal year; provided, however, that the amount equal to
341 said actuarial present value of the total increase in system liabilities shall be transferred from the
15

342 Cost of Living Reserve Fund to the Commonwealth’s Pension Liability Fund before such
343 increase shall take effect.
344 SECTION 37. Section 103 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
345 inserting after the word “applied”, in line 51, the following words:- , including any additional
346 benefit paid in accordance with paragraphs (k), (l) and (m).
347 SECTION 38. Said section 103 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further
348 amended by adding the following 4 paragraphs:-
349 (k) Upon acceptance of this paragraph as provided in paragraph (n), and upon the transfer
350 of funds from the Cost of Living Reserve Fund to the Pension Reserve Fund, as provided by
351 paragraph (d) of subdivision (6B) of section 22, every member of a retirement system other than
352 the state employees’ retirement system and the teachers’ retirement system who has attained at
353 least 10 full years of retirement but less than 15 full years of retirement as of June 30 of the prior
354 fiscal year and receives a cost of living increase pursuant to this section, shall receive annually
355 an additional $100 benefit to said increase. Said $100 benefit shall be granted only to members
356 of a retirement system, other than the state employees’ retirement system and the teachers’
357 retirement system, who retired before July 1, 2020 with 20 or more years of creditable service
358 and whose total annual retirement benefit is less than 80 per cent of the average annual salary as
359 determined by their retirement system’s most recent actuarial valuation; provided, however, that
360 those members who retired with a disability benefit under section 6, 7 or 26 shall be eligible with
361 less than 20 years of creditable service. Any surviving beneficiary of a deceased member who
362 would otherwise be eligible for the aforesaid additional benefit under this paragraph, including
363 those beneficiaries receiving a benefit under section 9, 12, 100 or 101, shall receive said
16

364 additional benefit if it is determined that they are eligible by the board of the system in which
365 they are a participant.
366 (l) Upon acceptance of this paragraph as provided in paragraph (n), and upon the transfer
367 of funds from the Cost of Living Reserve Fund to the Pension Reserve Fund, as provided by
368 paragraph (d) of subdivision (6B) of section 22, every member of a retirement system other than
369 the state employees’ retirement system and the teachers’ retirement system who has attained at
370 least 15 full years of retirement but less than 20 full years of retirement as of June 30 of the prior
371 fiscal year and receives a cost of living increase pursuant to this section, shall receive annually
372 an additional $200 benefit to said increase. Said $200 benefit shall be granted only to members
373 of a retirement system, other than the state employees’ retirement system and the teachers’
374 retirement system, who retired before July 1, 2020 with 20 or more years of creditable service
375 and whose total annual retirement benefit is less than 80 per cent of the average annual salary as
376 determined by their retirement system’s most recent actuarial valuation; provided, however, that
377 those members who retired with a disability benefit under section 6, 7 or 26 shall be eligible with
378 less than 20 years of creditable service. Any surviving beneficiary of a deceased member who
379 would otherwise be eligible for the aforesaid additional benefit under this paragraph, including
380 those beneficiaries receiving a benefit under section 9, 12, 100 or 101, shall receive said
381 additional benefit if it is determined that they are eligible by the board of the system in which
382 they are a participant.
383 (m) Upon acceptance of this paragraph as provided in paragraph (n), and upon the
384 transfer of funds from the Cost of Living Reserve Fund to the Pension Reserve Fund, as provided
385 by paragraph (d) of subdivision (6B) of section 22, every member of a retirement system other
386 than the state employees’ retirement system and the teachers’ retirement system who has attained
17

387 at least 20 full years of retirement as of June 30 of the prior fiscal year and receives a cost of
388 living increase pursuant to this section, shall receive annually an additional $300 benefit to said
389 increase. Said $300 benefit shall be granted only to members of a retirement system, other than
390 the state employees’ retirement system and the teachers’ retirement system, who retired before
391 July 1, 2020 with 20 or more years of creditable service and whose total annual retirement
392 benefit is less than 80 per cent of the average annual salary as determined by their retirement
393 system’s most recent actuarial valuation; provided, however, that those members who retired
394 with a disability benefit under section 6, 7 or 26 shall be eligible with less than 20 years of
395 creditable service. Any surviving beneficiary of a deceased member who would otherwise be
396 eligible for the aforesaid additional benefit under this paragraph, including those beneficiaries
397 receiving a benefit under section 9, 12, 100 or 101, shall receive said additional benefit if it is
398 determined that they are eligible by the board of the system in which they are a participant.
399 (n) Paragraphs (k), (l) or (m) shall take effect for systems other than the state employees’
400 retirement system and the teachers’ retirement system upon its acceptance by a majority vote of
401 the board of such system, subject to the approval of the legislative body, and subject to its
402 additional acceptance of subdivision (6B) of section 22. For the purpose of this paragraph,
403 “legislative body” shall mean: (i) in the case of a city, the city council in accordance with its
404 charter; (ii) in the case of a town, the town meeting; (iii) in the case of a district, the district
405 members; and (iv) in the case of an authority, the governing body. In the case of a county or
406 regional system, acceptance of said paragraphs (k), (l) or (m) shall be by the county or regional
407 retirement board advisory council at a meeting called for that purpose by the county or regional
408 retirement board. Acceptance of this paragraph shall be deemed to have occurred upon the filing
18

409 of the certification of such vote with the commission. A decision to accept this paragraph shall
410 not be revoked.
411 SECTION 39. Chapter 32A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
412 section 17Z the following section:-
413 Section 17AA. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
414 clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
415 “Cost sharing”, a deductible, coinsurance, copayments and any maximum limitation on
416 the application of such a deductible, coinsurance, copayment or similar out-of-pocket expense.
417 “Health care provider”, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111.
418 “HIV”, human immunodeficiency virus.
419 “HIV prevention drug”, any pre-exposure prophylaxis drug approved for the prevention
420 of HIV by the federal Food and Drug Administration, including any ancillary or support health
421 service determined by the secretary of health and human services to be necessary to: (i) ensure
422 that a drug is prescribed or administered to a person who is not infected with HIV and has no
423 medical contraindications to the use of a drug; and (ii) monitor a person to ensure the safe and
424 effective ongoing use of a drug through: (A) office visits; (B) laboratory testing; (C) testing for a
425 sexually transmitted infection; (D) medication self-management and adherence counseling; or
426 (E) any other health service specified as part of comprehensive HIV prevention drug services by
427 the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, the federal Centers for Disease Control and
428 Prevention, the United States Preventive Services Task Force or an equivalent state-authorized
429 body with responsibility to identify health services that are components of comprehensive HIV
430 prevention drug services.
19

431 (b) The commission shall provide any active or retired employee of the commonwealth,
432 insured under the commission, coverage for an HIV prevention drug. There shall be no: (i)
433 patient cost sharing; or (ii) prior authorization, step therapy or any other protocol that could
434 restrict or delay the dispensing of any HIV prevention drug.
435 (c) The commission shall not refuse, reject or deny a prescription for any covered HIV
436 prevention drug on the basis of the type of health care provider issuing the prescription for an
437 HIV prevention drug or the venue or practice setting of the health care provider issuing the
438 prescription; provided, that the health care provider shall be licensed to prescribe medications.
439 SECTION 40. Section 5 of chapter 40A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
440 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “sent”, in lines 31 and 44, each
441 time it appears, the following words:- electronically or.
442 SECTION 41. Said section 5 of said chapter 40A, as so appearing, is hereby further
443 amended by inserting, after the word “notice”, in line 37, the following words:- electronically or.
444 SECTION 42. Section 6 of said chapter 40A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
445 striking out, in line 3, the word “issued” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- or
446 other entitlement applied for under this chapter.
447 SECTION 43. The first paragraph of said section 6 of said chapter 40A, as so appearing,
448 is hereby amended by inserting after the second sentence the following sentence:- provided,
449 however, notwithstanding the foregoing, pre-existing nonconforming structures or residential
450 uses that do not conform to zoning because of lot size or shape, frontage, lot coverage or floor
451 area ratio requirements may be extended or altered as of right, without the need for a finding by
452 the special permit granting authority under this paragraph, if such extension or alteration
453 complies with the current dimensional regulations regarding height, stories and setback.
20

454 SECTION 44. Said section 6 of said chapter 40A, as so appearing, is hereby further
455 amended by inserting after the word “use”, in line 21, the following words:- or structure.
456 SECTION 45. Said section 6 of said chapter 40A is hereby further amended by striking
457 out the second and third paragraphs, as so appearing, and inserting in place thereof the following
458 2 paragraphs:-
459 A zoning ordinance or by-law shall provide that construction or operations under a
460 building permit shall conform to any subsequent amendment of the ordinance or by-law unless
461 the use or construction is commenced not more than 24 months after the issuance of the last
462 permit necessary for construction and, in cases involving construction, unless such construction
463 is continued through to completion as continuously and expeditiously as is reasonable. The 24-
464 month period shall be tolled during any time the applicant is actively seeking or obtaining other
465 necessary permits. Construction or operations under a special permit issued pursuant to section 9
466 or site plan approval pursuant to the local ordinance or by-law shall conform to any subsequent
467 amendment of the zoning ordinance or by-law or of any other local land use regulations unless
468 the use or construction is commenced within a period of 3 years after the issuance of the special
469 permit or site plan approval and, in cases involving construction, unless such construction is
470 continued through to completion as continuously and expeditiously as is reasonable. For the
471 purpose of the preceding sentence, construction involving the redevelopment of previously
472 disturbed land shall be deemed to have commenced upon substantial investment in site
473 preparation or infrastructure construction, and construction of developments intended to proceed
474 in phases shall proceed expeditiously, but not continuously, among phases.
475 A zoning ordinance or by-law may define and regulate nonconforming uses and
476 structures abandoned or not used for a period of 4 years or more.
21

477 SECTION 46. Said section 6 of said chapter 40A, as so appearing, is hereby further
478 amended by striking out, in lines 51 and 52, and in lines 60 and 61, the words “for single and
479 two-family residential use”, each time they appear.
480 SECTION 47. Said chapter 40A is hereby further amended by striking out section 10, as
481 so appearing, and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
482 Section 10. The permit granting authority shall, after a public hearing for which notice
483 has been given by publication and posting as provided under section 11 and by mailing to all
484 parties in interest, grant upon appeal or upon petition with respect to particular land or structures
485 a variance from the terms of the applicable zoning ordinance or by-law if the permit granting
486 authority specifically finds that a strict enforcement of the ordinance or by-law would result in a
487 practical difficulty. In making its determination, the permit granting authority shall weigh the
488 benefits to the appellant or petitioner and to the public interest, including the interest in
489 supporting the production of housing against the detriment to the public health, safety and
490 welfare of the neighborhood, and may also consider: (i) whether the practical difficulty relates to
491 soil conditions, shape or topography of such land or structures; (ii) whether the strict
492 enforcement would impose a financial hardship on the appellant or petitioner; (iii) whether the
493 benefit sought by the appellant or petitioner can be achieved by some other method feasible for
494 the appellant or petitioner to achieve; and (iv) whether the practical difficulty was self-created.
495 Except where local ordinances or by-laws expressly permit variances for use, no variance
496 may authorize a use or activity other than residential, not otherwise permitted in the district in
497 which the land or structure is located; provided, however, that such variances properly granted
498 prior to January 1, 1976, but limited in time, may be extended on the same terms and conditions
499 that were in effect for such variance when it was originally granted. If the rights authorized by a
22

500 variance are not exercised within 2 years after the variance was granted, which shall not include
501 the time required to pursue other entitlements necessary to construct the project authorized by the
502 variance or await the determination of an appeal referred to in section 17, such rights shall lapse;
503 provided, however, that the permit granting authority, in its discretion and upon written
504 application by the grantee of such rights, may extend the time for exercise of those rights for a
505 period not to exceed 2 years; and provided further, that the application for an extension shall be
506 filed with the permit granting authority prior to the expiration of the 2-year period. If the permit
507 granting authority does not grant an extension within 30 days of the date of application therefor
508 and, upon the expiration of the original 2-year period, such rights shall only be reestablished
509 after notice and a new hearing pursuant to this section.
510 SECTION 48. Section 11 of said chapter 40A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
511 inserting after the word “sent”, in line 8, the following words:- electronically or.
512 SECTION 49. Said section 11 of said chapter 40A, as so appearing, is hereby further
513 amended by inserting after the word “notice”, in line 23, the following words:- electronically or.
514 SECTION 50. Chapter 41 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out section
515 97B1/2, as so appearing, and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
516 Section 97B1/2. (a) A hospital licensed pursuant to chapter 111 and all other medical
517 facilities that conduct medical forensic examinations shall notify a local law enforcement agency
518 at the time the evidence of a sexual assault is obtained and not later than 24 hours after using a
519 new kit for the collection of sexual assault evidence.
520 (b) Local law enforcement agencies shall:
521 (1) take possession of the sexual assault evidence kit from hospitals and other medical
522 facilities that conduct medical forensic examinations within 3 business days of notification; and
23

523 (2) submit new sexual assault evidence kits to the crime laboratory within the department
524 of state police or the police department of a municipality that operates a crime laboratory and has
525 a population of more than 150,000, in the case of a sexual assault alleged to have taken place in
526 that municipality, within 7 business days of taking possession; provided, however, that
527 noninvestigatory sexual assault evidence kits associated with a victim who has not yet filed a
528 report with a law enforcement agency shall not be subject to the 7-day requirement; provided
529 further, that noninvestigatory sexual assault evidence kits shall be safely stored by law
530 enforcement in a manner that preserves evidence for the duration of the statute of limitations for
531 all sexual assault and rape cases; and provided further, that all sexual assault evidence kits shall
532 be retained for at least 15 years.
533 (c) The crime laboratory within the department of state police or the police department of
534 a municipality that operates a crime laboratory and has a population of more than 150,000, in the
535 case of a sexual assault alleged to have taken place in that municipality, shall test all sexual
536 assault evidence kits within 30 days of receipt from a local law enforcement agency,
537 notwithstanding the statute of limitations on the underlying offense.
538 (d) In cases where testing results in a DNA profile, the crime laboratory shall enter the
539 full profile into CODIS and the state DNA database.
540 (e) Each sexual assault evidence kit shall be entered into the statewide sexual assault
541 evidence kit tracking system pursuant to section 18X of chapter 6A.
542 SECTION 51. Section 5 of chapter 53 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
543 amended by striking out, in line 4, the word “residences” and inserting in place thereof the
544 following words:- municipalities of residence.
24

545 SECTION 52. Section 16 of said chapter 53, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
546 inserting after the word “year”, in line 5, the following words:- ; provided, however, that the
547 street address, street number and other information identifying the personal residence of a
548 candidate that appears on a certificate of nomination or nomination paper shall not be a public
549 record and shall be redacted from any copy of the candidate’s nomination papers made available
550 for public inspection, except upon a written certification by the requestor, in a form prescribed by
551 the state secretary and signed under the penalties of perjury, that the information is sought solely
552 for the purpose of verifying or challenging the candidate’s legal qualifications for nomination or
553 election to the office sought.
554 SECTION 53. Section 34 of said chapter 53, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
555 striking out the fifth paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
556 Against the name of a candidate for an elective office or for state committee shall be
557 printed the candidate’s municipality of residence. Against the name of a candidate for a ward or
558 town committee shall be printed the ward or precinct where the candidate resides, or both ward
559 and precinct, as applicable.
560 SECTION 54. Section 106 of said chapter 53, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
561 striking out the word “or”, in line 11, and inserting in place thereof the following words:- office
562 shall be printed the candidate’s precinct or ward of residence, or both. Against the name of a
563 candidate for.
564 SECTION 55. Section 41 of chapter 54 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
565 amended by striking out, in lines 6 and 7, the words “he resides, with the name of the street and
566 the number, if any, of his residence” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- the
567 candidate resides.
25

568 SECTION 56. The second paragraph of said section 41 of said chapter 54, as so
569 appearing, is hereby amended by striking out the last sentence and inserting in place thereof the
570 following 2 sentences:- There shall be added to the name of each candidate for a county office
571 the name of the city or town where the candidate resides. There shall be added to the name of
572 each candidate for city or town office the ward or precinct where the candidate resides, or both
573 ward and precinct, as applicable.
574 SECTION 57. Said section 41 of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby further
575 amended by striking out, in lines 28 to 29, inclusive, the words “the name of the street on which
576 he resides, with his street number, if any, and”.
577 SECTION 58. Section 41A of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
578 striking out, in line 5, the words “christian names and addresses” and inserting in place thereof
579 the following words:- first names.
580 SECTION 59. Section 42 of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
581 striking out, in lines 41 and 44, the word “addresses” and inserting in place thereof, in each
582 instance, the following words:- municipalities of residence.
583 SECTION 60. Section 49 of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
584 striking out, in lines 2 and 3, the word “residences” and inserting in place thereof the following
585 words:- municipalities of residence.
586 SECTION 61. Section 50 of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
587 striking out, in line 2 and 3, the words “residences and” and inserting in place thereof the
588 following words:- wards or precincts of residence, or both, as applicable, and.
26

589 SECTION 62. Section 51 of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
590 striking out, in line 3, the word “residences” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
591 wards or precincts of residence, or both, as applicable.
592 SECTION 63. Section 1B of chapter 69 of the General Laws, as amended by section 25
593 of chapter 14 of the acts 2025, is hereby further amended by adding the following paragraph:-
594 The board shall establish a school meal nutrition standards advisory council to advise the
595 commissioner on nutrition standards for meals served in schools, including, but not limited to,
596 the implementation of the recommendations of the school meal nutrition standards commission,
597 established in section 77 of chapter 28 of the acts of 2023. The council shall: (i) provide ongoing
598 guidance in the development of comprehensive and strengthened nutrition standards aligned with
599 the most current public health guidance and evidence-based nutrition standards; (ii) provide
600 ongoing feasibility assessments; and (iii) work with school food authorities and other
601 stakeholders to reduce barriers to feasibility of implementation on issues, including, but not
602 limited to, procurement, facilities and workforce training. The members of the council shall serve
603 without compensation but may be reimbursed, subject to appropriation, for necessary expenses
604 reasonably incurred in the performance of their duties as members of the council. The council
605 shall consist of the following 11 members: 6 members appointed by the governor, who shall be
606 school nutrition operators or registered dieticians representing geographically, racially and socio-
607 economically diverse school districts; a representative from Project Bread – The Walk for
608 Hunger, Inc.; a representative from the School Nutrition Association of Massachusetts, Inc.; a
609 representative from the Massachusetts Healthy School Lunch Coalition; a representative from
610 Massachusetts Farm to School Project, LLC; and a representative from the Massachusetts Food
611 System Collaborative. Members shall serve for a term of 3 years. Members serving on the
27

612 council shall represent a reasonable statewide geographic balance. The council shall meet not
613 less than 4 times per year. The council shall elect from among its members a chair to serve for a
614 term of 3 years who may appoint other officers as necessary.
615 SECTION 64. Chapter 70 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out section
616 4, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
617 Section 4. (a) Upon action of the general court, there shall be a foundation budget review
618 commission to review the way foundation budgets are calculated and to make recommendations
619 for potential changes in those calculations as the commission deems appropriate for
620 prekindergarten to grade 12, inclusive; provided, however, that the commission shall be
621 established not less than every 10 years. The commission shall seek to determine the educational
622 programs and services necessary to achieve the commonwealth’s educational goals and to
623 prepare students to achieve passing scores on the Massachusetts Comprehensive Assessment
624 System examinations. The review shall include, but not be limited to, components of the
625 foundation budget created pursuant to section 3 and subsequent changes made to the foundation
626 budget by law. The commission shall seek to determine and recommend measures to promote the
627 adoption of ways in which resources can be most effectively utilized and consider various
628 models of efficient and effective resource allocation. In conducting the review, the commissioner
629 of elementary and secondary education and the commissioner of revenue shall provide to the
630 commission any data and information the commissioners consider relevant to the commission’s
631 charge.
632 (b) Members of the commission shall consist of: the senate and house chairs of the joint
633 committee on education, who shall serve as co-chairs; the secretary of education, or a designee;
634 the commissioner of elementary and secondary education, or a designee; the commissioner of
28

635 early education and care, or a designee; the secretary of administration and finance, or a
636 designee; a representative from the department of revenue’s division of local services; the
637 speaker of the house of representatives, or a designee; the president of the senate, or a designee;
638 the minority leader of the house of representatives, or a designee; the minority leader of the
639 senate, or a designee; the governor, or a designee; the chair of the senate committee on ways and
640 means, or a designee; the chair of the house committee on ways and means, or a designee; the
641 director of rural affairs of the executive office of economic development, or a designee; the
642 president of the Massachusetts Municipal Association, Inc.; the executive director of the
643 Massachusetts Business Alliance for Education, Inc.; the president of the Massachusetts
644 Association of School Committees, Inc.; the president of the Massachusetts Association of
645 School Superintendents, Inc.; the executive director of the Massachusetts Charter Public School
646 Association, Inc.; the president of the American Federation of Teachers Massachusetts; the
647 executive director of the Massachusetts Association of Vocational Administrators, Inc.; the
648 president of the Massachusetts Association of Regional Schools, Inc.; the president of the
649 Massachusetts Taxpayers Foundation; the executive director of the Tufts University’s Center for
650 State Policy Analysis; the president of the Massachusetts Association of School Business
651 Officials; president and chief executive officer of The Massachusetts Business Roundtable, Inc.;
652 and 1 member to be appointed by the governor who shall have experience in elementary and
653 secondary education finance or municipal finance in the commonwealth.
654 (c) Members of the commission shall receive no compensation for their services but may
655 be reimbursed for the reasonable expenses incurred in carrying out their responsibilities as
656 members of the commission. The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall
657 furnish staff and other support for the work of the commission. It shall not constitute a violation
29

658 of chapter 268A for a person employed by a school district to serve on the commission or to
659 participate in commission deliberations that may have a financial impact on the district
660 employing that person or on the rate at which that person may be compensated. The commission
661 may establish procedures to ensure that no such person participates in commission deliberations
662 that may directly affect the school districts employing any such person or that may directly affect
663 the rate at which any such person is compensated.
664 (d) Prior to issuing its recommendations, the commission shall conduct at least 4 public
665 hearings across geographically diverse regions of the commonwealth. The commission shall file
666 its report with findings and recommendations, including any legislative or regulatory changes
667 that may be necessary to implement its recommendations, by filing the same with the clerks of
668 the house of representatives and the senate, the house and senate committees on ways and means;
669 and the joint committee on education. The report shall be made publicly available on the website
670 of the department of elementary and secondary education.
671 SECTION 65. Section 89 of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
672 amended by striking out subsection (mm) and inserting in place thereof the following 2
673 subsections:-
674 (mm) The enrollment and accountability data for each Horace Mann charter school shall
675 be included in the enrollment and accountability data, as a whole, for the district in which the
676 school is located.
677 (nn) The board shall promulgate regulations for implementation and enforcement of this
678 section.
30

679 SECTION 66. Section 5A of chapter 71B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
680 amended by inserting after the definition of “Approved costs threshold” the following
681 definition:-
682 “Detailed cost components”, a breakdown of costs on either a per-trip or per-invoice
683 basis that shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i) labor; (ii) capital or fleet and vehicle
684 acquisition; (iii) fuel and vehicle maintenance; (iv) insurance; (v) overhead; (vi) profit; and (vii)
685 other costs that make up the total amount being charged to the school districts.
686 SECTION 67. Said section 5A of said chapter 71B, as so appearing, is hereby further
687 amended by inserting after subsection (b) the following subsection:-
688 (b½)(1) Each school district providing required out-of-district transportation pursuant to
689 subsection (b) shall include, in each district’s solicitation documents, a breakdown of detailed
690 cost components.
691 (2) Each vendor shall include detailed cost components in their submissions to school
692 districts for bids or quotes in the competitive procurement process. The detailed cost components
693 shall be included in: (i) the contract between the school district and the vendor; and (ii) all future
694 invoices.
695 (3) Annually, each school district shall submit the detailed cost components to the
696 department in its report. The department shall analyze the detailed cost components and report to
697 the chairs of the joint committee on education cost trends for out-of-district transportation.
698 SECTION 68. Said chapter 71B is hereby further amended by inserting after section 5A
699 the following section:-
700 Section 5A 1/2. (a)(1) The department shall establish and maintain an electronic
701 centralized database of: (i) procurement and contract documents for all out-of-district
31

702 transportation pursuant to subsection (b) of section 5A; and (ii) a list of licensed special
703 education out-of-district school transportation providers under contract with districts pursuant to
704 section 5A. The database shall be searchable and accessible to all districts. The database shall
705 include, but shall not be limited to: (i) copies of each procurement document and signed contract
706 provided pursuant to paragraph (2); and (ii) transportation vendor information, including, but not
707 limited to, compliance history, the areas where service is provided, ownership structure and
708 contract history with any district.
709 (2) Each district shall submit a copy of each procurement document and signed contract
710 to the department not later than 30 days after the contract is signed. Not later than 30 days after
711 receipt, the department shall add each document to the database established in paragraph (1).
712 (b)(1) The department shall establish and annually update guidelines for districts on best
713 practices for school transportation procurement, including, but not limited to, out-of-district
714 transportation. The guidelines shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i) information on laws
715 and regulations impacting transportation requirements; (ii) best practices for managing costs; (iii)
716 transportation planning and operations; and (iv) managing reimbursement requests. In
717 establishing and updating the guidelines, the department shall consult with the districts with the
718 highest utilization rates and highest costs of out-of-district transportation.
719 (2) The guidelines established in paragraph (1) shall be available to all districts on the
720 department’s website; provided, however, that the department shall annually identify and provide
721 the guidelines and additional assistance, as determined by the department, to: (i) the 20 districts
722 with the highest out-of-district transportation costs; and (ii) any district where transportation is
723 contributing to underperformance and inequity.
32

724 SECTION 69. Section 8 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
725 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “vehicle”, in line 54, the
726 following words:- and a module on the dangers of wrong way driving and strategies and
727 techniques for motorists to prevent wrong way driving.
728 SECTION 70. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
729 section 110E the following section:-
730 Section 110F. (a) Not later than 30 days after a family’s entry into a temporary emergency
731 assistance shelter pursuant to section 30 of chapter 23B, domestic violence shelter, substance use
732 disorder and recovery shelter or non-emergency assistance shelter, any child under the age of 3
733 years old shall be referred to a certified early intervention professional for an early intervention
734 evaluation and assessment, pursuant to the department’s early intervention operational standards.
735 The referral shall be made by shelter staff, case managers, medical providers or others. If
736 applicable, early intervention services shall be rendered once an evaluation and determination of
737 need have been established by a certified early intervention professional.
738 (b) The department, in consultation with the executive office of housing and livable
739 communities, shall promulgate regulations pursuant to chapter 30A to implement this section.
740 SECTION 71. Section 10A of chapter 118E of the General Laws, as appearing in the
741 2024 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the words “The division”, in lines 21
742 and 28, each time they appear, and inserting in place thereof the following words:- Subject to the
743 receipt of all necessary federal approvals and availability of federal financial participation, the
744 division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health maintenance organizations,
745 behavioral health management firms and third-party administrators under contract to a Medicaid
746 managed care organization, accountable care organization or primary care clinician plan.
33

747 SECTION 72. Said chapter 118E is hereby further amended by inserting after section
748 10Z the following section:-
749 Section 10AA. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
750 clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
751 “Health care provider”, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111.
752 “HIV”, human immunodeficiency virus.
753 “HIV prevention drug”, any pre-exposure prophylaxis drug approved for the prevention
754 of HIV by the federal Food and Drug Administration, including any ancillary or support health
755 service determined by the secretary of health and human services to be necessary to: (i) ensure
756 that a drug is prescribed or administered to a person who is not infected with HIV and has no
757 medical contraindications to the use of a drug; and (ii) monitor a person to ensure the safe and
758 effective ongoing use of a drug through: (A) office visits; (B) laboratory testing; (C) testing for a
759 sexually transmitted infection; (D) medication self-management and adherence counseling; or
760 (E) any other health service specified as part of comprehensive HIV prevention drug services by
761 the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, the federal Centers for Disease Control and
762 Prevention, the United States Preventive Services Task Force or an equivalent state-authorized
763 body with responsibility to identify health services that are components of comprehensive HIV
764 prevention drug services.
765 (b) The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health maintenance
766 organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party administrators under contract
767 to a Medicaid managed care organization, accountable care organization or primary care
768 clinician plan shall provide coverage for an HIV prevention drug. There shall be no: (i) patient
34

769 cost sharing; or (ii) prior authorization, step therapy or any other protocol that could restrict or
770 delay the dispensing of any HIV prevention drug.
771 (c) The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health maintenance
772 organizations, behavioral health management firms and third party administrators under contract
773 to a Medicaid managed care organization, accountable care organization or primary care
774 clinician plan shall not refuse, reject or deny a prescription for any covered HIV prevention drug
775 on the basis of the type of health care provider issuing the prescription for an HIV prevention
776 drug or the venue or practice setting of the health care provider issuing the prescription;
777 provided, however, that the health care provider shall be licensed to prescribe medications.
778 SECTION 73. Section 69 of said chapter 118E, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition,
779 is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:-
780 (e) Notwithstanding 101 CMR 614.00 and any successor rules or regulations or any other
781 general or special law, rule or regulation to the contrary, the office shall not apply a payment
782 adjustment with respect to a shortfall allocation to a federally qualified community health center
783 established under chapter 147 of the acts of 1995.
784 SECTION 74. The second paragraph of section 24 of chapter 119 of the General Laws, as
785 so appearing, is hereby amended by striking out the fifth sentence and inserting in place thereof
786 the following sentence:- If the identity or whereabouts of a parent is unknown, the petitioner
787 shall, upon motion and with leave of the court, cause notice to be served upon such parent by: (i)
788 publication once a week for 3 consecutive weeks in any newspaper as the court may order; (ii)
789 publication on a website designed for such purpose for 3 consecutive weeks; or (iii) electronic
790 means reasonably calculated to reach the parent as determined by the court.
35

791 SECTION 75. Section 26 of chapter 121B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
792 hereby amended by striking out, in lines 276 and 277, the words “for not less than 2 years,”.
793 SECTION 76. Chapter 127 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
794 section 17D the following section:-
795 Section 17E. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
796 clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
797 “County correctional facility”, as defined in paragraph (f) of section 1 of chapter 125.
798 “Health care provider”, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111.
799 “HIV”, human immunodeficiency virus.
800 “HIV prevention drug”, any pre-exposure prophylaxis drug approved for the prevention
801 of HIV by the federal Food and Drug Administration.
802 (b) The superintendent of each state correctional facility and the administrator of each
803 county correctional facility shall ensure that within a reasonable time prior to release, each
804 inmate of a state correctional facility and county correctional facility who has been committed to
805 a term of not less than 30 days and who is negative for HIV infection, shall be:
806 (i) provided information and counseling about HIV prevention drugs to prevent HIV
807 acquisition;
808 (ii) evaluated for the benefit of an HIV prevention drug, with the consent of the inmate;
809 (iii) provided with a supply of an HIV prevention drug prior to release, to an eligible
810 inmate with their consent; provided, however, that the supply of an HIV prevention drug shall, at
811 the inmate’s option, include administration immediately prior to release of the longest duration
812 injectable form of an HIV prevention drug, a 90-day supply of an oral HIV prevention drug, any
36

813 other clinically appropriate HIV prevention drug or a prescription for such supply to be filled
814 post-release; and
815 (iv) provided with information about requirements for medical monitoring after release to
816 ensure the safe and effective ongoing use of HIV prevention drugs; provided, however, that each
817 state correctional facility and county correctional facility shall develop and implement a plan to
818 connect each inmate receiving an HIV prevention drug to post-release medical and other services
819 to ensure ongoing HIV prevention therapy upon release.
820 (c) Any pre-release supply of an HIV prevention drug shall be provided at no cost to the
821 inmate.
822 (d) Each state correctional facility and county correctional facility evaluating an inmate
823 for an HIV prevention drug pursuant to subsection (b) shall ensure that information obtained for
824 such evaluation shall be kept confidential between the inmate and medical provider and shall not
825 be shared with security or administrative staff.
826 (e) The department of correction, in consultation with the department of public health,
827 shall promulgate regulations or issue guidance for the implementation of this section.
828 SECTION 77. Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
829 section 47CCC the following section:-
830 Section 47DDD. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
831 clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
832 “Cost sharing”, a deductible, coinsurance, copayment and any maximum limitation on the
833 application of such a deductible, coinsurance, copayment or similar out-of-pocket expense.
834 “Health care provider”, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111.
835 “HIV”, human immunodeficiency virus.
37

836 “HIV prevention drug”, any pre-exposure prophylaxis drug approved for the prevention
837 of HIV by the federal Food and Drug Administration, including any ancillary or support health
838 service determined by the secretary of health and human services to be necessary to: (i) ensure
839 that a drug is prescribed or administered to a person who is not infected with HIV and has no
840 medical contraindications to the use of a drug; and (ii) monitor a person to ensure the safe and
841 effective ongoing use of a drug through: (A) office visits; (B) laboratory testing; (C) testing for a
842 sexually transmitted infection; (D) medication self-management and adherence counseling; or
843 (E) any other health service specified as part of comprehensive HIV prevention drug services by
844 the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, the federal Centers for Disease Control and
845 Prevention, the United States Preventive Services Task Force or an equivalent state-authorized
846 body with responsibility to identify health services that are components of comprehensive HIV
847 prevention drug services.
848 (b) Any policy of accident and sickness insurance, as described in section 108, that
849 provides hospital expense and surgical expense insurance that is delivered, issued or
850 subsequently renewed by agreement between the insurer and policyholder in the commonwealth
851 and any group blanket or general policy of accident and sickness insurance, issued under section
852 110, that provides hospital expense and surgical expense insurance and that is delivered, issued
853 or subsequently renewed by agreement between the insurer and the policyholder, within or
854 without the commonwealth, that provides coverage for any HIV prevention drug shall not
855 require: (i) patient cost sharing; or (ii) prior authorization, step therapy or any other protocol that
856 could restrict or delay the dispensing of any HIV prevention drug.
857 (c) Any policy of accident and sickness insurance, as described in section 108, that
858 provides hospital expense and surgical expense insurance that is delivered, issued or
38

859 subsequently renewed by agreement between the insurer and policyholder in the commonwealth
860 and any group blanket or general policy of accident and sickness insurance, issued under section
861 110, that provides hospital expense and surgical expense insurance and that is delivered, issued
862 or subsequently renewed by agreement between the insurer and the policyholder, within or
863 without the commonwealth, that provides coverage for any HIV prevention drug shall not refuse,
864 reject or deny a prescription for any covered HIV prevention drug on the basis of the type of
865 health care provider issuing the prescription for an HIV prevention drug or the venue or practice
866 setting of the health care provider issuing the prescription; provided, however, that the health
867 care provider shall be licensed to prescribe medications.
868 SECTION 78. Said chapter 175 is hereby further amended by adding the following 2
869 sections:-
870 Section 231. (a) There shall be, within the division of insurance, a permanent auto body
871 labor reimbursement rate advisory board to address any issues related to auto body labor
872 reimbursement rates. The advisory board shall consist of: 1 member appointed by the
873 commissioner of insurance, who shall serve as a co-chair; 1 member appointed by the attorney
874 general, who shall serve as a co-chair; 1 member from the auto insurance industry appointed by
875 the Massachusetts Insurance Federation, Inc., or its successor; 1 member from the auto repair
876 industry appointed by the Massachusetts Auto Body Association, Inc., or its successor; and 1
877 member appointed by the Massachusetts State Automobile Dealers Association, Inc., or its
878 successor. No board member shall serve more than 3 consecutive 2-year terms.
879 (b) The advisory board shall meet not less than 1 time per year. The advisory board shall
880 be responsible for creating, implementing and overseeing a survey not more than once every 4
881 years that shall be given to relevant auto body shops and insurers as determined by the advisory
39

882 board. The survey shall compile data pertaining to contracted hourly labor reimbursement rates,
883 posted hourly labor reimbursement rates and any additional information the advisory board
884 deems relevant. The advisory board shall collect industry data including, but not limited to: (i)
885 labor reimbursement rates in neighboring states; (ii) total labor costs and total repair costs for
886 repairs, including the total cost of repair; (iii) inflation data; (iv) workforce data; (v) vocational
887 school trends; (vi) automobile insurance premiums; and (vii) any additional information as
888 requested by the advisory board. The results of the survey and the data collected shall be
889 reviewed and analyzed by the advisory board.
890 (c) Not later than December 31 every fourth year, the advisory board shall file a report of
891 its findings and conclusions, and any recommendations of the individual members of the
892 advisory board with the clerk of the senate and house of representatives, the joint committee on
893 financial services, the senate and house committees on ways and means and the division of
894 insurance.
895 Section 232. (a) The commissioner of insurance shall, every 4 years, issue the labor
896 reimbursement rate survey to auto body shops and insurers, as established by the auto body labor
897 reimbursement rate advisory board established in section 231.
898 (b)(1) Not less than every 4 years, the commissioner of insurance shall review the
899 findings of the survey for evidence of whether there is a reasonable degree of competition in the
900 auto body repair market.
901 (2) If the commissioner, through review of the labor reimbursement rate surveys and
902 consideration of competition concludes that a reasonable degree of competition does not exist,
903 then the commissioner shall implement a full rate hearing, under the regulations of the division
40

904 of insurance, to establish a minimum auto body labor reimbursement rate for the commonwealth
905 or a region thereof.
906 (c) In addition to competition, in setting the auto body labor reimbursement rate, the
907 commissioner shall consider: (i) the best available market data relative to auto body repairs and
908 the resulting insurance claims; and (ii) the impact on coverage premiums, including, but not
909 limited to, phasing in the labor rate over a period of not more than 3 years.
910 SECTION 79. Section 7 of chapter 175M of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
911 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 6, the words “and for the
912 administration of the department” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- for the
913 administration of the department and for expenditure by the Workforce Productivity Subfund
914 pursuant to section 12.
915 SECTION 80. Said chapter 175M is hereby further amended by adding the following
916 section:-
917 Section 12. (a) For the purposes of this section, “eligible applicant” shall mean an
918 employer employing not more than 50 employees in the commonwealth; provided, however, that
919 “eligible applicant” shall not include an employer with a plan approved pursuant to section 11.
920 (b) There shall be a Workforce Productivity Subfund within the Family and Employment
921 Security Trust Fund which shall be expended by the director for the administration of this
922 section.
923 (c) There shall be a grant program to support eligible applicants with: (i) costs associated
924 with covering a temporary vacancy due to an employee being on an approved continuous leave;
925 or (ii) other purposes as determined by the director. Eligible applicants may apply for a grant
41

926 pursuant to this section in a form and manner prescribed by the department. Determinations
927 related to grants issued pursuant to this section shall be at the sole discretion of the department.
928 (d) The director may promulgate regulations or other guidance necessary for the
929 implementation of this section including, but not limited to, grant eligibility criteria.
930 SECTION 81. Chapter 176A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
931 section 8DDD the following section:-
932 Section 8EEE. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
933 clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
934 “Cost sharing”, a deductible, coinsurance, copayment and any maximum limitation on the
935 application of such a deductible, coinsurance, copayment or similar out-of-pocket expense.
936 “Health care provider”, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111.
937 “HIV”, human immunodeficiency virus.
938 “HIV prevention drug”, any pre-exposure prophylaxis drug approved for the prevention
939 of HIV by the federal Food and Drug Administration, including any ancillary or support health
940 service determined by the secretary of health and human services to be necessary to: (i) ensure
941 that a drug is prescribed or administered to a person who is not infected with HIV and has no
942 medical contraindications to the use of a drug; and (ii) monitor a person to ensure the safe and
943 effective ongoing use of a drug through: (A) office visits; (B) laboratory testing; (C) testing for a
944 sexually transmitted infection; (D) medication self-management and adherence counseling; or
945 (E) any other health service specified as part of comprehensive HIV prevention drug services by
946 the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, the federal Centers for Disease Control and
947 Prevention, the United States Preventive Services Task Force or an equivalent state-authorized
42

948 body with responsibility to identify health services that are components of comprehensive HIV
949 prevention drug services.
950 (b) Any contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual or group
951 hospital service plan that provides hospital expense and surgical expense insurance, except
952 contracts providing supplemental coverage to Medicare or other governmental programs, that is
953 delivered, issued or renewed by agreement between the insurer and the policyholder, within or
954 without the commonwealth, that provides coverage for any HIV prevention drug shall not
955 require: (i) patient cost sharing; or (ii) prior authorization, step therapy or any other protocol that
956 could restrict or delay the dispensing of any HIV prevention drug.
957 (c) Any contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual or group
958 hospital service plan that provides hospital expense and surgical expense insurance, except
959 contracts providing supplemental coverage to Medicare or other governmental programs, that is
960 delivered, issued or renewed by agreement between the insurer and the policyholder, within or
961 without the commonwealth, that provides coverage for any HIV prevention drug shall not refuse,
962 reject or deny a prescription for any covered HIV prevention drug on the basis of the type of
963 health care provider issuing the prescription for an HIV prevention drug or the venue or practice
964 setting of the health care provider issuing the prescription; provided, however, that the health
965 care provider shall be licensed to prescribe medications.
966 SECTION 82. Chapter 176B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
967 section 4DDD the following section:-
968 Section 4EEE. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
969 clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
43

970 “Cost sharing”, a deductible, coinsurance, copayment and any maximum limitation on the
971 application of such a deductible, coinsurance, copayment or similar out-of-pocket expense.
972 “Health care provider”, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111.
973 “HIV”, human immunodeficiency virus.
974 “HIV prevention drug”, any pre-exposure prophylaxis drug approved for the prevention
975 of HIV by the federal Food and Drug Administration, including any ancillary or support health
976 service determined by the secretary of health and human services to be necessary to: (i) ensure
977 that a drug is prescribed or administered to a person who is not infected with HIV and has no
978 medical contraindications to the use of a drug; and (ii) monitor a person to ensure the safe and
979 effective ongoing use of a drug through: (A) office visits; (B) laboratory testing; (C) testing for a
980 sexually transmitted infection; (D) medication self-management and adherence counseling; or
981 (E) any other health service specified as part of comprehensive HIV prevention drug services by
982 the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, the federal Centers for Disease Control and
983 Prevention, the United States Preventive Services Task Force or an equivalent state-authorized
984 body with responsibility to identify health services that are components of comprehensive HIV
985 prevention drug services.
986 (b) Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service agreement,
987 except certificates that provide supplemental coverage to Medicare or other governmental
988 programs, issued, delivered or renewed, within or without the commonwealth, that provides
989 coverage for any HIV prevention drug shall not require: (i) patient cost sharing; or (ii) prior
990 authorization, step therapy or any other protocol that could restrict or delay the dispensing of any
991 HIV prevention drug.
44

992 (c) Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service agreement,
993 except certificates that provide supplemental coverage to Medicare or other governmental
994 programs, issued, delivered or renewed, within or without the commonwealth, that provides
995 coverage for any HIV prevention drug shall not refuse, reject or deny a prescription for any
996 covered HIV prevention drug on the basis of the type of health care provider issuing the
997 prescription for an HIV prevention drug or the venue or practice setting of the health care
998 provider issuing the prescription; provided, however, that the health care provider shall be
999 licensed to prescribe medications.
1000 SECTION 83. Chapter 176G of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
1001 section 4VV the following section:-
1002 Section 4WW. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
1003 clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
1004 “Cost sharing”, a deductible, coinsurance, copayment and any maximum limitation on the
1005 application of such a deductible, coinsurance, copayment or similar out-of-pocket expense.
1006 “Health care provider”, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111.
1007 “HIV”, human immunodeficiency virus.
1008 “HIV prevention drug”, any pre-exposure prophylaxis drug approved for the prevention
1009 of HIV by the federal Food and Drug Administration, including any ancillary or support health
1010 service determined by the secretary of health and human services to be necessary to: (i) ensure
1011 that a drug is prescribed or administered to a person who is not infected with HIV and has no
1012 medical contraindications to the use of a drug; and (ii) monitor a person to ensure the safe and
1013 effective ongoing use of a drug through: (A) office visits; (B) laboratory testing; (C) testing for a
1014 sexually transmitted infection; (D) medication self-management and adherence counseling; or
45

1015 (E) any other health service specified as part of comprehensive HIV prevention drug services by
1016 the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, the federal Centers for Disease Control and
1017 Prevention, the United States Preventive Services Task Force or an equivalent state-authorized
1018 body with responsibility to identify health services that are components of comprehensive HIV
1019 prevention drug services.
1020 (b) An individual or group health maintenance contract that is issued, delivered or
1021 renewed, within or without the commonwealth, that provides coverage for any HIV prevention
1022 drug shall not require: (i) patient cost sharing; or (ii) prior authorization, step therapy or any
1023 other protocol that could restrict or delay the dispensing of any HIV prevention drug; provided,
1024 however, that cost sharing shall be required if the applicable plan is governed by the federal
1025 Internal Revenue Code and would lose its tax-exempt status as a result of the prohibition on cost
1026 sharing for these services.
1027 (c) An individual or group health maintenance contract that is issued, delivered or
1028 renewed, within or without the commonwealth, that provides coverage for any HIV prevention
1029 drug shall not refuse, reject or deny a prescription for any covered HIV prevention drug on the
1030 basis of the type of health care provider issuing the prescription for an HIV prevention drug or
1031 the venue or practice setting of the health care provider issuing the prescription; provided,
1032 however, that the health care provider shall be licensed to prescribe medications.
1033 SECTION 84. The definition of “federal government shutdown” in subsection (a) of
1034 section 17 of chapter 239 of the General Laws, as appearing in section 54 of chapter 73 of the
1035 acts of 2025, is hereby amended by striking out the word “all” and inserting in place thereof the
1036 word:- any.
46

1037 SECTION 85. The definition of “federal government shutdown” in subsection (a) of
1038 section 42 of chapter 244 of the General Laws, as appearing in section 55 of chapter 73 of the
1039 acts of 2025, is hereby amended by striking out the word “all” and inserting in place thereof the
1040 word:- any.
1041 SECTION 86. Chapter 265 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
1042 section 23A the following section:-
1043 Section 23A1/2. (a) Whoever has sexual intercourse or unnatural sexual intercourse with
1044 a child who has attained the age of 16 but is under the age of 18, and who exercises or has at any
1045 time exercised custodial or supervisory authority over such child as a mandated reporter as
1046 defined in section 21 of chapter 119, shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for
1047 not more than 20 years; provided, however, that this subsection shall not apply if the defendant
1048 was not more than 4 years older than the child at the time of the alleged offense. A prosecution
1049 commenced under this subsection shall not be continued without a finding or placed on file.
1050 (b) Whoever commits an indecent assault and battery on a child who has attained the age
1051 of 14 but is under the age of 18, and who exercises or has at any time exercised custodial or
1052 supervisory authority over such child as a mandated reporter as defined in section 21 of chapter
1053 119, shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for not more than 10 years, or by
1054 imprisonment in a jail or house of correction for not more than 2 ½ years; provided, however,
1055 that this subsection shall not apply if the defendant was not more than 4 years older than the
1056 child at the time of the alleged offense.
1057 (c) In a prosecution under this section, a child under the age of 18 shall be deemed
1058 incapable of consenting to any conduct of the defendant for which such defendant is being
1059 prosecuted.
47

1060 (d) It shall not be a defense to a prosecution under this section that the defendant’s
1061 custodial or supervisory authority over the child has ended, if the child is under the age of 18 at
1062 the time of the offense.
1063 SECTION 87. Section 2 of chapter 275 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
1064 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 5, the words “subscribed by” and
1065 inserting in place thereof the following words:- subscribed, electronically or in person, by.
1066 SECTION 88. Section 22 of chapter 276 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
1067 amended by striking out, in line 4, the words “subscribed by” and inserting in place thereof the
1068 following words:- subscribed, electronically or in person, by.
1069 SECTION 89. Section 63 of chapter 277 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
1070 amended by inserting after the first paragraph the following paragraph:-
1071 Notwithstanding the preceding paragraph, an indictment or complaint for an offense set
1072 forth in sections 22, 22A, 22B, 22C, 22D, 23, 23A or 23B of chapter 265 may be found and filed
1073 at any time after the date of the commission of such offense if the identity of the person who
1074 allegedly committed the offense: (i) was identified after the limitation period set forth in this
1075 section; and (ii) has been established through a DNA analysis, as defined in section 1 of chapter
1076 22E, using evidence collected at the time of the commission of the offense.
1077 SECTION 90. Section 121 of chapter 5 of the acts of 1995 is hereby repealed.
1078 SECTION 91. Item 1599-6063 of section 2A of chapter 268 of the acts of 2022, as most
1079 recently amended by section 42 of chapter 248 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by
1080 striking out the words “that not less than $388,000 shall be expended for the design and
1081 installation of heating pumps for the public library in the town of Hudson,” and inserting in place
1082 thereof the following words:- that not less than $388,000 shall be expended for the design and
48

1083 installation of heating pumps, or for the purpose of roof repairs and general structural
1084 improvements for the public library in the town of Hudson.
1085 SECTION 92. Section 81 of chapter 28 of the acts of 2023, as amended by section 96 of
1086 chapter 9 of the acts of 2025, is hereby further amended by striking out the word “3-year”, each
1087 time it appears, and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following word:- 4-year.
1088 SECTION 93. Section 114 of said chapter 28, as amended by section 98 of said chapter 9,
1089 is hereby further amended by striking out the figure “2027” and inserting in place thereof the
1090 following figure:- 2028.
1091 SECTION 94. Subsection (d) of section 214 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024 is hereby
1092 amended by striking out the word “September” and inserting in place thereof the following
1093 word:- November.
1094 SECTION 95. Subsection (d) of section 112 of chapter 9 of the acts of 2025 is hereby
1095 amended by striking out the figure “2026” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:-
1096 2027.
1097 SECTION 96. Said chapter 9 is hereby further amended by striking out section 129 and
1098 inserting in place thereof the following section:-
1099 Section 129. Notwithstanding section 189 of chapter 149 of the General Laws, the
1100 comptroller, at the direction of the secretary of administration and finance, may transfer up to
1101 $15,000,000 of employer medical assistance contributions from the Commonwealth Care Trust
1102 Fund established in section 2OOO of chapter 29 of the General Laws to the Health Safety Net
1103 Trust Fund established in section 66 of chapter 118E of the General Laws; provided, however,
1104 that this transfer may be in addition to any other transfers from said Commonwealth Care Trust
1105 Fund to said Health Safety Net Trust Fund required in fiscal year 2026.
49

1106 SECTION 97. The special commission on local and regional public health established in
1107 chapter 3 of the resolves of 2016 and revived and continued under section 308 of chapter 238 of
1108 the acts of 2024 is hereby further revived and continued until December 31, 2027.
1109 SECTION 98. The working group established pursuant to line item 4000-0601 of section
1110 2 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024 shall continue to develop recommendations, in addition to
1111 those filed in the personal care attendant working group reports finalized on February 28, 2025
1112 and November 14, 2025. The working group shall submit updated recommendations consistent
1113 with requirements in line item 4000-0601 in section 2 of this act to convene and consult with the
1114 executive office of health and human services to identify savings in addition to those identified in
1115 the November 14, 2025 report to effectuate the long-term viability of the personal care attendant
1116 program. Not later than January 1, 2027, the working group shall file said recommendations with
1117 the secretary of administration and finance and the house and senate committees on ways and
1118 means.
1119 SECTION 99. The intersection of Centre street and Westchester road in the city of
1120 Boston shall be designated and known as Mulvey square.
1121 SECTION 100. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
1122 Massachusetts Department of Transportation shall conduct a comprehensive transit service
1123 assessment of the feasibility of establishing direct rapid bus transit between Kendall square in the
1124 city of Cambridge, the Allston and North Brighton sections of the city of Boston and the
1125 Longwood medical area in the city of Boston.
1126 (b) The assessment shall: (i) identify the transit infrastructure that needs to be preserved
1127 for direct rapid bus transit alternatives between Kendall square in the city of Cambridge, the
1128 Allston and North Brighton sections of the city of Boston and the Longwood medical area in the
50

1129 city of Boston; (ii) review the prospect of constructing and operating on existing rights of way;
1130 (iii) analyze the impact of planned, designed, funded or under construction transportation or
1131 development projects nearby; (iv) identify the potential market for such transit services; and (v)
1132 evaluate the potential economic benefits to the region and to the commonwealth.
1133 (c) The department shall make recommendations on a preferred route and how to
1134 preserve the transit infrastructure necessary for direct rapid bus transit alternatives between
1135 Kendall square in the city of Cambridge, the Allston and North Brighton sections of the city of
1136 Boston and the Longwood medical area in the city of Boston, taking into consideration nearby
1137 transportation and development projects that have been studied, designed, funded or are under
1138 construction. Not later than July 1, 2027, the department shall file a report with the clerks of the
1139 house of representatives and the senate, the house and senate committees on ways and means and
1140 the joint committee on transportation.
1141 SECTION 101. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, not later than
1142 October 1, 2026, the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority shall enter into a lease
1143 agreement with the Friends of the Weston Depot for the use of the parcel or parcels of land
1144 located at 55 Church street in the town of Weston on which the Weston railroad station sits.
1145 SECTION 102. Notwithstanding section 2OOO of chapter 29 of the General Laws or any
1146 other general or special law to the contrary, in fiscal year 2027, the comptroller, at the direction
1147 of the secretary of administration and finance, may transfer to the Commonwealth Care Trust
1148 Fund, established in said section 2OOO of said chapter 29, an amount not to exceed the amount
1149 equal to the cost of the fourth year of the pilot program established in section 81 of chapter 28 of
1150 the acts of 2023 from funds attributable to the federal financial participation received by the
1151 commonwealth for designated state health program expenditure.
51

1152 SECTION 103. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the bureau of
1153 purchased services in the operational services division shall determine prices for programs under
1154 chapter 71B of the General Laws in fiscal year 2027 by increasing the final fiscal year 2026 price
1155 by the rate of inflation as determined by the division. The division shall adjust prices for
1156 extraordinary relief pursuant to 808 C.M.R. 1.06(4). The division shall accept applications for
1157 program reconstruction and special circumstances in fiscal year 2027. The division shall
1158 authorize the fiscal year 2027 price for out-of-state purchasers requested by a program, not to
1159 exceed a maximum price determined by the bureau, by identifying the most recent price
1160 calculated for the program and applying the estimated rate of inflation for each year, as
1161 determined by the bureau pursuant to section 22N of chapter 7 of the General Laws, in which the
1162 rate of inflation is frozen beginning with fiscal year 2004, in a compounded manner for each
1163 fiscal year.
1164 SECTION 104. (a) The executive office of health and human services shall establish an
1165 endometriosis task force, which shall consist of: the secretary of health and human services or a
1166 designee, who shall serve as chair; the commissioner of public health or a designee; the
1167 commissioner of insurance or a designee; the assistant secretary for MassHealth or a designee; 2
1168 representatives from the Massachusetts Medical Society; 1 representative from the
1169 Massachusetts Association of Health Plans, Inc.; and 4 persons to be appointed by the secretary
1170 of health and human services, 1 of whom shall be an individual with a diagnosis of
1171 endometriosis, 1 of whom shall be a representative of a pharmaceutical company that
1172 manufactures a drug or device for detecting, preventing or treating endometriosis and 1 of whom
1173 shall be a representative of a research, advocacy or support organization primarily serving
1174 persons diagnosed with endometriosis.
52

1175 (b) The task force shall: (i) research and summarize advances made in research on and
1176 treatment and diagnosis of endometriosis; (ii) research and summarize advances made in access
1177 to care for persons with endometriosis; (iii) research and summarize services and support
1178 available to persons with endometriosis, including the commonwealth's activities and programs
1179 with respect to endometriosis; and (iv) develop a comprehensive, strategic plan to improve health
1180 outcomes for persons with endometriosis, including recommendations to: (A) advance research
1181 on endometriosis; (B) improve public awareness and recognition of endometriosis; (C) improve
1182 health care delivery for persons with endometriosis; (D) increase early and accurate diagnosis
1183 and treatment of endometriosis; (E) systematically advance the full spectrum of biomedical
1184 research on endometriosis; and (F) summarize any progress made relative related to the
1185 diagnosis and treatment of endometriosis.
1186 (c) The task force shall submit a report of its findings, summaries, plan and
1187 recommendations to the governor and to the clerks of the senate and house of representatives and
1188 the senate and house committees on ways and means not later than June 30, 2027.
1189 SECTION 105. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
1190 Massachusetts Department of Transportation shall develop, implement and maintain a
1191 comprehensive protocol to prevent the occurrence of wrong way driving on limited access
1192 roadways. The protocol shall include, but not be limited to: (i) directional striping on access
1193 ramps, adequate signage, lane delineators, lighting, detection systems which activate multi-
1194 sensory warning devices that alert wrong way drivers and notify public safety agencies of wrong
1195 way driving incidents in real time; (ii) messaging systems which notify motorists of the threat of
1196 a wrong way driver; and (iii) other infrastructure based on current science and research relative
1197 to the prevention of wrong way driving incidents. The protocol shall be implemented in the most
53

1198 expeditious manner possible, pursuant to a multiyear plan which shall identify and prioritize
1199 access ramps and intersections based on a threat level or other similar analysis that shall include,
1200 but not be limited to, documented incidents of wrong way driving and identifiable logistical
1201 defects or deficiencies. The protocol shall be updated periodically, in increments of not less than
1202 3 years. In carrying out this section, the highway administrator shall, in consultation with the
1203 secretary of transportation, prepare a budget for the initial cost of the plan and shall thereafter
1204 issue annual reports that shall include the costs associated with such plan for the next fiscal year,
1205 progress made in implementing the protocol and the protocol’s impact and effects on reducing
1206 incidents of wrong way driving. The report shall be submitted to the senate and house
1207 committees on ways and means, the joint committee on transportation, the joint committee on
1208 public safety and homeland security, the clerks of the senate and house of representatives, the
1209 secretary of administration and finance and the secretary of public safety not later than April 30;
1210 provided, however, that such report shall be made for at least 5 years following the effective date
1211 of this act.
1212 SECTION 106. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the secretary
1213 of public safety shall, in consultation with the secretary of transportation, develop and implement
1214 training practices that ensure that all peace officer training conducted in the commonwealth
1215 includes, as of January 1, 2027, instruction relative to wrong way driving.
1216 SECTION 107. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the registrar
1217 of motor vehicles shall research, develop and transmit through a comprehensive plan of public
1218 service announcements, on an annual basis, information relative to the dangers and prevention of
1219 wrong way driving. The content, transmission and effectiveness of such plan shall be reported
1220 annually to the senate and house committees on ways and means, the joint committee on
54

1221 transportation, the joint committee on public safety and homeland security and the clerks of the
1222 senate and house of representatives not later than March 1.
1223 SECTION 108. The Massachusetts Department of Transportation shall, in consultation
1224 with the registry of motor vehicles, the executive office of public safety and security and the
1225 executive office of aging and independence, conduct a feasibility study on improving roadway
1226 safety for drivers over the age of 70. The study shall include, but not be limited to, an analysis of:
1227 (i) wrong way driving incidents involving drivers over the age of 70; (ii) identification of
1228 roadway design, signage, lighting or geometric factors that may contribute to increased risks for
1229 older drivers; (iii) educational, engineering or technological interventions that may reduce wrong
1230 way driving incidents among older drivers; and (iv) recommendations for infrastructure
1231 improvements, driver education enhancements or policy changes to improve safety for older
1232 drivers.
1233 The study and any recommendations shall be filed with the senate and house committees
1234 on ways and means, the joint committee on transportation, the joint committee on public safety
1235 and homeland security and the clerks of the senate and house of representatives not later than 12
1236 months after the effective date of this act.
1237 SECTION 109. (a) There shall be a special commission to: (i) review current practices
1238 and gaps in transitional planning services; (ii) prepare a comprehensive plan to address the
1239 complex and growing number and needs of persons with disabilities whose entitlement to
1240 services under special education programs has terminated or will terminate as a result of such
1241 person’s graduation from high school or attainment of age 22, hereafter referred to as transition-
1242 age youth; and (iii) recommend solutions to improve transition planning services and outcomes
1243 for transition-age youth and their families or guardians.
55

1244 (b) The commission shall consist of: the secretary of health and human services or a
1245 designee, who shall serve as co-chair; the secretary of education or a designee, who shall serve as
1246 co-chair; 1 representative of the transitional advisory committee within the bureau of transitional
1247 planning; the commissioner of the state vocational rehabilitation agency within the executive
1248 office of labor and workforce development or a designee; the commissioner of MassAbility or a
1249 designee; the commissioner of developmental services or a designee; the commissioner of mental
1250 health or a designee; 1 member of the senate; 1 member of the house of representatives; 1
1251 member appointed by the minority leader of the senate; 1 member appointed by the minority
1252 leader of the house of representatives; the chairs of the joint committee on children, families and
1253 persons with disabilities; 1 member representing The Arc of Massachusetts; 1 member
1254 representing the Massachusetts Down Syndrome Congress; 1 member representing the
1255 Federation for Children with Special Needs; and 3 members to be appointed by the governor, 1
1256 of whom shall represent a program that serves transition-age youth, 1 of whom shall be a
1257 transition-age youth and 1 of whom shall be a caregiver or family member of a recent transition-
1258 age youth with high support needs.
1259 (c) The comprehensive plan shall include, but not be limited to, strategies and
1260 recommendations for: (i) improving and strengthening habilitative services pursuant to sections
1261 12A to 12C, inclusive, of chapter 71B of the General Laws for a person with disabilities whose
1262 entitlement to services under special education programs has terminated or will terminate as a
1263 result of such person’s graduation from high school or attainment of age 22; (ii) improving,
1264 enhancing and modernizing transitional planning and services for persons with disabilities who:
1265 (A) are eligible for adult services through the department of developmental services, department
1266 of mental health or MassAbility pursuant to existing eligibility processes, including, but not
56

1267 limited to, referrals under chapter 688 of the acts of 1983 or applications by the individual or
1268 family; (B) are assessed to be prioritized for residential placement through the department of
1269 developmental services; (C) require intensive staffing for complex behavioral or complex
1270 medical needs through the department of developmental services; and (D) require services from
1271 1 or more member agencies of the transitional advisory committee; (iii) enhancing and
1272 improving coordination, communication and data sharing across local education agencies, the
1273 department of developmental services, department of mental health, MassAbility, individuals and
1274 their families or guardians to support informed, person-centered transition planning including,
1275 but not limited to, education on adult service systems, eligibility processes and available
1276 pathways to employment and independence; (iv) improving and modernizing the referral
1277 program established through said chapter 688 of the acts of 1983 to increase transparency,
1278 advance planning and communication between all involved parties; (v) facilitating information
1279 sharing between members of the bureau of transitional planning with the goal of serving
1280 transition-age youth and their families or guardians prior to, during and after their transition to
1281 adult services; (vi) expanding competitive integrated employment opportunities for transition-
1282 age youth with disabilities, consistent with Employment First policies and the Workforce
1283 Innovation and Opportunity Act; (vii) limiting or eliminating the number of transition-age youth
1284 who do not have a residential placement, if required by their transition plan, identified at least 6
1285 months before their transition to adult services and ensuring that there is a clear process for
1286 transition-age youth for whom an alternative placement is not immediately available; (viii)
1287 increasing options and opportunities for transition-age youth found eligible for residential
1288 supports to maintain meaningful connections with their families or guardians, including through
1289 innovative housing models, cross-agency collaboration and improved use of existing resources,
57

1290 while accounting for and considering workforce capacity, clinical needs and housing availability;
1291 (ix) addressing any unique transition challenges for transition-age youth who are leaving the care
1292 of the department of children and families; (x) promoting, when possible, geographic equity in
1293 services provided across the commonwealth including, but not limited to, habilitative services,
1294 residential living opportunities, employment and day program supports and family supports; (xi)
1295 establishment of regular review processes within the bureau of transitional planning regarding
1296 the efficacy and results of any transition-age services provided by those same member
1297 organizations; (xii) modernizing and updating existing reporting and transition planning data
1298 collection processes and requirements by local education agencies and the department of
1299 elementary and secondary education pursuant to the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act;
1300 and (xiii) identifying evidence-based transition practices that improve postsecondary
1301 employment and education outcomes for students with disabilities, including early engagement
1302 with vocational rehabilitation services, participation in pre-employment transition services,
1303 work-based learning experiences and career and technical education opportunities.
1304 (d) In making its recommendations, the commission shall consider practices related to
1305 communication, education and awareness efforts including, but not limited to: (i) the frequency
1306 of transparent agency communication between relevant agencies and transition-age youth and the
1307 families and guardians of transition-age youth; (ii) the amount of notification time given for
1308 transition plans to be developed and finalized; and (iii) raising awareness of programs,
1309 examining outreach practices and the efficacy of services available prior to, during and after the
1310 transition process to adult services.
1311 (e) The report shall include recommendations for: (i) modernizing and strengthening
1312 habilitative services and transitional planning services for persons with disabilities pursuant to
58

1313 sections 12A through 12C, inclusive, of chapter 71B of the General Laws; and (ii) interagency
1314 data sharing and transition outcome tracking across education, vocational rehabilitation and adult
1315 service systems, including metrics related to employment, postsecondary enrollment and
1316 independent living outcomes for persons with disabilities.
1317 (f) The commission shall submit its report and recommendations, together with drafts of
1318 legislation, if any, to the executive office of labor and workforce development, the executive
1319 office of education, the executive office of health and human services, the clerks of the senate
1320 and house of representatives, the senate and house committees on ways and means, the joint
1321 committee on education and the joint committee on children, families and persons with
1322 disabilities not later than September 30, 2027.
1323 SECTION 110. (a) The department of elementary and secondary education, in
1324 consultation with the operational services division, the department of public utilities and the
1325 registry of motor vehicles, shall study the special education school transportation marketplace to
1326 identify areas to improve the vendor marketplace for special education transportation to ensure
1327 open and free competition.
1328 (b) The study shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i) an analysis of pricing data from
1329 school districts; (ii) an analysis of vendor financial information; (iii) other states’ models for out-
1330 of-district special education school transportation; (iv) the feasibility and efficacy of establishing
1331 a rate structure for special education transportation providers; and (v) any other information
1332 necessary to identify solutions to address the lack of competition in the marketplace.
1333 (c) Not later than July 1, 2027, the department of elementary and secondary education, in
1334 consultation with the operational services division, the department of public utilities and the
59

1335 registry of motor vehicles, shall submit a report of its findings to the chairs of the joint
1336 committee on education.
1337 SECTION 111. Not later than October 31, 2028, the foundation budget review
1338 commission shall file its first report pursuant to section 4 of chapter 70 of the General Laws,
1339 inserted by section 64; provided, however, that prior to filing the first report, the commission
1340 shall review recommendations and utilize data from the local contribution study completed by
1341 the department of elementary and secondary education pursuant to item 7010-0005 of section 2
1342 of chapter 9 of the acts of 2025. If the commission recommendations include proposals that
1343 would result in increased costs to the commonwealth the commission shall identify available
1344 resources to support any recommendations. The review may include other school finance
1345 programs not included in the foundation budget including, but not limited to: (i) aid to rural
1346 schools; (ii) charter school costs; (iii) out-of-district special education costs; and (iv) municipal
1347 school district transportation costs, including road mileage and geographic area. The report shall
1348 be submitted to the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate, the house and senate
1349 committees on ways and means and the joint committee on education shall be made publicly
1350 available on the website of the department of elementary and secondary education.
1351 SECTION 112. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for fiscal
1352 years 2027 through 2031, inclusive, the executive office for administration and finance shall
1353 impose hiring and spending controls to restrict the number of employees for each sheriff’s office
1354 and prevent spending in excess of appropriation. Such controls shall include, but not be limited
1355 to, restrictions limiting the total number of employees at each office and procedures for any large
1356 capital expenditures; provided, however, that the executive office for administration and finance
1357 may permit waivers from hiring controls for demonstrated public safety needs.
60

1358 (b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for fiscal year 2027 and
1359 consistent with current law, including, but not limited to, sections 26 and 27 of chapter 29 of the
1360 General Laws, no sheriff’s office shall spend into deficiency; provided, however, that if a
1361 sheriff’s office requires supplemental funding, said sheriff’s office shall submit sufficient
1362 documentation of the need to spend into deficiency to the executive office for administration and
1363 finance and the comptroller’s office prior to any supplemental budget being filed by the governor
1364 to address such need.
1365 (c) If the secretary of administration and finance determines that a sheriff’s office has
1366 concluded fiscal year 2027 in deficiency without providing sufficient documentation of the
1367 deficiency, or has not complied with the controls imposed pursuant to subsection (a), the
1368 secretary shall place such sheriff’s office under the oversight of the sheriff fiscal oversight
1369 council established in subsection (d).
1370 (d)(1) There shall be within the executive office of public safety and security a sheriff
1371 fiscal oversight council. The council shall oversee the finances of any sheriff’s office made
1372 subject to its oversight under this section.
1373 (2) The council shall consist of the secretary of public safety and security, who shall serve
1374 as co-chair; the secretary of administration and finance, who shall serve as co-chair; and 3
1375 members to be appointed by the governor, 2 of whom shall have experience in the operation of
1376 correctional facilities and 1 of whom shall have experience in state government finance. The
1377 oversight council shall meet and hire staff as it deems necessary to ensure proper oversight of
1378 sheriff operations and finances.
1379 (3) The council, in carrying out this section, shall have access to all records, documents,
1380 accounts, correspondence and any other data and material that is maintained by the sheriffs’
61

1381 offices or other state agencies that the council deems necessary. Upon being subject to oversight
1382 of the council and not less than monthly thereafter, each sheriff subject to the council’s
1383 governance shall provide the council with information on the status of the revenues and expenses
1384 for their office’s operating budget and on the status of revenues, contracting, procurement and
1385 authorized and actual spending for any capital projects. Such reports shall provide itemized year-
1386 to-date expenditures and detailed projections for anticipated expenses for the remainder of the
1387 fiscal year and be in a form prescribed by the council. The council shall submit such monthly
1388 reports to the secretary of public safety and security, the secretary of administration and finance,
1389 the inspector general, the clerks of the senate and house of representatives, the chairs of the
1390 senate and house committees on ways and means and the chairs of the joint committee on public
1391 safety and homeland security.
1392 (4) The council may set financial management metrics to ensure the fiscal and operational
1393 integrity of sheriff operations. The council may formulate and recommend a plan for a sheriff’s
1394 office to stabilize and strengthen its finances, management, operations and asset conditions with
1395 a focus on maintaining activities specifically required by statute, case law or court order while
1396 limiting cost growth year over year and ensuring total annual expenditures do not exceed annual
1397 state appropriations.
1398 (5) If a sheriff’s office fails to meet any financial management metrics or the
1399 requirements of a recommended plan prescribed under clause (4), or if the sheriff’s office’s
1400 failure to comply with subsection (b) demonstrates an inability to appropriately manage the fiscal
1401 and operational integrity of the office, as determined by the council, the council shall take action
1402 to ensure the fiscal and operational integrity of such sheriff’s office, which may include, but shall
1403 not be limited to: (i) appointing a receiver to take operational and managerial control of the
62

1404 applicable sheriff’s office; provided, however, that such receiver shall have experience in the
1405 operation of correctional facilities; (ii) directing the comptroller not to certify any amounts for
1406 payment from a sheriff’s office; and (iii) prohibiting a sheriff’s office from incurring any new
1407 expenditures or obligations without prior approval of the council for a period of time to be
1408 determined by the council.
1409 SECTION 113. (a) Notwithstanding section 53 of chapter 118E of the General Laws or
1410 any other general or special law to the contrary, beginning in fiscal year 2027, the executive
1411 office of health and human services may determine the extent to which to include within its
1412 covered services for adults the federally-optional dental services that were included in its state
1413 plan or demonstration program in effect on January 1, 2002 and the dental services that were
1414 covered for adults in the MassHealth basic program as of January 1, 2002.
1415 (b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, beginning in fiscal year
1416 2027, the executive office of health and human services may impose a cap on a per patient basis
1417 for adult dental services; provided, however, that such cap shall not be less than $1,750 and shall
1418 exempt emergency services. The office may impose additional exemptions to such cap.
1419 (c) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, beginning in fiscal year
1420 2027, the health safety net office established in section 65 of chapter 118E of the General Laws
1421 may impose a cap on a per patient basis for adult dental services; provided, however, that such
1422 cap shall not be less than $1,750 and shall exempt emergency services. The office may impose
1423 additional exemptions to such cap.
1424 SECTION 114. (a) For the purposes of this section, “HDAP” shall mean the HIV Drug
1425 Assistance Program, established under the department of public health and funded in line item
1426 4512-0106 of section 2 of chapter 9 of the acts of 2025.
63

1427 (b) Notwithstanding section 66 of chapter 118E of the General Laws or any other general
1428 or special law to the contrary, in Health Safety Net fiscal year 2026, the comptroller, at the
1429 direction of the secretary of administration and finance, and in consultation with the secretary of
1430 health and human services, may transfer to the department of public health or expend an amount
1431 not more than the amount required from the Health Safety Net Trust Fund, established in said
1432 section 66 of said chapter 118E, for services rendered to Health Safety Net patients participating
1433 in HDAP and any reasonable administrative costs associated with paying for services to such
1434 patients. The secretary of health and human services shall take into consideration supplemental
1435 rebates received by the commonwealth from drug manufacturers for drugs provided through
1436 HDAP.
1437 (c) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the department of public
1438 health shall use any funds transferred or expended for HDAP from the Health Safety Net Trust
1439 Fund in Health Safety Net fiscal year 2026 exclusively for services rendered to Health Safety
1440 Net patients participating in HDAP and any reasonable administrative costs associated with
1441 paying for services to such patients.
1442 SECTION 115. (a) For the purposes of this section, “HDAP” shall mean the HIV Drug
1443 Assistance Program, established under the department of public health and funded in line item
1444 4512-0106 of section 2.
1445 (b) Notwithstanding section 66 of chapter 118E of the General Laws or any other general
1446 or special law to the contrary, in Health Safety Net fiscal year 2027, the comptroller, at the
1447 direction of the secretary of administration and finance, and in consultation with the secretary of
1448 health and human services, may transfer to the department of public health or expend an amount
1449 not more than the amount required from the Health Safety Net Trust Fund, established in said
64

1450 section 66 of said chapter 118E, for services rendered to Health Safety Net patients participating
1451 in HDAP and any reasonable administrative costs associated with paying for services to such
1452 patients. The secretary of health and human services shall take into consideration supplemental
1453 rebates received by the commonwealth from drug manufacturers for drugs provided through
1454 HDAP.
1455 (c) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the department of public
1456 health shall use all funds transferred or expended from the Health Safety Net Trust Fund in
1457 Health Safety Net fiscal year 2027 exclusively for services rendered to Health Safety Net
1458 patients participating in HDAP and any reasonable administrative costs associated with paying
1459 for services to such patients.
1460 SECTION 116. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
1461 comptroller, at the direction of the secretary of administration and finance, shall transfer
1462 $37,500,000 from the Commonwealth Federal Matching and Debt Reduction Fund established in
1463 section 2EEEEEE of chapter 29 of the General Laws, inserted by section 2 of chapter 214 of the
1464 acts of 2024, to the Health Safety Net Trust Fund established in section 66 of chapter 118E of the
1465 General Laws; provided, however, that such funds shall be used first to reduce the shortfall, as
1466 described in subsection (b) of section 69 of said chapter 118E, for health safety net fiscal year
1467 2027 and that any remaining funds may be used to reduce the shortfall in any other open health
1468 safety net fiscal year; and provided further, that the amount equal to any federal financial
1469 participation revenues claimed and received by the commonwealth for eligible expenditures
1470 made from said Health Safety Net Trust Fund with these funds transferred from said
1471 Commonwealth Federal Matching and Debt Reduction Fund shall be credited to said Health
1472 Safety Net Trust Fund.
65

1473 SECTION 117. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
1474 comptroller, at the direction of the secretary of administration and finance, shall transfer
1475 $8,000,000 from the Commonwealth Federal Matching and Debt Reduction Fund established in
1476 section 2EEEEEE of chapter 29 of the General Laws, inserted by section 2 of chapter 214 of the
1477 acts of 2024, to the General Fund.
1478 SECTION 118. Notwithstanding section 189 of chapter 149 of the General Laws, the
1479 comptroller, at the direction of the secretary of administration and finance, may transfer up to
1480 $15,000,000 of employer medical assistance contributions from the Commonwealth Care Trust
1481 Fund established in section 2OOO of chapter 29 of the General Laws to the Health Safety Net
1482 Trust Fund established in section 66 of chapter 118E of the General Laws; provided, however,
1483 that this transfer may be in addition to any other transfers from said Commonwealth Care Trust
1484 Fund to said Health Safety Net Trust Fund required in fiscal year 2027.
1485 SECTION 119. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
1486 comptroller, at the direction of the secretary of administration and finance, in consultation with
1487 the secretary of health and human services, may transfer not more than $15,000,000 from the
1488 prescription advantage program in line item 9110-1455 of section 2 and the Health Safety Net
1489 Trust Fund established in section 66 of chapter 118E of the General Laws in fiscal year 2027 to
1490 support the Medicare Saving or Medicare Buy-In programs established in section 25A of said
1491 chapter 118E; provided, however, that the secretary of health and human services shall certify to
1492 the house and senate committees on ways and means, not less than 45 days in advance of the
1493 transfer, in writing, the amount to be transferred and an explanation of the amount of expected
1494 savings to those programs resulting from the transfer.
66

1495 SECTION 120. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, payments
1496 from the Health Safety Net Trust Fund established in section 66 of chapter 118E of the General
1497 Laws may be made either as safety net care payments under the commonwealth’s waiver
1498 pursuant to section 1115 of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 1315, or as an adjustment to
1499 service rate payments under Title XIX and XXI of the Social Security Act, or a combination
1500 thereof. Other federally-permissible funding mechanisms available for certain hospitals as
1501 defined by regulations of the executive office of health and human services may be used to
1502 reimburse up to $70,000,000 of uncompensated care pursuant to said section 66 and section 69
1503 of said chapter 118E using sources distinct from the funding made available to the Health Safety
1504 Net Trust Fund.
1505 SECTION 121. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, not later than
1506 October 1, 2026 and without further appropriation, the comptroller shall transfer from the
1507 General Fund to the Health Safety Net Trust Fund established in section 66 of chapter 118E of
1508 the General Laws the greater of $45,000,000 or 1/12 of the total expenditures to hospitals and
1509 community health centers required pursuant to this act, for the purposes of making initial gross
1510 payments to qualifying acute care hospitals for the hospital fiscal year beginning October 1,
1511 2026. These payments shall be made to hospitals before, and in anticipation of, the payment by
1512 hospitals of their gross liability to the Health Safety Net Trust Fund. The comptroller shall
1513 transfer from the Health Safety Net Trust Fund to the General Fund, not later than June 30, 2027,
1514 the amount of the transfer authorized by this section and any allocation of that amount as
1515 certified by the director of the health safety net office.
1516 SECTION 122. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, in hospital
1517 fiscal year 2027, the office of inspector general may expend a total of $1,000,000 from the
67

1518 Health Safety Net Trust Fund established in section 66 of chapter 118E of the General Laws for
1519 costs associated with maintaining a health safety net audit unit within the office. The unit shall
1520 oversee and examine the practices in hospitals including, but not limited to, the care of the
1521 uninsured and the resulting free charges. The unit shall study and review the Medicaid program
1522 under said chapter 118E including, but not limited to, a review of the program’s eligibility
1523 requirements, utilization, claims administration and compliance with federal mandates. The
1524 inspector general shall submit a report to the senate and house committees on ways and means on
1525 the results of the audits and any other completed analyses not later than March 1, 2027.
1526 SECTION 123. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, nursing
1527 facility rates for the period beginning on October 1, 2026 under section 13D of chapter 118E of
1528 the General Laws may be developed using the costs of calendar year 2023.
1529 SECTION 124. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for fiscal year
1530 2027, $123,450,000 shall be considered operating assistance and distributed to regional transit
1531 authorities from item 1595-6370 of section 2E. For fiscal year 2027, $94,000,000 of the amount
1532 transferred in item 1595-6370 of said section 2E shall be distributed based on fiscal year 2026
1533 distributions in accordance with the updated fiscal year 2026 bilateral memorandum of
1534 understanding between each regional transit authority and the Massachusetts Department of
1535 Transportation; provided, however, that each regional transit authority shall receive operating
1536 assistance from said item 1595-6370 of said section 2E of not less than the amount received in
1537 fiscal year 2026.
1538 The Massachusetts Department of Transportation may require each regional transit
1539 authority to provide data on ridership, customer service and satisfaction, asset management and
1540 financial performance, including farebox recovery, and shall compile any such collected data into
68

1541 a report on the performance of regional transit authorities and detail each authority’s progress
1542 towards meeting the performance metrics established in each memorandum of understanding.
1543 SECTION 125. Notwithstanding section 59 of chapter 23K of the General Laws or any
1544 other general or special law to the contrary, 100 per cent of the revenue received from a category
1545 1 license, as defined in section 2 of said chapter 23K, pursuant to subsection (a) of section 55 of
1546 said chapter 23K, in fiscal year 2027 shall be transferred as follows:
1547 (i) 31.5 per cent to the Gaming Local Aid Fund established in section 63 of said chapter
1548 23K;
1549 (ii) 20 per cent to the Commonwealth Transportation Fund established in section 2ZZZ of
1550 chapter 29 of the General Laws;
1551 (iii) 20 per cent to the Education Fund established in section 64 of said chapter 23K;
1552 (iv) 13 per cent to the Gaming Economic Development Fund established in section
1553 2DDDD of said chapter 29;
1554 (v) 5 per cent to the Public Health Trust Fund established in section 58 of said chapter
1555 23K;
1556 (vi) 4 per cent to the Community Mitigation Fund established in section 61 of said
1557 chapter 23K;
1558 (vii) 2.5 per cent to the Race Horse Development Fund established in section 60 of said
1559 chapter 23K;
1560 (viii) 2 per cent to the Massachusetts Cultural and Performing Arts Mitigation Trust Fund
1561 established in section 2HHHHH of said chapter 29; and
1562 (ix) 2 per cent to the Massachusetts Tourism Trust Fund to fund tourist promotion
1563 agencies under subsection (b) of section 13T of chapter 23A of the General Laws.
69

1564 SECTION 126. (a) Notwithstanding section 5G of chapter 29 of the General Laws, the
1565 excess capital gains threshold for fiscal year 2027 shall be $2,250,000,000.
1566 (b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for fiscal year 2027, the
1567 comptroller shall transfer capital gains collected in excess of the threshold under section 5G of
1568 chapter 29 of the General Laws on a quarterly basis as follows: (i) 58.6 per cent to the State
1569 Retiree Benefits Trust Fund established in section 24 of chapter 32A of the General Laws; (ii) 20
1570 per cent to the Commonwealth Stabilization Fund established in section 2H of chapter 29 of the
1571 General Laws; (iii) 13.6 per cent to the Commonwealth’s Pension Liability Fund established in
1572 subsection (e) of subdivision (8) of section 22 of chapter 32 of the General Laws; and (iv) 7.8 per
1573 cent to the Disaster Relief and Resiliency Fund established in section 2HHHHHH of said chapter
1574 29.
1575 SECTION 127. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the amounts
1576 transferred pursuant to subdivision (1) of section 22C of chapter 32 of the General Laws shall be
1577 made available for the Commonwealth’s Pension Liability Fund established in section 22 of said
1578 chapter 32. The amounts transferred pursuant to said subdivision (1) of said section 22C of said
1579 chapter 32 shall meet the commonwealth’s obligations pursuant to said section 22C of said
1580 chapter 32, including retirement benefits payable by the state employees’ retirement system and
1581 the state teachers’ retirement system, for the costs associated with a 3 per cent cost-of-living
1582 adjustment pursuant to section 102 of said chapter 32, for the reimbursement of local retirement
1583 systems for previously authorized cost-of-living adjustments pursuant to said section 102 of said
1584 chapter 32 and for the costs of increased survivor benefits pursuant to chapter 389 of the acts of
1585 1984. The state board of retirement and each city, town, county and district shall verify these
1586 costs, subject to rules that shall be adopted by the state treasurer. The state treasurer may make
70

1587 payments upon a transfer of funds to reimburse certain cities and towns for pensions of retired
1588 teachers, including any other obligation that the commonwealth has assumed on behalf of a
1589 retirement system other than the state employees’ retirement system or the state teachers’
1590 retirement system, including the commonwealth’s share of the amounts to be transferred
1591 pursuant to section 22B of said chapter 32. The payments under this section shall be made only
1592 pursuant to distribution of money from the Commonwealth’s Pension Liability Fund and any
1593 distribution, and the payments for which distributions are required, shall be detailed in a written
1594 report prepared quarterly by the secretary of administration and finance and submitted to the
1595 senate and house committees on ways and means and the joint committee on public service in
1596 advance of the distribution. Distributions shall not be made in advance of the date on which a
1597 payment is actually to be made. If the amount transferred pursuant to said subdivision (1) of said
1598 section 22C of said chapter 32 exceeds the amount necessary to adequately fund the annual
1599 pension obligations, the excess amount shall be credited to the Pension Reserves Investment
1600 Trust Fund established in subdivision (8) of said section 22 of said chapter 32 to reduce the
1601 unfunded pension liability of the commonwealth.
1602 SECTION 128. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for fiscal year
1603 2027, the secretary of administration and finance shall direct the comptroller to take any
1604 measures necessary to retain within the General Fund interest earnings that would otherwise be
1605 deposited into or otherwise attributed to a fund, trust fund or other separate account, whether
1606 established administratively or by law, including a separate account established under section 6
1607 of chapter 6A of the General Laws. The secretary and comptroller shall report to the senate and
1608 house committees on ways and means 45 days before any action under this section. The report
1609 shall certify that the secretary, in consultation with the comptroller, has determined that the
71

1610 balance, or a specified part of the balance, is not necessary for the purposes for which it was
1611 made available.
1612 SECTION 129. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for fiscal year
1613 2027, all abandoned property net revenue as defined in section 5H of chapter 29 of the General
1614 Laws shall remain in the General Fund.
1615 SECTION 130. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, not later than
1616 December 31, 2026, the comptroller shall transfer $1,000,000 from the Family and Employment
1617 Security Trust Fund to the Workforce Productivity Subfund established in section 12 of chapter
1618 175M of the General Laws.
1619 SECTION 131. Not later than November 9, 2026, the department of public health, in
1620 consultation with the executive office of housing and livable communities, shall adopt rules or
1621 regulations necessary to implement section 70.
1622 SECTION 132. Sections 51 to 62, inclusive, shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
1623 SECTION 133. Not later than January 1, 2027, the department of elementary and
1624 secondary education, in consultation with the operational services division, shall create a model
1625 procurement template and a model contract for use by school districts for procurement of out-of-
1626 district transportation pursuant to subsection (b) of section 5A of chapter 71B of the General
1627 Laws. The department shall maintain the model documents in the database established in section
1628 5A1/2 of chapter 71B of the General Laws, inserted by section 68.
1629 SECTION 134. The first auto body labor reimbursement rate survey required under
1630 section 232 of chapter 175 of the General Laws shall be conducted not later than January 1,
1631 2027.
1632 SECTION 135. Except as otherwise provided, this act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
72